Chapter 1

Orbis Alius

 

Water drizzled from the metal cans that Lansius carried with the help of a wooden pole. As he passed, the soil around the green vegetable patches grew darker. A strong earthy scent rose as the ground received more moisture.

Despite having done this dozens of times, he couldn’t help but think that he could’ve done it faster if he had sneakers or boots. Alas, all he got was a sad-looking medieval leather shoe with hardened soles.

"Lans, are your legs getting wobbly already?" Marc teased from the well.

Lansius chuckled and returned to the well for a refill, but suddenly lunged his wooden pole at Marc.

"Hah!" Marc parried with his pitchfork and launched a counter sweep.

Lansius blocked it, and the two engaged in a friendly spar, with Marc easily blocking and dodging Lansius' slow swings, taunting him all the while.

After a few more attempts, Lansius finally threw his arms up. "No more… hard to breathe."

Marc didn't even break a sweat; Lansius' attacks only managed to mess up his disheveled short brown hair. Having been trained to wield a polearm, a simple pitchfork posed no challenge for him. "Seems like the master soldier wannabe has poor stamina," he taunted with a smirk.

"Quiet, you," Lansius chuckled breathlessly.

Marc picked up the wooden pole, refilled the metal cans, and continued to water their family plot. Slowly but surely, he covered all their spring vegetables. Their livelihood depended on it.

Unlike the previous year, Lansius could now help with the work. However, he could only do so much before becoming sluggish and exhausted. Nonetheless, he found satisfaction in knowing that he wasn't a freeloader anymore.

"Marc, is there - no other work?" he asked in broken language as they cleaned up.

Marc grinned. "Easier work for you, bro?"

Lansius could only nod. He had yet to master the language well enough to argue.

"Still won't do the wool shop?"

Oof, anything but that...

Lansius shook his head.

Marc snickered. "You can't cook, can't do carpentry, and can't write. So either the wool shop or the tannery."

The thought of working in the tannery made Lansius' stomach churn. Tanneries used urine and manure to treat leather, and even blood, brains, and other animal waste in their process.

"Well, at least you're a freeman," Marc said to cheer him up.

"Freeman?" Lansius learned a new word and sort of guessed its meaning.

"Yeah, unlike us, you can go wherever you want and find work elsewhere."

Lansius furrowed his brows. "You - not free?"

"Well, we could be if we paid our debts. The land, the house, and the tools are provided by the Lord. But we needed money to fix things, buy clothes, or build new fences," Marc explained.

Lansius grew worried. This was the first time he'd heard about this problem.

"No worries. It's only a small sum," Marc reassured him. "But at this rate..."

Lansius followed Marc's gaze and understood the situation. They were planting on not even a quarter of the allotted land. Moreover, the yield was small, and vegetables held little value.

"Oi, don't give me that look," Marc said. "It's true that we're in debt, but we're not planning to move, so it's fine."

"You like it here?" Lansius asked, looking at the vast green meadows.

"Yep, father brought us here when we were little. It's far from the capital, but much safer from war," Marc said, recalling a fond memory of his late father.

The wind blew softly, causing their loose, off-white tunics to flutter, offering a soothing sensation. As spring neared its end, the breeze carried a distinctive fragrance and a touch of aridity.

"Marc! Lans!" a little girl called from outside the field.

"Tanya, why are you here?" Marc, the girl's brother, asked.

Tanya grinned from ear to ear and announced, "Mother bought meat from the market."

"Whoops, gotta go." Marc quickly gathered his tools and sprinted home.

"Aiyo," Lansius protested. He lacked the stamina to chase after Marc, so he took his time cleaning up. His stomach growled at the thought of the missed opportunity. Meat was a rare treat. When Mother Arryn bought some, it was usually just bones for broth, with very little actual meat.

By the time Lansius finished, the sun had turned completely orange, sitting low on the horizon. As he walked home, he spotted Tanya waiting behind the wooden fence. Her golden hair shone brightly against the backdrop of the sunset. She was the only blonde in the village, as the rest, including her brother and mother, had brown hair.

"Tanya, why didn't you go with Marc?" he asked, trying to recall his vocabulary.

"I'd rather walk home with you," she replied with a grin, revealing her missing tooth.

Lansius couldn't help but chuckle. He genuinely enjoyed Tanya's company. Of the three people he knew in this world, she was the closest to him, the one who had kept him sane during the lowest point of his life.

"Hey, let's talk about something. Hmm, have you got your memory back?" she suddenly asked.

"Eh, umm... no, I remember some things, but not much."

"Aww, I really want to hear what your home and village look like." Like other kids, Tanya was curious about the world outside Bellandia.

"Maybe after I learn to speak more."

"You're doing well. Last year, you only talked with hand signals," she said, smiling sweetly.

Unable to resist her charm any longer, Lansius stopped, knelt down, and gestured for her to climb onto his back for a piggyback ride.

"Yay!" She hopped on and wrapped her arms around his shoulders.

"Uff, you - heavier," he muttered.

Tanya laughed, pressing her knees as if riding a horse. In reality, she was underweight like many other children in the village.

Unauthorized use: this story is on Amazon without permission from the author. Report any sightings.

Lansius obeyed and started jogging. He adored the little girl.

When Lansius found himself in this unknown place the previous year, he was severely ill and nearly died. No one rushed him to a hospital or administered first aid. Not knowing the language or his location, he could only assume he had had an accident in a rural part of the world.

After recovering, he realized something unbelievable had occurred. No matter where he looked, there were no light bulbs in Bellandia—no wall clocks or even tissues. The place that resembled the medieval era was indeed from the Middle Ages.

Even worse, his entire past identity had become hazy. He could recall movie plots and books, even The Art of War he had been studying for some reason, and knew he had graduated and worked. But not a single personal name came to mind. No family faces, no memory of his hometown, or even his own name.

The only name that remained was a nickname he had used in realistic-themed online games: Lansius. He had used that name to lead countless players in online battles and felt comfortable being called by it, but he never expected to use the name in reality.

For someone raised in the modern age, the prospect of living in a medieval era seemed bleak, filled with wars, plagues, and backbreaking labor. Lansius became depressed, barely eating, and suffering from a series of fevers. There was little hope for him if not for Tanya.

The little girl cared for him and kept him engaged with her curiosity. Gradually, her words became familiar, and he began to open up, trusting her to keep him moving forward.

 

***

 

The season changed, and summer arrived in Bellandia. Even in the heartland of the Arvena highland, the sun blazed hot, though tempered by the cool mountain breeze. Farmers who had cultivated their land sought shelter in their homes during this time of the year, tending to tasks such as fixing tools and mending clothes.

The land surrounding the village ripened with yellowing crops, just a season away from harvest. Unlike crop farmers, vegetable farmers operated on shorter timetables, planting and replanting multiple times throughout the year. Consequently, Mother Arryn's family continued working during this unforgiving season.

Lansius also lent a hand on the farm today, but after two hours of hard work, he was soaked in sweat and had to stop. He leaned against the cool stone well, groaning as his body ached in the shade of its roof.

So hot... damn it... just unbelievable.

"Ha, told you," Marc exclaimed from beneath his large straw hat.

"Leave him alone and help me with this," Mother Arryn called out.

With a resigned sigh, Marc returned to work under the relentless heat of the sun.

This is so pathetic... at this rate, I'll be depending on them forever.

Lansius observed Marc and Arryn. Despite the heat, they diligently tended to the cabbage and turnip plots, weeding and replanting as needed.

This was Lansius' second year, so he thought he had what it takes to help them. However, the summer sun was nothing like the mildness of spring. The humidity, intensity, and heat easily overwhelmed him. He had tried several times, but always ended up with a nosebleed or a fever.

I need a different job. Something other than manual labor if I want to stand on my own.

"You're probably better off accompanying Tanya in the wool shop?" Arryn suggested, cleaning the hem of her brown working gown from dirt as they finished for the day.

"Maybe..." Lansius answered indifferently while tidying up the tools. His palms ached, but he wanted to help.

Lansius' stubbornness led Arryn to believe he was being too hard on himself, while Marc thought that, despite being unfit for farming, Lansius was too proud to accept a woman's job.

The wool shop, true to its name, was a place where wool was dyed and spun into yarn. Although Lansius didn't mind this kind of work, the pay was meager, and the shop primarily served as a gathering place for village housewives to chat and gossip while working. As an introvert, it would be his worst nightmare.

Arryn and Marc allowed Lansius to make his own decision. Despite their struggles, they didn't rely on his help. Though he was the same height as Marc, Lansius had softer arms and more delicate hands. He ate sparingly and was picky, especially about boiled water for drinking, but mostly took care of himself. While there were areas where he needed help, they weren't too serious.

As the sun began to set, the three fetched Tanya from the wool shop and headed home.

That night, Lansius felt a fever coming on and needed ointment for his blistered hand. Tanya applied a thin layer of salve on his injured palms and distracted him from his worries by sharing stories she'd heard at the shop.

While Lansius felt inadequate, the other family members were grateful for his efforts. He was learning the language and showing his willingness to help. Moreover, Marc was old enough to answer the Lord of Arvena's call, and small farmers like them were required to fulfill military services instead of paying taxes. When selected, men from the village would follow the Lord into battle for up to four months each year. In those times, Arryn would work alone. Lansius' presence provided Marc some peace of mind.

However, Lansius couldn't see it that way. His inability to work like the other men disheartened him. Even without a complete memory, he knew his old life was paradise in comparison. He felt that medieval farming was nothing less than cruel, and the term "backbreaking" seemed like an overstatement until he experienced it firsthand. That night, like many other nights when beset by illness, he vowed to escape the farming life.

 

***

 

The wet season arrived, and drizzle fell almost every day. Winter was still a month away, but the chill in the air was enough to penetrate one's bones.

“Gah,” Lansius panted as they endured the cold, light rain.

“A bit more, keep it up,” Marc encouraged him.

The two were carrying firewood for the village chief. Marc carried a stack of wood on each shoulder, while Lansius managed only one.

“I-is there no other job?” Lansius asked. His shoulder ached and his hips burned.

“Heh, you’re still asking about that?” Marc teased.

Lansius exhaled deeply.

Easy for him to say. I don’t want muscle-head's jobs.

Unfortunately, most jobs were manual labor. While there were some other trades, they were typically passed down from father to son and too small-scale to require additional help.

“Move it fast, lads. It’s getting wet,” urged the old man in dry, thick clothes as soon as he saw them approaching. In contrast, the two youngsters wore only two layers of coarse garments.

The two quickened their pace and hurriedly entered an old but sturdy-looking wooden shed. The place belonged to the village chief, who was wealthy enough to have a separate shed for storing firewood.

Both carefully dropped their stacks of wood on the floor and panted heavily. They had jogged to avoid getting wet but still ended up drenched.

“Took you too long,” the chief complained as he fretted about the firewood getting wet. Nothing surprising there - he was known to be rude, senile, and cheap. Marc only took the job because the chief’s wife always shared some food.

But before they could claim their reward...

“Hey, where are you two going? Stack them first, neatly,” he ordered.

Marc and Lansius groaned but turned around and stacked the firewood as requested. Unlike the small branches they used in their home, the ones they stacked were thick logs that were properly dried. These logs were smokeless and burned longer.

When the two were done, the chief scratched his head, seemingly puzzled.

“What’s the matter?” Lansius asked while rubbing his hands for warmth.

“Tsk- it’s nothing. I just forgot to count them before stacking. Now it’s hard to count.”

“The logs? Why, it’s thirty-six,” Lansius answered flatly.

The chief immediately looked at Lansius with doubt. Even Marc, who was busy cleaning his clothes from wood chips, watched with suspicion.

Hold on, why give me the look?

“I-it’s only six and six…” Lansius explained while searching his vocabulary for the exact word for multiply. He couldn’t find it and started to realize what went wrong.

"You can multiply without using a table?" Marc asked in disbelief.

"Y-yes," Lansius replied, realizing that in this era, people relied on multiplication tables for calculations. The use of numerals similar to Roman numerals made calculation even more challenging.

They can't multiply..? But of course! They have no formal education... This might be my way out. To think it's math and not something groundbreaking like making gunpowder or antibiotics.

Marc looked ecstatic, but the chief wasn't convinced. Even he, along with most merchants and several farmers, knew how to calculate without using a table. So he challenged, "Try to calculate how many legs three horses have. You can use—"

“Twelve,” Lansius blurted out without trying.

His answer startled the old man. “Eleven plus seven?”

“Eighteen.”

The old man continued to furrow his brows. “How about, if five goat each give birth to three baby goat, how many total baby goat are there?"

“Fifteen baby goat,” Lansius answered with a grin.

The chief was furiously engaged in finger-counting. In this method, each finger represented up to four units, corresponding to its three joints and the fingertip. He used his thumb as a pointer to keep track. With this technique, using all eight fingers, he could easily calculate up to 32 units—sufficient to count the days of a month.

When he arrived at the same result, he became slightly frustrated. He had always prided himself on being the cleverest one in the village, but this was his limit. Now, after witnessing Lansius calculate without needing a table or fingers, he was taken aback.

"Young man, have you regained your memory? Are you perhaps an apprentice to a merchant?" The old man's tone was less rude than usual.

Lansius shivered, not from the cold, but from the realization that this could be his ticket out.

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

Chapter 2

Bellandia

 

After a brief but freezing winter, another spring arrived in the Arvena highlands. The snow melted, and the scenery changed dramatically. Meadows turned colorful with purple and yellow wildflowers while the wind carried whiffs of floral scent as the land returned to life once again.

Like most villagers, the Arryn family spent their first week cleaning their yard and maintaining their thatched roof. Afterward, the village welcomed the new spring with a week-long festival. Only after the soil was soft enough did they return to farming.

Last year, Lansius had unexpectedly assisted with the village's annual report, a job typically reserved for the village chief, scribe, or officials. However, his hopes for rapid advancement were quickly dashed. In a rural farming community, there were seldom job that required such skills.

Despite the setbacks, the townsfolk began to see Lansius in a different light. They now viewed him as a foreign merchant apprentice who was robbed and lost in the woods, explaining his odd-looking clothing and inability to speak the common language.

Since Lansius lost his memory, the rumor went unchallenged. Even the village chief wrote such in his reports. The officials learned about the appearance of a foreign straggler, but with the nobles locked in conflicts, they saw it as an unnecessary tidbit.

The Arryn family followed their work routine as usual. During the warm spring season, Lansius was able to help out and they planted more than usual. Things were looking promising.

After the planting season was over, Marc convinced Lansius to accompany him for daily strolls just before sundown. They would make their way around the village plaza, where the young people would socialize under the watchful eyes of their elders. Despite his social awkwardness, Lansius engaged in small talk and gradually improved his speaking skills.

In this world, the common tongue was rough-hewn and direct. Words were utilitarian tools, not elegant and well-articulated. Conversation was a matter of conveying necessity, not crafting poetry. The more polite and formal the conversation, the stiffer it became.

On one such evening, the two found themselves wandering aimlessly and ended up at the butcher shop. Though they were penniless as usual, they still went inside to catch up on the latest gossip and perhaps offer their help in exchange for some slices of meat.

The owner, a retired butcher from the city required no help that day, but he halted them. “Lad, I heard you can do calculations?”

Lansius’ eyes widened. “Yes, I can.”

Connor, the owner, was tall, muscular, with a graying mustache. “Next week I’m going to deliver a new batch of meat jerky to the city. I'm thinking to buy some supplies. Problem is, I don’t know whether my savings will suffice.”

Hmm... shouldn’t be too difficult.

“Can I have something to write?” Lansius asked.

Connor gave him a waxed tablet and a wooden stylus. “Would this suffice?”

"Gratitude. This will do," he said, his words fluent and formal. "Now, name the items you wish to purchase, along with their prices and quantities."

Connor informed him about the goods.

Lansius tallied them and compared the sum against the savings. “You’re still forty copper short.”

“About three silvers short, eh?” Connor approximated while rubbing his chin.

Sensing an opportunity, Marc grinned and hyped it up. “Wow, you sure can count fast. Not even the chief can calculate that much.”

Lansius could only smile sheepishly, but Connor nodding his head. “Indeed, lad, you’re pretty good with this.”

Marc found an opening. “Surely such assistance begets some-“

“But of course,” Connor said happily.

They went home with three iron coins and a sausage. The treat was a pleasant surprise for Tanya and Arryn. Before eating, the boys smelled their cut multiple times to savor it. The meat was juicy, unlike the dry salted meat they had on festivals.

One small favor led to another. In the following weeks, the number of people asking for help, while random and inconsistent, steadily grew. Lansius was happy, but knew that he couldn’t count on them for a living.

When spring almost came to a close, Connor returned from his trip. He happily reported that Lansius’ calculation had saved him from taking out loans. Now, he wanted Lansius to teach his oldest child calculation.

Lansius, ever in a hurry to escape from farming life, immediately agreed. With mother Arryn’s blessing, he took two students under his wing. At first, he thought that this was doomed to fail, but he soon realized that he was dealing with teenagers, not kids. They were well-behaved and curious, so the teaching went smoothly.

For his effort, he earned six iron coins or half a copper daily. A copper was the price of a full meal with ale, so Lansius’ rate was abysmal. Earning half a meal per day was not a living wage, but he was content.

The road to financial independence is never easy.

Afterward, things took a positive turn. During the summer, he gained two additional students: the village chief's son and the baker's child. With more students, his income increased, allowing him to earn a copper a day. Summer passed smoothly, but when autumn arrived, tutoring came to an abrupt halt as the entire village turned its attention to the harvest.

Harvest was the biggest celebration of the year, and other festivities like marriage and feast were commonly arranged around it. Only after the festivity ended, did things slow down as people prepared for winter.

One day, on a clear but windy day, without warning, hundreds of armed men marched towards Bellandia. It was then that the villagers learned that Arvena was at war. Young lord Arte led a column of men, including wounded soldiers and refugees, towards Bellandia. They camped outside Bellandia and waited for reinforcements. Marc and the other villagers were called for training.

This unforeseen event made Lansius worried. He had never had any experience with war or fighting before. Although he never said it, he felt sickened by not knowing what was going to happen. In his mind, the situation could worsen at any moment.

 

***

 

Days passed in more or less the same routine. The only difference was that Lansius frequently spent his free time with other men from the village. During one such gathering, the topic of magic was raised. Some believed that the lord might employ a mage or a saint candidate as a healer.

Intrigued, Lansius found himself increasingly drawn to the subject. Magic was something he had always yearned to witness. Thus, he followed the crowds to the newly established camp nearby to listen and learn about the world beyond his village.

However, rather than learning about magic, Lansius found himself becoming an object of curiosity. The men at the camp were intrigued by his foreign features. No one had seen dark hair like his before. While they were familiar with various shades of blonde and lighter brown, his near black hair was a novelty. Even men who hailed from distant lands, such as the Mercantile Kingdom in the Far East or the Navalnia Empire, hadn't encountered someone with such distinct hair color.

Lansius came to realize his distinctiveness. Then, abruptly, a voice rang out. “You with the dark hair, the young lord wants to see you,” someone declared in a commanding tone.

Lansius looked around and saw that everyone’s gaze had turned toward him as an imposing man in a fresh white tunic approached. The man motioned for Lansius to follow him.

The crowd’s eyes dutifully followed as Lansius and the knight headed toward a particularly large tree.

Lansius saw young lord Arte sitting regally on a small wooden chair, surrounded by burly men, presumably his knights.

Gulping, Lansius stammered, “My lord.” The words felt foreign. He had never addressed a lord before.

“No need to be so tense,” Arte responded. “I just heard a story of a foreigner who was robbed, lost his memory, and couldn’t even speak the language.”

“Indeed, that is my story,” Lansius confirmed, relieved that he found the right words.

“Do you remember anything about your home?”

The story has been stolen; if detected on Amazon, report the violation.

Lansius shook his head. “I can’t remember.”

“Ah,” the young lord mumbled, then changed his tone. “Tell me, what do you do in this village?”

“I teach children to calculate,” Lansius managed, feeling the constraints of his limited vocabulary.

The young lord laughed upon hearing this, appearing pleased about something.

“If you can count, why not calculate the number of our troops or something? Entertain us, will you?” said one of the burly men.

“That’s a good idea. Can you do it?” the young lord agreed.

Lansius hesitated for a moment. However, his interaction with the young lord validated what others had said about him. The young lord seemed genuine. Thus, he answered, “I believe I can.”

“Excellent,” Arte replied, clearly excited.

The knight who had approached Lansius earlier now signaled to some men. “Assemble the men who can walk. No armor, no weapons. And make no unnecessary commotion.”

Slowly, the camp came to life with calls and shouts as everyone who was able sprang into action, readying themselves for formation. The knights watched from the sidelines, clearly considering themselves above the call. For them, this was merely entertainment.

“My lord, the men are ready,” the knight reported to Arte.

The young lord stood and inquired, “Well, can you calculate the number of men in their current formation?”

Nodding, Lansius realized that his actions had led hundreds of men to assemble, many of whom were wounded. The pressure was immense, and the villagers watched intently.

Observing the formation, he noted that the men were arranged in five deep ranks. The first and subsequent ranks consisted of equal numbers, only the last was missing a few men.

The front consisted of 22 men and 5 ranks deep. So, 110. But they are missing three to complete the formation.

“My lord, it’s 107,” Lansius answered. Clearly, Arte had fully expected him to count manually or to use a stylus and multiplication table.

“Oui, that was quick. Are you certain?” Arte asked a fierce glint in his young eyes, perhaps a byproduct of this violent era.

“More or less, my lord,” Lansius confirmed.

Fascinated, Arte ordered, “Send in the squires.”

Three teenagers hurriedly began to count the men manually, each starting from a different point. They divided the formation into thirds and ran while counting. It was evident that they were accustomed to this method.

After a short wait, the squires returned and announced, “My lord, it’s 107.”

Lansius was inwardly pleased. The count matched his own calculation exactly.

The knights looked pleased, as did the young lord who dispersed the formation. The 107 men also appeared amused by the recent events. Many eyes turned toward Lansius, a level of attention he was unaccustomed to.

Arte returned to his seat and asked, “What is your name, man?”

“It’s Lansius, my lord,” he responded, surprised that Arte would even ask. The social chasm between them was so wide that it would normally be unthinkable for Arte to need to remember the name of a lowly subject like him.

"Lansius, you're an interesting man. How about joining my retinue?" Arte's offer drew chuckles from his knights.

At this, Lansius was dumbfounded, struggling to process the unexpected offer.

 

***

 

Two weeks had passed since the arrival of the armed column. The trees had shed their orange leaves, and the cold air from the western Targe mountains had descended upon the Arvena highlands, signaling the approaching winter.

Despite the usual calm during this time, the town and villages near Bellandia saw an influx of armed men arriving from distant towns and cities. The majority didn't stay and continued their march eastward. Most traveled light, as supplies were plentiful and easy to come by so soon after the harvest.

The situation reached its peak when Lord Maurice of Arvena, Arte's father, arrived in Bellandia with his personal column.

Today was the second day after the Lord's arrival. Despite all the military activities and the rising prices, the Arryn's household continued their life as usual, except for the addition of a mother and daughter who were war refugees. Arryn gladly sheltered them in her house.

The guests helped with the chores and offered some coins for food. With the farm empty for winter, Arryn, Tanya, and the guests went to the wool shop. Meanwhile, the boys were busy fixing things like roofs, window covers, and fences.

Despite his training, Marc was only out at noon for a few hours. Interestingly, Marc wasn't the only one brushing up on military matters. Last week, Lansius had encountered a rather memorable scene involving himself, the troops, and the young lord.

While Lansius didn't think much of this encounter, others insisted that he had impressed the young Lord, who had asked him to join. However, Lansius felt that the young Lord was only joking, as he was neither a fighter nor a competent scribe.

As the sun was rising and today was laundry day, Marc and Lansius busily scrubbed and beat their clothes with a wooden bat before rinsing them.

Suddenly, a woman’s voice rang out from outside, “Lansius. I’m looking for Lansius.”

Marc and Lansius stared at each other. Lansius cleaned his hand from the white ash they used as a detergent, but Marc headed straight to the front.

“Wow, a woman, not from Bellandia, too. I never thought this could happen to you,” Marc commented sarcastically.

Lansius splashed water on Marc for his stupid comment.

“Bah!” Marc reacted by trying to smack Lansius’ back as he went past him, but missed. He ended up grinning and shaking his head while returning to his laundry.

The woman leaned against the short wooden fence, her hands resting lightly on the rough wood. Unlike most of the women in the village, her hair was cut short.

“I’m Lansius,” he said as he approached.

“I can tell from the hair,” she quipped.

Lansius unconsciously frowned. Unlike other people’s brown hair, his was almost charcoal dark. He disliked it as it made him stand out.

The woman missed the subtle change. “Are you really a foreigner?”

"I think so. Even now, I'm struggling to talk." He wasn't being modest; despite two years and daily chats in the village plaza, he was only slightly better than basic.

“I understand you enough.” She straightened her posture and revealed a weathered black gambeson. An exquisite-looking belt decorated her waist and a well-worn scabbard hung neatly on one side.

“I’m Stefi, a Squire. They sent me to help you on the journey ahead.” She gave a little bow at the end.

Lansius blinked several times to process what he just heard.

Ehhh... a squire? Accompany me? A girl...!?

Nervously, Lansius guessed why she was here. He concluded that the young lord's offer was real. However, nobody had informed him about this arrangement.

“May I call you master Lansius?” she asked indifferently.

“Eh, no, I’m not someone important. Just Lans is enough," he clarified.

Stefi stared at him briefly. Lansius noticed that there was something about her gaze. It was so abnormally powerful and penetrating.

Not wanting to start on the wrong foot, Lansius decided to explain his stance. “Listen, before anything else, you should know that I haven’t made my decision yet.”

She looked surprised. An invitation from a noble was a formality. It was hardly refused, either due to its prestige and opportunity, or fear of punishment. “Are you by any chance afraid of the upcoming battle?”

“That is one concern, yes,” he admitted. Life for him was already hard without sanitation and antibiotics. Adding war into the mix would be suicidal.

Stefi offered a stiff smile and explained, “Be at peace. At most, you’re probably going to work as a scribe.”

“But I never travel out and I can’t even write that well.”

Lansius' confession broke the ice and made the squire chuckle. “That’s why I’m here. And Lans, put more trust in your ability. I was there, you know, when you counted the troops.”

“Ah…” he muttered.

“The troops had barely assumed formation. The squires just started their counts when you finished counting. How did you do that?” Stefi asked with great interest.

“It’s just multiplication,” he said, but he knew that mental math was uncommon in this era.

“But you didn’t even use a multiplication table. That’s amazing, you know?”

The way Stefi said it made Lansius rather proud. However, he still had doubts. “I’m just a farmer turned teacher. I only want to live in peace.”

“Ahh, so you’re that kind of man,” she said, gazing out across the landscape.

“I’m not sure I follow,” Lansius replied.

“Humble. Many people get a speck of skill and become pompous and haughty.”

Lansius couldn’t help but smile at her kind words.

“Is that your house?” She gestured at the small hovel.

“Yup,” he remarked without any intention of hiding that he lived in poverty.

“Looks cozy and well taken care of, aside from the rotted thatched roof and wood panels," Stefi observed.

"Indeed, it needs a bit of repair," Lansius admitted.

Stefi nodded sympathetically. "Must be costly..."

"Yep." Lansius knew where the conversation was headed and braced himself for her sales pitch.

"So why don't you accept the offer? Being a lord’s retainer brings wealth and status. What’s not to like?”

Lansius was hesitant and asked sheepishly, "Do you know about the pay?"

“For non-combatants on a campaign, it’s usually half silver a day.”

Half silver was six copper; it was six times his income. Lansius started to see the benefit.

“I don’t know about teachers’ pay, but I think it’s hard to pay for a better house,” Stefi teased.

Lansius unconsciously nodded in agreement.

Stefi noticed the subtle change. “I heard you guys aren’t related, but... don’t you want to help them out? I imagine working the land is hard on the body.”

Lansius exhaled deeply. Mother Arryn’s back was getting worse while blue dyes wrecked Tanya’s fingers. The family had taken care of him, a complete stranger. It was only natural for him to help them back.

“How about if I return tomorrow morning for your answer?” She knew not to push too hard.

“Yeah, that’s probably for the best.”

“I hope you say yes, otherwise I’m stuck with half-pay,” Stefi commented without sounding bitter.

“Eh, why?”

“Well, because I don’t have a duty right now,” she answered flatly.

“But you’re a squire?”

“A masterless one. My knight master, unfortunately, died on a hunt. Maybe I’ll tell you about her when we have the time.”

“I’m sorry to hear that… but why won’t other knights employ you?”

She giggled. “Because I’m a female and most all other knights are males. If I fuck around and become pregnant, then they’ll be the one who gets the blame.”

“T-that’s awful…” He felt embarrassed by the frank answer.

She laughed. “It’s just a lame joke. But yeah, at any rate, you would be stuck with me. But don’t worry. I’m more reliable than my looks.”

Lansius smiled at Stefi’s self-promotion. "Is it common for women to become squires or knights?"

Stefi furrowed her brows momentarily. "Oh, I guess you didn't know since you're not from here. It's rare. Probably my master and I were the only ones, so I usually work with the servants. Why, do you wish to change for another squire?"

"No, not at all," he said, shaking his head. "I'm just curious."

Sensing a change in his mood, she asked, "So, how about it? Are you coming?"

He mulled about it. “Are you sure about no fighting?”

“Of course! We’re only defending against a small incursion. We’ll be mostly at the rear, far from any battle.”

Lansius was getting swayed. He looked around to settle his mind and spotted Marc hanging clothes.

“He too, would get an exemption,” she whispered.

Lansius’ eyes widened. He looked her dead in the eye and asked, “Are you sure?”

“It’s common knowledge that the Lord can only levy one from a family.”

He knew that most men in the village had already answered the call. While a lord couldn't legally force the same man to answer the call multiple times, they could impose a quota on the village or settlement. As a result, many volunteered multiple times on behalf of their sons or other male relatives. Youngsters and first-timers like Marc, who had no protection from their parents or uncles, were sure to get selected.

Lansius finally found his courage. “When will we depart?”

Stefi smiled brightly. “Tomorrow after sunrise.”

“So soon?” he asked while trying to steel his resolve.

“Winter is coming in a month or two, so we’re running out of time,” she remarked. “Don’t worry, I’ll prep you up and show you the basics.”

Lansius remained doubtful. He couldn't shake off the feeling that he was being treated as an exotic pet with a talent for numbers. If that were the case, assigning him a squire would make sense - not as an assistant, but more like a handler.

Despite his pessimism, he still wanted to repay the family’s kindness. Lansius wasn’t trying to play a hero. For him, it was about survival chances. Obviously, a scribe in the backline was safer than footmen in the frontline. As he reached out to offer his right hand, he found himself already contemplating the words he would use to say goodbye to the family, preparing an excuse for Arryn, Marc, and especially Tanya.

Stefi took Lansius' hand, and the two clasped hands to seal the deal. "I swear to protect you from harm and injury until we reach our destination."

“I put my life in your care,” Lansius said, taking a leap of faith.

Autumn of Elven Calendar 4422 was drawing to a close.

 

***

 

Chapter 3

Ceresia

 

On his last night in Bellandia, Lansius told his family about his decision to join young Lord Arte as his retinue. His family was mostly ecstatic. However, Mother Arryn felt the need to warn him, "Remember, we’re just village folk, and you still have a lot to learn about interacting with nobles."

“It’s not that scary, Mother. Besides, expectations are low for country folks like us,” Marc reassured. He then added, “Based on your abilities, you’ll probably work in the supply camp. The worst that could happen is joining a scouting party to count enemy soldiers, but that’s unlikely since you’d need to know how to ride a horse.”

Lansius nodded, hoping Marc’s assessment was accurate.

“You know what Connor told me?” Marc asked.

“The butcher? No, why?”

“Don’t overthink it. Learn as you go if you have to. Opportunities are rare,” Marc said, smirking proudly as he reiterated Connor’s advice when Marc was selected for training.

Mother Arryn crossed her arms and muttered, “Well, the worst that can happen is they’ll send you home.”

Marc laughed and patted Lansius’ shoulder. “I’ll lend you my rucksack and shoulder bag. Now, let’s prepare things for the journey.”

Lansius didn’t tell them that accepting the offer would spare Marc from being levied.

...

 

Early in the morning after breakfast, horses around the camp were saddled. Men refilled their waterskins, and clothes and other gear were packed. Everyone, including a number of camp followers, was ready to march. Mules and horse carts laden with supplies were also lined up.

Meanwhile, inside Arryn’s household.

“Wear this for the winter,” she instructed as she unloaded items from a wooden chest.

“Gratitude.” Lansius examined the woolen coat and found it to be in good condition despite its age.

“Lans, take this for good luck,” said Marc.

Lansius looked at a small iron medallion resembling a coin with intricate patterns. “Where did you get this?”

“It belonged to Father.”

Lansius furrowed his brows. “Are you sure you want to give me this?”

“Yep,” Marc said, pulling out his own medallion. “I have a better one, see?”

Lansius grinned.

“Have you packed your mittens and thick gloves?” Arryn interjected.

“Yes, I’ve packed those already.”

“Extra foot wraps for the road?” she inquired.

“Already gave him two,” Marc answered.

She nodded. “That should suffice.”

Lansius’ rucksack was now filled. Next was the shoulder bag, which he packed with packages of dried meat, hard biscuits, a small sack of flour, some raisins, and carrots.

“Here’s the waterskin. It’s old but still sturdy and not leaky,” Marc said as he handed over what was essentially his own gear to Lansius.

“Gratitude, Marc. Let me pay you for this.”

“No need, you’ve already shared enough. I can buy another one later when I need it,” said Marc.

After they finished packing, Tanya came in and hugged him. “I was about to make you a hood, Lans, but it’s not finished yet. I’m sorry I can’t give you anything.” Her voice was tinged with regret.

Lifting her, he reassured her, “Don’t worry about it. Take care of Mother and Marc for me. I’ll come home when I can.”

“Hush, you’re going to work as a retinue,” Arryn corrected him. “Obey your master and don’t ask to come home too soon; wait until you’ve done something worthy. Don’t worry about us.”

Smiling at her wise advice, Lansius felt grateful. Given the hurried nature of his departure, he had little time to dwell on his emotions. His farewell might have been more emotional and potentially awkward if he had more time.

After saying his goodbyes and sharing warm hugs with everyone, Lansius, with a heavy heart, stepped out the door. His family waved as Lansius shouldered his rucksack and began to walk toward the camp.

The sun was still far on the east and the wind was cool, Bellandia looked amazing around time like this.

As Lansius had expected, a woman in black gambeson waited not far from his house. Stefi approached Lansius and asked, “All set?”

Lansius tapped at his shoulder bag. “Hopefully, it’s enough.”

“I’ll share if you’re missing something,” Stefi reassured him. She then led him to a section of the camp where her horse was kept. It was already saddled and ready to go; a young servant stood by, waiting.

“Gratitude. Here’s a coin.”

Upon being paid, the servant darted into the crowd that was preparing to leave, apparently in search of his own master.

“What do you think of Horsie?” Stefi asked.

“She looks gentle, but I don’t know anything about horses,” he admitted.

Stefi chuckled. “Come on, take the reins, and let’s go.”

Lansius wasn’t sure. “I’ve never held horse reins before.”

“Don’t worry, she’s docile. Time to get acquainted,” Stefi said, smiling.

He gazed at her questioningly. “You’re going to train me to ride?”

“There’s no reason not to. Just don’t pull too hard. Guide her gently.”

Lansius did as he was told, and they finally hit the road. It was bustling with a column of people, knights, horse carts, pack mules, and even donkeys, all marching eastward toward their final destination: Riverstead City.

 

***

 

Elven Calendar 4422

In an era marked by rising tensions and escalating raids, Viscount Karius, the formidable Lord of Inglesia, committed the ultimate act of aggression. He crossed the Great River and launched a large-scale attack on the jewel of the Arvena province - the city of Riverstead.



Despite Lord Maurice of Arvena’s attempts to fortify the city, even sending his own son to bolster its defenses, the city of Riverstead fell prey to Karius’ surprise assault.

The High Lords viewed this as an overt act of hostility and aimed to censure the Lord of Inglesia. However, the Imperium’s archaic bureaucracy, slow and unresponsive, sought to label the incident as a minor border squabble among its vassal lords.

This attempt was a bid to preserve a semblance of peace within a realm already besieged by wars, particularly the Western front’s ongoing struggle against nomadic incursions.

Unwilling to wait for the slow response of the Imperium, Lord Maurice mustered his forces, marching them to Ceresia on the eve of winter.

 

***

 

One month after leaving Bellandia.

Lansius was suddenly awoken by a chilling gust of wind, causing his body to stiffen and his face to ache from the cold. Blinking, he found himself curled up around a faintly glowing campfire inside an old barn. Despite the fire's warmth, he could see his breath turning into vapor.

“It’s still not dawn,” Stefi whispered beside him.

Lansius nodded and pulled his rough woolen blanket tighter around himself. The wind outside howled and shook the barn, making it feel even colder. Despite the thick rags and hay mats on the ground, the cold still seeped through.

Only the crackling fire and the friendly faces of his comrades brought any relief. Gradually, Lansius began to drift back to sleep.

Lansius and the Arvena troops had been marching to retake Riverstead for almost a month when they encountered sudden, drastic changes in the weather. No one wanted to be caught in a blizzard, so they scrambled to find winter quarters.

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

Lansius' group had found refuge in an abandoned barn in Ceresia village, where they had been trapped for over a month. Yet winter was still in full force, with frequent snowfall and blizzards.

Today was another cloudy day, with weak sunlight filtering through the gaps in the wood panels. The early risers were already up and about, preparing breakfast. Nobility and city dwellers didn't typically eat so early in the morning, but on a campaign, it was a necessity. Morning was one of the few times they could cook without much interruption.

Lansius's stomach growled, and he knew the wine and water he drank each night would upset his digestion. Nevertheless, he needed a sip or two to warm up. Just as he was about to sigh, Stefi appeared with a bowl of stew she had received from the cook.

“You’re awake?” she asked, offering him the bowl.

“Gratitude,” he said, taking the bowl and sipping the warm, savory broth.

Smells burnt just as usual, but the warmth hits the spot.

Lansius took another spoonful, while Stefi gobbled down a thick, round bread. They swapped the bowl for the bread and continued eating.

Stefi didn’t bat an eye when they shared the bowl and spoon; partly because she was raised as a squire, but mainly because of practicality.

Most men carried a wooden plate and spoon, but washing them repeatedly in ice-cold water was a daunting task. One trick was to use a heated rock from the fireplace and dunk it in a bucket to warm the water, but even then, nobody wanted to do it repeatedly. Thus, sharing utensils was a common practice. However...

Don’t think about it-

But this is the same bowl and spoon...

For better or worse, Lansius hadn't been close to a woman his own age in two years. But now, he and Stefi were practically inseparable. They marched, ate, and slept beside each other every day.

Stefi, despite being younger, was experienced and had taught Lansius the basics of survival during their journey, including what to wear, what to eat, and how to prepare a tent. As they traveled, they inadvertently shared some intimate moments. Once, cleaning and washing resulted in a skinny dip in the stream; another time, two straight days of steady drizzle meant they had to sleep half-naked in the tent.

While Stefi seemed oblivious to the intimacy of their shared experiences, Lansius treasured each memory, vividly etching them onto the canvas of his mind. There had even been a spur-of-the-moment kiss from Stefi, not out of passion, but mischievously.

Apart from a few innocent slip-ups, Lansius had managed to conduct himself exceptionally well, earning Stefi's respect. Her mentor had warned Stefi about men's lecherous tendencies, yet Lansius had proved himself an exception. For Stefi, what had started as a menial job babysitting a scribe had turned into a pleasant experience.

Their camaraderie led others to tease them as a couple, which wasn't surprising given their closeness. Anyone who knew saw them as socially compatible and of the right age to marry.

As for themselves, despite her brash demeanor, Lansius admired her honesty and resourcefulness. Meanwhile, Stefi respected Lansius' educated background and his status as part of the young Lord's retinue.

A pat on Lansius’ shoulder brought him back to the present. “Time for some sparring,” Stefi said.

“Right,” Lansius responded as he followed her with a borrowed sword. The owner allowed anyone to use it for training, but it was old and dull. As Lansius unsheathed it, he felt surprised that it was so light, unlike what he had imagined.

“Show me your middle guard,” Stefi instructed, preparing her own stance.

Lansius gripped the handle and pointed his sword at shoulder height, remembering where to place his thumb and not to death grip the handle.

“Alright, parry mid, low, and high. En-garde!” With a swift motion, Stefi thrust her sword toward Lansius’ torso. It came like a blur, but Lansius parried it sideways. Stefi continued with a low slash. Lansius took a step back and defended his limb with a block.

Stefi wasn’t done and directed her sword upward. Lansius knew the routine, but instinct made him to dodge backward. He felt it was more natural. However, she followed up with a swing that stopped inches from Lansius’ neck.

“You need to parry it,” she warned him before pulling out her sword.

“My bad,” he exclaimed. “But it feels natural.”

Stefi didn’t bother with his rant. “Again.”

They resumed their stance. Repetition built muscle memory, and gradually there was less hesitation in Lansius’ moves.

Stefi had worked tirelessly to teach him the correct way. At first, he had been clumsy and had some misconceptions about swordsmanship, but now he was starting to get the basics right.

The two weren't the only ones practicing. Breakfast had ended, and more people were exercising. Many young first-timers practiced with their spears, but Stefi felt that more spear training would be useless for Lansius. Since there were no words about Lansius' appointment, Stefi, as a squire, fell back on things she knew best, which was sword training. She thought that teaching him some sword combat would be useful.

Around midday, the barn turned into a chaotic work group. Some people searched for cracks in the walls to patch up, while others tended to the horses and mules. A few went outside, braving against ankle deep snow to relieve themselves in the adjacent hut.

When the sun was at its highest, everyone paused to bask in its warmth. Unfortunately, lunch wasn’t very appetizing. The bread from this morning was blackened and soggy.

Lansius sat with his back against the wall, trying to munch the tasteless bread. A slice of ham, cheese, or pickles would have been a welcome addition, but those were reserved for the nobles.

“Still having trouble with the bread?” Stefi asked.

He groaned, “It’s mushy and tastes horrible.”

She chuckled. “Just be grateful it’s still white. When things get hard, they use cheap grains, the ones they used to feed the mules.”

In shock, he asked, “How does that thing taste?”

“Horsebread? They’re gross, smell and taste like dirt.”

Lansius’ terrified face made Stefi giggle.

“Finish your bread and do some riding while there’s still light,” she said and rose up.

Lansius followed and spent an hour riding slowly around the tight enclosure. Far from riding on his own, Stefi was the one pulling the horse’s reins on foot. She taught him how to sit correctly on the saddle and what not to do when riding.

Despite just sitting on the saddle, it was tiring for someone who wasn’t accustomed to the rocking motion. It wasn’t as easy as he had imagined, and the horse’s smell was giving him a hard time. “Are you sure the saddle is alright?”

“Well, maybe it could have better paddings, but...” she shook her head.

Lansius understood the reason. Maintaining her gear alone was costly; boots needed new soles, coats needed mending, and horses needed fodder, to name a few. It was lucky that her old master used good bridles that still worked despite years of usage.

“Well, don’t mind my ramblings. I’m already grateful that you are teaching me how to ride.”

She chuckled. “Give thanks to Horsie. She’s the one who carried you around.”

The horse neighed as if she understood.

Soon, the sun began to set in the west. The temperature dropped and people begrudgingly donned coats and blankets. Despite daily exercise or handling animals, they rarely bathed, only doing so when absolutely necessary.

Lansius too adopted this practice to some degree, finding the hassle of bathing not worth the effort. When he did wash up, he used a bucket of warm water, a clean cloth, and firewood ash as soap.

Cleanliness was appreciated but difficult to achieve, thus it was common to find cases of rashes and other skin disorders. Clothing was the only thing preventing an outbreak of body odor and putrid smells, as the many layers of fabric kept the unpleasant odors inside.

As someone with a sensitive nose, Lansius avoided unpleasant smells when possible, but his introversion made him reluctant to say anything about his group. Eventually, Stefi noticed and moved together to a group that stank less.

The new group eventually found out about Lansius’ hair. Despite his attempt to always cover it up with a hood or traveling cloak, he couldn’t hide them forever. Unlike what he had feared, nobody behaved differently. The men were interested in his foreign background, but largely unconcerned. Only then did Lansius feel truly welcomed.

The cold season seemed endless, and people passed the time with chatting, playing dice, and preparing meals. When the sun went down, the barn grew quiet except for the bubbling of the cauldron and the crackling of the fire.

Despite the monotonous routine, people did their best to entertain themselves with music, storytelling, or gossip. As a foreigner, Lansius often found himself at the center of attention, but he was cautious about revealing his origin, and only offered vague answers about his birthplace.

The monotony continued for three weeks. During this period, some of the younger soldiers improved their weapon handling skills or picked up soft skills like reading and cooking. Lansius, however, made little progress beyond the basics in his sword training.

He instead focused on learning cursive writing with a wax stylus. A balding lieutenant with an arm tattoo, believing in Lansius' potential, offered to tutor him without charge, thinking that Lansius had potential and would go places.

One day, four men arrived and gathered the captain and lieutenant from Lansius’ shelter. Rumors of an impending attack spread like wildfire. Indeed, the weather had calmed down, and the snow was only ankle-deep.

When the captains and lieutenants returned, they confirmed the rumors. “Pack your gear. We’re going out tomorrow at dawn."

The shelter sprang to life as preparations for the journey began. Like Stefi, several of the group hailed from Riverstead. Driven out in the previous season, they were eager to return home.

“It finally happened,” Stefi said to Lansius, who could only nod with a sense of uneasiness.

 

***

 

The next day dawned in Ceresia, with a drop in temperature and a fierce wind. The barn doors, which were usually closed, stood wide open, and lanterns and torches illuminated the inside. Dozens of men dressed in their winter gear were ready for departure.

Similar scenes were taking place in neighboring towns and villages. After being cooped up in their shelters for over a month, the Arvena troops were finally returning to march.

As Squire and Scribe apprentice, the young Lord assigned Stefi and Lansius to stay behind and take charge of the supplies. It wasn’t surprising. They needed someone to guard the supplies and record them.

“Hope they win,” Stefi murmured as the army received their order to march out. “Otherwise, we’ll have to defend this place with only remnants and leftovers.”

“How big is the opponent’s army?” Lansius asked.

“Interested in war, are you?” Stefi quipped.

“Not much, just trying new vocabulary,” he avoided the question, fearing that Stefi might use it as an excuse to train him harder.

“Well… hard to know. But ours should be bigger. I say two-thousand versus a few hundred?” Stefi shrugged.

Lansius found it hard to believe but he had some suspicion when he saw how many marched with him. He realized he had been mistaken in his assumption about the scale of the world he found himself in. Although he had initially believed it to be similar to medieval times, he now saw that it was more akin to an Imperial Roman, one that had thrived into the medieval era.

So, not just a Lord, but more like a Roman governor with cohorts to commands.

“Ah, so it’s likely we’ll win,” he muttered, more to himself.

Stefi shook her head. “Nothing is certain in a war. Securing the river crossing won’t be easy.”

Lansius had heard that the river between Ceresia and Riverstead was wide and had strong currents. There was only one narrow bridge which was often damaged by flood. The forces who occupied Riverstead surely understood this bridge’s importance and put efforts to defend it.

Looks like it's going to be a messy battle... Unless... if the river is frozen. 

He considered the possibility that if the river was frozen, the Arvenians could split their forces, cross the river, and attempt a pincer attack. However, he realized that he knew nothing about the Lord of Arvena's personality and whether he would gamble on such a risky maneuver.

"Stefi," he called as he approached and whispered, "Is the Lord of Arvena, bold?"

Stefi furrowed her brows and met his gaze. "Lans, we're campaigning in the middle of winter. If that's not bold, then I don't know what is."

Lansius felt foolish for asking. "Oh, right, of course."

Stefi crossed her arms in a relaxed way. "What's on your mind?"

"Oh, I'm just thinking, if the river is frozen, then-"

"Then it's going to be easy win at the crossing?" Stefi guessed.

Lansius nodded. "Yeah, something like that."

"Well, you're onto something. If it's frozen then it's only a matter of sending our strongest detachment to cross and attack their camp. However," Stefi continued, "it's not that simple. The river is wide, and it rarely freezes entirely. Have you ever walked on thin ice before?"

Lansius shook his head.

"Well, you never want to cross it in armor, and definitely not with a group of armored men," Stefi cautioned.

"I see, so it's possible-"

"But dangerous," Stefi completed the sentence. "Lastly, if that's the plan then they'll need to move quickly."

"Why's that?" Lansius asked.

"The coldest time was several weeks ago. By now, the river may already be thawing," Stefi said with a sigh.

Lansius now realized that time was running out. With the weather unpredictable and the bridge likely fortified, the Arvenians needed to act fast. The fate of their campaign depended solely on their speed.

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

***

 

Chapter 4

Tall Clouds

 

Two weeks had elapsed since the Arvenian troops had set out. Lansius sighed from boredom, for what felt like the hundredth time. He had taken Stefi's advice to clean and maintain his equipment; his spare cloth was neatly rolled in his bag, the wooden bowl was scrubbed spotless, and he had even aired out the woolen coats and blankets until they were fluffy again. Still, he found himself with time on his hands.

I really could use a book... I wonder how everyone is doing in Bellandia. I hope Tanya isn't overworking herself. It pains me to see her nails and fingers stained blue. And Mother Arryn, too.

He exhaled yet another sigh.

I wish I were with them...

The relentless weather was the primary source of his gloominess. However, it hadn't always been this way. Upon the soldiers' departure two weeks prior, the weather had cleared, allowing Lansius to roam Ceresia without hindrance. It was then that they received uplifting news - the Arvena forces had triumphantly crossed the frozen river, securing the bridge and opening the road to retake Riverstead from the occupier force.

Regrettably, just as the Arvenians should have been advancing towards Riverstead for the siege, the weather took a sudden turn for the worse. A relentless snowstorm besieged the region, with no end in sight.

“It’s snowing again,” one of the two elderly men dressed in worn gambesons muttered.

His companion stood up, looking concerned. They went to the barn door and secured it tightly.

“I’m worried about our people,” the second man whispered.

“They’ll be fine. Riverstead is a four-day journey from here,” his friend attempted to comfort him.

“But what about their supplies? They must be running low.”

“Their provisions should suffice. There’s no need to entertain such an ill-conceived thought.”

Lansius, overhearing their conversation, couldn't help but feel a twinge of unease.

We’ve captured the bridge, but maintaining a siege and taking a city is a different matter. Especially in a winter like this.

Lansius, Stefi, two old men, and two boys were in charge of a cartload of grains, small barrels of ale, cheese, and salted meat. They made up one of the many supply posts around Ceresia.

It wasn't much, but due to winter, moving them all to a dedicated spot was a logistical nightmare. Thus, instead of a well-guarded camp, the supplies were scattered with minimal personnel to guard them.

The main body of the army marched with as many supplies as they could manage. What Lansius and the other groups were guarding were leftovers that were too cumbersome to transport in the snowy conditions.

Linking them with the main army was a group of men and mules who would come regularly for supplies. But the last visit was ten days ago, before the weather worsened.

Keeping two-thousand men from freezing with just medieval technology is almost unthinkable. Men need more than just food, tents, and blankets to survive the winter. Without roaring fire, nobody will survive the night. And firewood is cumbersome and not easy to get.

His experience in Bellandia had taught him that firewood must be dried through the summer. A properly dried wood would make good heat with almost no smoke. Meanwhile, recently cut logs had too much moisture and produce less heat with lots of smoke.

With the path likely blocked by heavy snow, Lansius could only imagine the hardship that befell the men on the front line. The nobles could furnish themselves with charcoal heaters, but the common folks could only rely on foraging the snowy woodlands for dead branches. Meanwhile, the stacks of firewood in Ceresia lay unused.

No use worrying about it.

Surviving winter in the open was notoriously treacherous, making warfare during the season a rarity. This made the siege of Riverstead especially risky.

The dullness endured until the orange glow of the setting sun seeped through the cracks in the wooden walls. Observing this, the two elderly men enlisted the boys' help with chores.

The boys weren't particularly helpful, but the men appreciated their company. The youngsters were the same age as their grandchildren, and their lively chatter provided a welcome distraction from thoughts of war.

As the pottage bubbled away in the cauldron, the food preparations came to an end. To fill the time before supper, one of the men chopped wood while the other taught the boys some winter crafts.

In contrast, Stefi seemed to snooze effortlessly, as if she hadn't a worry in the world. After sword training, a lunch break, and a bit of horse riding, she indulged in a well-earned nap. To be fair, she had been eager for another round of training, but Lansius had declined, as his hands had developed painful blisters and callouses.

Coincidentally, as Stefi shifted in her sleep, she faced Lansius' direction.

... She does have a cute side. Without the fierce eyes, she looks innocent, even fragile.

Lansius had heard from her that it was rare for women to take up arms. Many called her a shield-maiden, a term that harkened back to an older era when men and women fought side by side in battles. Nowadays, as peace and civilization have advanced, it has become uncommon. While some women do become huntresses or knights, they are considered outliers, and their numbers have gradually diminished.

His stomach suddenly growled and ruined the mood. He caressed his stomach, to no avail. It was getting worse, but he didn’t know why. Without realizing it, his habit of drinking wine, even when diluted with plenty of water, was causing discomfort in his unaccustomed stomach.

Trying to distract himself from the discomfort, he looked at Stefi, but she had turned away once more.

Well, the horse is fine too... A live animal documentary. Shouldn’t be too bad.

He shifted in his seat and watched Horsie instead. However, the horse rarely did anything interesting. Only the occasional farting and neighing when she heard rats making noises in the ceiling.

This narrative has been purloined without the author's approval. Report any appearances on Amazon.

Sigh, how I would kill for the internet and some films.

Quietly, Lansius resigned himself to the boredom and unease. He could try to strike up a conversation, but they had already exhausted their topics. Even Lansius, with his keen interest in the history of the Imperium, had grown weary of the old men's tales.

He longed to learn more about the Ancients, the elves, half-elves, and dwarves. While most people had some knowledge about their world's origins, their understanding was limited compared to the insights a wandering minstrel could provide. The issue, however, was that a wandering minstrel typically sang a variety of songs and only occasionally delved into the world's origin.

The barn was suddenly filled with the sound of a creaking door. Lansius only managed a brief glance in its direction before Stefi sprang awake from her slumber.

Sword?!

Metallic flashes propelled Lansius into action. As Stefi rushed to the door with sword in hand, Lansius grabbed his sparring spear and ran after her. The two old men also scrambled for their weapons, but it was all for naught.

“Hello, boys,” greeted a familiar bearded face as he opened up the barn door.

“Thomas!” shouted the old man behind Lansius.

“Please spare me the blade,” Thomas said with a grin.

Stefi smirked and sheathed her sword. Lansius too recognized the man and lowered his guard.

Thomas was old enough to sport a full grey beard, but a protruding axe that hung on his belt proved he was still in his prime. Along with four other men, their horses, cart, and mules, they went inside to warm themselves.

Everybody asked about the frontline, but they just looked at each other with big grins and bright faces.

“Ah damn it, just say it. We won,” Thomas said in the most anticlimactic way.

Everybody couldn’t believe what they heard.

“Did you- “ Lansius tried to ask.

“We won!” somebody cut in and the rest followed. A wave of emotion erupted as they realized that the war was over. Youngsters and old men alike jumped in joy and danced happily in celebration.

Spring of 4423 was yet to arrive when the Arvena troops successfully took back Riverstead city after a short siege.

 

***

 

It had been ten days since Thomas arrived in Ceresia, and they had begun their march toward Riverstead. The trees were bare, their branches bleached white by the frosty winter, while the road was still covered in a thin layer of ice. Despite the conditions, Stefi, Lansius, and the Ceresia supply group marched on toward Riverstead city in high spirits, as today marked the final leg of their journey.

Stefi rode her horse, while the coachman and the boys journeyed on the horse-drawn supply cart. Lansius, Thomas, and the others walked beside the mules laden with goods. By midday, they reached the outskirts of the city where they found a cobblestone road, significantly easing their travel.

The imposing towers and bridges of Riverstead were an impressive sight even from a distance. Lansius was captivated by the grand city. As they drew nearer, the view became even more remarkable, with colorful roof tiles visible through the snow, rows of tall buildings, and white plastered walls adorning the cityscape.

“Hehe, you like it here?” Stefi teased as they crossed the stone bridge leading into the city.

“This is awesome,” Lansius admitted as they entered.

“Wait till you see the market when it returns to normal. They have everything.”

Though currently sparse due to the war, the vividly colored shops and stalls caught Lansius' attention. He marveled at the city's advanced appearance compared to Bellandia.

“Come, let’s report before dark,” Stefi urged.

They said their farewells to Thomas and the rest of the supply group. Since they served the same Lord and were stationed in the same town, they knew they would likely cross paths often.

Stefi and Lansius left their horse at the city stable and went in search of the Captain. After asking several people, they finally found him supervising reconstruction efforts. Despite being well over fifty, he still possessed an imposing figure. He wore a thick woolen tunic in a rich yellow hue, layered over a padded gambeson for warmth.

Spotting Stefi, the Captain gestured for her to approach.

“No mule is lost or injured, sir,” Stefi reported.

What the- that’s not how to report?!

The Captain appeared annoyed, confirming Lansius' suspicions. “The goods, are they safe?”

Unable to answer, Stefi nudged Lansius, who pulled a parchment from his bag and presented it. “The supplies from Ceresia Village are present and accounted for, sir.”

The Captain glanced at the parchment but dismissed it. “Keep it for the Seneschal’s men.” Then, addressing Stefi, he said, “Make sure the animals are fed and rested. We’re going to need them soon.”

“Another battle, sir?” she inquired.

The Captain snorted. “The northern bastard still refuses a truce or surrender. The Lord is hunting the remnants as we speak.”

“I see,” she murmured.

“Will that be all?” the old man questioned.

Seemingly uneasy, she asked, “Mm, sir, any chance of payments?”

The Captain shook his head. “You’ll have to take it up with the Marshal or his deputy. And they’re both away.”

She sighed. “Sir, what about him?”

Her question perplexed the Captain. “What about him? A new scribe?”

Stefi grinned. “We're not sure yet, but the young Lord personally recruited him.”

Her statement surprised the Captain, who took a closer look at Lansius.

“I’m Lansius, from Bellandia village, sir.”

“Well, Lansius of Bellandia, what makes the young Lord want you as his retinue?”

“I’m not sure-“

“Don’t be modest,” Stefi interrupted. “He can calculate real fast.”

The Captain noticed Lansius’ darker hair peeking out from his hood but disregarded it, as it wasn't part of his job. “Did the young Lord say anything more specific?”

Both shook their heads in unison.

The man sighed as he considered the situation. It wasn't the first time the young Lord had recruited someone on a whim and then forgotten about them. The Captain didn't want to deal with this, but it was a waste of money and talent. After all, retainers were entitled to full payment, even if they hadn't done any work except following their Lord. "Oi, fetch me the scribe," he instructed his squire.

After waiting, an even older man appeared, wearing a long blue tunic and brown robe. The Captain dictated a brief letter and handed it to Lansius.

“Give this letter to the municipal office tomorrow morning. That’ll be all,” he dismissed the duo.

Lansius bowed his head, but Stefi had another question.

“Mm, sir, what about me?”

“Let me guess, you convinced no one?” the Captain joked, having predicted that no knight would take Stefi as their squire.

She shook her head and feigned sadness.

“Oh, begone,” he scolded her. “Just stick with this Lansius fellow.”

“Eh, really, I can do that?”

The Captain didn't elaborate and waved his hand to send them away.

The two walked away from the reconstruction site and headed into the main street.

“Well, I guess we’re stuck together,” Stefi said lightly.

“So glad that we’re both employed,” Lansius remarked.

She chuckled. “Come, let’s head home before dark. I reckon there’s a lot to be done.”

That made him stop in his track. “Home? You have a house?”

“Of course, I lived here, you dummy. Well, it’s my master’s, but nobody threw me out, so...” she explained carefree.

“Doesn’t the city have a ...” He tried to find the word barrack, but he couldn’t find it in his vocabulary.

Stefi tilted her head.

Lansius seemed to realize that the word might not exist. “What’s the building where soldiers sleep?”

“Guardhouse? That’s reserved for guardsmen, and it’s cramped.”

“What about the other men-at-arms?”

“Oh, you mean billets. Yeah, the Lord could ask the townsfolk to provide housing for his men, but I guess right now, Riverstead doesn’t need one.”

The city was empty. Its people had evacuated when the war started last year. Some refugees had returned, but many would wait until spring or summer when the road was firm and passable.

The two walked down the cobbled path toward a lifeless, narrow alley. Not one in ten buildings had lights in their windows or smoke coming out from their chimney. They passed a tavern that was crowded with soldiers and city folks.

“Want to give it a go?” Lansius asked as he saw Stefi sniffed the heavenly smell of grilled meat.

“We can’t,” she exclaimed and walked away.

He followed up and asked, “Is the place expensive?”

“Two copper, but we need to be frugal. Otherwise, we’ll go broke.”

Both of them sighed. Nobody expected the opponent to refuse a truce after defeat and keep up fighting. With the Lord and most of his troops continuing the mop-up, nobody in Riverstead could pay them.

“Isn’t Lord Arte in Riverstead?” he asked with hope.

“Lans, never ask money directly from the nobles. They’ll get irritated. The ones who pay are either the Seneschal or the Chamberlain. Both didn’t take part in the campaign, only their assistants attached to the Lord or the Marshal.”

“I see...” Lansius took her advice to heart.

The sky above them transformed from a mesmerizing golden hue to a breathtaking reddish-orange as the chilling wind whipped through the deserted alleyway. With empty pockets but hearts full of hope, Lansius and Stefi continued to stride forward. Neither knowing what the future would hold for them.

 

***

 

Chapter 5

Riverstead

 

The growing darkness and mounds of snow on either side of the road didn’t hinder Stefi from finding her home. With Lansius by her side, Stefi headed to one particular house in a row of similarly sized buildings. As they arrived at the door, they saw that the door lock was smashed open.

Lansius nervously turned to Stefi, waiting for her response. Stefi drew her sword, gave a confident nod to Lansius, and cautiously pushed the door ajar.

The creaking noise from the frozen hinges heralded their entry, but no challenge came from inside. Stefi went in and was followed by Lansius with a knife.

The house wasn’t large and was only modestly furnished, so they could easily see that nobody was inside. They checked the kitchen and the wet area but found nothing. Stefi dropped her bag and motioned upstairs. She ran up the flight of stairs and disappeared from view.

Lansius heard a door being flung open and then another. But then, there was only silence. Slowly, the knife in his hand felt insignificant. He stopped hesitating and went for the stairs, but the sounds of footsteps stopped him.

Stefi appeared from upstairs with an unlit candle. “All clear,” she said with a faint smile.

“Anything lost?” he asked while sheathing his knife. It took two tries, as his hand was unusually tense.

“I’ll worry about it later when I have time,” she responded.

There were clear signs of looting or burglary inside, but there was nothing they could do about it. As darkness fell, Stefi placed a candle on the wooden table and began unwrapping her small pouch; a stone, a metal object, and pieces of wood emerged. She grabbed the flint, struck it against the iron to produce sparks, and directed them onto the small pieces of wood from last night’s fire. After several attempts, an ember glowed red, and she carefully used it to light the candle.

Lansius found a wooden plank lying on the floor, lifted it, and placed it into the corresponding iron bracket to secure the door.

“Come, let’s head upstairs,” she called, holding the lit candle in her hand.

The narrow wooden stairs creaked almost with every step. Upstairs, they were greeted by two doors. One led to a large bedroom that housed the whole family, while the other led to a separate study that also served as a guest room.

“It’s my late master’s room. You better not enter.”

“I see. So where do you sleep?”

“My bed is beside hers,” Stefi said vaguely as she led him toward the study, its door was ajar.

Lansius followed her inside. “Umm, so where will I sleep?”

“Here,” she lightly stomped on the wooden floor.

“At least it won’t be cold,” he responded, fully expecting to sleep on the floor.

“No, I haven’t pulled out the bed," she clarified.

“Oh...” he remarked shyly.

That made her giggle. “Lans, you’re my charge. I won’t let you suffer.”

The room was dusty and damp, so they did what they could with a broom and ragged clothes. Stefi found a dry rushlight on the cabinet and lit it up. Afterward, she went inside her room and dragged a bed out.

“You sure you can do it alone?” Lansius asked in between the screeching noises.

But with only a few tries, she managed to get the oaken bed frame out.

Out of curiosity, Lansius tried to move it.

Oof, this is heavy...

The bed refused to budge.

She chuckled. “Better do it together.”

The two moved the bed into the study without an issue. Afterward, they returned downstairs only to realize that all the firewood was gone.

Stolen from its rightful author, this tale is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Lansius wanted to give it another look, but Stefi said, “Wait here.” She lifted the wood plank on the door and head outside. He followed and spotted her just as she entered an empty-looking neighbor’s house.

Did she just barge into her neighbor’s house?

He glanced around nervously, feeling like an amateurish thief's accomplice. Fortunately, Stefi returned quickly with two sizeable objects in each hand. She handed one to Lansius as she walked by, and the two hurriedly returned to their place.

“What are we going to do with these chairs?” Lansius asked her as they barred the door once more.

“They belonged to the jerk. He used to piss from his window at night, right onto my fence," she explained, lifting the chair and heading into the kitchen.

“What?” Lansius couldn’t believe what he'd just heard.

“After my master passed away,” she began, “this neighbor kept bothering me... One time, he even waggled his privates when I walked home.”

Lansius was taken aback. “You let that go unpunished?”

She sighed. “I can’t do anything. If I cause an incident, I might lose the house.”

“How come?”

“It’s a long story, Lans,” she said, with little intention to elaborate.

After a brief pause, Lansius asked, “So, do you have a mallet?”

His question made her smile. Stefi didn't have a mallet, but she did have a small, rusty axe. Despite its bluntness, they quickly turned the chairs into firewood. Now, the wood burned brightly.

Stefi put the clean snow she had gathered into the cauldron and let it boil. Meanwhile, Lansius removed his coat and watched as Stefi arranged what they had left on the table.

“Lans, there’s only gruel until I can get something from the market tomorrow.”

“Let me pay for the food.”

“Better save your coins. You might need better clothes,” she said, pouring the grains into the cauldron.

“Ah... you think so?” He realized that all his clothes were shabby.

“You need to look the part, like the Captain’s scribe earlier. Let’s visit some second-hand shops tomorrow.”

The image of a long blue tunic came to Lansius’ mind. “But don’t I need to report in the morning?”

“Ah, it’s fine. You can show up later. It’s not like the Captain would send a runner to inform them about you.”

Lansius nodded. He knew he wasn’t important enough to warrant that kind of treatment. Without things to worry about, he started to unwind. The comfort of home felt luxurious after a prolonged stay in barns and tents.

He looked around and couldn’t help but compare this place and his home in Bellandia. Almost every feature in this house looked better. Even in a lower-class area, the house had a sturdy construction and a separate living space. This way, the soot and stench from the kitchen area stayed below.

The cauldron made noises as it boiled. Stefi diligently stirred and added her last chunk of cheese, followed by a portion of salted meat from a waxed linen wrap. “It’s almost ready.”

Lansius picked up a bowl from his bag while Stefi grabbed one from the cupboard. The meal was a humble one, but the mood was uplifting. They had been sleeping rough for months, so the prospect of spending the night on proper beds was overwhelming.

As they ate, a curiosity dawned on Lansius. “Stefi, is it alright in the city for unmarried men and women to spend the night in a house together?”

"Of course not. If they're caught, they'll be forced to marry..." Her voice trailed off as she slowly realized what it was all about. "Oh, shit. We've been together for so long that I forgot about this."

Lansius exhaled deeply. Although they were technically still on a campaign, they were now stationed inside a city, which meant they could get in trouble with the parish laws. He had only recently learned about the restrictive and unreasonable rules that governed medieval society, such as the sumptuary laws that dictated what clothing, colors, fur, and jewelry were permissible based on a person's social status.

Worse still were the laws imposed on unmarried couples. If a man and woman were found alone together without a chaperone, the parish would levy a fine. If they were caught touching, the fine would be even heftier. If they spent a significant amount of time together, it could be deemed as adultery, a criminal act with its own punishment. In addition, the fines had to be paid when the woman got married, which served as a form of public shaming.

I knew it. Something felt off with just the two of us.

"J-just keep this a secret," she whispered. "Nobody needs to know, and no one will be the wiser."

He nodded. It wasn't like he could find another place to stay with the sun already setting. "I'll find somewhere else to stay tomorrow. It's getting late, you should get some rest."

Stefi took a deep breath and sipped her drink. "I'll help you out. There must be something I can sell around this house."

"Sell?" Lansius furrowed. "No, I think I have enough to pay for rent."

"But you also need a new tunic for work," she reminded him.

Lansius smiled, appreciating her good intentions. "We'll figure something out tomorrow. Oh, go ahead and clean your room. I'll make sure the fire goes out."

"Right, I still need to do that. Good night then, Lans.” She took her cup and went upstairs.

Lansius, left alone with his thoughts, couldn't help but imagine what would happen if they were caught and forced to marry. Although he couldn't remember his exact age, he felt that he was older than twenty. Meanwhile, based on her story, Stefi was nearing twenty as well. Both were considered old enough to marry.

But will that work out? Hah, probably not...

The smouldering of the fireplace interrupted his daydream. He approached the fireplace and knelt to light the candle from an ember. Afterward, he went upstairs to the study. Once inside, he realized he had the entire room to himself.

The newfound privacy relieved him like no other, but fatigue from days of walking and camping crept in quickly. He forced himself to arrange his bag and coat. Afterward, he blew out the wax candle, slipped into the bed, and pulled the blanket.

Today was full of new experiences for him. He had finally reached Riverstead and looked forward to a new job. The feeling that he might just pull this off and help his family financially put his mind at ease.

The only thing nagging him was that he must find another place to stay tomorrow, and that might ruin him financially. The temptation to seek shelter in one of the vacant homes loomed large, but the risk of accusations of looting or theft was too great to ignore.

Oh, I’ll worry about them tomorrow!

With a reckless abandon, Lansius finally found peace and drifted into sleep.

 

***

 

Chapter 5-2

Two Sides of a Coin

⠀

Lansius awoke to the sight of an unfamiliar ceiling, gradually recalling that he was sleeping in Stefi’s house. As the events of the previous night flooded back into his mind, he took a deep breath, pushed his blanket aside, and rose to his feet.

The room was dark and cold, but a sliver of weak orange light streamed in through a slit in the window. Picking up his bag without bothering to change his clothes, Lansius quietly left his room. The house was silent, and Stefi’s door remained closed. He carefully descended the nearly pitch-black staircase, feeling his way down and listening to the creaking of the wooden steps beneath his weight.

Reaching the bottom without a mishap, Lansius headed to the kitchen. There, he noticed more light seeping through the cracks of the door and front window. He approached the fireplace, where he had hung his old, worn shoes and socks. The lingering heat from the fireplace overnight had dried them out, freeing them from the previous day’s mud.

Grateful for dry footwear, he pulled out a chair and sat down to put on his socks. While the wealthy could afford longer socks or hose, Lansius made do with short ones. The cheap wool was itchy, but it was better than the discomfort of rubbing against hard soles.

After putting on his socks and shoes, he thought to start a fire. Noticing that Stefi had left a fire-starting kit on the table, Lansius picked up one of the charred pieces of wood from the previous day and began to strike the stone and metal together to produce sparks.

Despite a couple of unsuccessful attempts, he persisted, considering this a valuable opportunity to practice his fire-making skills.

⠀

***

⠀

Stefi's POV.

Stefi yawned as she descended the stairs, wearing an off-white mantle and hood over her head. Her face was pale from the cold, her eyes unfocused, and even her lips lacked their usual pinkness. Surprisingly, a good night’s sleep had actually made her drowsy.

She didn’t even notice the crackling fire and was caught off guard by the warmth and light from the fireplace.

“Morning,” Lansius greeted her.

“Lans, you made a fire?”

“Well, you taught me correctly. Turns out it’s not that hard when it’s dry,” he replied with a hint of excitement.

Stefi chuckled, wanting to commend him but feeling too shy to do so early and without preparation. She approached the fireplace and knelt, basking in its warmth. Gradually, her pale face regained some of its healthy color.

Lansius offered Stefi a cup. Without needing to ask, she took it and drank slowly, aware that drinking too fast could provoke a cough since her throat was dry. After months stranded in winter, it had become routine to drink watered wine to keep warm. Soon, more redness returned to her face, especially her lips and cheeks.

“How’s the weather outside?” she asked.

“Windy, with a bit of snow,” he said as he sat near her.

She took another sip. “Have you had breakfast?”

“Not yet. I was thinking of waiting for you first.”

She nodded, rose slowly, and approached the cupboard to find her small bag of grain and cheese. “How’s your stomach?”

“Ready for some gruel,” Lansius joked as it was the only thing they had at the moment.

Stefi snorted and turned apologetic, “I’ll cook stew tonight. I should be able to get something from the field kitchen.”

“I’m not sure it’s necessary,” Lansius said in a serious tone.

Stefi looked at him, puzzled, and Lansius explained, “I’m going to rent a place tonight. Somewhere close, if possible.”

“Ah,” she muttered, clearly understanding his reasoning.

Her face turned a bit sad. Lansius, ever perceptive, noticed and asked, “You’re good with that, right?”

“What? Oh, sure. I’m just thinking that I’m going to eat alone again,” Stefi admitted, revealing more than she wanted.

Eh, dang, why did I say that?

Now, Lansius glanced to the side, seemingly perplexed before suddenly announcing, “Alright, change of plan, I’m staying then.”

Stefi almost jumped. “No, you can’t,” she said sharply. “Someone will see and start a ruckus.”

He furrowed his brows in doubt and asked, “They’ll do that, even after a siege?”

The narrative has been taken without permission. Report any sightings.

Stefi sighed and tried to explain, “Especially after a war like this when they’re bored and without any entertainment.”

Lansius nodded. Yesterday, he had seen several houses lit, evidence that many had stayed throughout the siege. Riverstead was populous enough, and many were affluent families of craftsmen and tradesmen; a siege wouldn’t uproot them.

“I wonder what they’ll gossip about us?” Lansius mused, a playful tone in his voice.

Stefi met his gaze, but Lansius quickly looked away, feigning ignorance.

Finishing her drink, Stefi placed the wooden cup on the table. “My knight master would’ve liked you,” she commented without any particular intention.

Her cryptic remark seemed lost on Lansius. “Eh, come again? Why do you think Isolte would like me?”

Stefi’s face softened, and she stifled a laugh as she recalled Isolte’s eccentricity. “She’s always unpredictable. She outwardly tried to push me into a marriage, but secretly, she always warned me not to because all men are not to be trusted.”

“That’s a bit confusing,” he frowned.

“Indeed, she’s like that. And it’s not like I could afford it...” she quipped, the combination of an empty stomach and wine loosening her tongue.

“What do you mean?” Lansius asked, intrigued.

“Well, the only thing I have is Horsie, and I don’t intend to give her for dowry.”

The thought of Horsie as a dowry amused Lansius, who burst into laughter.

“What’s so funny?” She glared at him menacingly.

“No, it’s just... Horsie as a dowry,” he stammered between laughs, unable to provide a better explanation.

She misunderstood his reaction and stared at him, making him flinch.

Growing annoyed, she asked bluntly, “Lans, do you need some knockings?”

“Wait, no, no, hear me out,” Lansius replied quickly, attempting to come up with an excuse. “I mean, in my... homeland, it’s men who pay dowry!”

His explanation took Stefi aback. Her previous annoyance faded, replaced by curiosity as she nervously asked, “How much is this dowry?”

Trying to suppress his laughter, Lansius offered a number. “Probably more than three years of pay.”

Stefi nodded, her brows furrowed as she tried to calculate the sum.

That‘s huge, definitely huge. They pay educated men more than common footmen or lowly squires.

“How about it, suddenly interested?” Lansius teased.

Only if they‘re well behaved, strong, but not brutish.

However, Stefi soon realized that Lansius was the only foreigner she had ever seen in Riverstead. There were no other black-haired men around.

She paused to look at him and found him watching her so innocently with a faint smile. That led her to the wrong conclusion that he was subtly proposing.

Is he really into me?

She couldn’t help but think that for a lowly squire like her to get an educated man who even pays the dowry would be quite the catch. She noticed that Lansius had become bolder since they first met.

Is it because he saw me naked once...? 

Her past experience made her reluctant to exploit such an innocent, sweet guy. With so many thoughts racing through her mind, Stefi chose the approach she was trained for. She chuckled menacingly, alarming Lansius.

“All this talk about marriage so early in the morning. Maybe we’re too drunk, and a morning training session is needed to clear our heads.”

Lansius jumped from his seat, shuddering and shaking his head. “Wait, what? No, calm down. We don’t have swords, and yours isn’t dull.”

Stefi grinned maliciously and threatened, “Sooner or later, you’ll need to practice against a real sword. Today is as good a day as any.”

“Uh, ah... Oh, remember we need to hit the shop and buy some clothes!” Lansius said, trying to change the subject.

Stefi maintained her gaze, contemplating what they could use for sparring.

Lansius quickly added, “Maybe buy some breakfast too? I’ll treat.”

She blinked, her eyes softening a little. “Mm... bribery huh. I doubt you have the money, but I know just the place.”

“Alright, let’s go then, I’m hungry,” Lansius said, urgency edging into his voice.

Stefi could tell what he was doing, but decided to let him off the hook. “Let me change my clothes first,” she replied.

Lansius immediately relaxed, clearly relieved.

⠀

***

 

Lansius.

For over three thousand years, Riverstead had been a silent witness to the rise and fall of numerous kingdoms and all three Imperiums. This ancient city, having been resurrected multiple times from the ruins, was strategically nestled among three rivers that flowed towards the Great River.

Despite the rivers' presence, the surrounding land wasn't blessed with fertility, but rather with mineral wealth that had been mined since ancient times. As a result, generations of craftsmen had made their livelihoods here.

With access to the Great River, Riverstead maintained direct trade links with the Far East Kingdoms and also served as a crucial trade hub for the northern provinces of the Imperium. Through the city, goods, particularly from the industrious province of Midlandia, flowed northward and eastward.

The city streets were paved with grey cobblestones, and the vastness of Riverstead was apparent, boasting hundreds, if not thousands, of buildings, including several multi-story structures. Lansius found it fascinating that some of the buildings bore architectural resemblances to ancient Greek or Roman styles.

That morning, Lansius accompanied Stefi to the bustling market area, where they encountered open stalls teeming with people. Even in a city scarred by war, people needed to eat, and stall owners always found a way to make ends meet.

Stefi chatted with some of the stall owners who eyed Lansius and made comments about him. She either shrugged or waved them off, then returned with a wooden plate filled with various morsels. One particular dish caught Lansius’ attention – a white-yellowish, sauceless lasagna.

Lansius took his knife, rubbed it on his inner clothes, and tried to get a taste, but he couldn’t manage it. The pasta-like dish was slippery.

Seeing him struggle, Stefi used her spoon and thumb to pinch off a piece of the lasagna and fed it to Lansius. Once he tasted it, he found it to be similar to pasta with salt and cheese but without tomato sauce.

Pretty good. I wonder if they have macaroni or spaghetti.

As the two ate standing in the street, the city slowly began to stir. The market was still recovering from the war, but those stalls that were open were crowded.

“Fortune favors the brave,” Stefi remarked, noticing where Lansius was looking.

Lansius nodded and commented so casually, “Profit makes the world go round.”

“So, you’ve heard the lore about the Ancients, huh?” she asked.

“What lore?” Lansius was intrigued.

Stefi furrowed her brows. “The round world?”

“You know the world is round?” Lansius asked, surprised, seeking confirmation.

She looked at him quizzically. “It’s a children’s story. Everyone knows that the Ancients transformed into dragons and soared around the world, outpacing the sun in a race. I suppose you foreigners don’t have that tale.”

Lansius shook his head. “Marc never mentioned it, and I’ve never heard a bard sing that song.”

Stefi chuckled. “It’s a children’s story; bards don’t usually sing those. Try asking a wet nurse next time.”

“Wet nurse? What’s that?” He was certain of his vocabulary, but nothing came to mind.

Stefi just laughed it off. “Come on, we still have things to do. Finding you a new tunic is a priority.”

With that, she led him deeper into the market, where shops lined both sides of the bustling streets. As they entered and browsed various cheap stalls, excitement sparkled in their eyes. The day was still young, but things didn't always turn out the way they wanted.

⠀

***

⠀

Chapter 5-3

A Man and His Trade

 

Lansius and Stefi continued browsing the quiet market, where only a few persistent vendors remained after the siege. They discovered a small shop tucked between two larger, shuttered establishments. Although there was no wooden sign, an assortment of colorful clothes hung gracefully from the second-floor window.

“Ah, the old grandpa made it through!” Stefi exclaimed excitedly, pulling Lansius by the hand and pushing the door open with the other.

Upon entering, they were met with the scent of well-worn fabric and leather. A tall, sharp-looking man with a thin beard and contrasting dark clothing rose from his seat, setting aside his needle and unfinished work. “Ah, Miss Squire, it’s a pleasure to see a familiar face in Riverstead.”

“Happy I’m not running from my debts, Keith?” Stefi teased.

Keith stifled a polite laugh, noting that he didn’t recognize Lansius. Assuming Lansius might be someone else’s confidant, he asked, “How may I help you, tradesman?” He gestured towards the wares in his shop.

“I need a tunic, affordable but with a formal appearance,” Lansius replied as formally as he could be, looking at the neatly organized racks of clothing, which included tunics, dresses, and cloaks.

“And for what purpose?” Keith inquired politely, albeit his demeanor was more akin to a soldier than a tailor.

“He’s a scribe,” Stefi chimed in.

“Ah,” Keith murmured, turning to a neatly stacked pile of garments.

“Why not this one?” Stefi suggested, pointing to an already folded piece of clothing.

Keith glanced at Lansius, and Stefi assured him, “He’s alright; he’s with me.”

Lansius quickly added, “I can keep a secret.”

Keith smiled and explained, “The folded ones are likely looted from this city or nearby area. Lord Karius’ men forced me to buy them. I’ve already bribed their officers, but they still demand more.”

Stefi looked at them, found something she liked, and inquired. “Can’t you sell them to us?”

“Let’s avoid trouble. Those garments are tailored for nobles, and someone will recognize the original owner. If word gets out, we could all face consequences,” Keith reasoned, pulling two tunics from the pile – one yellow and one blue.

Lansius immediately took a liking to the vibrant blue tunic, but he maintained a neutral expression and replied, “Don’t you have something brighter? I don’t want my employer to think I’m uneducated.”

Keith chuckled, refraining from commenting on Lansius’ accent, and returned to the stack, searching for a tunic that would suit Lansius’ needs.

Stefi approached Lansius and whispered, “I like the blue one.”

“If you’re in a fight, do you show your intention to your opponent?”

Stefi was taken aback and understood his reasoning. “Good thinking.”

“I’m not a teacher for nothing,” Lansius quipped.

“Now, here’s a brighter one.” Keith pulled out a red tunic. Its color was faded, making it closer to a pink, but the intricate embroidery along the neckline and hem spoke of its former elegance.

Lansius had no intention of buying that one, but he put down his leather bag on the table and tried on the red tunic. The fabric felt soft and comfortable against his skin.

Eh, linen can be this soft?

“It’s not too old based on its stitches, you can wear it until you’re too old to work,” Keith joked, promoting the tunic.

“What’s the price for this one?” Lansius asked.

“If it were new,” Keith employed his merchant skills, “the material, dye, and tailoring cost would make this tunic worth at least four silver.”

Lansius softly sighed and said firmly, “Too expensive.”

“You haven’t heard my offer,” Keith tried to negotiate.

Lansius removed the tunic and politely handed it back to Keith, saying, “If it’s around forty copper new, then I probably can’t afford it. Do you have anything else?”

“How about this Centurian blue tunic?” Keith suggested.

Lansius feigned disinterest. “How much for the yellow one, though it’s a bit too big?”

This content has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road; report any instances of this story if found elsewhere.

“Don’t worry about the size. I can tailor it for you.”

Lansius smiled. “I believe that may add to the cost.”

Keith chuckled. “Eleven copper for this fine yellow tunic, adjustments included.” He then showcased its features. “Feel it, fine Midlandian linen, no patched holes, no frayed stitches. It will last you a long time, you can pass it down to your son and grandson.”

“How about five copper?” Lansius countered.

“I can’t do it for less than ten.”

“Six, and I’ll pay the adjustment fee.”

“That’s too low for a piece like this,” Keith shook his head.

Lansius sighed and politely said, “Maybe some other time then.”

“You won’t find pieces like this anywhere else,” Keith cautioned.

“That’s precisely my problem. Your wares are too good. I can’t afford them.”

“That’s most unfortunate. May I interest you in some less bright-colored tunics? I have quite a selection perfect for your size.”

“Like that blue one?” Lansius asked nonchalantly.

“Yes, why don’t you try the blue one.”

Lansius tried it on and found it in excellent condition, with no stains on the hem, indicating it had been well cared for. It wasn’t as soft as the red one, but it was undoubtedly better than the coarse ones he had acquired from Bellandia. “I don’t like the color, but beggars can’t be choosers,” he quipped, much to the shop owner’s delight.

“I like you, and since you’re Stefi’s friend, I’ll give it a good price. Seven coppers.”

“Four! Even four is too much for blue dyes.”

“I can’t do that,” Keith expertly positioned the tunic in the sunlight to reveal its deeper color.

Lansius didn't bother to look and focus on the seller. “I believe you still make a profit with four copper. What do you say? It's early, and they say good fortune to start the day is good for business."

Keith smiled and said, “Since you’re a good lad. Let’s make it six, that’s-“

“Best I can do is five,” Lansius pulled his purse and began fishing for five copper.

“Six is a fair price,” Keith said, but Lansius ignored him, so he looked to Stefi, who smiled back at him.

“He’s a good tradesman, Keith,” Stefi remarked.

Lansius presented the copper coins, spreading them on his palm for Keith to see. “Five coppers. We’ll both profit, and this might be the start of a good business relationship.”

Keith looked unsure, but Stefi delivered the coup de grace, “He’s the Young Lord’s newest retainer, you know?”

With his thumb and index finger, Lansius pinched the five coins and offered them to Keith.

Keith snorted, amused, and opened his palm. Lansius placed the five coins into it, and the deal was sealed.

“Gratitude, you drive a hard bargain. May I learn your name, tradesman?”

“I’m just a nobody, call me Lansius.”

“People call me Keith Senior the tailor,” he introduced himself. “If I’m not around, my son, Keith Junior, will be happy to help you.”

“Nice meeting you, Keith.”

“Well, try fitting it out. If you need a simple adjustment, I can do it for you, free of charge,” Keith said happily. Even at five copper, he still had quite a margin, but he rarely encountered people who haggled this quickly and precisely. Others might haggle lower, but they usually ended up with a worse deal or returned at a later time, only for Keith to upcharge them for the same piece.

 

***

 

Lansius proudly wore his new blue tunic as he stepped out of the shop, brimming with newfound confidence.

“Come here,” Stefi beckoned, wanting to admire the blue tunic with its intricate orange embroidery along the neckline and hem.

“Lans, it looks good on you. Now you look the part,” she complimented.

“Of course, it cost me five copper,” Lansius quipped. “That’s enough to buy food for a week.”

Stefi giggled and elbowed him, knowing he had gotten it at a bargain. “Oof, what’s that for?” Lansius complained but couldn’t help chuckling as he followed her.

“Next up is the sword,” she announced.

“Eh, no, I’m a scribe. I don’t need a sword,” he blurted, fearing she was going to train him with a sharp sword for real.

Stefi paused and pondered. “Alright, then let’s just head there,” she decided, leading him southward, toward a large building at the end of the market district.

“What’s this place?” Lansius observed the tall stone compound with walls and large double gates for carts.

“Hopefully, your new office,” Stefi replied.

Lansius was taken aback by the size of the municipal office. “But weren’t we planning to do this tomorrow?”

“Well, it’s nearby, and it can’t hurt to try out your new Centurian blue tunic.”

The two walked until they saw a small door just beside the double gate. A guard in brigandine lazily greeted them with a nod but didn’t ask any questions. They entered through the open door and passed several other guards who watched them with similarly little interest.

Inside, they discovered a garden and a large paved courtyard, with the towering three-story Riverstead municipal office building overhead. The structure was once a proper castle, but now it served as storage and a taxation office.

Oh, a show garden!

Lansius marveled at the well-maintained medieval garden, filled mostly with herbs and a few blossoming flowers and plants protected by a fence. A carpet of grass and tall, old trees with roots spreading into the stone wall and buildings completed the picturesque scene.

The garden was so well taken care of that Lansius commented without thinking, “This would be a great spot for a picnic.”

Stefi looked at him and asked, “What’s a piknik?”

“Umm... eating out in the open on the grass?”

“Like when we’re stuck outside on a campaign? Why would you want to do that again?” She rolled her eyes.

Lansius chuckled but refrained from explaining further.

They finally entered the building and observed its disheveled interior, a clear sign that it had been ransacked during the siege. The garden outside had survived, likely because it had been covered by snow all winter, but the once-orderly office, a symbol of Riverstead’s administrative prowess, now resembled a war-torn relic.

The staff had made attempts to restore order, but it was a work in progress. Lansius observed the partially-empty wooden cabinets lining the walls and the broken chairs, tables, and desks possibly pooled here to be repaired. Light filtered in through the shattered windows in the back, casting a gentle glow over the sorry scene.

Two servant boys were cleaning up, while a staff member in a grey tunic eyed Lansius and Stefi with suspicion, mistaking them for a merchant and his bodyguard. “My apologies, but didn’t the guard inform you that the office is still closed?”

“We’re not here for business. The guards probably can see that,” Stefi clarified.

Lansius reached into his bag and pulled out a letter from the Captain, displaying it to the staff member. “I’m part of the young Lord’s retinue. The Captain sent me.”

The staff member hastily wiped his hands on his sleeve before approaching Lansius. “May I see the letter?”

Lansius glanced at Stefi, who gave a nod of approval.

The staff member accepted the letter with a respectful gesture and skimmed its contents. “A new member?” His gaze flicked between the letter and Lansius, clearly taken aback. However, he decided it wasn’t his place to question. “Please wait here. I’ll inform Master Hubert.”

 

***

 

Chapter 5-4

Novice

 

A tall, slender man with a slightly hunched posture from years of poring over documents and ledgers descended the stairs. His confident gait and footsteps signaled a healthy individual, despite his age.

His thinning hair, peppered with streaks of silver, was combed back and meticulously maintained, just like his sharp, vibrant blue attire with its extravagant contrasting silver embroidery. It made Lansius’ secondhand tunic seem second-rate.

Lansius gulped as the man exuded an aura of eccentricity. Unlike the predatory air of the noble, this man meant business.

“Well?” Master Hubert asked impatiently.

The staff member, not much older than Lansius, hastily introduced his master, “This is Master Hubert, the vice-“

“Current Head Clerk of Riverstead Municipal Office,” Hubert corrected. “The old fool vanished before the siege, and we’ve been unable to bribe because of him. Lord Maurice should have listened!” he rambled and continued quickly, “Now, how may I help you?”

“The letter,” Lansius found his voice.

“Yes, I read it. But you’re not trained in bookkeeping.”

“I have been trained, Master Hubert, just not in the Imperium standardized bookkeeping style,” Lansius countered with as much technicality as his vocabulary allowed.

Hubert glanced at Lansius and cast his judgment, “The Eastern style is not to be trusted.”

“I’m not from the Eastern Kingdom. Indeed, theirs is not as advanced,” Lansius clarified, standing tall.

Old Hubert let out a sharp sigh and extended his right arm. The staff member hurriedly placed Lansius’ letter into the master’s palm. Hubert gave it another glance and noticed Stefi in her black gambeson, a color of wealth. The Captain’s scribe signage, the claim of being part of the young Lord’s retinue, and a wealthy squire at his side led Hubert to guess that Lansius was either a wealthy donor or a bastard.

Fortunately or unfortunately for Lansius, Hubert completely missed his black hair that jutted out from his hat. The Head Clerk looked around, and without even catching his gaze, the servant boys scrubbed the floor harder and faster.

“I can’t ignore the Captain’s wishes, so be it,” Hubert said without even facing Lansius. He then quickly added to his staff, “Don’t let him touch ink or paper. Get him into storage and see if he can help in any way.”

“Gratitude,” Lansius replied sincerely. Though he hadn’t recovered his memory from his past, he somehow knew this treatment all too well.

As Master Hubert climbed back up the stairs, Lansius was left with the same staff member who didn’t mince words. “Are you a noble?”

“No,” Lansius replied, knowing he would be at the bottom of the pecking order.

Before the staff member could nod, Stefi stepped forward. “He’s my master, though, and a direct retainer of young Lord Arte. I’d be careful if I were you.”

“There should be no problem between us. My name is Vince. I’m not very smart, but my family has been clerks here for generations.” He extended his hand to Lansius.

Lansius grasped Vince’s hand, saying, “Call me Lansius, I hope I can be of help.”

“Hopefully so. We need lots of hands to clear this mess,” Vince rubbed what little goatee he had. Lansius noted that the man’s hair was neat and slick, a sign that he was trying hard despite his modest introduction.

“Oi, Jan, come here,” Vince suddenly called for one of the boys.

A bright-looking boy stopped scrubbing and ran toward them. “Yes, Vince?”

“Take care of Lansius for me. Show him the empty quarter at the far end, so old Hubert doesn’t see him,” Vince added. “No offense.”

“None taken,” Lansius replied lightly, but then asked, “Empty quarter?”

“For your lodging, of course. You’re a clerk now, not a scribe. We can’t let new staff go in and out every day; there are too many risks involved. But don’t worry, the dormitories are quite neat. You’ll like it unless you’re from a much higher station than me.”

“Ah,” Lansius nodded and exchanged glances with Stefi, who was also nodding excitedly. They had just solved Lansius’ housing problem, and he got it for free.

Unauthorized duplication: this narrative has been taken without consent. Report sightings.

I have to buy something for that Captain. The man’s a hero!

Vince furrowed his brows, watching the duo’s reaction, suspicious of their relationship, but continued, “As I said before, Jan will show you the room and then escort you to the storage. That’s all, Junior.”

Lansius chuckled. Vince introduced himself as a fool, but in the end, he asserted his seniority. “Yes, Senior Vince, I’ll comply.”

Vince looked pleased as he patted Lansius’ right arm and headed out to the guardhouse, likely to lecture them for allowing a guest to enter without notice.

“Come, Master Lans, Squire. I’ll show you the room,” Jan happily motioned for them to follow him up the stairs.

 

***

 

Lansius and Stefi followed Jan to a quarter on the third floor of the same building. The complex, while old and fortified with grey stones on the outside, boasted a more refined interior that was plastered and painted a pastel orange.

Despite the aging paint, the corridor remained neat and more attractive than most buildings Lansius had entered. The place was well ventilated. From the window, Lansius could observe the comings and goings at the building’s gate.

Another window offered a view of the storage room entrance, likely designed for monitoring purposes.

The three walked past the row of rooms for the officials working there, noticing that only half were occupied since many hadn’t returned to Riverstead.

“This is the place,” Jan said as they reached the furthest end, pushing the door open.

Lansius detected a damp smell, but the room was adequate and showed little evidence of looting. The walls were plastered, and since they were on the third floor, the flooring was made of timber. The room also had a glass window, which Jan promptly opened, letting in a fresh breeze and sunlight.

It’s glass...

This window was the first high-quality glass Lansius had seen in this world. It was lightly tinted but transparent, unlike the ones used in lanterns, which were only as transparent as parchment or fabric.

The room contained a proper raised bed with legs, a mattress without bedding, a small worktable, a chair, and a wardrobe.

“Do you like it?” Jan asked cheekily.

“I will, after I clean this,” Lansius replied.

Jan grinned. “I’ll help you with it.”

Stefi approached the wardrobe and discovered a selection of fine linen clothing. There was even a silk undergarment. “Is the owner not returning?” she asked.

Jan licked his lips and said, “The previous owner is unlikely to return. He’s one of the few who ran before the siege happened, along with the stolen money.”

Stefi nodded, reached into the drawer, and found several woolen socks; old and new, long and short. She picked the old ones and signaled for Jan to take them.

“For me, Squire?” Jan asked uncertainly.

She nodded and said, “I’m Stefi. It’s nice to meet you, Jan.”

Lansius understood the intention and added, “If we find more, we’ll give you more. Would that be a problem?”

Jan shook his head. “Maybe someone will ask, so don’t give them all away at once.”

Stefi chuckled, glanced at Lansius, and remarked, “He’s smart.”

Pleased with the compliment, Jan bowed his head. “Oh, don’t put your bag here yet. We should get the key first, but that has to wait until supper.”

“Well, that can wait. Let’s head down to the storage and see what my job looks like,” Lansius said with a hint of excitement. After being stranded in a barn all winter, he too wanted some piece of action worth his skills.

 

***

 

Ground Floor.

At Lansius’ request, Jan led them to the ground floor, where they encountered three cavernous warehouses that made the storage area. Each warehouse could accommodate three carts at once for loading or unloading.

After introducing themselves to the other staff, Lansius quickly surveyed his designated work area and found it a mess. His shoulders slumped as he took in the chaotic scene that resembled a crash site more than a warehouse.

Sacks of grains and flour were piled haphazardly, wooden crates were scattered everywhere, and piles of leather curled from mismanaged storage, giving off a strong odor.

Earthen jugs, likely filled with wine, were tied against the wall to an old wooden rack, while wooden or wicker baskets of various sizes held smaller jugs.

To make matters worse, dozens of wooden barrels blocked the way, making it hard to move around. Some of the unmarked barrels contained ale, while others were filled with goods like nails, fur coats, or blankets.

“The Lord just won a tremendous victory at a fort near the Grand River,” Jan said proudly, referring to the battle that took place while Lansius was still traveling to Riverstead.

“I can see that,” Lansius observed another unsorted pile near the warehouse gate, likely dumped after the valuables were recovered.

“This is going to take ten men and a week just to tidy things around,” Stefi commented with stiff lips.

Lansius let out a sigh. He approached the mess, trying to figure out where to start.

“The workers are at your command if you need help,” Jan informed him. “I can’t stay for long, though. I’ll be needed in the kitchen soon.”

“For lunch?” Stefi guessed. “Will we get any?”

“Of course. Where do you want to take your lunch?” Jan inquired.

“Probably here,” Lansius said, rolling up his sleeves. “I’ve got a lot of work to do today.”

“This is just like Ceresia,” Stefi quipped as Jan left the warehouse.

“Ceresia isn’t plundered and pillaged like this," joked Lansius.

That old fart, he named me a clerk but gave me manual labor...

Lansius exhaled deeply. He had joined Lord Arte and traveled to Riverstead, enduring winter and war, with the expectation of working on something important. Yet, the reality of life kept pinning him down. Slowly, he examined the crates one by one and sketched a crude map on a wax tablet, trying to come up with a plan.

...

As time passed, their efforts seemed to have little effect. Despite working through lunch, Lansius, Stefi, and a single worker had only managed to rearrange some of the items. The storage area now appeared even more chaotic, like a half-finished puzzle of misplaced pieces.

“This isn’t working,” Lansius mumbled, sitting on a crate, his blue tunic soaked with sweat.

“We only got one worker, and the rest just nod their heads when called, but leave as soon as someone else calls them back,” Stefi replied, sweat dripping from her chin.

Lansius observed the workers in the neighboring warehouse and snorted, realizing their tactics.

Whether working here or there, hard or not, the pay is probably the same. It’s time to change the game.

“Stefi,” Lansius called.

“Yeah?” she noticed the shift in his tone.

“I need your help with something—something that might solve our problem.”

Stefi looked around at the disorganized warehouse. “Show me your magic, Lans, because we won’t finish this on our own.”

 

***

 

Chapter 5-5

Compatriots

 

Lansius enjoyed his late lunch in peace, undisturbed by the shouting and yelling from the staff in the neighboring warehouse. He filled his thick bread with ham and cheese, then offered half to the worker, who graciously accepted it.

“Thank you, master.”

“Eat well, my good man,” Lansius said casually.

The man was baffled by the kind treatment but ate heartily.

Lansius took out Stefi’s wineskin from his bag, poured a bit into his half-filled water cup, and offered it to the man. The worker didn’t refuse the offer, as he was just trying to make a living. “Thank you, master,” he said again, gulping it down.

Lansius wasn’t trying to bribe him with food, as that would be impossibly difficult. Instead, he struck up a conversation. “So, how many years have you worked here?”

“Since the young Lord was still a toddler,” the worker recalled.

“Must be more than a dozen years. How much do they pay you?”

The man chuckled and rubbed his coarse facial hair. “Too little.”

“A copper and two?” Lansius guessed.

His lips formed a small grin. “Master, if you know, why ask?”

“I don’t. I’m new here, and they won’t tell me anything. Tell me, how much does a staff member like me make?” Lansius asked, offering him two pieces of berries.

The worker took the fruit, looked at Lansius, and said, “I heard from a drunken staff member that he got four copper a day.”

About the same. Mine was six copper on campaign, probably four copper on peacetime.

"And how much for a new staff that works in the warehouse?" Lansius inquired.

"Unfortunately, a lot less," he said apologetically.

Not if I can help it...

Lansius grinned. “Tell you what. I’m just here because the Captain said so. I believe when things return to normal, I’ll be recalled to Lord Arte’s side.”

The name drop shocked the man. “You’re part of the young Lord’s retinue?” He sized up Lansius again, nodding his head as he recalled how Lansius was accompanied by a squire in black gambeson. “I wish you fortune then, master. Your stay here might be unpleasant.”

“Why is that?” Lansius asked.

The man looked around and whispered, “The one who runs this place is a bit odd in the head.”

Lansius chuckled. “I have the same opinion.”

The two laughed heartily.

Stefi appeared at the warehouse entrance and walked briskly toward Lansius, sweaty from her efforts. Lansius rose and quickly offered her a jug of water, which she took and drank gracefully.

The man grinned while admiring Stefi’s appearance.

“Did you get it?” Lansius asked.

“Keith drove a hard bargain, but your note saved the day.”

Lansius grinned. He had sent Stefi with two pieces of high-quality clothing from the wardrobe in their room to Keith.

Keith wasn’t going to give them a good price easily, but Lansius had written a note stating that he still had a lot and would sell to another if the price wasn’t acceptable. Keith faced a dilemma and gave an acceptable price of three copper per piece.

“He wouldn’t give me socks as a bonus, but he gave me these,” Stefi pulled out two yellowing head caps.

Lansius was amused. “Keith was a tough nut.”

“But you cracked him good. I’ve never seen him give that much ground before.”

Lansius gestured for Stefi to take a seat on the clean crate, and she did so, resting her legs from the return trip. Meanwhile, Lansius checked the head cap, finding it worn and yellowish, but clean, dry, and comfortable. He offered it to the lone worker.

“Monsieur, I can’t accept this,” he refused, half embarrassed and half out of fear because of Lansius’ earlier announcement that he was the young Lord’s retinue.

“What’s your name?” Lansius asked.

“Wade, master.”

Lansius knelt and placed one of the head caps in Wade’s hand. “Nice to know you. I’m Lansius, but you can call me Lans.”

Wade clenched the head cap. “Good to meet you, master Lans.”

Lansius returned to the crate and sat as if addressing his subject. “Wade, I’ve been thinking about what you said earlier – about how things might be unpleasant for me.”

Wade nodded, so Lansius continued, “I want to make my stay as enjoyable as possible. Can you help with that?”

“But how, master?”

Lansius smiled. “Tomorrow, bring a friend,” he instructed while pinching another head cap. “If you bring more, I can always part with several iron coins if they’re strong, work hard, and fast.”

Wade grinned. “I have friends. I’ll only bring the best.”

“Tomorrow then. Now, let’s wrap up and end the day.”

“But it’s barely past midday, master Lans,” Wade asked.

“It’s useless with just us. I want you to be fresh tomorrow.”

Wade nodded happily, grateful to find a benevolent staff member who wasn’t stingy with his purse.

Stolen content alert: this content belongs on Royal Road. Report any occurrences.

 

***

 

The following day, after a good night’s sleep, Lansius arrived at his section of the warehouse to find five men already working. Stefi had yet to arrive, but he didn’t mind.

“Morning, master Lans,” Wade greeted him, while the rest bowed their heads slightly in respect.

“Morning, Wade. You’re working early today.”

Wade and the men smiled, charmed by Lansius’ down-to-earth attitude, unlike that of the other staff. “Are these men enough, master Lans?”

“Only if they’re as good as you said,” Lansius replied. “I can give two irons per person, to be paid each evening. I’ll allow you to return to your original post, so as not to offend the Senior Staff, but try to return when you can; otherwise, I can only give one iron.”

The men understood and grinned knowingly.

Lansius continued, “Let’s keep this a secret between us, lest the acting Head Clerk causes us problems.”

“There won’t be any,” Wade said with confidence.

Lansius pulled a head cap from his bag and gave it to Wade. “Foreman, Wade. Reward this to whomever you please.”

With that, Lansius effectively established a hierarchy and command structure. While the ones who ultimately paid for the workers was the office, by using bonuses or bribes, he made them more inclined to work for him instead of the other staff. Afterward, things progressed smoothly despite the inevitable mishaps and snags that accompanied untangling such a large mess.

 

***

 

In just three days, the warehouse had visibly transformed. Master Hubert had heard rumors but couldn't be bothered to check until Vince brought him the record.

“Yes, I read that. Did you want more praise?” Hubert scolded his staff while remaining seated behind a large mahogany table.

“Master, a confession. I wrote that, but the calculation was the new clerk’s doing.”

Hubert’s sharp eyes gazed at Vince, who didn’t back down. “Are you implying that he works at noon and calculates records at night? Does he not need sleep?”

“Oh, I checked, Master. The light in his room faded before midnight,” Vince clarified.

“Then how is it possible... Unless, he’s really good with numbers," mulled Hubert.

Vince nodded. "His writing is near illegible, but his calculations were spot-on."

“But why did you report this to me and not use it to your advantage?” the acting Head Clerk inquired.

“Because the new clerk is just too good, and now everybody wants to use him too.”

Hubert chuckled. “And what are you proposing?”

Vince didn’t hesitate. “Give him a chamber and put him to work. Let us be the only two who have access to him.”

Hubert smiled. “Arrange it.”

 

***

 

A few weeks had passed, and the frigid winds and snow that had held Riverstead City in their grip finally dissipated. Warmer air from the western sea quickly brought changes to the landscape. The snow thawed, rivers flowed once more, and the grasslands and treelines sprang back to life.

Despite the muddy roads and persistent drizzle, refugees began to flock back to the city. The first week of spring saw Riverstead come alive with bustling markets and ongoing repairs throughout the city. There were even talks of spring festivals and victory celebrations.

As the city returned to normalcy, Lansius continued working alone in a small study. As he had planned, Hubert finally accepted him as a fully-fledged clerk with all its benefits. He was assigned to the third floor, just at the far end from his room.

Hubert through Vince kept supplying Lansius with endless calculation work, ranging from minor purchases for kitchen supplies to various taxes received by the city. Dark shadows circled Lansius' eyes, and he yawned at random intervals. However, the cause of his sleep deprivation was not work-related.

While he feigned naivety around Hubert and Vince, Lansius was well aware that working too quickly could lead to exhaustion. Since he was paid by the day rather than by the task, he deliberately paced himself. Sometimes he would double-check his work, at other times he would study the documents on hand. However, his favorite diversion was reading books under the guise of studying.

The municipal office didn't have a proper library, but Lansius had discovered two old, leather-bound history books. While they read like children's stories—filled with tales of creation and heroism—he found them captivating. He was particularly intrigued by accounts of Elves, Dwarves, and Half-Humans, as well as their legendary deeds.

He also came across an old, incomplete report about the Mage Guild, which detailed its founding, headquarters, and objectives. This gave him something to discuss with his fellow clerks, usually Vince. From these conversations, Lansius learned that Mages were rare, even Lord Maurice only employed one.

Aside from Mages, there were also Saint Candidates, said to possess the ability to heal. Lansius was skeptical, considering them to be physicians at best, if not mere shamans.

There were a lot of mysteries in this world and he had to admit that he was rather excited with the possibility that magic was real. This fueled him to read as much as he could during the daytime, and by the dim light of his rushlight, he continued his reading well after sunset.

This passion for reading led to his peers respecting him, mistaking his haggard looks as proof of his hard work.

...

 

Sudden knocks alerted Lansius. “Who—”

Before he could complete his sentence, a woman in a black gambeson barged in. Lansius recognized who had entered and continued working as if nothing had happened.

Stefi took the only other seat and slouched. “Ah, it’s much cooler in here.”

“Well, it’s the third floor.”

She noticed a plate with a slice of spiced ham, beans, and hard bread on the table. “Oh, Jan has made his rounds?”

“Yeah, not long ago. Help yourself,” he said, without losing focus on his parchment and wax tablets.

“They’ll whip a squire like me if I ate before the master,” she teased.

He chuckled but remained focused. Stefi took the only cup on the table and drank it straight. However, her simple act robbed Lansius of his focus.

Her lips... on my cup.

“Ah, it’s refreshing!”

He banished his inappropriate thoughts, which had been triggered more often since they were apart. “I-it’s just water.”

“Well, it doesn’t matter,” she exclaimed and unfastened the lower part of her gambeson.

Lansius’ eyes opened wide in anticipation.

“There you go.” Stefi pulled out a wrapped package and slammed it on the table.

“Oh, a gift?” he blurted, half relieved, half disappointed.

“Hehe, a present for graduating from that warehouse.”

Lansius chuckled as he unwrapped the package. “A belt! Oh, you didn’t have to.”

“Go on, test it,” urged Stefi.

Lansius approached her and tried on the belt by wrapping it around his waist. However, he had never tied a sword belt before and got confused. Stefi assisted him and tied the ring belt. With her help, the sword belt fits snugly and correctly.

“So, this is how you wear one.” He moved about to appreciate the look. “You’re very good at this.”

She chuckled at his remark. “Lans, I’m a squire. That’s what I do for a living.”

Lansius realized his error and grinned sheepishly. Indeed, a squire’s primary job was to help their knight don their gear.

“Do you like it?” she asked.

“Of course. But are you sure it’s not pricey?”

“Don’t fret. You need it; the old one is worn out.” She added, “Next is a sword and shoes.”

He found her enthusiasm amusing. “I don’t think a clerk needs a sword.”

Stefi shrugged and poured another cup of water as Lansius returned to his seat. He then brought an earthen jar to the table along with a bronze goblet from the bottom cabinet.

“What’s that for?” she asked, nodding towards the jar and goblet.

Lansius smiled as he poured the contents generously into the goblet. The rich aroma had a hint of honeyed sweetness.

“It’s mead. Where did you get it?” She became excited.

“One of Wade’s men broke an amphora, so all of them got their pay docked. I felt pity and helped out a little.”

She whistled. “Must be expensive.”

“Yeah, but I got this in return. So drink up and be delighted.” He handed the goblet to her.

She gulped it with a big grin on her face.

Her reaction brought a smile to his face. “Hey, wanna go out for lunch?” Lansius asked.

“If you insist,” Stefi masterfully quipped, putting a smile on Lansius’ face. He wanted to visit Keith’s shop again to buy gifts for Marc, Tanya, and Arryn. His campaign money was yet to be distributed, but that didn’t deter his eagerness to browse around.

 

***

 

“Master Lansius!” came a frantic knock at the door.

Lansius opened the door slightly wider, peering out into the pitch-black hallway. Only the dim light of a servant’s lantern illuminated their surroundings.

“Jan?” Lansius opened the door slightly wider.

The boy looked distraught. “Some people are leaving the city in a hurry,” Jan whispered frantically. “Master Hubert and Vince too. Wade saw them packing goods onto a fast carriage.”

Lansius’ mind raced as he tried to make sense of why even the eccentric Hubert left along with Vince.

Embezzlement? No, the old crook is far too eccentric for that, and Vince collects wages for doing nothing.

There was only one possibility left: War.

“Quick, help me pack my things,” Lansius said, rushing over to the cabinet and flinging its contents aside. He knew he was probably too late, but he didn’t need to outsmart anyone—just enough to get himself out of harm’s way.

 

***

 

Kingdom Building means War, and War begets Tragedy.

The story may gets depressing, so only continue to read if you can manage or cope with emotional distress. 

But really, don't lose hope. ❤️

 

Chapter 6

Crossroads

 

The large glass window on the second floor creaked as Jan heaved it open. “Remember to climb down the bricks. It’s too high to jump,” the young servant whispered, opening the window to its fullest extent.

Lansius’ heart raced. Earlier, Jan had convinced him this was the only way out without being seen by the guards. The municipal office was built like a castle and had just one exit.

“Can’t Wade smuggle me out or something?”

“He can hardly even get out himself. Together with you, it’s just not possible,” Jan argued.

Lansius knew that was true. Vince had once bribed a guard for a favor, but it led to a lengthy extortion. Slowly, he approached the window and was surprised by his disheveled appearance in the incomplete reflection on the glass, but the chilly evening air rushed inside and demanded his priority.

“Which part of the garden is beneath us?” he asked, knowing the soft ground was his only safety net.

“The one at the far end, near the old tree.”

Lansius hesitated. The chilling wind brought a sense of reality to his face, while the darkness challenged him to jump.

“Master, please be quick, or someone will find out,” Jan urged, as they were on the same floor as the staff’s dormitory.

“Are you sure you don’t want to leave with me?” Lansius asked.

“Who would feed me if I go? I’m a servant. I was here when the city was taken. They did little harm to me,” Jan whispered.

Taking a deep breath, Lansius flexed his hands to test his grip and began to climb. He placed his hands on the stone window frame and pulled his body up so his legs could find footing. The night sky came into view, showcasing both beauty and terror. Fear would surely paralyze him if he could measure the height.

“Turn around,” Jan urged him.

“I know. Just give me a moment.” Lansius turned to face the wall and climbed down. The earthy scent of moss warned him that the stone surface might be slippery, but he quickly found suitable spots for his hands and feet, securing solid footing.

This isn’t too hard.

The municipal building was nearly ancient, having faced partial destruction and rebuilding several times throughout the centuries. Each time, only its entrance and courtyard received proper repairs, while the other sides remained rough and ill-finished.

“Good luck, Master Lansius.”

Lansius looked up, but the creaking from the window signaled that Jan had already left. With no way back, he took a deep breath and continued his descent. Just two steps down, he encountered a snag. Unlike his first attempt, he couldn’t find secure footing. Some stone bricks jutted out, but they were too slippery for his feet.

Growing frustrated after a series of failed attempts, his hands grew sweaty and raw. He paused on the last good footing to catch his breath. At one point, he glanced down and saw the silhouette of a tree.

This is only the second floor, right?

An idea came to him. He carefully dropped his bag down, but the leather bag didn’t make enough noise to reveal the height. Now, out of options and with hands throbbing from strain, he felt more inclined to jump.

First, he knelt, gripping the last jutting stone brick, and planned to lower his body down. However, he couldn’t hold his weight and quickly lost his grip.

Gasp... Ouch!

The fall was swift; he landed feet first and fell sideways. Despite the sharp pain in his ankle and back, adrenaline kept the pain at bay. In the darkness, he could see the silhouettes of trees and a line of bushes. He forced himself to run for cover, crouching behind the nearest bushes, and waited.

The building remained silent. No noise or lights were disturbed. Lansius felt relieved and sneaked to find his bag. It took several tries, as only faint starlight illuminated the area.

Once he retrieved it, he quickly left through the narrow path between two buildings. He made several turns and suddenly emerged onto the main street. He looked around to get his bearings.

“Master,” someone called to him from the shadows.

“Wade?” Lansius whispered, and the man urgently motioned for Lansius to come closer.

As Lansius approached, Wade pulled back his hood and placed a small purse in Lansius’ hand. “I gave the guard a hard bargain, only a copper to let me out.”

“Keep the rest, Wade. You’ve earned it,” Lansius said, proud of his men.

Wade grinned. “I knew you’d say that,” he said, pocketing the bribe money Lansius had sent through Jan. “Are you hurt?”

“Nothing’s broken,” Lansius assured.

Wade nodded. “So, where do we go next?”

“Stefi. We need to get her.

“Where does the Squire live?”

Lansius racked his memory before recalling the location, “The old cobbler’s alley.”

“I know the way. Stay close.” Wade looked around and lead the way. Not wanting to attract attention, they walked close to the buildings.

The main street was deserted at this hour, and both sides were empty. As his adrenaline subsided, Lansius felt aches in his palms, left ankle, and back.

Riverstead was almost pitch-black, save for a few establishments like the tavern that maintained lit lanterns in their front yards. As they walked, they came across a glowing orb that illuminated a large area.

The source of the orb was a giant glass lantern, adorned with a statue of a grotesque, giant lizard, marking an intersection.

Wade approached the low-hanging lantern and opened its small metallic window. The city had placed it there for wayfarers to light their lanterns if they went out.

Wade pulled a candle from his lantern and lit it. Then the two of them ventured into a dark, winding alleyway.

This narrative has been purloined without the author's approval. Report any appearances on Amazon.

The area was notoriously challenging to navigate, even at noon. Wade had to stop and study the building signs to make sure he wasn’t lost.

“This is it, the old cobbler’s alley,” Wade remarked.

Lansius took the lantern from Wade. As they walked further down, he noticed a row of similarly sized buildings and quickened his pace. With Wade following, they arrived at one of the houses, and Lansius began knocking on the door.

“Stefi! Stephania!” he called repeatedly while continuing to knock.

After a while, Wade stopped him and tried to push the door several times.

“Master, it’s locked but not barred,” Wade said.

“She isn’t inside?” Lansius was horrified and surveyed the area. He was confident that this was the house.

Meanwhile, Wade examined the ground with his lantern and discovered footprints. “She’s not here. Someone must’ve called her.”

Lansius inspected the footprints in the muddy ground, kneeling to get a better look. There were indeed footprints, but he couldn’t tell if they were fresh.

“We have to go,” Wade urged. “She’s most likely called to arms.”

Lansius hesitated, but Wade pulled on his arm. As if pursued by ghosts, Wade led Lansius through the dark maze until they finally returned to the junction.

The grotesque lizard guarding the giant orb lantern greeted them again. Only then did they notice the roads growing livelier, with carriages now appearing.

As they neared the south gate, they encountered taller-than-man torches and lanterns, illuminating the numerous horse-drawn carriages and carts. Most were armed, with some even accompanied by cavalrymen.

A palpable sense of fear and anxiety permeated the atmosphere.

 

***

 

No one would take a clerk and his assistant seriously, but Lansius had no option. As they passed various carts and carriages, those inside eyed them nervously, their panic evident in the haphazard loading of their carriages.

It was unprecedented for a city to face another siege in such a short time. Everyone here had likely received a tip and was attempting to flee the impending siege. As Lansius drew closer, he overheard a heated exchange between the crowd and the guards.

“No men of arms are to leave the city,” a man hoarsely argued with the crowd.

“I assure you, these are only my master’s private household guards,” someone in the crowd responded.

“We know you let a dozen carriages leave just moments ago,” another accused, and the bickering persisted.

Judging by their elegant coats and fine garments, it was clear that the crowd came from a wealthy background.

Suddenly, a low horn sounded in the distance, followed by faint cries and shouts carried on the wind. The crowd froze, straining their ears to better identify the sounds.

As if confirming their fears, more windows on the top floor lit up as the dwellers awoke from their slumber, alarmed by the same sound.

"We're under attack!" someone yelled in a panic. Men from the carriages surged toward the city guards at the gates, demanding they be opened. Overwhelmed, the captain finally relented, especially after learning that the danger approached from the north, while the southern approach appeared clear.

With a groan of iron and wood, the massive city gates began to swing inward. People hastily prepared their carts and carriages for departure.

The clinking of heavy chains signaled that the drawbridge was being lowered. When it finally settled, it revealed a path leading to a stone bridge and beyond, all shrouded in darkness.

Another low horn resounded from the north, stirring more residents from their sleep. People spilled into the streets, confused and fearful.

Three horsemen headed to the gate, carrying brass lanterns that barely lit the road ahead. They were leading a carriage out of the city, and others quickly fell in line behind them.

Before he knew it, Lansius found himself caught in the current of the crowd. Nervously, he glanced to the side and noticed that Wade had stayed behind. "Wade!" he called out.

"Take care, Master Lans," Wade waved back from the edge of the crowd.

Lansius was aghast. "You're not coming?"

"I can't. My family and friends are here," Wade replied, taking a step back from the fray. "Riverstead is home. No matter who the Lord is, they'll need a warehouse worker like me."

Wade's expression was one of grim resolve. He had survived two sieges already; there was no guarantee he'd survive a third. Yet he knew little about the world beyond Riverstead's walls.

The crowd pushed Lansius forward, moving in one direction: out. The guards were keen to clear the area as quickly as possible so they could reseal the gates for the coming siege. Walking through the dimly lit crowd, illuminated only by sporadic hand-held lanterns, Lansius could see the faces of tired, nervous men all around him.

The throng approached the drawbridge, and the cacophony of carriages, horses, and escorts filled the air. Soon, they passed under the grand arches of the city gate, leaving only the open night sky above.

Before long, they had crossed the wooden drawbridge, stone bridge, and reached an open road. The walls of Riverstead now lay behind them, and an open field stretched out in front. And so, the crowd marched, intent on putting as much distance as possible between themselves and the besieged city.

Lansius stood alone outside the stone bridge, still hesitating to leave the city and Stefi behind. He was contemplating running back when the echo of the gates closing reached his ears. Soon, the gates were shut, and the drawbridge was drawn up again after the last horse-drawn cart had cleared its way.

Now, there was no more coming back. The guards certainly wouldn't lower the drawbridge for him.

"Out of the way!" The last cart's coachman shouted at Lansius.

Feeling that his chances were bleak, Lansius shouted back as the cart slowed down at the edge of the bridge. "I have some money, can you give me a lift?"

The horse and cart sped up, ignoring Lansius' plight.

Lansius sighed, feeling foolish, and jogged to try and catch up with the crowd.

"Quickly," someone called.

Surprised, Lansius saw the coachman and several figures in the cart were waiting for him. He ran toward them.

Someone uncovered a lantern, producing a faint glow as Lansius approached.

"Ha! I know you," said the coachman.

"Huh?" Lansius couldn't see the man's face.

“To think I met you out here,” the coachman muttered, grabbing Lansius' hand. He then called out, "Theo, help us.”

The two helped Lansius into the back of the cart, where he landed between wooden crates. "I’m Theo, and this big fellow here is Max,” the youth introduced himself.

Max groaned, wiped his blurry, sleepy eyes, and waved a little to Lansius.

"You said you know me?" Lansius directed the question at the coachman in front.

"It's Thomas," he removed his hood to reveal his bearded face.

“Thomas!” Lansius couldn’t believe his eyes.

The old man smirked but hurriedly spurred his horses, and the cart sped up. Lansius noticed a figure clad in a traveling cloak, sitting next to Thomas.

"Do you happen to see Stefi?" asked Lansius.

"The squire?" Thomas asked without looking back.

"We traveled together from Ceresia, remember?"

"I hope she's in one of the carriages," Thomas replied weakly.

Lansius exhaled deeply, his hope faded. “What will happen to the city?”

“Another siege,” replied the figure beside Thomas, her tone somber.

“Can the city hold out?” Lansius asked.

“Nobody knows, but Riverstead has never held against a siege," said Thomas.

His words left Lansius feeling dejected.

"Try to make peace with it. I need you to stay alert,” Thomas warned.

“Are we not safe here?” Lansius was alarmed.

“Sieges are always bad, whether you’re inside or outside,” Thomas cautioned.

“The horsemen may chase us for supplies and hostages,” Theo added.

The cart became bumpier as the horses picked up speed. Riding in the dark, even with lanterns and torches, was dangerous, but everyone risked it to avoid capture.

The sound of cracking whips filled the air as the coachmen urged their hesitant horses to run despite the darkness.

Lansius felt a crushing sense of loss as he kept his eyes fixed on the receding city. All he had wanted was a good job and a chance to improve his station in life. And now everything seemed lost.

Stefi, Jan, Wade, please stay safe...

As the dispersed crowd and convoy moved further away, the glimmering lights north of the city became increasingly numerous and distinct. At first, they mistook them for an eerie reflection of the night sky. But soon, the unsettling truth dawned on them: those weren't stars.

Instead, those were the glowing hearths of countless fireplaces, illuminating a sprawling enemy encampment. The sheer size of the camp, visible even from a distance, suggested an army not in the hundreds, but likely in the thousands.

The realization that the defeated army—believed to be on its last legs—now appeared more formidable than ever sent a chill through the convoy. A palpable sense of fear and hopelessness settled over them as they left Riverstead to its fate.

 

***

 



Last year, unwilling to wait for the Imperium's response, Lord Maurice mustered his forces and marched them to Ceresia on the eve of winter. There, he waited and launched a daring winter attack, which took Karius' men by surprise and turned the tides of war.

Lord Karius was swiftly dislodged from Riverstead and forced to flee, with Lord Maurice's men hot on their heels. However, even with the arrival of spring, the tensions remained unresolved. Lord Karius stubbornly resisted all offers of truce, seemingly engaging in negotiations merely to buy time.

Lord Maurice, out of an abundance of caution, secured a fortress to guard against any potential reinforcements. Despite his precaution, nobody suspected that an alliance had formed between Lord Karius and Margrave Gottfried.

The formidable Margrave, ruler of four northern Brigandia provinces, had previously clashed with Karius, making their sudden alliance a surprise. The specifics of their agreement were unclear, yet one thing was certain: Karius had set a trap for Maurice.

Karius had successfully lured Maurice out of Riverstead, giving Gottfried and his formidable army the opportunity to cross the Great River and launch a devastating attack on the city. The situation rapidly escalated into a crisis for Maurice and his men, whose escape route was effectively cut off.

The war in Arvena dealt a heavy blow to the central government's prestige. As high nobles waged war upon each other, the rule of the Imperium had never appeared weaker. Many nobles looked upon this conflict with deep concern, fearing that the fabric holding the Imperium together might finally fray. Others saw this as a great opportunity to carve out realms of their own.

However, for the commoners, the fall of Arvena was seen as a prelude to disaster. Something that may warn of the incoming age of strife.

 

***

 

Not a Chapter

Volume I Glossary

 

Map for Elven Calendar 4422



This is the map of Promissia Continent.

The Third Human Imperium encompasses a vast region that includes (starting from 9 o’clock) Sarmatia, Centuria, Arminia, Brigandia, Arvena, Rhomeia, Midlandia, and Lowlandia, as well as the territories of Nicopola, Halicia, and Ekionia.

Each Province within the Third Human Imperium is vast, with some, like Midlandia, rivaling half the size of Western Europe. Thus, they don’t have resource or living space issues. The Imperium's governance and structure evoke a Roman Empire that survived into the Medieval Era.

Lords govern the Provinces, acting much like Roman Governors, traditionally commanding at least a legion of six-thousand men. However, in this story's setting, the relative peace that has lasted for 1300 years has reduced these numbers. Right now, even a high-ranking Lord like Earl Maurice of Arvena has only two-thousand men at his disposal.

Nomadic People, Mercantile Kingdom, and Navalnia Empire are human but not part of the Imperium.

Beastman Confederati is self-explanatory.

 

***

 

The World, Aqua Terra

The biodiversity of this world varies greatly from that of Earth, making the local flora and fauna rather unique. To avoid confusion, I've largely omitted these details from the narrative, as they don't significantly impact the plot. Moreover, Lansius, our protagonist, is neither a botanist nor an avid animal expert. So, he didn't know the subtle differences.

However, one noticeable difference that he is aware of is the duck and chicken of this world. The birds here are enormous, about half the size of an ostrich. They're dangerous, cruel, and almost demonic in nature. Imagine a wild ostrich, or cassowary.

I can't hyperlink in main page, but look them up :



https://www.guinnessworldrecords.com/news/2019/4/why-the-cassowary-is-the-worlds-most-dangerous-bird-568931

 

In story, their eggs are large and rich in nutrients, but their meat is tough and difficult to prepare. These birds are typically slaughtered at a young age and their meat is primarily consumed by nobility.

As for the commoners, they mostly consume lamb or mutton and occasionally goat. Beef is also a staple, albeit less frequent.

Also, the carrots are mostly purple and banana is unappetizing because of the lack of selective breeding.

 

If you encounter this narrative on Amazon, note that it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

https://ferrebeekeeper.wordpress.com/2014/08/07/carrots-changed-color-in-the-sixteenth-century/

Banana pict is from Wiki.

Lastly, despite rumors of fell beasts lurking in the ancient forests of the Promissia Continent, there have been no reports of such creatures wandering the plains or urban areas. Goblins and trolls have been absent for thousands of years because, over the course of 4,000 years, humans have hunted these creatures, pushing them to the far corners of the continent.

Contact with goblins and other fell beasts predominantly occurs on the Old Progentia Continent, which is separated from Promissia by vast oceans.

 

Regarding Language

In this world, the common tongue was rough-hewn and direct. Words were utilitarian tools, not elegant and well-articulated. Conversation was a matter of conveying necessity, not crafting poetry. The more polite and formal the conversation, the stiffer it became.

Instead of thank you, they used Gratitude.

Instead of sorry, they used I apologize, or Apology.

It's something to emulate crude Latin feeling, mixed with old English. On an interesting note, if the conversation is formal, they usually use stiffer language. If they began to get more comfortable, they'll slip into more normal language.

 

Regarding Master vs Maester

Both mæster and the more modern master can be traced to the Latin magister – a master or a teacher. This title was bestowed in the Middle Ages upon a person of authority, who had obtained a licence

In story, they are almost interchangeable, with a small caveat. Maester/ Meister is used to address the professional, be it smiths, bakers, artisans, craftsmen, or scribe/ clerk.

Meanwhile, a Master is only used to address a superior.

 

Regarding Magic

Magic is scarce and highly regulated, meaning only the high nobility employs these powerful individuals. Most commoners don't know about the extent of what Mages can do aside from them being powerful.

What commoners do know is about the Healers Guild existence in big cities. The Guild cloisters gifted individuals they name Saint Candidates. These people can cure injuries and maladies with healing magic. However, the healing process takes a lot of time and effort, so their services (naturally since this is feudal era) are reserved for nobility and patrons of the Guild.

The price for healing is a donation, and it starts at multiple gold coins' worth of donations. So, it's mostly off-limits to commoners.

Also, there are no wizards or witches in their lore. They have different lore with dragons; again, we're looking at Volume II, along with some reveal about the Imperium. So, please be patient.

 

Regarding Currency

We're using currency that is based on Anglo-Saxon Pound, Shillings, and Pence, which was modeled after Holy Roman Empire who modeled after the Roman's Livre, Solidus, and Denarius.

The rate is 1 gold = 20 silver

1 silver = 12 Copper

1 copper = 12-14 iron (inflation)

 

Regarding The Great River

The Great River is as large as the English Channel, so no bridge is possible, and everyone must use water transport to cross.

However, unlike the English Channel, the Great River is relatively calm because it's mostly inland. Thus, river boats with simple flat hulls are typically used for trade and transport.

 

Regarding Squire-ship

A squire-ship is akin to an apprenticeship, serving both educational and occupational roles. Thus, if a squire loses his master, he remains a squire, much like a carpenter would remain a carpenter—or an apprentice carpenter, depending on skill level—even after losing his own master.

Being a squire is a big deal in the medieval world. Many became influential in villages because squires tend to be educated and closer to the nobility than commoners. Over time, they may become landowners and part of the gentry class.

If a squire loses his master, he has the option to pay and apply to serve another master. Alternatively, if he feels he has sufficient education and is not aiming for a career in knighthood—since knighthood is expensive—he can find employment as a squire. People can work in different capacity within a noble Household with a squire "diploma". And it's pretty normal and successful live to retire as a squire.

 

Regarding Blonde Hair

The majority of the Imperium's populace, including its nobility, predominantly have brown hair. However, this changed centuries ago when the Imperium conquered the northern Kingdom of Brigandia, whose kings and nobles were known for their blond hair.

Following the subjugation, Imperium nobles often married Brigandian aristocrats and brought them back to their own territories. As these unions sometimes resulted in offspring with golden hair, the color began to carry a noble connotation, particularly in other regions of the Imperium.

 

 

***

 

Chapter 7

Bridge to the West

 

A speck of light glowed on the far horizon and the once dark sky turned into bronze-yellow. The wind blew fiercely, as if hailing the birth of a new day.

Lansius felt someone pushed his shoulder. “Erm?”

“The sun is almost out,” Theo, who slept next to Lansius, said weakly.

“A moment.” Lansius fought the sleepiness off his head. His body felt stiff while his eyes painful to open. He saw the underside of the cart and reminded himself not to get up like normal or risk smacking his head. He rolled his body to the right instead and immediately felt the cold sensation from the dew-covered grass.

He stood up and shivered. It was his second night, but nothing improved. They carried no tent and slept underneath their carts as cover. It was better than sleeping out in the open, but way more cramped, smelly, and still cold.

Lansius lazily folded a sheet of canvas that he had used as a blanket. Theo appeared from beneath the cart. He looked equally miserable. The long and bumpy ride had taken a toll on all their bodies.

The horses, for certain, had it worse. They were moodier than ever and easily agitated by everything. Lansius, who had some experience with horses, took them to the patches of high grass and tied them to a tree as a precaution.

Lansius watched as Theo and Max started their task by getting water from a nearby creek. A strong breeze blew past them and he shivered again despite his gambeson. He took in the scent of the forest and pondered his decision to follow Thomas.

Despite the situation, Lansius couldn't shake off the lingering doubts and guilt about leaving Stefi and Riverstead. His rational mind, familiar with the horrors of a medieval town under siege, argued that escape had been the right choice. Yet, his heart disagreed, plaguing him with emotional torment.

Regardless of his internal conflict, Lansius recognized that his choices had led him here. Any chance he'd had for a life as a lord's retinue had probably vanished along with the likely defeat of their Lord and the siege of Riverstead.

“Morning,” someone greeted from behind.

Lansius turned to face Thomas. “Good to see you in high spirits, Chief."

“Heh, you’d be just as spirited if you learned about this,” Thomas teased.

“Learn what?”

“The scout said it’s only half a day’s journey till we reach the river,” the older man explained.

“We’re that close to Ceresia?” Lansius’ mood changed for the better.

“Yep, with luck; we could be there before sundown.”

“Chief, I hope you’ll find a better place than that barn,” Lansius jested.

Thomas laughed and slapped Lansius’ back. “Hey, it’s not that bad. It’s spacious, and the roof is solid.”

The morning went without a hitch and the convoy departed in high spirits. They kept riding west and now the trees looked different, taller, with less branches. The horses could only move at a slower pace as they faced more inclination. Some carts even had their men walk to ease their horses as they went uphill.

The cart Thomas commandeered wasn’t that loaded, so nobody needed to dismount. It was a slow ride; the sky was cloudy and breezy. Big boy Max found the weather so irresistible that he dozed on and off. Meanwhile, Theo continued on the lookout. The lad was dependable despite being only a year older than Max.

Compared to them, Lansius looked fragile. Unlike Max, who could sleep in an awkward position with head unsupported and both hands gripping crates to keep him from falling, Lansius kept awake because he couldn’t make himself comfortable.

Unintentionally, he counted five carts and two carriages that made up the convoy. It was less than half when they began. Too disheartened by war-torn Arvena, many had gone south into Midlandia, whose Lord was on good terms with Lord Maurice.

The convoy Lansius was in, traveled the same path he had taken last winter. Nobody questioned the decision. For them, it was only natural to return to the heartland. Like many, he was eager to return home and couldn’t care less about the reason.

Since yesterday, Lansius had been dreaming of finally arriving in Bellandia and seeing his family. That thought kept him going despite the situation. Even the awful taste of the hard biscuits, which he had to soften with water just to make them edible, did little to dampen his spirits once he reminded himself that he could taste Mother Arryn’s cooking in a few weeks.

He couldn’t wait to play with Tanya and trade stories with Marc. On the surface, he felt happy, but the guilt of leaving Stefi behind was eating at him from the inside.

Lansius kept to himself more than usual. He didn’t ask about Theo or Max’s background. Not inquiring about the figure who sat next to Thomas. It was only because of their close vicinity that he overheard the boys describing Miranda as a guard for hire.

Miranda wasn’t much of a talker, but had once mentioned how her only son bore a resemblance to Theo. She did little but maintain her prized crossbow every night, despite no apparent usage.

The cart slowed to a stop. Everybody but Max looked around to find the reason, but Thomas glanced and shushed them with his finger, “Listen.”

There were faint sounds of water moving rapidly.

“The river,” exclaimed Theo.

The convoy needed to wait before they could cross the narrow bridge. They needed to check it for safety. The old wooden structure often had its support beams weakened by the strong current.

The rest of the convoy dismounted as they waited. Most went to the river to sightsee, fill their canteen, or wash their face.

Lansius and Theo saw Miranda dismount, and they decided to follow. Thomas tied the horse to a tree and jogged after them, leaving Max sleeping alone in the cart.

This is perfect for a picnic...

Lansius thought about the picturesque spot and the lovely weather. A good respite from all the rough rides they had these past few days. Many sat on the ground or rested their back on the grass.

Unauthorized usage: this tale is on Amazon without the author's consent. Report any sightings.

...

“Boss,” Max cried from behind.

The tone made Thomas to jump into action. As he ran to the cart, Lansius and Theo followed. They watched as men from the other carts panicked and scrambled for the wooded area with just their weapons.

Miranda ran past Thomas and jumped to the top of the coachman’s seat. She didn't like what she saw. “Grab your spears and run to the trees.”

The carts in front made a risky dash to cross the bridge, but for the rest of them, there was no choice but to run for the woods.

 

***

 

The smell of earth and decomposing leaves was everywhere as Lansius followed Miranda and Thomas deeper into the woods. It wasn’t nearly as easy to hide as he had thought, the trees were tall but sparse.

Miranda found a hidden slope behind an old tree and signaled to take cover. “Stay away from the boulder,” she instructed.

Lansius was too breathless to think, but Theo gave a questioning look.

“Any distinct spot like a rock formation is a landmark. Don’t linger near them. The enemy will certainly look for you near there,” she explained.

“Will they be chasing us?” Lansius asked as he sat behind the tree’s giant roots.

“Calm down lads, with luck they might just take the carts and leave us alone,” Thomas said.

That gave some sort of relief, but soon the screaming and shouting dashed their hope. It wasn’t possible to tell what happened, but the situation wasn’t promising.

“We need eyes,” Thomas said to himself.

“I’ll go. Your old bones might not be fit for the job.” Miranda loosened her ring mail coif, put her sword and crossbow on the ground, then crawled out. She tried concealing herself while moving to the direction of their cart.

As she went farther, the trees and vegetation hid her from sight.

“You three, wait here. I’m going to look for another spot.” Thomas went deeper into the woods.

Theo looked at the other two. “Do you think we’ll be safe here?”

Lansius couldn’t answer while Max let out a loud sigh and complained, “I shouldn’t have listened. I never wanted to go to Riverstead.”

The sound of leaves rustling alerted them. Theo went on the lookout. “It’s Miranda, she’s back.”

She dashed toward them. Breathless and looked troubled, she hid behind the giant tree. “Thomas?”

Before anyone could answer, Thomas returned and crouched in front of her. “Not good,” he reported.

“What did you find?” Miranda asked.

“Horsemen, they've cut off our escape.”

“Damn it, they also got footmen encroaching on us. We're trapped. They wanted hostages.”

“Or slaves...” Thomas added.

"So, what should we do?" Theo asked, his voice laden with worry.

They were trapped, with horsemen at their backs, a river to their left, and footmen blocking their path ahead. Their options were dwindling rapidly. A cold sweat formed on Lansius' back and his grip on his spear tightened.

Thomas was silent. He knew the grim reality: their entire convoy consisted of only thirty men, most of whom were not fighters.

Miranda pulled her leather strap necklace. It connected to a small pouch she hid behind her ring mail. She emptied the content into her palm and revealed rings, jewelry, and gold coins.

Such valuables were so unexpected that they did a double take. For them, the value of such treasure was beyond their ability to comprehend.

“My job is to deliver this to Alba Castle,” she began the story. “Sir Ian was wounded in battle. He’s in no condition to ride and chances are he’ll get captured along with Riverstead. He wanted to send his signet ring and valuables to his son. That way, his son could either ransom him or succeed him if he perishes.”

Miranda handed two decorated silver rings to Thomas. “Return these to his family and claim your reward.”

“Why are you doing this? You should do this yourself,” Thomas protested.

“Someone needs to lead them. I’ll manage somehow.”

“Alone? It’s too risky-“

“I can’t let these boys be taken into slavery,” Miranda insisted and Thomas relented.

“The worst that could happen is to meet my son and husband in the afterlife.”

Her words stunned the three, while Thomas looked grim as if remembering a bad memory.

Without wasting more time, she gave Theo a jewel-encrusted brooch and Max an ornamented buckle. Then she handed out half the coins to Lansius. “You’re a scribe of some sort. Count it.”

“Six gold coins and sixteen silvers.”

“Good. Remember to return it to Alba Castle or I’m going to find you and turn you into target practice,” Miranda said to Lansius, who was older and not so naive as the boys.

Lansius nodded. It would be a simple task to find the only black hair in Arvena.

“Thomas, get them out safely. I’ll cover you.”

“Best of luck then,” Thomas said and left with the trio.

Lansius took one last glance and saw Miranda fastening her ring mail coif. When she noticed, Lansius bowed his head in respect. That simple gesture made her smile.

Thomas led the trio to crouch over the vegetation and tall trees; hopping between slopes and taking cover behind irregular mounds. The sound of cracking branches and horses’ heavy hooves alerted them.

The sound was getting closer. Thomas hid his head between shrubs while the other wouldn’t risk getting seen. They waited in fear before the horseman in orange and black surcoat came into view. He was wearing a skull-cap helmet and ring mail while his horse was without armor.

The horseman crept while keeping his eyes on the lookout.

“Come out, you little dirty rabbits.” A voice came from another direction.

“Evnas, keep your mouth shut,” came a distant response.

The banter between still unseen individuals made the orange and black horsemen chuckle.

Thomas pulled himself from the lookout and whispered, “I need to draw him away. Remember to keep walking with the river to your right. Find a shallow place and cross, but avoid Ceresia. The enemy will be there.”

And then, without warning, Thomas climbed and ran in the opposite direction.

“Halt!” the horseman cried as he spotted Thomas. “I found one,” he declared to his comrades, and clenched his legs to signal the horse to speed up.

“Evnas, go assist him!” commanded the other person. But before the second rider could come, the rider in black and orange had given chase.

Meanwhile, Theo froze, but Max, who understood the situation, dragged his friend from the spot. Lansius followed without a word.

...

Thomas zigzagged between the trees as he ran, but the horseman kept his cool and trailed him from a distance. He couldn’t run and hide forever. Out of breath, he slowed down. Before he stopped, instinct guided him to stand in the open instead of hiding behind the trees.

The horseman closed in with a drawn sword. The sound of hooves pounding the ground echoed through the air as he charged, intending to kill.

Thomas stood on his ground, his axe ready in his right hand. But the rider’s approach left no gap, forcing Thomas to dodge roll at the last moment into the trees.

The horseman overshot his approach, trotted his horse around, and prepared for another pass. He could afford to play this cat-and-mouse game patiently.

One more pass and then another. The horseman kept harassing his prey to provoke them into making a mistake.

Out of breath and out of tricks, Thomas’ attempt to bait the rider into a duel on foot had failed. Now, he risked meeting up with the footmen, or worse, the second horseman.

The horseman seemed to enjoy this and started another approach when a sharp, distinct sound echoed. It wasn’t loud, but the rider staggered, dropped his sword, and moved about erratically. A bolt had penetrated his ring mail, through the doublet, and ruptured his lung. The rider soon suffocated as his lung became filled with blood.

Thomas dragged his tired legs, attempted to deliver the killing blow, but before he could, someone rushed in from another direction and speared the rider.

The rider cried out in pain, but was unable to retaliate, his flailing causing his horse to panic. He fell backwards, hitting the ground hard as the horse galloped away. The fallen man, decked in the orange and black surcoat lay motionless, either from the fall or his fatal wound.

“Ronan,” Thomas called.

“Thomas, who shot the bolt?” Ronan asked as he pulled his spear from the dead body.

“It’s Miranda. Where are the other guys?”

“Dead, tch- they even killed Ulrich...” Ronan’s voice was full of anger and sadness.

“The lad? But he’s no older than fourteen...” Thomas felt sickened.

“There’s no reason to kill him…” he grew frustrated. “Nothing good will come from this. Better run while you still can,” he warned and walked away.

“Where you’re going?”

“Swim.”

“And lose all your gear?” Thomas asked.

Ronan turned to face him and opened his arms to signal, ‘what else can I do?’

Thomas reflected, but chose not to follow. Probably because he had no kids of his own, he wanted to save Theo and the rest.

Footsteps on his right surprised Thomas. He readied his axe, but saw Miranda and felt relieved. “Good shot.”

Miranda pulled Thomas behind a tree and forced him to crouch. “Don’t do that again!”

Thomas grinned. “Hey, let’s bait another one.”

“Are you an idiot? You’d be dead if I can’t find a clear line of sight.” Not wanting to hear his response, she added, “The footmen are closing in. Let’s get out from here.”

Thomas seemed to remember something. He took two rings from his pouch and threw them one by one to Miranda. “Catch.”

“What are you doing?” She couldn’t believe the Thomas she knew had turned suicidal.

“One more. For the boys,” he said and went searching for the second horseman.

 

***

 

Chapter 8

Amertume Forest

 

Tall trees with lush leaves and sturdy branches painted the backdrop as the trio ventured deeper into the forest. The undergrowth was teeming with bright green ferns, mosses, and shrubs that carpeted the forest floor. Max led the way, with Theo and Lansius following closely behind. Their only guide was to keep the river on their right.

Despite having trekked for some time, they had yet to encounter anything suspicious. This lack of threat emboldened Max to look for a shallow spot to cross the river.

Recognizing Max’s intent as he steered them closer to the river, Lansius voiced his concern. “Max, I think we should walk further before attempting to cross.”

Max halted, catching his breath. “We’ll get too tired if we walk further.”

“The sooner we cross, the better,” Theo chimed in.

Lansius nodded. He didn’t want to stall progress with a debate. Thus, they continued alongside the river until they found a suitable spot with jutting boulders.

Max was the first to wade into the water. He made steady progress initially but then suddenly found himself submerged up to his chest.

The other two could only exchange glances as a soaked Max returned. Taking over Max's bag, they continued their search along the riverbank. Before they knew it, they stumbled upon a potential solution.

Theo spotted a rundown hut not far from the river. Next to it, a piece of a canoe jutted out from overgrown shrubs. Hopeful, they jogged over to inspect the boat. It was old and decayed but, crucially, didn't have a gaping hole. Max and Lansius cleared the debris from the small boat while Theo investigated the hut.

Despite his efforts, Theo returned empty-handed. “So, can we use it?”

Max looked at Lansius, who nodded and replied, “This might just do the job.”

Together, they lifted the small wooden canoe into the river. Despite their panting and heaving, they were elated when the old boat floated without leaking much.

With help from the others, Max climbed aboard with an equally weathered oar, followed by Theo. The boat wobbled precariously.

“If we all get in, this dinghy will capsize,” Lansius warned.

“What should we do then?” Theo asked.

“You go first with Theo and come back for me later,” Lansius suggested.

“Okay, just wait here.” Max began to row, unsteadily at first.

Lansius stood back and watched, a smile tugging at his lips as Max grappled with the oar. The boat drifted aimlessly at first, but Max was starting to get the hang of it.

The emerging sun cast beautiful reflections on the water’s surface. Max was making good progress when he abruptly stopped and lurched forward. Theo quickly steadied his friend before shouting and waving at Lansius.

Lansius couldn’t make out what Theo was saying due to the river's noise. He initially thought Max had grown weary from rowing, but then he spotted a blot of red on Max’s tunic. He instinctively ducked and scanned the area in terror.

Confirming his fear, a silvery object darted again towards the boat, striking its side.

Crossbowman?!

Lansius scanned the area where the threat had come from, half expecting another bolt to be loosed in his direction.

“Get the boys, kill them. They might be Maurice’s bastards!” a chilling voice echoed from the woods.

But the expected bolt didn't come, and Lansius saw no one. His survival instincts surged, and he abandoned his friends, sprinting away from the riverbank as fast as he could.

He had left his spear behind, but he didn't care. He ceased thinking and just urged his weary legs to keep moving. He slipped, crashed into a tree, then pushed off and continued to run. His left ankle twisted as it caught a tree root, sending him tumbling. But he got up and pressed on, delving deeper into the forest.

...

Lansius eventually came to a stop, collapsing in a fit of uncontrollable coughing. Exhaustion had finally caught up to him. He was drenched in sweat, and his body felt drained of strength. His limbs throbbed with every beat of his heart.

For a long while, he could do nothing but lie there, gasping for breath. He noticed the trees around him were older, their bark a darker shade of brown. The ground beneath him was softer, the air thick with the smell of decomposing leaves.

The rustling leaves and branches above him created a serene soundscape, the sunlight and shadows dancing in a playful game. But all he could see were flashes of Max and Theo.

“Damn it...” he cursed, tears stinging his eyes.

He had known the boys for three whole days. They had traveled together, eaten together, slept side by side.

To think they have to die like that...

Overwhelmed by shock and grief, Lansius struggled to his feet. He was dizzy and in poor shape, but he had no other options. He clung to Thomas's advice: “Keep walking with the river to your right.”

So, he pressed onward, alone, further into the heart of the ancient forest.

 

***

 

The chirping of birds stirred Lansius from his restless slumber. He woke to find himself chilled and crawling with ants and insects. Groaning, he rose, shaking off the tiny invaders and even beating his clothes against a tree trunk to dislodge them.

Afterward, he staggered to the largest tree nearby, draping his blanket over one of its branches and settling down on a protruding root. He was consumed by exhaustion, his sleep cycle disrupted. His nights were sleepless and filled with fear. To make matters worse, his empty stomach churned, making him feel as if he might vomit at any moment.

The lightheadedness persisted, so he occupied himself by massaging his legs. His left ankle throbbed painfully, and his right knee was sore from numerous falls and slips. Even his shoes were beginning to fall apart.

This morning marked the third day Lansius had wandered alone. As his heart worked to pump blood into his weary head, he pulled out his traveling bag and rummaged through its contents. One by one, he put its content into his lap. He saw a piece of hard biscuit wrapped in linen, a wooden bowl and spoon, a tin cup, two small purple carrots, and a peculiar red fruit he had found but dared not to eat.

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

In his determination to not leave anything behind, he shook the bag and a pouch tumbled out onto his lap. It was his money pouch, which he had kept in his bag due to its significant value. He had forgotten about it, and out of curiosity, he emptied it.

Gold, silver, and copper coins formed a small pile on his lap.

He picked up one of the gold coins, inspecting it closely.

How many months of work is one of these worth?

It was a rhetorical question, but he found the irony amusing and burst into laughter.

To think that I would die with six gold coins in my hand...

His laughter only served to worsen his pounding headache. Dizzy and starving, he glanced at his meager ration of hard biscuit, but knew it was too dry to eat without water. He reached for his water pouch and took a few sips, then bit off a small piece of biscuit, chewing it like an awfully tasting candy.

He had less than a third of his water remaining. He knew he needed to find the river or some sort of creek. The problem lay therein. The previous day, he had bet on finding another village if he kept following the river, reasoning that most settlements were located near a water source. Ceresia farmland was near a river delta, Bellandia had a large creek, and Riverstead was flanked by three rivers.

However, he had underestimated the terrain. The river had become increasingly difficult to follow on foot, frequently disappearing into steep ravines or similarly impassable areas.

Yet, Lansius could still hear the distant murmur of the stream, providing a glimmer of hope. He looked at the sun, steeling himself for another exhausting journey. He knew there was no turning back; he didn't have enough food to retrace his steps.

Now, it was either move forward or die trying. Aided by a walking stick he fashioned from a broken branch, he once again set out into the vast forest.

 

***

 

Lansius’ stomach churned. He felt so weak and famished that he felt like boiling some leaves or mushrooms. His lack of tools to start a fire was now his greatest regret. It had cost him dearly. Fire would help ward off the chilly nights and kept insects from crawling over him. But most importantly, the absence of fire limited him to wild berries he dared to eat.

Hunger was all in his mind. Yesterday, he had eaten the last half of his hard biscuit.

Now, only a leftover carrot remained, but even after chewing it, he found little respite from his hunger. To make matters worse, his waterskin was nearly empty, as he still hadn't located the river.

The sun was high on the horizon when he finally found the will to continue southward. His legs wobbled with exhaustion and fever seized him in waves, yet he trudged on almost mindlessly. He knew that if he didn't find a settlement today, surviving tomorrow would be near impossible.

The terrain was unforgiving, forcing him to mind his steps on the moss-covered rocks, fallen branches, and overgrown shrubs. There was never a direct path. He constantly had to adapt and navigate when the terrain became too treacherous.

By midday, his stamina had dwindled to the point that he needed to lean on a large branch for support. The dizziness persisted, and he slumped to the forest floor. He reached for the last piece of food he had, a fruit resembling a red mango.

With his left hand, he unsheathed his knife and inspected the short blade. But instead of using it to cut the fruit, the sharp edge seemed to beckon him.

After days of wandering alone in the wilderness, he questioned his own sanity. He tried to soothe his racing thoughts, but feverish images persisted.

Stefi, Jan... Thomas, Max, Theo, Miranda...

Lansius recalled their faces and exhaled deeply. Half of him felt so guilty that he contemplated ending it all right there, but the other half clung to a sliver of hope.

Before he knew it, he was overcome by shivers, and exhaustion claimed him. He managed to sheath his knife before collapsing onto his side. He intended to take a brief nap, but half an hour turned into twelve.

...

Lansius didn’t realize a new day had dawned when he opened his eyes. He felt surprisingly refreshed, and even his ankle seemed better. Oddly enough, he didn’t find the usual insects crawling on his clothes.

There was nothing unusual in his surroundings, except for a plant with dark purple leaves near him. With nothing to lose, he took his knife and carefully excavated the plant, making sure to extract it complete with its roots. He wrapped it in leftover linen and stored it in his bag. Afterward, he checked his gear, took the last sip of water, and mustered his will for another trek.

Strangely, he no longer felt hungry. Unbeknownst to him, his digestion had slowed down as he'd barely eaten in almost a week. Now, his muscle tapped directly into his fat and he became skinnier each day.

After what felt like two hours, he could hear the river more distinctly than before. This spurred him to continue.

Suddenly, his foot plunged into what felt like a puddle of water. He instinctively pulled it out, startled by the cold, wet sensation. On examining his surroundings, he found he had stepped on a hidden creek that was concealed by ferns, shrubs, and other vegetation.

This stroke of luck made him burst into laughter.

Suddenly, a loud neighing sound startled Lansius, causing him to jump sideways and land on his backside.

A horse?!

He could hear the animal's heavy breathing emanating from behind the trees. He quickly filled his canteen from the creek and set off to find the horse.

He was concerned about the horse's rider, but after being alone for so long, he was willing to risk even a cell or a dungeon.

As Lansius peered between the trees, he spotted a brown horse with white spots. It was calmly drinking from the creek in the middle of a small clearing. The horse was saddled and had reins, indicating the presence of an owner.

Lansius scanned the surroundings, but found no one even after several minutes.

After some deliberation, he slowly approached the stream, doing his best to appear nonthreatening.

The horse neighed unhappily, but Lansius remained calm. He knelt by the creek to clean his hands and face, something he hadn’t done in days. He continued to observe his surroundings and noticed saddlebags on the horse. Seeing them as a potential lifeline, he gathered the courage to approach.

He racked his brain to recall what Stefi had taught him about horses. He made no sudden movements, approached the horse indirectly, and stayed within its line of sight.

After a tense moment in which the horse moved several times and Lansius paused to give it space, he finally managed to grab the reins. As he took hold of the leather strap, the horse protested but didn’t run or kick.

“Easy, boy…” Lansius patted the horse’s head to calm it down before moving to the saddle. He wasn't planning to ride - his horse-riding skills were far too poor - instead, he opened the saddlebags and unloaded their contents onto the forest floor.

There were pouches, ropes, onion-smelling thing, linens, and various other items. On the other side, he found water pouches, a metallic flask, a black metal pot, and a sheet of fabric. The last thing he did was unstrap a sword from the saddle.

As the sword clattered to the ground, he first gathered the pouches and moved the items away from the horse, lest the animal trample them. Once done, Lansius let go of the reins.

“Go on, you’re free to go.”

The horse remained distrustful but eventually trotted away. He had considered keeping her, but he was too worried that her rider was nearby. He was also concerned that leading a horse might make him an easier target to track.

Loaded with goods, Lansius moved to find some cover. He continued until he found a cluster of gigantic trees with tall shrubs on either side, then he began to unpack.

Peanuts? This is promising... and this is... ugh, moldy bread, yuck.

He threw the bread away, along with some rotten salted meat to avoid attracting any carnivores. Without wasting any time, he popped a handful of nuts into his mouth, finding they tasted somewhat like almonds. He then uncovered thin biscuits and eagerly devoured them.

Those biscuits were superb, better than any he had ever had. Next, he cut a chunk of cheese and ate it whole.

Curiosity led him to sample the ale from the engraved metallic flask. He coughed heavily as his throat burned, but he felt invigorated.

A metallic glint caught his attention. He had forgotten about the sword. He picked it up and drew it from its scabbard.

It was a fine-looking arming sword. Its blade had a fuller, the cross guard looked sturdy, and the pommel was rounded. The blade only had minor defects or imperfections. As Stefi had taught him, only the area around the tip was razor sharp. The rest of the blade was only as sharp as scissors and meant to be used against an armored opponent.

Feeling satisfied, Lansius sheathed the sword again and felt somewhat safer because of it. Not knowing how much time had passed, as the woods obscured the sun, he decided to push his luck further and continued his search for a way out.

A horse, even a lost one, is a good sign that a settlement is near.

With renewed spirit, he slung his newfound sword over his shoulder, along with his loaded bag, and set off again. His instincts told him to follow the creek, so he abandoned his search for the river.

The terrain became more challenging with boulders scattered here and there. The sun changed its hue to a reddish-orange, and the trees began to thin out. This urged him to quicken his pace, and he noticed a spot where numerous beams of light penetrated the forest floor. Jogging toward the clearing, he hoped to find something, but what he saw left him speechless.

Vast meadows, two distant hills, a lake, and small rectangular shapes that could be farms or orchards.

It wasn’t just a clearing; it was a way out. A warm wind greeted Lansius as he emerged back into the civilized world.

 

***

 

Chapter 9

A Village by The Lake

 

Holding his breath, Lansius sprinted through the woods until his better judgment stopped him. He surveyed his surroundings and concealed himself. Examining his bag, he realized he had items that could arouse suspicion. A clerk fleeing from war with a sword wouldn't go unnoticed, and carrying a large sum of gold coins would be unwise. At best, they could be confiscated; at worst, he could be robbed or jailed as a thief.

So, he scanned the area and noticed something gray. Lansius cautiously approached the spot, careful not to lose his bearings. As he got closer, he saw a large half buried boulder, which was easy to locate even from a distance—perfect as a landmark but not for hiding. Lansius then spotted an old tree with dark-colored bark behind some shrubs.

He pushed through the surrounding vegetation and reached the tree. Sitting on one of its giant roots, he felt protected by the plants that concealed the spot. Lansius then noticed a gap in the tree roots and cautiously inserted his sword, still in its scabbard, to test its depth while praying he wouldn't disturb any snakes or spiders inside.

Finding the hole deep enough and undisturbed, he pulled out the sword and dug a small hole for his money pouch. He carefully placed the pouch, covered it with dirt, and flattened the surface using the scabbard. He then gathered several stones and plugged the hole, followed by a layer of dried leaves to conceal it further.

Satisfied with his work, Lansius checked his pockets for anything that might raise suspicion and found his purple plants. On a whim, he pulled out his knife and began digging in a clearing near the ancient tree. He planted the purple plants and sprinkled some water on them. Now, he was ready to meet the villagers.

Filled with anticipation and hope, Lansius retraced his steps to the gray boulder and then walked east toward the village beyond vast meadows and a clear, azure blue lake.

After an hour of walking, Lansius spotted an elderly couple in their orchard, staring at him. Lansius waved at them, and they quickly dropped their gardening tools and approached him. "Young man," they called.

Lansius stopped, his heart racing, as he finally met them.

"Young man, are you a merchant?" the elderly woman in grey gardening attire asked.

"Huh?"

"He isn't, Martha, your eyes are deceiving you again," said the elderly man with a thin face but sharp eyes.

"I'm sorry, I'm not a merchant," Lansius replied. "May I ask the name of this village?"

They were stunned. "Are you lost? But Torrea is far from anywhere."

"I came through the woods," Lansius pointed out, gesturing toward the forest.

The couple was taken aback. The elderly woman motioned for him to follow her, while the elderly man grasped Lansius' hand and led him away. "Come with us. The village chief will need to know."

 

***

 

Over two weeks had passed in peaceful monotony. Life in Torrea village was much like Bellandia for Lansius – slow and tranquil. The sun blazed on this day, but a cool, pleasant breeze persisted.

Lansius sat on a backyard porch bench as the village chief skillfully cut his hair. The old man with graying hair wielded his large scissors with ease.

"There, now you look the part," the chief said.

"Thank you, Chief." Lansius then took a refreshing outdoor bath using water from the well, a quintessential summer activity.

"So, you're leaving tomorrow?" the Chief inquired while sweeping the porch.

"Yes, in the morning."

"I see," the old man nodded. "I'll ask my daughter to cook breakfast for you."

"Gratitude," Lansius replied with a smile.

The Chief waved his hand and went inside.

Lansius dried himself with a clean cloth and dressed in his work clothes. Though the summer sun would make him sweat soon enough, he didn't mind. He retrieved a wicker basket, a hemp sack, and a large, round hat from the shed.

Lansius routinely gathered firewood and wild berries, viewing it as both exercise and a way to contribute as a guest. He strolled leisurely along the path leading to the forest, waving politely to the people he encountered.

Serene and picturesque, Torrea village featured fields and terraced farms that had recently turned a subtle shade of yellow, enlivening the landscape. Cicadas sang, and birds flew freely around the lake, which teemed with life.

The author's content has been appropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

As usual, Lansius chatted with the elderly couple he first met in Torrea before excusing himself and heading toward the forest entrance. Ensuring no one followed, he made his way to a gray boulder. His recently purchased second-hand shoes were slightly oversized, but they protected his feet against occasional sharp pebbles.

Usually, Lansius would head directly to the half-buried boulder where he had hidden a thick piece of wood about the size of a sword. This piece was heavier than a real one, and he often used it for training after gathering firewood. Several trees had low hanging branches that were perfect for this purpose. While he could have used the blade he had found, he didn't want anyone to see him in possession of a sword.

However, today was different. Upon catching sight of the gray boulder, Lansius veered right, heading toward an ancient oak tree. Pushing through the surrounding shrubs, he found a comfortable spot on one of its giant roots. A nearby plant with purple leaves seemed to keep the area insect-free.

Lansius watered the healthy plant using his water pouch, carefully weeding out any other vegetation around it.

Through walking, carrying out small chores, and engaging in occasional training, he felt that he had recovered. He had gained weight, and the blisters on his feet had healed. His left ankle, however, never felt quite the same, but he accepted that there was little he could do to change that.

Birdsong from overhead reminded him of his task. Today, he didn't need to forage. Instead, he lowered his basket, knelt, and removed dried leaves from between the tree roots. He easily found the stack of firewood he had saved earlier. Afterward, he removed several stones between the roots where he had hidden his sword and money pouch.

Seeing no signs of spiders or snakes, he carefully reached inside and retrieved his arming sword. Even within its scabbard, the sword felt light. Resisting the urge to check the blade, he placed it inside a hemp sack and concealed it in a wicker basket, covering it with firewood.

Next, he dug a little deeper and pulled out his old money pouch. After confirming the contents of gold and silver, he placed it in his trusted bag. Lansius felt guilty for keeping these items a secret. The Chief had been kind to him despite his dubious background and circumstances, but he couldn't risk confiscation.

The sun turned orange and bathed the clouds in gold-colored rays. Lansius packed his gear. His old fear of getting lost in the forest haunted him deeply.

He knew it was a close brush with death. The villagers told him that the river he had followed flowed westward into the Great Forest. If he had gone there, then he would have certainly died. There was no known path, and it would take weeks to cross it. That is if he survived the rumored foul beasts and monsters that lurked inside.

Lansius looked at the purple plants one last time. Despite its special properties, he had no heart to pluck it for the second time.

He left the plants and oak tree behind. With hurried steps, he returned to the village.

 

***

 

Sundown came, and supper was served. The chief finished early as usual and left the two youngster to clean up.

“I heard you’re going?” Amelia, the chief’s daughter, asked while cleaning the plates.

“Mm, yeah. While you were away, the land official returned with a travel permit,” Lansius replied while scrubbing the cauldron.

“I see…”

Torrea village was so remote that the official needed seven days to learn about Lansius and to arrange someone to visit. When they finally met, Lansius shocked them with his report of war in Arvena. They forbade him from leaving until they could verify his story. As it turned out, confirming Lansius' story took another seven days, and an additional three days to find an official bound to Torrea so they could deliver his permit.

“Well, I understand why you want to leave,” Amelia said in between cleaning.

Lansius stopped scrubbing. “How so?”

“This village, there’s nothing in here but old couples and farm life.”

He chuckled. “That’s not true. Torrea has a lake and freshwater fish are a delicacy.”

Amelia giggled. “Too bad they’re fishy and rot easily. Also, without salt, we can only grill them.”

Lansius laughed. The two had talked about this topic several times. She was a few years older than him, but already a widow. Her much older husband had succumbed to an illness two years ago.

“Honestly, I like staying here. It’s peaceful."

Amelia paused her work, turned around, and looked at Lansius. “Then stay.” Her tone was serious.

Lansius exhaled. Even as dense as he was, he knew Amelia wanted him as a brother she never had, or as a substitute for her late husband. Torrea was surrounded by dense forest and lacked any trade routes, causing many young people to seek employment in neighboring villages with more opportunities. This led to a severe shortage of eligible partners for marriage.

“I wish I could,” Lansius said. He had too much guilt to accept such an offer.

Amelia said nothing and returned to cleaning.

Lansius did the same. This was his last day, and he intended to clean as thoroughly as possible. While his hands worked, his mind wandered. The offer was a tempting one.

If he stayed, then his future would be set. As an educated man, he could apply for a clerical job in the nearest estate. Moreover, the Chief’s vast farming land would be his, if he married Amelia. He wouldn’t have to worry about anything. To top the list, Amelia had a sweet side and was dependable by nature.

“I’m going to prepare something for you tomorrow,” she said when they were done.

“Gratitude,” Lansius said politely, and the conversation ended that way.

...

As morning arrived, Lansius enjoyed an early breakfast. He had discarded his moldy gambeson, which was too conspicuous when not on a campaign. Instead, he traded it for a second-hand gray doublet that he confidently wore.

Carefully packing his belongings into a hemp sack fashioned like a duffel bag, he donned a felt hat to cover his hair. Unbeknownst to him, the Chief had arranged for a donkey cart.

"I can't repay your kindness, Chief," Lansius said, touched by the stranger's generosity.

"Don't get me wrong, lad. You've been a great help to me." The Chief pulled an envelope from his coat and handed it to the coachman. "For the Baronet."

The coachman nodded and kept it in his breast pocket.

Lansius smiled with satisfaction. The envelope represented his idea to initiate trade between Torrea and its nearest neighbor. Although Torrea lacked a prized commodity and wouldn't typically benefit financially from trade, Lansius believed the villagers should barter their harvest for salted meat.

While salted meat was expensive, this trade could help alleviate the village's salt shortage, which Lansius suspected had caused illness and deaths after the salt mine closed due to a lack of young miners. He also suggested the Chief invite people who knew about the smoking process to preserve fish, potentially turning the underappreciated catch into a valuable commodity.

"Don't get in trouble again. Visit Torrea if you find yourself nearby," the Chief bid farewell.

"Thanks again, Chief. Until next time." Lansius carefully loaded the hemp sack and climbed aboard the cart.

The coachman gently nudged the donkey, and the cart began to move.

"Visit us when you can," Amelia waved.

"I will, take care, Amelia."

As Lansius left Torrea village with the sun yet to shine brightly, he eagerly anticipated his return to the world outside.

 

***

 

Chapter 9-2

Midlandia

 

For more than a thousand years, the Imperium stood as the largest human bastion in the Great Continent. Under its reign, the populace had seen unrivaled peace, order, and prosperity. However, its rule gradually fell apart.

The Imperium required vast resources just to maintain its vast territories. Burdened by an archaic bureaucracy, it consumed more than it could collect in taxes. As the treasury dwindled, the economy was strained and steadily worsened.

Since the turn of the century, the Imperium found itself unable to maintain its borders. Strategic outposts were deserted; public buildings, roads, and bridges were left to ruin. Yet, the capital continued to siphon more and more wealth, leaving only crumbs for the rest of the populace.

Regions closest to the border suffered the greatest. Neglected, but pressured by harsh tax and labor obligations, many abandoned their birthplaces. All over the continent, there were signs of unrest.

The weakened border triggered a nomadic uprising in the west. To the north, the ever tenacious northerners had defied the High Court and annexed regions with thinly veiled pretexts.

However, for the Imperium’s elites, it was business as usual. Despite the deterioration, the status quo in the central plains remained unchallenged. Their lavish parties and grand festivals masqueraded as ceremonies continued without interruption.

The summer of the Elven Calendar year 4423 arrived with tidings that shocked the Imperium to its core. Arvena, one of the provinces in the central plain, had fallen.

Ever ambitious, Margrave Gottfried had unified the rebellious northerners and led them across the Grand River and into Arvena. His pretext was to stop a feud between a minor lord and Earl Maurice. In the ensuing conflict, Earl Maurice, his descendants, and inner circle went missing, presumably killed, allowing the Margrave to occupy Arvena.

A massacre of a member of the High Houses and a blatant takeover of an important region created a crisis. With the army held in the west against the nomads, the Imperium couldn’t risk opening another front. However, everyone knew the Margrave had crossed the line. Things wouldn’t be the same anymore.

For the northerners, further conflict was a chance for revenge against their oppressors. For the ordinary folks in the central plains, this was a prelude to disaster.

 

***

 

After leaving Torrea, Lansius had been living on the road for two weeks. He rode open carts when they were available at a good price, usually when the cart was half empty. But for the most part, he traveled on foot. As much as he wanted to arrive faster at the eastern part, he knew money might be a problem, so he tried to balance speed and cost.

As was customary, he traveled in a large group with traveling peddlers, seasonal laborers, and people running errands. The group provided protection and the added benefit of someone who could cook in exchange for goods or money. Nonetheless, he was cautious about what he ate. The last thing he wanted was to fall ill due to diarrhea. Without access to medicine, stomachaches were not just an inconvenience but a potentially deadly disease.

Despite resembling a guardsman with his doublet and sword hung on his belt, Lansius took precautions and sewed the gold coins into his doublet, blanket, and the inner part of his bag. He needed protection against thieves who might blend in with the group.

As he traveled, he learned about the Midlandia province and its complex relationship with slavery. The Imperium strictly forbade the enslavement of humans. However, they allowed the sale of captured beastmen or nomadic people as slaves, who were mostly brought to the Eastern Kingdoms.

However, as the Imperium declined and increasingly relied on the lords to fight their border wars, they needed another source to fund their campaigns. As a result, they began to dabble in slavery, and the Imperium turned a blind eye.

Unauthorized tale usage: if you spot this story on Amazon, report the violation.

This situation created a sense of urgency for Lansius. He believed that if any captured people from Riverstead were to appear, it would be in Feodosia. However, time and money would be in short supply, as the Eastern Kingdoms were always hungry for more slaves.

Lansius thought about the gold coins. He knew they weren't his, but if he found Stefi or any of his friends, he would gladly buy their freedom and risk confrontation with Miranda or Sir Ian's House.

The sliver of hope that he might save someone motivated him to hit the road through the summer sun every morning.

Despite the heat, summer traveling was the norm, as the ground was firm and solid during the season. However, the heat posed a problem. At midday, travelers needed to seek cover under shade or risk getting heatstroke.

Only after the sun waned did they dare to continue until sundown or until they arrived at a town or village along the way. But that wasn't much of a problem. Central Midlandia was bustling with towns and villages surrounded by farmlands and orchards.

These places were busy, large, and industrious. Carts and carriages filled the roads, while the markets were full of traders with their goods and wares.

The towns had shops and workshops that offered all kinds of products. One, in particular, caught Lansius' attention. After much deliberation, he traded his shoes for new, better-fitting boots. While the soles were hard, they served him well in lessening the heat from the road.

... 

Just one more village to go.

Lansius walked with a determined stride. Today was a lovely day, but the sun was merciless. It was so hot that the birds stopped chirping. Unlike the norm, Lansius walked alone. This time, safety wasn't an issue, as the road was busy with carts and carriages.

Since his escape from Riverstead, more than a month had passed. There was a growing fear that the slaver could sell his friends before he arrived. This propelled him to travel faster, even if it meant traveling alone.

Lansius had upgraded his hat into a larger one, but the summer sun still burned into his back. The solar rays tanning his hands and any other exposed skin.

The occasional breeze was his only respite, while the sound of cicadas provided the only distraction from the maddening heat. When even the cobbled stone was too hot for his new boots' soles, he walked on the roadside where the grass was cooler.

As midday approached, the road became less crowded. Most travelers had stopped to rest, but Lansius kept going for an extra mile.

By chance, he heard a squabble on a speedy horse carriage that was moving toward him.

A couple’s quarrel?

He was ready to dismiss it, but the rising voice and the harshness of the tone signaled that something was off.

“No, no, don’t, that’s dangerous, watch out!” the coachman yelled.

Lansius looked at the speeding cart that barely passed him. His eyes widened as he saw long golden hair fluttering in the wind. Mesmerized by it, he failed to notice anything else.

“Oof,” Lansius cried. The area around his face suddenly felt warm. Something heavy had smacked him and sent him falling backward. He landed on the ground with a thud and hit the back of his head. The impact nearly knocked him out and left him dizzy and confused.

Lansius groaned weakly. He didn’t know what had happened and could only see stars spinning with his closed eyes. Worse, throbbing pain came from his head, chest, and back.

“Oh, so sorry,” said a concerned woman with a lovely voice.

A girl? From where?

Lansius tried to see, but it was all blurry and painful. The metallic taste grew stronger in his mouth, so he spat into the grass.

“So sorry...” She kept apologizing and grabbed Lansius’ hand.

His knees felt powerless, so despite her help, he could only sit on the ground. With head still felt like spinning, he asked, “What happened?”

“You fell pretty hard. Does your head feel alright?”

“Do you see what hit me?”

“Mm... more or less.”

“Can you tell me? If it’s a wooden crate or barrel, I might need a bandage.” He gently rubbed his pained head.

“No, you should be alright. I’m not that heavy,” she said, while pulling her straw hat down slightly.

“Y-you fell into me?” Lansius, for the first time, managed to open his eyes and glanced at the lady. He was awestruck by the sweet-looking face, blue azure eyes, and gorgeous golden hair.

“Oh no, you’re in shock,” she said, panicking.

“Eh, no no, I’m... thinking... about- Er... I’m just preoccupied, that’s all,” he stammered.

“Lemme check.” She moved beside him and checked the back of his head. “There’s no blood- Oh, my, what a lovely hair colour.”

Lansius was stunned and pulled his hat firmly down over his ears. “Please, it’s alright. I’m fine, My Lady,” he added as he just remember that blonde hair usually meant nobility.

She giggled. “Relax. I’m not a noble.” Again, she offered her hand.

Her smile swayed Lansius to take her hand.

She helped him to get up with a smile and whispered. “It’s alright, I saw nothing.”

Lansius flustered and nodded quickly. “A-anyway, are you okay? I mean, you’re jumping from a running cart.”

“Seems that way...” She looked at her left and right side. “Just some light bruises.” She showed him her reddened elbow.

“To get away from a speeding cart with just bruises. That’s truly good luck.”

“Hehe, my friends always called me lucky. I guess I am,” she said with the most radiant smile.

Lansius’ heart skipped a beat. He turned his face around and noticed the cart was coming back. “I apologize for minding your business, but why did you jump?”

“Ah, the jerk lied to me,” she said sharply. “He said just a minor detour before heading to Feodosia, but here we are, almost a city away. He also wouldn't stop to let me down.”

His eyes lit up. “You were kidnapped?”

 

***

 

Chapter 10

Fortuna

 

Beneath the sweltering summer sun, Lansius found himself in the midst of an unexpected encounter on his way to Feodosia. He had come across a blonde stranger who appeared to have been kidnapped, and now she stood her ground, boldly facing the approaching cart that might have been involved in her abduction.

“Do you need help?” Lansius asked as the cart slowed down.

“Nah, I’ll take care of it,” she said confidently and stood firmly.

Lansius watched by her side as the coachman parked his cart. The man immediately rushed to her, and yelled, "Why did you jump like that?"

Lansius cleared his throat, catching the coachman's attention. He noticed how Lansius looked like a guardsman and had his hand resting on the hilt.

“Why are you lying to me? You’re not heading to Feodosia, but away from it,” the lady stated her case.

“Miss, you’re mistaken. I’m merely taking a slight detour to fetch my goods,” he argued.

“Detour so far in an opposite direction? How absurd. I’m done with your words," she said firmly.

“But you agreed to pay,” the coachman said, fuming.

"I said I'm done. I'd rather walk," she replied as she turned around and walked away.

"But Miss, it's a long way," the man protested, about to follow her.

Lansius stepped forward and blocked his path. "She has spoken. Please leave."

The coachman’s face turned sinister. “Don’t interfere. You’ll regret this.”

The tone triggered Lansius, who drew his sword in an instant. He pointed the sharpened steel at the coachman. “Remove yourself,” he said in a low, cold voice that he didn’t know he had.

The coachman took a step back. He muttered curses under his breath, but turned and walked away.

The lady peeked from behind Lansius. “Did you get agitated easily before?”

“I-I don’t know... It’s actually my first time pulling a sword at someone,” he whispered and sheathed the sword back.

She grinned mischievously. “I really need to take a better look at your head.”

“Please don’t, I beg you,” he said meekly. His hair was obviously dirty from all the dust and sweat.

The lady giggled. Afterward, the two of them quietly watched the cart until it went out of view.

“Any chance you’re a minor noble?” she asked as they resumed their walk.

“Eh, no, if I were a noble, I wouldn’t travel on foot.”

“Ah, true... Too bad neither of us are noble,” she said cheerfully.

Lansius felt something was off about her: She was too casual with a man she had just met. He also noticed that she looked upper class from her attire, not a mere village born. Even her straw hat was painted white.

She said she’s not a noble? A bastard? And why is she so friendly? She saw the hair too...

Lansius felt uneasy about her friendliness. "Umm, are you sure you want to walk beside me?" he asked.

"What do you mean?" she replied, holding her straw hat as the wind blew past them.

"I mean, I'm a vagrant. If you need someone to watch over you, I can follow you from behind."

She giggled. "The heat has gotten to you. Come on, let's not stay under the midday sun any longer." She wandered off the road, and Lansius had no choice but to follow her.

Why am I getting lucky with women so suddenly? First Amelia, and now this pretty blonde.

He knew for sure that even in Midlandia, pretty girls were hard to find.

The two of them walked through the grassy area and into a nearby cluster of trees, finding a small grove with several old, withering trees. She sat under the largest one, which unfortunately had only half its branches full of leaves. The sparse shade they provided left Lansius with no good place to sit away from the sun.

"Come sit beside me," she said, tapping the grassy ground beside her.

Normally, he would shy away from the offer, but the midday sun was relentless, so he gladly accepted. They sat side by side, resting their backs against the old tree.

Without any hesitation, she unlatched her shoulder bag and pulled out a wrapped item. Unwrapping the linen, she revealed a slice of meat pie. She broke it in half and offered a portion to Lansius.

"Eh, you don't have to," he said.

She insisted, so he reluctantly took the pie and gave it a bite.

Mamma mia, this is fantastic!

Lansius hid his reaction to avoid being ridiculed. He then took out the bread he'd bought that morning, broke it in half, and offered it to her.

She smiled but shook her head.

"It's just plain bread, think nothing of it," he insisted.

She accepted the rye bread. "Oh, silly me. We haven't introduced ourselves. My name is Felicity. I'm... nobody's daughter." She chuckled at her own jest.

The story has been stolen; if detected on Amazon, report the violation.

"I'm Lansius, also nobody's son," he responded with a chuckle.

"Call me Felis. Everybody does that."

"So, Felis, why are you heading to Feodosia?" he asked.

"I work there. Well, it's more like I live there now. But occasionally, I still need to go home to check on my parents."

"I see..." Lansius wanted to ask about the slave market but hesitated. It wasn't a topic he wanted to discuss with a newfound friend.

The sun was at its zenith, and there was nothing the two could do but stay under the shade and rest.

As they rested, Lansius noticed that Felis was his complete opposite. She wasn't shy or timid and trusted others easily. Earlier, she had said she wanted some rest, folded her cloak like a sleeping rug, and just like that, she fell asleep.

I did help her a little, but still… 

There was no one around but the two of them as far as the eye could see.

How can a girl be so careless like this? Even I, given the chance, could turn into a...

As if teasing him, Felis opened her mouth slightly, revealing her alluring lips, which disrupted his train of thought.

Lansius gulped. The sight of a young woman sleeping so close was a huge temptation. He noticed her chest rising and falling with each breath. He averted his gaze and let out a sigh. Somehow, the sight made him think of Stefi.

He shook his head, trying to erase the sudden gloom, but the guilt had resurfaced. He felt terrible sitting so casually beside a pretty blonde while Stefi might be enslaved or dead. The occasional breeze offered some comfort, but Lansius could only look downcast.

 

***

 

As the midday sun finally waned, the travelers continued on their journey. Felis had awakened, and together with Lansius, they marched eastward. After three hours of walking under the sun, they arrived in Pozna village.

"Pozna, I'm back again," Felis said bitterly. She had been here earlier that morning before the cart fiasco.

"Well, what's your plan now?" Lansius asked, glancing around the new village.

"I'm going to report that guy first." Felis stormed towards the stable master.

The old man was grumpy because of the heat, and he grew even more irritable when he heard Felis' story. "It's crazy that this happens so often these days."

"What would have happened if I had been kidnapped?" Felis asked boldly.

"Well... They'd have taken you somewhere remote in the next province and assigned you some work. They wouldn't let you return unless you paid them an exorbitant sum for transport, food, and lodgings."

Felis remained unfazed, while Lansius felt disgusted.

It's not slavery, but it's still very much evil.

Felis provided the coachman's description so the stable master could warn other travelers. She left the place with a satisfied expression.

"I'm guessing we'll stay the night here?" Lansius asked.

"Yup. As much as I want to return to Feodosia, there's still half a day's walk ahead."

Unfamiliar with the area, Lansius chose to follow Felis' suggestion. However, she showed no sign of stopping in Pozna. "We're not staying in Pozna?" he asked as they passed the village limit.

"Oh, I'm used to staying at a nearby inn. If I'm lucky, maybe I can still use my room from last night." Felis led him towards a large intersection. There on one side stood a two-story building with white plaster, glass windows, and several chimneys. It had an adjacent stable where a carriage and at least two carts were parked.

She entered through the front entrance and effortlessly pushed the mahogany door open. The clean hallway and high ceiling gave the place a classy appearance.

This is so different from the cheap ones... I bet they have separate rooms, not a shared floor for everybody.

At this point, Lansius didn't dare to tell Felis that he used to sleep in the corner of a barn or on people's porches if he had to.

"Back again so soon, mademoiselle?" A man with a rounded belly, vibrant colored clothing, and a work apron asked Felis from behind the counter.

"Yes, there were some circumstances. My previous room, please, and another one for my friend," she said to the innkeeper, pulling a silver coin from her purse.

Before Felis handed over the coin, Lansius whispered, "Umm, you know, I can sleep in a servant's quarters or a warehouse corner. Don't spend your hard-earned money on me."

"Don't worry about it. Take it as a thank you for helping me out. Besides, I enjoyed your company," Felis smiled.

Hearing praise like that, Lansius couldn't help but smile.

The innkeeper smiled warmly as he received the silver and produced eight coppers as change. "Supper is included."

A teenage boy led them to their rooms. The small room was furnished with a bed, a window, and a small desk. Compared to Lansius' usual spartan arrangements, it was luxurious.

It's also clean...

Lansius felt the urge to clean himself. As expected, he found a water basin on the table and a bucket in the corner. He washed his face first, then his hands. Next, he changed his clothes so as not to look out of place in the establishment.

His doublet wasn't too dirty, but the tunic underneath was yellowing from sweat. Thus, he pulled his only spare tunic from his hemp sack and put it on.

The clean linen felt good on his skin. The tunic had stitches in several places from when he had ventured deep into the woods. He almost reminisced but pushed the thought away.

Now clean and proper, he sat on the bed and found it comfortable. He leaned back and found bliss. He knew he should wash his clothes. There should be a well near the inn, but after two weeks of rough sleeping, the bed was irresistible.

Maybe I could take a short nap.

...

Felis eventually knocked on the door after half an hour, and they went downstairs for an early supper. Lansius didn't dare to leave his belongings in the room, so he brought everything.

They chose a corner table with an open window. Nobody offered them a menu. It wasn't necessary. The inn would serve their guests a plate of whatever they cooked that day. Anything more, like ale or wine, would cost extra.

"This inn is famous for its roast meat," Felis said.

Lansius' nose agreed. The aroma was rich and savory. "The meat pie we had this afternoon was also good."

"You liked it? I got the pie from here too. Two slices for a copper."

"Reasonable price. It's delicious." Even as thrifty as he was, he had to admit it was a good deal.

A servant boy brought two cups, a pitcher of water, and a smaller pitcher of ale.

Felis filled their cups with ale. "Let's toast to a good meeting."

"Cheers." The two raised their cups and drank. The ale tasted fruity, malty, with a hint of bitterness.

Oof, this is stronger than what I usually got.

“Ah, need to dilute this, otherwise I’ll be tipsy in no time.” She giggled.

The cool breeze, the inn’s well maintained wooden furniture, and Felicity, who looked like a goddess, made this supper an exceptionally pleasant experience for Lansius.

Outside, the sun lost its luster, but sundown was still a good one or two hours away.

More people were coming to the inn and the dining hall was halfway filled. From the look, Lansius guessed tradespeople, local yeomen, and maybe even a member of the lower nobility.

Three more people entered the premise. Two looked like guardsmen in bright brigandine, while the third was much older in fancy colored doublet. Lansius thought nothing of them. For travelers, guardsmen equal safety and protection against bandits.

However, the man in fancy clothing saw Lansius and stood in silence as if struck by something.

It was odd enough that Lansius caught the act out of the corner of his eye. Lansius glanced at him, but dared not to see his face for too long. He didn't recognize the clean shaven and neatly combed man.

Probably just gawking at Felis.

He calmly gestured Felis about the man, but she shook her head.

The man stormed toward Lansius. “It’s you!”

“Y-yes?” Surprised, Lansius replied warily. He never caused a problem in Midlandia, so he quickly assumed this was some trickery or scheme.

“Oi, what’s the fuss?” One of the young guards, who was built like a bear, approached.

“Anci, this is the guy. We found him,” the man said to the guard, who looked at Lansius with ferocious eyes.

Lansius could see the smirk and sadistic eyes radiating from the big fella toward him.

Oh, sht, what did I do wrong?

His brain went into high gear and recalled an entrapment like this. The group he had been with taught him that the best way out was to challenge them to reveal his name. If they couldn’t name him correctly, then he could rally the other guests to intervene.

Before Lansius could open his mouth, Felis said innocently, “Is there a problem with my friend Lansius?”

Lansius was sweating bullets. Felis, unknowingly, had thrown him under the cart.

 

***

 

Chapter 11

Binding Chains

 

The sun was halfway to the west, and the weather had turned pleasant. More travelers began to appear in the cheap inns around Pozna village after a day's journey. However, the more affluent society members headed straight to the crossroad where a well-known inn, The Swan, was located.

While most inns offered only a communal hall for sleeping, The Swan boasted cleanliness, separate cabins, and lavish meals. At the moment, the atmosphere in the hall was perfect for winding down. Comfortable chairs, excellent ales, and the cool, airy hall—made possible by the inn's high ceilings and multitude of windows—invited relaxation.

Whiffs of rich aromas from the grill wafted through the hall. However, for Lansius, they merely served to highlight his dilemma. An old man in fancy clothes and his guard had flanked him for reasons unknown. With nowhere to hide, and Felis unwittingly revealing his identity, Lansius felt cornered.

"God-damnit, it's really you, Lansius," the old man said, attempting to get chummy with him.

Lansius felt cornered, certain that some sort of trickery was at play.

"My Lady, please excuse us," said Anci, the tall and muscular guard. Despite his brawny appearance, his manner revealed his education.

Can I talk myself out of this?

Before Lansius could react, the old man persisted. "Lans, it's me. How could you not recognize me?"

"Apologies, but I don't know you," Lansius replied, as politely as he could manage.

The old man chuckled. "It's me, dammit. It's Thomas."

The name struck Lansius. He did a double-take; the clean-shaven and neatly combed man before him looked so different. Only now did he notice the resemblance. His jaw dropped, and his eyes widened involuntarily.

Thomas laughed, watching Lansius' reaction, and slapped the man's back.

"Ouch, what was that for?" Lansius winced but couldn't resist grinning. He felt relieved to see Thomas and was glad that nobody was trying to scam him.

Felis and Anci chuckled softly.

Adopting a more formal demeanor, Thomas turned towards Felis. "Please forgive our behavior, My Lady."

Felis shook her head gently. "No need to apologize; I'm not of noble birth. I'm sorry if I gave you that impression."

Overhearing the discussion, the second guard approached. "Mademoiselle, your blond hair and blue eyes would make any high-born noble envious."

Felis smiled at the compliment. "Please, call me Felis."

Anci elbowed the second guard, who gasped in pain before retaliating with a solid punch to Anci's gut.

Shaking his head, Thomas told the young men, "Guys, knock it off."

They quickly stopped, allowing Thomas to extend an invitation. "Mademoiselle, Lans, if you don't mind, care to join my table for a chat?"

Lansius shot a questioning glance at Felis, who nodded. The two then followed Thomas to a larger table.

"I should introduce us. I'm Thomas; these are Anci and Hugo, squires to Sir Peter," Thomas said, then turned to the squires. "Boys, this is Lansius, the clerk I befriended in Riverstead."

Though he hadn't been formally introduced, Anci bowed his head to Felis before offering a firm handshake to Lansius.

Hugo, the lean squire, followed suit. "Nice to meet another Arvenian."

As they sat, Lansius asked, "Thomas, how did you get here? Isn't Arvena occupied?"

"We took the long way around through Tiberia and Elandia," Thomas explained. "So, what happened at the river crossing?"

The mood turned solemn. Lansius recounted the details, sparing none, including the fates of Theo and Max.

As his story concluded, Felis patted Lansius' arm in consolation.

Thomas looked visibly older, his face lined and eyes dimmed. He sighed deeply and said to Lansius, "Don't blame yourself."

"Clearly, the Margrave intended to massacre the entire House of Arvena. They even killed children based on rumors," Hugo said bluntly.

"If only the High Court wasn't so spineless," Anci grumbled.

"Is it true that the young Lord is missing?" Lansius asked, recalling gossip he'd heard on the road.

Thomas nodded reluctantly. Their discussion was interrupted by a servant who brought over a pudding that resembled a tart cake to Lansius.

Without objection, Anci took the first slice, followed by the others. Lansius took a small portion, wary of any milk content, while Felis grabbed a larger piece and ate merrily by hand.

Erm… Well, who am I to judge?

The sweet treat lifted everyone's spirits. All ate with visible enjoyment.

Thomas cleaned his knife and sheathed it. "You're fortunate to have made it this far safely. The roads and cities are far from as secure as in Arvena."

Lansius nodded. "Indeed. Just today, we had a brush with a kidnapping."

The story has been illicitly taken; should you find it on Amazon, report the infringement.

This revelation didn't seem to surprise anyone. "Midlandia may appear prosperous, but many have been impoverished by the growing industries. It's good that you have a sword," Thomas noted.

"I feel safer with it, but I haven’t trained—" He stopped abruptly. "Thomas, have you seen Stefi?" he blurted out.

Thomas recalled the female squire and shook his head. "I'm sorry, lad. We found a few remnants and survivors, but..."

Felis jumped to the conclusion that Stefi was either Lansius' sister or lover, and patted his arm again. Unintentionally, her grubby finger left a smear of pudding on his clean blue tunic.

W-what is she doing? My clothes! The pudding- it's made from fat.

Lansius almost wept; he appreciated Felis' good intentions, but not the stain on his only clean clothes.

“Boss, there’s still some light outside.” Hugo carried a serious tone.

Thomas nodded. “Mademoiselle, may we ask Lansius out for a bit for a chat?”

The pudding was gone, but they had yet to finish their supper as roasting meat in the fire pit was a lengthy process. Lansius felt something was off, but he trusted Thomas.

Felis cleaned her hands on the yellowing table cloth and declared, “I’m coming too.”

 

***

 

The five of them went into a small wooded area. Anci stood guard at a distance against eavesdropping. Felis seemed to read the situation and stuck with Anci.

Hugo ventured further, but he too kept a enough distance from Thomas and Lansius.

“It’s far enough.” Thomas stopped and turned himself to face Lansius. “Lad, you got something from Miranda.”

Lansius’ heart raced. He knew this would happen. “Can I say a few words beforehand?”

Thomas looked at him sharply. “Speak up.”

“I’m going to use it to free Stefi if the slavers got her. If I can't find her, then I’ll return everything.”

“No, no...” Thomas shook his head in disbelief. “You’re entrusted with it. It’s not yours to use.”

Thomas’ flat out rejection surprised him. “Give me a chance. I’ll pay it back. I carried it this long. You can’t just appear and grab it away.”

“Lans, it’s not given to you.” Thomas refused to listen.

"I almost lost my life in that forest. It was me who saved this money, so whoever owns it, they owe me that much. I didn't go this far for nothing," Lansius exclaimed, unintentionally raising his voice. He knew there wasn't much logic to his argument, but he was at his wit's end.

The outburst forced Thomas to gesture Lansius to quiet down. “Are you out of your mind? Those guys are Sir Peter’s!”

“What this got to do with Sir Peter?”

Thomas exhaled. “Sir Peter is Sir Ian’s son.”

Lansius took a step back. Only now he realized how Thomas had got his fancy clothing and two squires. “Are you here to help the escaping Arvenians or to hunt me down?”

“It’s not like that...” Thomas knitted his brows. “Sir Peter is making a warband, and it needs money.”

Lansius became conflicted, but said stubbornly, “I can’t go to Feodosia empty handed.”

“Lans, the squires will cut you down if you run with the money,” Thomas warned.

Lansius exhaled sharply and glanced around. The wooded area was sparse and had the markings of men: pathways, cut down trees, and no old branches on the ground. He hated the forest, but he knew this was far from that ancient forest. He could survive here easily.

“Don’t do it,” Thomas read him. “You may outrun me, but not the squires.”

Lansius hesitated. His eyes reddened from all the suppressed emotions.

Thomas said nothing, giving Lansius time to rethink. After losing Theo and Max, the last thing he wanted was to lose Lansius.

“Help me,” Lansius pleaded. “There must be another way...”

Thomas sighed as if giving up. “Even if I let you- even if I help you. The two of us can’t take them. Maybe I could stall Hugo, but not Anci. That lad is a monster.”

Lansius’ shoulder slumped. Since the first time he saw Anci, his instinct had screamed not to mess with him.

“Look, I understand your cause. But there’s no other way.” Thomas’ voice was tired and sore.

The thought that he would find Stefi and Jan but unable to free them tormented him. He couldn’t think of another way. His friend’s safety depended on the money he had hid. His muscles tensed, but his mind didn’t know what to do.

Then he realized just how good Thomas’ clothing really was and found a slim opening. “The prize. Miranda mentioned a prize. You got that nice clothing and certainly more. What would I get?”

Thomas was taken aback. He went into thinking and exclaimed afterward, “Fine, take the silver.”

Lansius wasn't going to give up. “It’s only sixteen silver. I can’t free a slave with just that?”

“Ah, fuck it, Lans. I’m not some charity.” Despite Thomas’ harsh words, he reached out for his inner pocket, pulled a money pouch, and fished some coins. He grabbed some and gave it away.

Lansius counted seven silvers. “Much obliged.” He knew it’s far from enough, but that was probably the best Thomas could do.

“Ready the gold. I’m calling Hugo.”

“Wait-“ Lansius scrambled to open the sewn gold coins in his doublet, blanket, and inner part of the bag.

Thomas watched and marveled at Lansius’ ingenuity.

“Here.” Lansius showed six gold coins. The amount could buy two cottages, or a well built two-story house in a friendly neighborhood.

Thomas didn’t take it, but whistled to signal for Hugo.

The laid-back squire, in a light blue brigandine, approached them. He saw what was on Lansius’ hands and received it politely. “On behalf of Sir Peter, I offer you his gratitude.”

The problem seemed to be resolved for Hugo and Thomas, but Lansius still had one concern.

“Umm, can I get a receipt?” he asked.

Hugo and Thomas were dumbfounded by the request, and Thomas couldn't help but be amused. "Well, he's a clerk. What can I say?"

Hugo and Thomas laughed, and Lansius couldn't help but chuckle along.

Hugo offered his right hand to Lansius. "If my signature is good enough, you shall have it."

Lansius gladly clasped hands with Hugo.

 

***

 

The sun turned orange when Lansius, Thomas, and Hugo headed out.

“So, tell me about the warband?” Lansius asked.

Hugo bent a low-hanging branch so they could pass easily. “Not much to tell. We got less than a hundred, but mostly too young and without weapons.”

“I see...” Lansius paused for a bit. “Well, call me crazy, but have you ever consider rescuing slaves?”

“Rescue?” Thomas scoffed. “That’s ballsy, but foolish.”

Watching Lansius’ reaction, Hugo filled him in. “The Lord of Midlandia tolerates our presence, but he’ll kick us out if we try something funny with the slave trade.”

Lansius reluctantly nodded. He had heard rumors that the Imperium sanctioned the slave trade to appease the two Eastern Kingdoms that grew powerful, but only now did he have an indirect proof.

So, not even the Lord of Midlandia dares to go against the slave trade.

“The local lords are especially jittery about the presence of armed men in their regions,” Thomas commented about themselves.

“But I heard that Midlandia is on our side. Can’t they intervene at all?”

Hugo glanced at Lansius. “Only if it benefits them. This means we need the young Lord. As the rightful heir, he could claim Arvena. If we have him, then Midlandia will gladly assist in exchange for a hefty compensation.”

“More likely a debt so large that Arvena could never repay,” Thomas sneered.

“Aye,” Hugo agreed. “This is why we can’t rely on Midlandia too much. With the Imperium like this, certainly Midlandia too wants to carve out pieces of Arvena for themselves.”

“And us as the henchmen.” Thomas swatted an insect that flew too close to his face.

Lansius could taste the hopelessness, but decided to push forward. “If we found the young Lord, will he do something about the Arvenian slaves?”

Hugo spared him some hope. "Well, those are his subjects. I think he’ll try to free them one way or another.”

Lansius nodded, wanting to believe it was true.

They trekked the short distance toward the edge of the wooded area and met with Anci and Felis.

“So, what are you guys talking about?” she asked.

Hugo looked at Lansius. Felis was an outsider.

Lansius nodded, but had another thought. “She’s from here, maybe she could help.”

“Help with what?” Felis was intrigued.

Hugo mulled, but Anci nodded at him. “We’re looking for a noble from Arvena. You might’ve heard about him, young Lord Arte. Light brown-“

“Light brown hair, beautiful jawline, charming, and speaks candidly like a bard? And oh, also a scar on his left eyebrow?” Felis sent rapid questions at Hugo.

The men stopped with eyes opened wide. “Y-you saw him?” Hugo asked.

 

***

 

Chapter 11-2

Northern Hills

 

Lansius and the three squires could hardly believe what they had just heard. Felicity had perfectly described Lord Arte’s features: light brown hair, a charming demeanor, a beautiful jawline, and a small scar on his left eyebrow. This could only mean that Felis had met Lord Arte.

“You saw him?” Hugo inquired cautiously, anticipation swelling in his heart.

Felis’ excitement grew. “I knew it! He’s not just some wandering minstrel. He has a different aura about him.”

“Was he alone?” Anci interjected impatiently.

“He was when I met him. He introduced himself as Archie, perhaps a disguised name," Felis replied.

“And where and when did this happen?” asked Hugo.

“Pozna, just yesterday,” Felis replied with a smile.

The expressions on Thomas, Hugo, and Anci were a mixture of disbelief and relief. They had searched fruitlessly for weeks, even venturing to Feodosia in the slim hope that Lord Arte might have been captured and sold as a slave without being recognized. Now, it seemed that luck was on their side.

“Did you talk to this Archie?” Thomas probed.

“Only by chance. We met at the stable while waiting for our carriages. He introduced himself and made a humorous remark when I asked him a question.”

“Funny?” Thomas furrowed his brow.

“He said he was going to whore himself out to save his friend,” Felis giggled.

Her response left Hugo and Thomas dumbfounded. They now had more questions than answers.

“Where is he heading?” Lansius asked at last.

“North,” Felis replied with certainty, then added, "I don't know if you'll believe me, but I fear your friend intentionally headed there to meet with the slavers."

"Slavers? Aren't they supposedly in Feodosia?" asked Lansius, his brow furrowing.

"Those are the Imperium approved ones, Lans. There's also the illegal kind, you know?"

"Illegal slavers?" asked Lansius again.

Felis nodded unenthusiastically. "Unfortunately, there are people who trade slaves within the Imperium."

Lansius recalled the rumors he had heard on the road. There had indeed been several mentions of it.

Noticing Lansius' puzzled expression, Felis elaborated, "It's an open secret that despite the law, many powerful men keep slaves to work on their vast, secluded estates."

Hugo and Thomas exchanged thoughtful glances. The news did not sit well with them. A group audacious enough to operate against the Imperium's law would likely be powerful and have ties with the local strongmen. However, their loyalty demanded they attempt to rescue their lord.

Despite their silence, the squires were already considering how many men they could gather before storming the location. They were trained for violence; it was their primary instinct. The idea of trying to negotiate their lord's release or attempting to purchase his freedom crossed their minds, but their lack of funds, as well as their pride and honor, prevented them from uttering such thoughts.

Lansius observed them; he had a different idea. While Lord Arte was his master, he didn't know him well on a personal level. More significantly, he had other priorities at the moment.

Anci broke the silence. “I’ll head north and scout around. There should be only one road, so we can easily find each other. You can gather men and follow when you’re ready.”

Thomas agreed. “A few simple markings should be easy to spot.”

Hugo nodded. “Alright then, Thomas and I will head west to gather our men. You and the clerk should go north.”

Lansius was taken aback and protested. “I beg your pardon, but I must go to Feodosia.”

His response elicited stares from Hugo and Thomas, with only Anci remaining indifferent.

Lansius hurried to explain. “I cannot fight; I am dead weight. You have my purse, so let’s part ways here. I need to find my friend in Feodosia before she’s sold to someone else.”

Thomas looked away, recalling their earlier conversation. He knew Stefi and understood Lansius’ motivations.

Anci snorted, amused by the turn of events. “There’s no need for him to come along. I can handle it myself.”

Hugo sighed. While he felt slightly offended that a retainer would not prioritize his master’s safety, he recognized the truth in their words. “Let’s return to the inn. We’ll depart at first light tomorrow.”

Before they could move. “Do you need fighters?” chimed the lady in a pale blue gown.

The group looked at her quizzically.

“You’re not suggesting yourself, are you?” Hugo asked.

“Well, I’m part of the package,” Felis said casually, then added, “I know capable fighters in Feodosia. Men-at-arms looking for contracts.”

This was welcome news for Hugo, who would take any offer in their current situation. "I need brave stout men, not kids or old men in armor."

The tale has been stolen; if detected on Amazon, report the violation.

"Of course, I'm talking about duelists, watchmen, and thief-takers," replied Felis.

Hugo nodded. "How many can you find and at what cost?"

Felis smiled brightly. “Well, I might be able to gather nine or ten if I can reach them all, but probably less, since you probably need it quickly. As for the price, let’s discuss that later at the inn.” She paused and glanced at Lansius briefly. “We’ll need to borrow paper and ink, and then Lansius can handle the paperwork for us.”

“Eh, why me?” Lansius was taken aback by the sudden mention of his name.

Felis gave Lansius a smug look. “I want this contract in writing, and I’d like to secure down payments as well.”

Hugo glanced at Thomas, who shrugged. “Alright, let’s do it your way,” Hugo conceded. With the arrangements settled, they made their way back to the Swan Inn.

 

***

 

Despite their dire circumstances, the squires found solace in the feast before them. Their table was strewn with empty dishes and empty earthen jugs. Even Hugo seemed to be enjoying himself. The unspoken consensus among them was that they might die in a few days, so they ought to savor life while they could.

The squires knew little about their adversaries, but rumors circulated that the illegal slavers were influential and powerful, with enough sway to undermine the Imperium’s authority. Engaging them in battle would likely be suicidal, which perhaps explained the group’s merry demeanor.

Beneath the soft glow of tallow candles, a wandering minstrel played his string instrument. The crowd requested a lively, humorous melody to lift their spirits. Meanwhile, the servers bustled about, providing more ale and food, their work clothes stained from a long day’s labor.

Thomas had passed out, his head resting on the table. The old man carried a heavy guilt that he kept to himself, unwilling to share.

The atmosphere grew rowdier when five women entered the inn. Most of the guests became boisterous at the sight of them, with some making bold advances. Hugo was among those flirting, focusing his attention on a woman in a pastel white and dark green gown, her full lips and long, wavy hair capturing his interest.

Lansius, however, felt hollow and disconnected. His guilt prevented him from enjoying the festivities, even in the presence of the beautiful blonde, Felis, who sat beside him. It didn’t help that his evenings were usually quiet, filled with suspicion about who might be sharing the communal sleeping space.

Noticing his gaze, Felis smiled. “Pozna wenches. They’re shy compared to the ones from Feodosia,” she commented.

Lansius simply nodded.

Felis leaned in closer. “Don’t you want to join in? I could help you pick a good one.”

Lansius knew she wasn’t teasing. “Maybe next time,” he politely declined.

Felis giggled and took a sip of her ale. She had to raise her voice to be heard over the clamor and music as she turned to Anci, who sat at the next table, and tapped his back gently.

Anci craned his neck and gave her a questioning look.

“Come, let’s head outside. I need to talk to you about something,” Felis said.

Anci furrowed his brows. “About what?”

“About things that’ll involve you too,” she replied cryptically.

After a moment of contemplation, Anci stood. As he did so, Felis gestured for Lansius to follow. They stepped outside, not far from the entrance where two large lanterns cast a warm glow. Another lantern swayed gently near the wooden fence by the road, replacing the sounds of music with the chirping of crickets.

“What do you want to talk about?” Anci asked, guarded, while Lansius remained silent.

“Well, I want you to talk some sense into your friend here,” she began.

The two men were intrigued. “What do you mean?” Lansius asked.

“Well, you’re looking for your friend, right? A female fighter," asked Felis.

“A female squire, yes. Why asking?”

“Lans, I doubt she’ll make it to Feodosia,” Felis said bluntly.

Lansius felt alarmed by it.

She continued, "I've never seen female fighters in Feodosia. They're popular and in high demand as guards for harems in the Eastern Kingdoms or as bodyguards."

Lansius' suspicion arose. "Isn't that a contradiction?"

"No, listen," she insisted. "Female fighters are in demand, but we never see them in Feodosia. From what I've heard, someone always recruits them first—and it's not traders from Feodosia."

Lansius and Anci exchanged glances.

“Who is this someone?” Anci asked.

"It would be a lie if I said I knew for certain, but it's most likely the same group you're going up against. Between here and Arvena, I doubt there are two groups operating so close together."

Lansius drew a deep breath. "You want me to go north?"

Felis nodded. "You might not trust me, but that's my suggestion. You'll have a better chance of finding her there than in Feodosia."

Lansius hesitated before a large, rough hand patted his shoulder.

"The way I see it, if your friend's not there, then she'll be in Feodosia. However, if she's there, then you won't see her in Feodosia. Looks like you're coming with me, clerk," Anci said, flashing his predatory grin.

"Felis, are you absolutely certain?" Lansius asked, urgency coloring his tone.

"Without a doubt," she responded with conviction. "I may not look the part, but I'm well-acquainted."

Lansius sighed in resignation and later whispered, “But don’t you need company to Feodosia? Hugo just gave you a down payment, remember?”

Unfazed by the extra silvers in her purse, Felis giggled. “I’ll persuade Thomas to accompany me. It shouldn’t be too difficult, after all, I could easily disappear with all your coins,” she teased.

Afterward, noticing Lansius' reaction, she spoke more seriously, "Even if you go to Feodosia with me, you'll need a proper introduction and then wait for days before receiving a formal invitation from the slavers. It’s not as if you can just come and have a quick look... So, what will you do? Will you wait in Feodosia, risking missing her, or will you take a quick detour to the place I mentioned to ensure that doesn’t happen?"

Anci stifled his laugh while Lansius gazed at the night sky, uncertain about the consequences his decision would bring. His head was still processing just how many things had happened in this single day. There were so many chance meetings and lucky coincidences that astounded him.

It's as if someone, or something, is pulling the strings...

...

The following morning, as the first light broke, the Arvenians, one Midlandian, and a foreigner gathered. As agreed upon the night before, Thomas would accompany Felis to Feodosia, so they parted ways at the inn.

As Thomas’ horse-drawn cart headed east, Hugo, Anci, and Lansius set off west toward Pozna. Upon arrival, they quickly marched to the stable, where Hugo paid a deposit to rent a horse.

“Take care. I’ll meet you in two days,” Hugo said after testing the horse just outside the stable.

“You know my patience. Don’t take too long,” Anci half-threatened.

Hugo laughed heartily. Despite his eyes still reddened from the previous night, he exuded confidence.

Anci approached the horse and gave it a firm pat, urging Hugo to leave. He set off at a brisk pace, racing west to gather fellow Arvenians.

After Hugo’s departure, Lansius followed Anci on foot as they set off to the north.

And so, the trio separated, and their plan was set into motion.

 

***

 

The hill range separating Midlandia and Rhomelia was teeming with birds flying freely. Despite being in the middle of summer, the land remained lush and green, dotted with ponds and marshes in the lowlands.

Lansius and Anci had traveled on foot for a day to reach this hill, where they spotted a suspicious manor surrounded by a palisade wall on the adjacent hill. They spent the remaining daylight constructing a crude tent. Neither was skilled in craftsmanship, so the shelter was poorly built.

After a fireless supper, Anci took the first watch. Nothing happened during his watch, so he woke Lansius, who took turns watching until dawn. The night was quiet, too quiet for Lansius’ taste.

At dawn, as the wind blew, and the fog dissipated, Lansius could see the walled manor house perched on the hill, surrounded by farms and cottages. However, even a glance revealed that it was fortified. Aside from the palisade wall, it had guards and even an outer gate.

With spare time on his hands, Lansius drew a map on the ground using sticks and pebbles, depicting the manor’s defenses.

It looks like a mini fortress… walls on each side, fences, patrols, and checkpoints.

The compound was well fortified and Lansius felt that attacking such a place would be suicidal. But knowing the Arvenians, they would most likely attempt it anyway. As he sighed, he couldn’t help but ponder how this would all end up.

⠀

***

 

Chapter 12

Cold Steel

 

As the sun rose and the day grew warmer, Anci stirred from his slumber, roused by the sounds of birds and rustling leaves. Their crude makeshift tent was far from ideal, but it had served its purpose for the night.

"Can't believe we traded the inn for this place," Anci complained as he munched on yesterday's bread.

Lansius sighed, thinking of the inn's comfortable bed. "At least we had the roasted meat," he said.

"Oh, that finely seasoned and juicy meat," Anci's mouth watered at the memory.

"So tender," Lansius commented, and they shared a laugh.

"So, what's your story with that blonde?" Anci asked, changing the subject.

Still groggy from his night watch, Lansius paused. "Felis? We barely know each other. Why do you ask?"

Anci stroked his chin. "Well, she's not an ordinary girl, you know."

"What do you mean by that?"

"Mm... should I tell you, or should I not?" Anci teased.

"Forget it. I can always ask her myself."

Lansius' defiance made Anci laugh. Despite their differences, the two bonded easily. Anci, born Archibald, came from a family with a history of serving as squires. His grandfather had been a knight, but his father never earned the title. Anci himself barely made it as Sir Peter's squire due to his imposing physique.

The sun continued to climb, but nobody ventured in or out of the manor. Nevertheless, the two continued their scouting mission. The area was remote, with only a handful of hamlets within a day's journey, so the road was practically empty, with only the occasional birds flying and circling around.

Lansius fell asleep after breakfast while Anci kept watch for any signs of danger.

...

“Oi, oi…” called Anci.

Lansius wearily opened his eyes and crouched beside Anci. “What did you find?”

“A carriage.” Anci gestured in its direction.

Lansius looked toward the lone incoming carriage.

“Well?” Anci asked impatiently.

“Well, what? I don’t think that’s our reinforcement.”

Lansius had expected tens of men and several warhorses, especially considering the six gold coins he had given.

“Oh, that’s one of the slavers, alright.” Anci grinned wickedly.

Lansius squinted, trying to follow Anci’s train of thought. Meanwhile, Anci withdrew deeper inside their shelter and retrieved his broadsword.

"What are you going to do with that?

“Information gathering,” Anci laughed and strolled out in a relaxed manner.

“By the ageless," Lansius scrambled to tie his sword to his belt, grabbed his bag, and hurriedly followed Anci. When he found him, Anci was already standing in the middle of the road, blocking the carriage. Though not the tallest or biggest, he was muscular and as intimidating as a bear.

The two horse-drawn carriages stopped as they saw Anci blocking the road. The coachman looked at Anci wearily, and shouted, "What do you want?"

"Just some questions," Anci said while shouldering his broadsword.

"Go on," the coachman replied.

"Do you know anything about slave trade?"

Anci received no further answer. Three men descended from the carriage, weapons in hand. The burliest of them, clad in ring mail, led the assault.

"My, my, so impatient," Anci jeered at them.

Anci stood defenseless as one of his attackers lunged at him. Yet, at the last possible moment, he executed a slash that was so swift it was almost invisible. The resulting clang echoed loudly through the air. The assailant's grip wavered, and he only just managed to regain his balance when Anci launched into another swing, his hands moving with effortless precision.

Driven by instinct, the man attempted to parry, but he misjudged Anci's speed. His blade failed to meet Anci's, which landed with a faint metallic echo, followed by a dull thud. Anci's broadsword had broken through the burly man's upper arm bone and didn't stop until it had cracked several ribs. Only a few rings of the man's armor were damaged, but the impact sent him to the ground, gasping for breath.

The remaining two men were both terrified and enraged. They launched their attack in unison.

Anci managed to parry the attack from the slimmer assailant, but he intentionally engaged in a blade-lock with the larger man's sword. Utilizing his strength, Anci wrestled and positioned the larger man in such a way that his back obstructed the slimmer man's advance.

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

The larger man, confident in his superior strength, attempted to force Anci's sword in his direction. Instead of further contesting the brute force, Anci cleverly redirected the man's sword downward while delivering a swift knee kick to his groin. The move was executed so rapidly that the man could only gasp in surprise before his eyes rolled back, overcome by the sudden shock.

Without waiting for his final ally to crumple, the slimmer man launched a desperate attack. Anci blocked the thrust with a solid parry and deflected it aside. The man, seemingly blinded by desperation, attempted another strike. However, his stance was sloppy, his movements ill-coordinated. Anci's heavier sword swung faster, its blade slicing through the man's gambeson and burying itself into his right shoulder.

“I yield, I yield!” the slim man shrieked as he knelt with his right arm dangling. A deep gash and blood soaked his layered fabric armor and tunic.

Lansius was Anci’s backup, but he only stood in awe. He was glad that Anci was on his side.

Anci heard his opponent’s plea and snorted. “That’s why you should introduce yourself, so I'll know whether to keep you for ransom or to end you.”

“Money, I have money, take it,” he scrambled for his money pouch with his left hand. "J-just let me live-"

A horse's neigh alerted them.

“That can wait,” Anci said and then to Lansius. “Keep them down. I’ll be back soon.” He casually ran after the speeding carriage.

Lansius, with a drawn sword, watched over the man who sat on the ground whimpering from his injury. Lansius pitied the man. “Cut some of your cloth and press it on the wound. That’ll stop the bleeding. Otherwise, you’ll be going cold soon.”

The thin man nodded in fear and tore some of his cloth to dress the wound.

Meanwhile, Anci chased after the slowing carriage as it ascended the hill. He climbed from the back and soon enough, the coachman flew overboard and tumbled onto the dirt road like a sack of wheat. He groaned loudly from his injuries, but Anci wasn't feeling generous and turned the carriage around and pursued the man until they came to a stop near Lansius.

The coachman collapsed to the ground with battered breath and bruises covering his body, pleading for mercy. "Please, forgive me. Do no more harm. No more," he rambled.

"I know you," Lansius said to the coachman, then turned to Anci. "He's the one who tried to kidnap Felicity."

"Please, have mercy. I won't do it again," the coachman begged.

"Oh, I'll give you my mercy," Anci declared as he jumped down from the carriage and holding out a bloodied surcoat for Lansius to see.

Lansius recognized the heraldry of a river and a small castle. "Riverstead," he exclaimed.

The coachman trembled with fear as he realized he was dealing with Arvenians.

"Lans, you better climb up. There are kids and women."

Lansius hurried toward the crude-looking carriage and climbed up. Inside, he discovered scattered baskets of clothing, along with three frightened women hugging two children. He did not recognize any of their faces, but it did not matter. "Don't be afraid. We'll get you out of here."

 

***

 

After midday, Anci and Lansius, with some help from the women and children, had pulled the carriage to the side and hidden it from sight. All of the captured men, fainted or not, were tied up. The burly man might not make it, but there was nothing they could do but turn him on his side so he wouldn't drown in his own blood.

Just as they finished, the promised reinforcements arrived. Hugo led thirty men, most of whom were in their teens. They also had three warhorses and four additional horse-drawn carts.

Lansius informed them about what had happened, and they went to meet the coachman. The man confessed that he was a smuggler, who dealt with everything from contraband to slaves. Today, he was sending a fresh batch of slaves from Arvena.

Realizing his safety depended on cooperation, the coachman-smuggler glossed over his role in acquiring slaves from Arvena, focusing instead on details about the manor complex. "The Den is fortified. They have lots of men, a hundred, if not more."

A hundred, no way...

That surprised everybody. Normally, a baronet could only muster a dozen men or two, while a knight could only muster himself, his son, and his squire. Only a Baron could muster such a number.

However, Hugo didn’t let that fact bother him. “Why do you need to keep them there?”

Normally, the coachman would snigger at such a question, but Anci had slapped him once, which broke one of his front teeth and made the cheeks swollen. “T-the slavers wanted to keep the price high. They kept the slaves there and only sell a few.”

“Isn’t slave trade legal? Why bother with hiding and smuggling?” Lansius found it hard to grasp.

“The goods bound to Feodosia are bad batches. The too old, too sick, crippled. They’re only good for the Eastern Kingdoms," the man reluctantly explained. "The young, healthy, and those with skills, they command a high price. The purveyor will secure them before the Feodosia’s slaver arrived.”

“And then sell them to who?” Hugo asked.

The man watched left and right, before answering meekly, “Anyone with money. The Barons, baronets, knights, even rich city folks.”

“In Midlandia?”

He nodded and added, “also Rhomelia, Elandia, Nicopola...”

The smuggler’s answer triggered a murmur amongst the men. Many felt sickened that fellow Imperium subjects bought slaves.

“Lies! No men would take slaves under his household!” One of Hugo’s men said from behind, followed by a ruckus of support.

“The Eastern Kingdoms are human too, but they used slaves for everything,” the smuggler said and unintentionally silenced the place.

“Alright, that’s enough. Anci, get the men to rest and arrange for scouts,” Hugo commanded.

Anci whistled and waved his hand, it was enough to direct the men outside.

At least they’re listening to command easily… but thirty against a hundred?

Lansius felt that victory was slipping away.

As the surrounding area was being emptied apart from several individuals, Hugo asked the smuggler again, “Do you know anyone named Archie?”

“I never ask their names. It’s better that way... less guilt.”

Anci knelt beside the smuggler and whispered, “Try to remember.”

The man nodded fervently, out of fear. Hugo gave him Arte’s description, but the coachman shook his head.

“Are you the only one transporting slaves to this Den?” Lansius asked.

“Of course not. I’m merely a middleman. They got others as well.” Sensing the opportunity, he drove the point home. “I think your Archie friend must be with one of them.”

The interrogation gave no concrete evidence about the young Lord’s whereabouts, but stopping wasn’t on their mind.

Hugo checked the knots on the man’s wrist, nodded to Anci, and strolled out. Afterward, Lansius approached the smuggler. “A female squire with fierce eyes. Have you seen one?”

The man hesitated for a moment. "I recall taking one into the Den, but she never opened her eyes."

"What happened to her?" Lansius asked, his voice laced with a chilling edge.

The coachman swallowed hard, his eyes darting nervously between Anci and Lansius. "I don't know. She had a bandage wrapped around her head. The men carried her both in and out. That's all I know."

Lansius let out a weighted sigh, leaving the coachman behind as a flurry of mixed emotions began to consume him.

It could be her...

The decision to follow Felis' lead was starting to appear more justified. Instead of wandering aimlessly in Feodosia, he found himself in a place where the prospect of rescuing his friend seemed abruptly within grasp.

 

***

 

Chapter 12-2

Ducere

 

A horse-drawn carriage, trailed by two canvas-covered carts pulled by pairs of mules, approached the hill leading to Sabina Rustica. Anci, on lookout duty, recognized Thomas and Felicity. Swiftly descending from his vantage point, Anci waved at them and guided them to the camp where the others awaited.

As promised, Felis was accompanied by seasoned men in their late thirties or early forties. These duelists, watchmen, and thief-takers formed an intimidating group, some sporting proud mustaches while others were clean-shaven. Dressed in gambesons or brigandines, they were ready for battle, and their carts were loaded with poleaxes, swords, helmets, and shields.

Felis introduced the seven men-at-arms for hire first, then presented their leader and his assistant. "This is a special friend of mine, Calub, the alchemist, and his assistant, Jardin."

Calub, a tall, tanned man with short curly hair, wearing a milky-white leather coat, offered a slight bow, followed by Jardin. While Calub had the appearance of a scholar, the shorter Jardin exuded an imposing presence, his beard and muscular arms evoking the image of a living dwarven statue.

"Fire grenade," Anci's eyes flashed.

Calub heard the comment and smiled in response. Lansius guessed the two would become fast friends.

With little daylight remaining, they proceeded to discuss their battle plan. Together with Felis' group, they had around forty men, but they had yet to decide on a course of action.

"Palisade walls with almost no gap. Armed men, patrols, even stables," Anci reported.

"From the smuggler, we learned that the compound houses at least a hundred men, possibly more," Hugo informed the newcomers.

"Looks rough," Jardin commented.

No one spoke for a moment, so Anci took the initiative. "It's within our strength. I say let's storm them from two sides," using both hands to illustrate a pincer attack.

Calub shook his head. "You may have the numbers, but not the age or experience."

Hugo and Jardin nodded in agreement.

"Indeed, many are too young," added old Thomas.

Lansius wanted to suggest a different approach, but his background as a mere clerk weighed him down. He even felt that he didn't have the right to be there.

Meanwhile, Felis seemed eerily comfortable. "We only have five crossbow users, including me."

Many, including Lansius, doubted her ability, but they couldn't risk offending her and her associates. They also needed as many hands as possible.

"The spear and shield will do just fine," Anci remarked. "The men have met the women and children I rescued earlier, so their morale is high."

No one contested Anci's words, leaving the decision to Hugo.

Among the three, Thomas was older but had only recently become a retainer. Before that, he was merely the equivalent of a foot soldier. Anci, on the other hand, was younger and had less experience than Hugo.

"Anci, take Thomas and twenty men. I'll take another twenty. You'll attack first and draw them out. Keep them preoccupied while I attack from the west side and stage a rescue." Hugo then looked at Lansius. "We'll leave the younger ones in your care. Just wait here. If we need help, we'll come to you."

By the ageless, that’s only a bit better than Anci’s plan.

Lansius glanced at the rest of them, but nobody say a word.

What in the Art of War does forty go against more than a-hundred with half-baked plan like this?

Thomas, Felis, and Calub turned their backs, signaling the end of the discussion.

A wave of panic washed over Lansius. It had been years, but he was a big nerd who'd spent years honing his strategy and tactical skills in weekly online gaming competitions. He'd planned and led hundreds of players in guild wars with thousands on the battlefield. Looking at this situation, he was sure a disaster was brewing. His heart pounded hard, and an inner voice screamed that everybody was going to die.

“Do you mind if I share my thoughts on this attack?” Lansius spoke up.

Everyone paused. Calub looked at Lansius and asked, “You’re what, a scribe?”

“A clerk,” Lansius corrected, “but I have also studied warfare.”

Hugo and Thomas contemplated Lansius' suggestion. Felis gave him an encouraging smile, while Calub nodded once to show his openness. However, it was Anci who broke the silence, “Meh, we’ve heard the slowpoke's, might as well listen to the clerk.”

If you come across this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen from Royal Road. Please report it.

Lansius knelt down and quickly drew a rectangle, a series of lines, and a circle on the ground using a stick. Hugo, Thomas, and Calub immediately understood his intention and knelt down as well.

"This is our target, the manor on the next hill," Lansius pointed to the rectangle. "And this is the only road from there leading to us."

Calub followed the crude map, nodded, and asked, "And what is this circle in the middle?"

"There's a lake between us and our target, just beside the road," Lansius explained.

"The Lowlands," Anci remarked from behind.

Lansius continued, "My plan is not to attack them at their strongest point, but to lure them out and fight them at a location of our choosing."

Thomas glanced at Hugo, who nodded. "And how do you propose we beat them once they're out?" Hugo asked.

Lansius placed three stones on the map, saying, "We'll bait them here, and then one team will hold them while another team flanks them from behind."

Lansius' basic plan began to make sense and captured everyone's attention.

"My men and I can stage a defense. Even with a small force, we could easily hold off dozens of men if the terrain is suitable," Calub offered.

"A bait and ambush, might work better than just a surprise attack," Anci commented.

Hugo seemed to like the plan.

"But first," Lansius warned them, "this can only work if we eliminate their horses."

Thomas let out a big sigh. He knew all too well how fighting on foot was at a great disadvantage against cavalry. They needed a way to counter this.

 

***

 

An elderly man reclined in solitude beneath a large tree near the manor's palisade gate. Though the sky was overcast, the summer heat was still relentless. He had hung his doublet on a nearby branch, allowing the breeze to cool him down. Since morning, he had toiled to maintain discipline among his men, resolving minor quarrels and ensuring order in the newcomers’ dormitory.

The sounds of steady plowing and weeding bore witness to his efforts. Everything was well-organized, just as his master had demanded.

Following the Arvena war, Sabina Rustica Manor, also known as the Den, experienced an influx of ‘newcomers.’ They were assessed like commodities; those with potential were further cultivated to garner a higher value, while the mediocre were assigned to work in the shops or on the farm.

Contrary to popular belief, female slaves did not fetch high prices. What drew a premium were skilled individuals. Unprincipled nobles would pay handsomely for laborers, carpenters, or scribes. Laborers were employed on farms or orchards; carpenters for private construction projects or concealed rooms on estates; and scribes to handle confidential dealings and transactions.

There was minimal risk of leaks, as slaves were bound to their masters. This loyalty made them ideal candidates for sensitive roles, such as serving in the inner chambers where family affairs were prevalent.

Not all requests were malicious. Occasionally, a secret adoption would be arranged. There were other specialized roles, such as female bodyguards, as opposed to eunuchs. Nonetheless, it was indisputable that these slaves would never experience freedom again.

At the heart of this illicit operation was Bogdan, an old veteran of the northern uprising. As the caretaker, he directed his laborers to expand their fields. He had ambitious plans to enlarge the complex, which already included an additional farm, dormitory, and vineyard.

For Bogdan, the manor symbolized his reward, sustenance, and retirement, all in one. Though not the owner, his role as caretaker granted him near ownership. Sabina Rustica afforded him a life far superior to what his social standing would otherwise permit.

This advantage extended to many of Bogdan’s accomplices, including the elderly man who now enjoyed his tranquil private garden. The day was far from over, yet he was already contemplating his evening meal, a game of dice, and spending time with his mistress.

As he swatted flies away from the festering wound on his right hand, he was reminded of the incident two days prior, when he had been careless with an Arvenian woman. While punishing her, an unexpected guest had arrived, and Bogdan needed him to bolster security.

A sly smile crossed his face as he pondered the retribution he would exact upon her once the guest had departed.

Clang- Clang- Clang!

As if doused with icy water, the old man sprang to his feet, scanning his surroundings before focusing on the sentry atop the manor house.

The sentry finally noticed him and yelled, “Three horsemen!”

This revelation alarmed the old man. The Den was only expecting a carriage from Arvena sometime this week, but no one mentioned horsemen. Hastily, he donned his doublet, grabbed his poleaxe, and sprinted to the gates. “Does anyone know about this?”

“No, boss. No one heard any…” one of his men replied.

He clicked his tongue, sensing something amiss. “You lot. Come with me.”

Four men groaned as they emerged from the wooden gatehouse. The heat was oppressive, and they had been secretly drinking.

“Where’d these horsemen come from? I thought the boss had bought off all the local baronets and knights,” one queried.

“Maybe they’re just the guest’s men?” another suggested nervously.

“I didn’t sign up for this,” a third grumbled.

“You signed up for rape, loot, and arson, but not fights?” the fourth taunted his comrades, inciting a commotion.

“Silence or I’ll cut off your noses!” the old man barked.

The five men stood and waited until the three horsemen were close enough to shout at. They could see the horsemen wore brigandines and ring mail, but bore no banners.

“I’m Archibald, a champion from Arvena. Prepare to die!” the lead horseman declared.

“What did he say?” the men glanced at each other. Their instincts told them to flee, and so they did, legs pumping at the first sound of hoofbeats.

The old man readied his poleaxe, but he knew he stood no chance. He, too, sprinted away, yelling for support from behind the gates, “Crossbows, crossbowmen!”

The three horsemen thundered after the fleeing men, who desperately cried for their allies to open the gates. The horsemen easily caught up and attacked ruthlessly. Three of the fleeing men collapsed in an instant.

“Crossbowmen!” the old guard made his final plea before a lance pierced his back.

Fulfilling the old man’s dying request, a meager two shots were fired from the slits near the gate. Both missed their marks.

The horsemen laughed as they cut down the last man, who went limp before his face hit the ground.

Two of the horsemen dismounted, dragged the victims away, and stripped them of their gear. “Wow, look what I found—a gold ring and a necklace. These guys are loaded!”

Anci laughed and turned his attention back toward the gate. “Is there no one with manhood inside?”

The sentry above hammered the iron bell again. The sound drove everyone into the gatehouse. They had yet to learn what had transpired when they heard the sound of shattering glass from outside. Suddenly, the left side of the gate erupted in flames.

“Fire!” The guards panicked and backed away from the gate.

“Get the buckets! Tell the slaves to fill them!”

It took several moments, but they eventually extinguished the fire with buckets of water. That was when Bogdan arrived on the scene. “What are you waiting for? Get the riders out!”

Black smoke still billowed from one side of the gate as the heavy wooden door swung open. Eight riders brandishing swords and lances galloped out in pursuit of the three horsemen.

Seeing the new threat, Anci led his two comrades in a hasty retreat.

 

***

Chapter 13

Sabina Rustica

 

The eight riders from the Den relentlessly pursued Anci, charging downhill towards a picturesque glade where the dense forest met the tranquil waters of a large pond. The unsuspecting pursuers, focused solely on their quarry, failed to notice the strategically positioned men hidden amongst the trees. As the riders entered the glade, a group of determined men armed with spears and swords burst forth from the woods, catching the riders off guard.

“It’s an ambush... It’s an ambush!” the riders exclaimed among themselves. They slowed down and attempted to wheel around.

The men from the woods hurled rocks at the riders, while another group of spearmen moved to block their exit.

“Courage!” the leading rider urged his companions. However, he failed to notice Anci, who had turned around and was now closing in on him from behind.

A gasp echoed as Anci’s lance pierced the leading rider’s ring mail. The rider fell from his horse, a section of the lance still embedded in him. The unsettling scene caused the remaining riders to grind to a halt, their faces reflecting panic and fear.

“Yield, or I’ll do the same to you, slavers! Decide now!” Anci threatened, while his allies regrouped by his side.

In spite of the threat, three riders made a desperate dash for the exit.

 

***

 

“Spear in front, keep formation!” Lansius commanded as the three riders galloped toward them.

Eight men readied their spears or polearms. In addition to the eight spearmen in the front row, Lansius had only four crossbowmen and Felis in the second row. He prayed that he had enough forces to deter a cavalry charge.

“They won’t stop!” Felis remarked cheerfully.

What kind of girl is she?

“Pick your targets,” Lansius directed the crossbowmen. At this range, he didn’t need to question their accuracy. “Loose!”

The four crossbowmen around him and Felis pulled their triggers. The sounds of bowstrings and wooden prods snapping back into place filled the air, followed by the whistling of bolts.

Two steel-tipped bolts found their targets. One struck a rider, while the other hit a horse. Both veered off course.

Small cheers erupted from Lansius’ ranks.

“Not yet, one more!” Lansius moved to the front row to fortify their undermanned wall of spears. Standing shoulder to shoulder with the other men, he planted the end of his spear into the ground like a stake and held it firmly.

The lone horseman, less than forty paces away, continued to gallop, appearing mad enough to force his way through.

Lansius wanted to rally his men, but the words wouldn’t come. Others clenched their jaws or ground their teeth as they stared at the approaching terror. The charging horse made each of them feel as if it was targeting them personally.

This isn’t going to work, we’re too thin...

The ground shook from the thundering hooves of the warhorse. Taller than a man and weighing more than nine of them combined, the warhorse alone was a formidable opponent.

Its large black nostrils flared as the beast went against its instinct to keep away from the column of men. It continued galloping, leaving a trail of dust and dirt in its wake.

Lansius’ fingers turned white from gripping his spear tightly. The other men trembled, cowered, and braced themselves for the inevitable.

Suddenly, a deafening yet familiar sound came from behind. Lansius hesitated to turn, his focus locked on the horse in front of him. He noticed the sudden shift in the horse’s movements as the powerful beast slowed, its gait becoming unsteady, seemingly rejecting the idea of continuing its charge. With a sudden swerve, the horse changed course while its rider slumped lifelessly in the saddle.

“Oh, I got it,” Felis declared, her tone dripping with casual confidence.

Only then did Lansius look back and see Felis, who had clearly fired the last shot. The other crossbowmen were still busy reloading.

Stolen from its rightful place, this narrative is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Realizing they were out of danger, the men cheered exuberantly. Many could barely stand straight, and the ground reeked of urine, but they raised their fists in the air and taunted their opponents.

“Great shot!” Lansius shouted to Felis, amid a chorus of compliments from everyone else.

Felis chuckled but didn’t celebrate. To her, this was just what she expected. After all, it was nothing compared to shooting at a running goblin or other foul beasts inside the labyrinth.

Lansius took a deep breath. They had stopped the riders from breaking through, but the battle wasn’t over. In the distance, he saw another rider challenging Anci.

“Anci’s horse seems tired,” one of the crossbowmen observed.

Lansius squinted his eyes.

“Nah, he’ll be alright. The man is a natural,” Felis reassured.

“You can tell?” Lansius inquired.

“The way he controls the horse. He’s not relying on the reins, as the nomads do,” Felis explained.

Ah… Indeed, nomads used bows on horseback.

Just as they had predicted, Anci bested the final challenger without any drama. Afterward, the remaining riders finally threw down their weapons. Witnessing this, Thomas, Calub, and a few other men rushed from the far side to capture the riders.

 

***

 

Anci and Thomas’ men secured the captured raiders, who had surrendered their weapons and horses. Anci dismounted, checked his horse for injuries, and patted the mare when he found none.

Thomas approached with a waterskin. “I can’t believe this actually worked.”

Anci took the water, drank some, and offered the rest to his horse. “Your friend has a sharp mind.”

“I never knew he was more than just a clerk,” old Thomas admitted.

“Maybe you never asked?” Anci suggested.

Thomas chuckled.

Calub approached the two and said, “Sorry to interrupt, but I think we should send a messenger.”

“No need, the marshal is right there,” Anci gestured towards the line of spearmen who had yet to move.

Thomas followed Anci’s gaze and saw Lansius in front of his men. Thomas laughed while Calub tried to understand the humor.

In Sir Peter’s retinue, Hugo had always acted as if he were in charge, much to Anci’s annoyance. Despite Hugo’s laid-back attitude, he was rather bossy. Seeing someone else in command now gave Anci a great deal of satisfaction.

“So...?” Calub wasn’t sure what to do next. There wasn’t a clear chain of command in a ragtag warband like theirs.

“No need for a messenger. I’ll speak to Lansius myself on my way up,” Anci said.

“You’re going up again? Oh... The second, or is it the third step?” Thomas asked, half-guessing.

Anci tried to count on his fingers.

“First step is the baiting. Second is luring them here. Now, it’s the third,” Calub clarified. As an alchemist and part of the educated class, he easily understood Lansius’ seemingly complex battle plan.

The other two nodded in agreement. Having tasted a minor victory, they were eager for more. Their success was proof enough that they could trust Lansius’ plan.

With renewed confidence in their strategy, the group started planning the next steps. Anci and his fellow riders took a short break, giving their horses a chance to recuperate before continuing. After the rest, Anci observed his horse panting heavily, so he affectionately patted the horse and switched to a more rested one.

With the sun on their back, Anci proceeded at a relaxed pace alongside four other men, while five footmen joined them, each guiding one or two horses. As they came into view, the manor complex came to life with the sound of metal hammering and shouting.

Unfazed, Anci paraded the horses they had acquired from the riders. “I thank you for these lovely horses. Anything else you can offer?” he taunted in a loud clear voice.

This time, the slavers responded boldly, with the gate swinging open as armed men poured out. “Charge, punish these fools!” Bogdan, clad in bright brigandine, commanded.

Anci surveyed the scene, noting seventy men lining up against him, with another thirty emerging from a hideout on the far side of the complex. Surprised by the wide front, Anci hesitated before retreating in disarray, losing two captured horses in the process.

Sensing panic in Anci’s retreat, the slavers threw their full force into the pursuit. One hundred men charged downhill, with Bogdan leading them all in. He was suspicious after the eight riders he had sent earlier never returned and didn’t want to risk another piecemeal attack against his opponents.

As the slavers descended, their line became stretched out. The front group kept pace with Anci’s men and reached the glade in the low ground, where they discovered four horseless carts blocking their path.

Anci and his horsemen rode past the carts, which were guarded by a group armed with spears and swords.

Confident of their numbers, the slavers charged headlong into a direct assault. A fierce battle ensued, with the defenders using the carts as makeshift barricades. Slavers attempting to climb the barricades were met with brutal resistance, being hacked down, pelted with stones, or shot by crossbow bolts.

Undeterred, Bogdan directed his fresh men into the narrow gap where Anci had slipped through. The bulk of the fighting took place in the tight space, with both sides thrusting and raking with spears and polearms, each struggling to gain or maintain their ground.

Casualties started to pile up on the slaver’s side, but that didn’t faze them. Their morale remained high. After all, they had a hundred fighting men, a significant force they believed their opponents could not match.

Even if the neighboring baronet and knights combined their forces, they could only muster around thirty fighting men. Thus, no one on the slaver’s side thought they could lose this fight. In their minds, their opponents had merely poked a hornet’s nest.

Fresh blood and gore stained the grass as the fighting grew more intense.

Suddenly, desperate shouting and screams erupted from the slaver’s rear. Bogdan looked back and saw their rear ranks under attack by a swarm of men who had seemingly descended out of nowhere. “What’s going on? What are our men in the back doing?”

“Two dozen men or more attacked our rear,” one of his aides hastily reported.

Bogdan realized that his hundred men had been stretched thin as they marched through the narrow hill path. However, he never expected that the enemy had enough numbers to pull off such a deception.

Indecision breeds disaster, Bogdan thought. “On me, on me! Boys, that’s where the bastards are hiding. Time to give them a warm welcome!” He rallied his most veteran group and led them toward the source of the trouble.

Old Bogdan knew he could still salvage this situation. The enemy was cunning but seemingly lacked experience.

 

***

 

Chapter 14

Burning Sands

 

Hugo and his men had been hiding on a secluded trail that branched off from the hill path. They had waited and watched as the slavers’ one-hundred men charged downhill.

The hill path that connected the manor to the low ground was narrow and in several parts no wider than a cart’s width. Such terrain formed a natural bottleneck and forced the slavers to make an elongated formation like a snake.

Hugo wiped the sweat from his forehead and noticed Jardin’s glance.

“Now?” the alchemist assistant asked.

“Do it,” Hugo said.

Jardin puffed a smoke from his clay smoking pipe and grabbed two glass bottles from a nest of hay inside a metal container. He pulled out their corks, jammed waxed linens into them, and lit one using the ember from his pipe. Once it was lit, Jardin looked at Hugo.

“That section over there and there.” Hugo pointed his hand toward the two narrowest sections on the hill path.

Jardin lit the second bottle using the fire from the first bottle, loaded the first one into his leather sling, and then whirled it over his head several times. When the tension felt right, he released one of the cords and the bottle flew with an astounding accuracy. Before the first one hit the ground, Jardin had loaded and let loose the second one.

The glass bottle crashed without an explosion, but the liquid turned mist from the impact and readily caught fire from the linen wick. It burst into a fireball and the flame spread over a small area.

The fire stunned the slavers’ rear formation. Several men got caught in it and caused panic. Another bottle landed with another fireball and the slavers abandoned their position.

“For Arvena!” Hugo led his men to attack. Lansius had instructed him not to attack at the very end of the slaver’s formation, rather in the middle, to sever the rear from the main body.

The fire and surprise attack had scattered the slavers, but they soon reformed into several large groups to defend themselves.

Jardin launched another bottle and successfully prevented two of the largest group from joining. That would be his last assist as melee fighting broke between the two sides.

Knowing the element of surprise wouldn’t last, Hugo had concentrated his best fighters at the front. With spears and polearms, they hacked and slashed the slavers’ rear, who were lesser fighter compared to their vanguard.

Against slavers, with slim chance of high-born, the Arvenians ditched formalities and went for the kill. Today, they were not in the mood to take hostages.

The fighting turned brutal. Patches of red and dark gore stained the grassy ground. Meanwhile, fire kept blazing from several patches of dried grass.

The slavers’ middle and rear combined had more than forty men, but the narrow terrain negated their numerical advantage. The gap in skills and resolve caused the slavers to lose men rapidly. It didn’t take long before they feared their opponent.

Hugo’s small but hardened party whittled down the slavers’ number and secured a footing on the hill path. As planned, they split in two. One chased the rear section, the other, led by Hugo, continued their fight against the middle section. This move further strained their small number.

However, the slavers had it worse. They were in disarray. Not wanting to die for nothing, many pushed and jostled against their allies to avoid fighting. However, those who stood and fought, were no slouches. One tall man answered Hugo’s halberd thrust with the swing of his sword.

A thin metallic sound rang as the man tried to rush Hugo. However, Hugo raked and locked the man's sword using his halberd’s axe. He tried to yank it out, but Hugo was ready for a follow up. However, unseen by Hugo, his ally to the right blocked a vicious attack from his opponent, lost his footing, and bumped into Hugo.

Their lapse freed the tall man’s sword and he roared whilst launching a thrust into Hugo’s chest. The sword came too fast and Hugo parried it poorly. The steel sharp tip stabbed Hugo’s brigandine, dented the thin metal inside before slipping harmlessly into the shoulder.

Staggered, Hugo took a step back and raised his weapon just in time to block a cut aimed at his neck. Unflinching, Hugo grabbed his shaft closer to the tip, and lashed it out against the opponent’s arm. The halberd’s axe bit the opponent’s left elbow and the tall man groaned. Despite the gambeson that extended to his wrist, he was in so much pain that he went on defense.

Hugo was out of breath but continued to swing his weapon. He saw an opening and hooked the halberd upward into the tall man’s face.

“Gahh!” The tall man winced as the halberd’s axe struck his chin and made a deep gash. Pain and shock made the man lash out blindly with his sword.

Hugo sidestepped and countered with a thrust. The jolt felt squishy as the halberd's point plunged into the man’s abdomen. The man shrieked before kneeling down powerlessly.

Hugo kicked the dying man aside and pulled his halberd. He didn’t celebrate, but breathlessly recovered his stance. The fight to his right immediately demanded his attention. He brazenly approached and made a quick thrust when his ally parried.

The unexpected attack scored a clean hit. The opponent dropped his weapon out of shock and gasped for breath. He then stared at the halberd, which jutted out from his stomach. His breath became erratic as he gazed at Hugo with bloodshot eyes. He ground his teeth and pulled the halberd’s tip out.

Hugo brandished his halberd again, his ally was also ready, but the wounded man turned pale. He took several steps back only to collapse, never to stand again.

“Look, they’re running!” a wave of emotion erupted from behind. Breaths of relief and some chuckles quickly followed.

Hugo realized he had slain the last opponent. Despite praises from his men, Hugo felt humbled. How the battle had played was exactly as Lansius had predicted.

Unauthorized tale usage: if you spot this story on Amazon, report the violation.

The fighting on the hill path was practically over. The slavers’ middle section had ceased their struggle and fled to their main body. Uphill, Hugo’s split group, had routed the slaver’s rear, who fled to the manor.

The slavers were just local troublemakers. Even strengthened by a percentage of men-at-arms, they weren’t qualified for war. They were paid to guard slaves, not fighting a pitched battle.

Hugo spat before drinking his waterskin. Afterward, he looked at his allies, whose faces were full of sweat, dirt, and blood. “Don’t celebrate yet. Wash the blood from your hands. There’s still another fight upon us.”

The fighters nodded in solemn anticipation. They had taken the hill path, but the slavers’ main body on the low ground was still intact. And now, even without squinting their eyes, they could see the slavers marched toward them.

Led by Bogdan and reinforced by their best fighter, the reformed slavers’ column looked solid and intimidating.

“I believe it’s my time again?” Jardin asked Hugo as he arrived at the front.

Hugo snorted. “Do as you’re told, but nothing extra. We’re a little tight on the purse.”

Jardin found it funny and replied, “Most certainly.”

 

***

 

The sun was searing hot despite the multitudes of clouds. Bogdan’s men slowed their march just before the hill climb as exhaustion piled up. Bogdan let his men pause to catch their breath before the big push. This was not a race. They needed the stamina to fight.

Made up by mostly veterans, their morale was high. Their earlier failure against the four carts barricade didn’t dampen their spirit. In their eyes, they had forced the main perpetrator out and now things would be resolved quickly.

Hugo’s men had arranged themselves six men wide and three ranks deep. They were similarly exhausted after the last fight, but they had time to catch their breath and were in a better position.

In terms of numbers, Bogdan commanded more than fifty, of which half were his veterans. Meanwhile, Hugo had less than twenty. However, the Arvenians looked every bit intimidating as they stood their ground and brandished all their spears and polearms.

Led by Bogdan, the slavers resumed their march, but suddenly a small object flew in their direction. It cracked like clay and burst into flame when it landed at the center of their formation. The attack caught several men’s garbs on fire and terrified those in the formation.

“Push forward, let nothing stop you!” Bogdan commanded. Whatever the cost, he needed the assault to happen quickly.

Another clay object flew into their front and shattered, fire blazing just like the first one. However, this time, they were ready and only two got caught in the fire. Both fires fizzled surprisingly quickly and left a plume of white smoke.

Bogdan capitalized on the enemy’s apparent failure. “See those men in front of you? They’re nothing but thieves and robbers. Your wealth, your money, they’re going to take it all from you! Are you going to let that happen?”

Bogdan’s words pumped his men, and they clamored for battle.

“So, what are you waiting for? Make them pay!” Bogdan raised his sword.

Emboldened, the men yelled their battle cry. Their distance was less than two-hundred paces away from Hugo’s men.

“Onward!” one of the lieutenant shouted, but a wave of screaming from their ranks alerted everybody. They looked around and saw panicked men trampled left and right to get away from the white smoke. The smoke was clearly unusual. They noticed everywhere the white smoke passed, men immediately suffered.

The men avoided the smoke like a plague and left the formation in shambles. Indeed, it was hazardous. It contained a fine white powdery substance that reacted with moisture and caused burns.

A person engulfed in the white smoke would feel their eyes, nostrils, and throat burning. It blinded them and filled them with immense pain. Even breathing felt like swallowing a burning charcoal. Many scrambled toward the large pond to douse themselves from the pain.

The white smoke had only caught less than a dozen, but it shook the column. Bogdan had shouted on top of his lungs to keep control. However, ten horsemen and a score of Arvenians appeared behind.

A wall of spears in front, the threat of more white smoke, and now, cavalry appeared at their back; the slavers were beginning to panic. “This is madness. We can’t win, not like this,” one rambled.

“There’s no hope. We should run and meet back at the manor!” Another tried to convince their comrades.

Many nodded and fled as the horsemen advanced closer.

Watching his men fleeing, Bogdan eerily kept his calm. Instead of running, he dismounted and gave the horse to his aide. He was too old to lick boots. Moreover, he had no child of his own and little love for his concubines.

Together with twenty like-minded allies, old Bogdan reformed the column and readied themselves against the cavalry charge.

 

***

 

Anci led his horsemen into a wedge formation. Instead of galloping, he opted for a trot to better aim their lances. The horses, showed some resistance at first, but eventually they charged directly into the slavers' position.

The column of men and horses clashed. In an instant, many fell by the lances whilst the warhorses tore, trampled, and crushed whoever stood in their way. It wasn’t clear how many died, but the remaining slavers frantically disengaged and ran.

Anci wheeled his riders and gave chase to prevent the opponent to regroup.

While Anci went on a chase, Lansius arrived at the scene. Thomas, Calub, and Felis were at his side, together with eleven men whom almost all had wounds. They had given their best just to march and keep standing.

Lansius looked around with deep concern on his face. Many took it as reading the battle, but in reality, the scattered corpses, blood, and gore mortified him. He took a deep breath, but the distinct smell of blood made him nauseous.

Calub took notice. “You okay?”

“I’ll be okay when this is over,” Lansius replied.

The white smoke had dissipated from the field. As Calub had warned them, the area wasn't ideal. There was a strong wind coming from the hillside, and thus the smoke could only last for a minute or two.

Still, it got the job done. Without the burning sands, their casualties would be higher. An evenly matched battle was the worst in terms of casualties. They were lucky that Felis brought the alchemist, who spared them from that fate.

Calub and Felis, in turn, were grateful for Lansius’ uncanny understanding of the alchemist's tools and how he could integrate it into his plan.

Thomas stepped forward. “I’ll take some men to round up the survivors.”

Lansius nodded. “Try to link up with Hugo.”

“Aye, will do.” Thomas was about to walk away when Lansius grabbed the old man’s arm.

“Be very careful... no ransom is worth our men’s lives,” Lansius said.

Thomas gave a warm, fatherly look. “We’ll avoid danger as much as we can.”

Thomas went with just four men and scoured the battlefield. The other seven quickly lost their composure and dropped to the ground. Their role as reserve luckily wasn’t required.

“Don’t drink if you have deep wounds. Dab some water on your lips to keep them from drying.” Lansius watched the men and was reminded of the few he had left behind in the four carts barricade. He looked at the bright sky momentarily and shook his head to keep away the feeling that he was responsible for the dead.

I did my best. Nobody should blame me.

But the plan wasn’t flawless. Originally, two of the carts should burn to keep the attackers away. However, the small amount of fire bottles had failed to burn the carts. Thus, their severely limited number had borne the brunt of the attack.

Lansius knew that was his mistake. He had miscalculated and made Calub assign most of his stock, including both of the burning sands, to Jardin.

If only Calub carried one…

As Lansius had witnessed. Even a single bottle of burning sands was powerful. If it was used on the barricade, it would certainly stopped the attack on the carts and saved many.

“Tsk-” Lansius chastised himself. He had downplayed the technical side and incorrectly assumed that the dry wood would catch fire easily. However, the carts' thick wood proved to withstand the small douse of benzene from the fire bottles.

“Good job, Lans.”

The sudden praise took him by surprise. He turned around and saw Felis. Her smile and blue piercing eyes almost made him blush.

“Hey, be proud. This is a significant accomplishment,” she said heartily.

Lansius felt guilty, but the verbal pat on the back felt so good that he let out a stiff smile.

Maybe this isn't all bad.

Felis tilted her head at Lansius' lack of reaction. "You looked concerned. Is something wrong?"

"Nah, it's just that... It's time to finish the job."

 

***

 

Chapter 15

Catulus

 

The sun had yet to turn orange when the Arvenians secured the battlefield. Anci had returned and sent a few riders on patrol. Hugo took captured men for interrogation. Meanwhile, the Arvenians looted the dead for better gear and trinkets. They collected all they could and surrendered the more valuable ones to Thomas for safekeeping.

Sitting on top of a big rock, Lansius was busy mending both of his hands. Something had smashed his right thumb during the fight and caused the nail to cave in. He wrapped it tightly to help with the throbbing pain. At least that he could address that one. His left palm got some wood splinter that went too deep.

Darn it! Wish I had a tweezer, even a flimsy one.

Done with the interrogation, Hugo met up with Lansius and gathered the rest. “Bogdan, the caretaker of the place, is amongst the dead.”

A wave of relief was on everyone’s face. They felt victory was within grasp. Thus, all agreed to storm the compound. Despite the risk, the fear that the slavers might retaliate to their loved ones drove them to attack.

Lansius knew that Anci and Hugo would storm the manor regardless of his decision, for the two were looking for a far more important prize, the future Lord of Arvena. This made him weary. “Thomas, get the wounded somewhere cool and safe. Start a fire and boil some water. Treat their wounds if you could.”

Thomas nodded lightly. He cared for the men and was happy to oblige.

Next, Lansius looked at Calub. “Can I ask you to go with Thomas?”

“I need to warn you that my knowledge of medicine is limited,” Calub said.

“We have no one else. I’m only asking for a bit of cheap wine to clean the wounds, clean linen to wrap them, and some honey for treatment.”

Lansius’ explanation caught Felis and Hugo’s attention. They were familiar with the treatment, but Lansius’ confidence was rather unusual.

Calub smirked and asked, “So you’re also well read in medicine?”

“Just a bit... Oh, promise me, no bloodletting. Even if they got fever, don’t draw blood,” Lansius warned sternly.

The alchemist’s grin grew wider. “I’m not a barber-surgeon. Anything else?”

Lansius offered his hand. “Just wishing you a good luck.”

The two clasped hands. “You too, stay safe.” Afterward, Calub departed with Thomas.

Anci, who had stood there patiently, finally stepped forward. “Are we done with the preparation?”

“Pretty much,” Lansius answered.

“So, what’s next?” Hugo asked in anticipation.

Lansius looked him in the eyes. “The men are well rested, yes?”

Hugo, Anci, and Felis looked at each other. “I think the men are ready,” Felis answered.

Lansius looked down momentarily. Nothing was amiss, he thought and involuntarily nodded. “Let’s move to the summit and claim the prize.”

Anci chuckled and gestured his riders to saddle up. Meanwhile, Hugo turned to his men and shouted, “Gentlemen, time to free your sons and daughters. Let’s move out.”

Only twenty-three Arvenians were in shape to fight, but they responded with a fierce battle cry.

 

***

 

Taunts and screams echoed across Sabina Rustica. The Arvenians had cleverly used a cart and inclined wooden poles as makeshift ladders in their assault. The defender rushed to contain the breech by sending their best group of fighters.

Even being leaderless, the slavers zealously defended the place and almost succeeded if not for their disunity. Despite their heroic attempts, too many had left through a hidden backdoor with their gold and silvers. The lack of men finally turned the tide for the Arvenians. The fight turned sporadic, but quickly died down as the slavers fled to the manor, the only stronghold left standing.

The manor’s usually clean courtyard was now littered with blood and gore. The last few continued to fight inside the main hall and storage area. Only after they had nowhere else to run did the remaining four yield. The thud of their swords on the wooden floor marked the end of the slavers’ resistance.

However, another party existed.

“Drop the sword!” demanded Anci, whose broadsword dripping blood to the wooden floor.

“Easy, we’re not related to the slavers,” said one of the three men in red brigandine.

Despite the declaration, both the Arvenians who had stepped foot on the manor’s second floor, and the three guards, kept staring at each other.

“Tch-“ Anci spatted to the side. He looked around for threats before hollering down the stairwell. “Get Hugo. We got company.”

At his behest, a few rushed downstairs. They passed the call and not long after, hurried footsteps echoed against the stone stairwells.

Hugo appeared with bloodied face and hair.

Anci snorted. “Someone got you good.”

Unauthorized tale usage: if you spot this story on Amazon, report the violation.

“Fuck off, tis just a scratch,” Hugo retorted and then gazed at the men in the red.

“We’re not hostile unless you threatened our master,” the most senior of them replied.

“Who’s your liege and what’re doing here?” Hugo asked.

“We’re accompanying our master, the baronet of Brunna.”

The name made Hugo to take a double look at the three guards. He noticed the deep red color and surmised that the claim was true. “Tough luck, it seems that we got your master with his pants down.”

“I’m sure we can-“

“It’s a walk to the gallows for slavers. It's not a path you should follow,” Anci cut in.

The three looked stressed and gave no answer, but continued to stand in front of the guest chamber.

Hugo gestured his men to lower their weapons. “Yield, and we’ll promise the safety of you and your master,” he proposed.

“Will you hold us for ransom?”

“Nothing substantial for you three. Two goats or one if you’re poor.”

One of the guard snorted. The joke came out of nowhere. “What about my master?”

“I can’t decide for a baronet. We’ll let the nobles decide.”

The three looked at each other before lowered their swords. “Fair enough," the senior guard said and presented his sword to Hugo. “We yield on the conditions that no harm befall our lord and the three of us.”

“I, Hugo, on behalf of Sir Peter, accept.”

That brief ceremony marked the end of conflict in Sabina Rustica. Now, Hugo and Anci were free to roam the second floor for their biggest prize, Arte of Arvena, but his whereabouts remained elusive.

“Nothing here but marks of looting. You sure there’s no hidden cell downstairs?” Anci asked as they searched the master chamber.

Hugo exhaled deeply while patting his forehead with a clean linen he had found. “There’s nothing in the cellar or storage... Must be outside. There are several suspicious buildings-”

“Wait, we haven’t checked the guest chamber.” Anci marched out.

Hugo ran after him and they watched how the red guards called their master, without avail.

“No answer?” Hugo asked.

The senior guard shook his head. “No luck. We explained it’s safe to get out, but-“

Anci snickered. “Is he dead?”

The guard sighed and lowered his voice. “I hope not. I have a family to feed.”

“Yo,” Anci called for one of his men. “Get me an axe.”

“Umm... How about a poleaxe?” A rather young looking man offered his weapon.

Anci grabbed the poleaxe and found it solid. He smirked. “This will do.”

 

***

 

Inside the guest chamber on the second floor, things remained calm. The room had seen better days, but the plasters on the wall still retained their bright color. Cool breeze rushed from a fully opened decorated glass window on the far side. Lacquered furniture completed the fancy look.

Nowadays, guests rarely used the chamber anymore. Decades ago, a potential customer would need to travel to see the wares, but nowadays the slavers had bribed enough that they could smuggle their wares directly to the customers. Thus, there was seldom a reason for a visit.

However, three days ago, a valued customer, no less than a baronet, had traveled on a whim. He just had a new companion, an effeminate wandering bard from the looks. They wanted to browse the wares before deciding on a purchase. Their host was just too happy to oblige. But now their trip had came an abrupt end.

Muffled roar from outside followed by a violent smack, shuddered the room. The oaken door creaked whilst wood splinters flew. A dozen more powerful bashes followed until one of the door frame gave up. Despite the layers of tallow, but the metal hinges had rusted.

“Jam it into the gap-“

“We need a chisel!”

“Stand back! Yeaaarrggh!”

The hinges burst while the iron lock slipped. Anci, the ones who brute-forced it, sneezed loudly as wooden and plaster dust gathered around. The room was too quiet to his liking, but that didn’t stop him. “Yield,” he demanded while brandishing his reddened broadsword.

“You’re too loud,” came the answer.

The tone and the sight dumbfounded Anci.

An effeminate young man sat naked on the bed. His shoulder length light brown hair swayed by the wind as he filed his finger nails calmly. To his side, a grotesque man lay exposed in an awkward position with mouth foaming.

“Oi, what happened?” Hugo asked from behind. He impatiently shoved Anci aside and saw the young lad. “Who’re you?”

“I’m just a guest here. You must be looking for this big arse?” The naked lad gestured his hand at the grotesque man. “He’s a slave buyer alright, but not the owner.”

The heightened tension and heat caused blood on his head to start dripping again. He wiped it off as he approached the bed. Suddenly, his eyes went wide. “That’s the baronet of Brunna.”

“A baronet?” the lad asked.

Hugo nodded while ascertaining that the baronet still drew breath.

“Oh, to be taken advantage by a baronet,” the lad said as if in a play. “I thought he’s at least a Baron in disguise.”

“Brunna is a wealthy estate. He’s as powerful as a Baron.” Hugo felt compelled to explain while he took a piece of cloth and dabbed the reddened sweat from his eyebrows.

“You better get that checked-“ he was cut off by the appearance of a lady at the door.

Felis held her crossbow in her arms as she went inside. “Oh, my~” she noticed the naked lad and gawked at the beautiful yet masculine body.

“Please pardon my uncouthness, My Lady.” The lad jumped from the bed after he had noticed the blonde and made a gentlemanly bow, all without trying to cover his groin. “A most unfortunate circumstance just befell me.”

“Not at all. Please, I’m not a noble,” Felis corrected him. “But… you’re Archie, right?” She saw through the heavy makeup.

The name forced Hugo and Anci to do a double take. As mere squires to a knight, they rarely saw the Lord Maurice’s son in person. Only now, they began to see the resemblances.

“Ah...” The lad’s surprise turned to smile. “You’re the lady from three days ago. Such a good fortune to be blessed with your presence again. But tell me, for what purpose, my lady, are you here in such an unpleasant place, and are these your men?”

Felis smiled. Before they could interact further, someone intruded from outside. “What’s happening? Is my master alright?”

“Oh, he’s fine. Just a bit drunk.” Anci blocked the way and passionately guided the guard out. “Listen, there’s personal stuff happening, totally unrelated to your master. So, grunts like us, we better wait outside.”

Hugo breathed a sigh of relief at Anci’s quick thinking. Afterward, he approached the naked lad and took a knee. “My Lord, I’m Hugo, Sir Peter’s squire. We come to rescue you.”

“My, to be found by my own retinues. Tis is so unexpected.” The lad, no other than Arte of Arvena, stood taller as he straighten his back like a seasoned fighter that he was.

To their side, Felis gathered the scattered clothes and offered them to Arte.

“Gratitude, my lady. And pardon for the sight.”

“Not at all, My Lord. I heard it’s a sign of nobility when one isn’t ashamed of their own body.”

Arte chuckled at Felis’ flattering while Hugo readily assisted him to don his clothes.

“Squire, tell me about your master.”

“My master is Sir Ian’s firstborn son.”

“Ah, the baronet of Ardena. It seems that the Ancient’s light has not forsaken me.” Arte closed his eyes to gather his thoughts. “I’m indebted to you and your master, but for now, let’s drop the formality. I’m in a poor state and there are likely assassins going after me... Until I can stand on my two feet, call me Archie, a knight from Arvena.”

Hugo bowed his head and then asked, “Sir Archie, may we ask what happened and why you’re here?”

“It’s a long story. Maybe for some other time.” Archie looked at the man in the bed. “You only need to know that I used this poor excuse of a man to hide from my pursuer. Unknowingly, he kept me safe. But there's always a catch...”

Hugo nodded diligently. Outwardly, he appeared content to serve his newfound Lord, but inside, he knew the story didn’t add up. However, there was no reason for a lowly squire like him to pry further.

“So, what did you do to him, Sir Archie?” Felis innocently asked.

“Well, how should I explain... this sorry man enjoyed my company, so it’s only prudent to return the favor, no?” Archie let out an innocent smile.

Felis unexpectedly giggled. Meanwhile, Hugo found it hard to digest. “He’s passed out from that?”

Archie laughed but didn’t offer an explanation. “More importantly, now you’ve rescued me. What is your plan?”

Hugo’s back tensed up. He knew it was best to consult with a certain someone, but this was too good an opportunity to pass. “Sir, I think it’s best to head out tomorrow at the first light.”

 

***

 

Chapter 16

Missing

 

Nightfall descended on the newly liberated Sabina Rustica, the sky awash in hues of dusky purple and blue. The manor was now under complete Arvenian control, but there was no sign of celebration in the air. They ended the day with only a small feast. Despite a cellar full of alcoholic caskets, only bitter pale ale was available. This wasn’t due to self-restraint, but a need for preservation.

Exhausted and weighed down by wounded men, the Arvenians also faced the risk of a counterattack. The slavers could return with fresh accomplices and stage a night attack. Thus, the feast started abruptly and ended just as quickly. They knew they needed their rest before their rounds of night watch.

Meanwhile, freed slaves and captured men drank wine merrily, an absurdity that was actually a calculated gamble. The Arvenians were trying to calm the slaves while simultaneously robbing them of their fighting abilities. With the slaves’ loyalty in question, the Arvenians couldn’t take any chances. They simply didn’t have enough eyes to watch everyone.

Despite earlier hostilities, the Arvenians provided their captives with meals, blankets, and linen for bandages. It was a stark contrast to what they used to have, but they could only drink their sorrow. The only thing that kept them from the sword was their labor. After all, there was no rose garden after the war, only piles of dirty jobs. It fell to the defeated to dig burial pits, bury the dead, and wash looted articles.

The victor fare only slightly better. The care for the wounded was taxing and, often times, ill-fated. As the night fell, the remaining uninjured Arvenians barricaded themselves in the manor, gatehouse, and dormitory. Inside the manor’s main hall, injured personnel were being tended. The atmosphere was heavy and riddled with whimpering, whining, and sobbing. However, on the second floor, an altogether different scene was unfolding.

Clean and serene, the private hall was filled with small chuckles and lively discussion. A number of peers were waiting for a ceremony. The air was scented with the fragrance of incense wafting from a censer.

Inside the master chamber, Sir Archie prepared himself by donning a fresh clean tunic. Today, the Arvenians had won a brilliant victory against an opponent thrice their size. He should be ecstatic, but he remained dispirited. Truthfully, he had gone to Sabina Rustica not to hide, but in search of a servant boy who was like a brother to him. The two had gotten separated when they escaped Riverstead. Ever since that day, Archie had been on the lookout. Unfortunately, he couldn’t find him, not even at the Den.

Archie remembered their times together and let out a sigh. However, he did not dwell on it. He was the Lord of Arvena and his men needed a leader, not an emotional youngster.

Two knocks on the door alerted him. “Enter,” he said without hesitation.

An old esquire named Thomas appeared. “Sir, we’re ready for your presence.”

Archie strode out from the master chamber, into the adjacent hall where a big mahogany chair stood in the center. He sat on it and looked at the guests arrayed before him. Some looked Arvenians, some were not, but all were equally unfamiliar to him.

Squire Hugo was the first to approach and knelt down in front of Archie, formally stated his deeds in an embellished manner. Originally, this was a herald’s job, but the only one they had had been injured. After Hugo finished, Archie offered a praise and bestowed three gold coins, a share of the loot, and a promise of sizeable arable land in Arvena.

Hugo rose and returned to his colleagues, and Anci stepped forward to play the jester and embellish his merits to an extreme degree, causing a riot of laughter. The unexpected entertainment helped him win a bigger prize. Valor and courage alone weren’t enough; one needed to promote oneself to gain a reward.

Next, Thomas stepped forward, delivering his performance solemnly and politely. For his efforts, he received one gold coin and a promise of two horses. Felis and Calub were then called forward. Sir Archie praised them for their assistance, giving a sizeable pouch of looted richness as payment.

The ceremony ended quickly, and they got down to business. Hugo started with the information about the slavers. “We stumbled upon a powerful group who surely will try to exact revenge on us.”

Archie pondered about the new threat. “Nothing we can do about it but to proceed carefully... Anything else?”

Since the time they had found him, Archie had been a constant relief to his retinues. He lost his father, his closest colleagues, his loyal entourage, and the whole province, yet he remained steadfast.

Thomas coughed once to draw attention. “From what we gather. This Gottfried bastard and his northerners barbarians have captured the entire Arvena except the western area.”

“The reinforcement from the Duke of Tiberia forced Gottfried to withdraw. Even he couldn’t act brazenly against them,” Hugo added.

Archie nodded, but didn’t say anything.

A haunting memory gushed into Thomas’ head. “These barbarians are no better than animals. They kill and chain whoever they cannot use in their army, even children-“

“The Margrave will pay,” Archie stated with a cold and loaded emotions.

Satisfied that his pleas were heard, Thomas bowed his head deeply.

“If nothing else…” Hugo looked at the other and then at Archie. “Tomorrow, we’ll move out with ten riders to Selene Castle.”

Archie looked perplexed. “Selene? Shouldn’t we head for Lubina Castle?”

“Sir Peter is a guest at Selene Castle, but more importantly, it’s Lord Bengrieve’s summer residence,” Hugo explained.

The name made Archie nod easily. While only a seneschal and not the Lord of Midlandia, Bengrieve held the actual power. If Arvena was to survive, he needed that man’s support.

“How about the rest of us?” Anci asked.

Hugo recalled the conversation he had with a certain someone. “Thomas will lead the men to Pozna. Remember to pillage this manor before leaving, otherwise, brigands will use it. If you have trouble, consult with Calub, or lady Felis.”

If you discover this narrative on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

“Isn’t it better to ask Lansius?” Calub suggested with a faint smile.

“Lansius? The name seems familiar,” Archie remarked.

Hugo’s heart raced as he hastily responded, “He’s just a clerk from Riverstead.”

The room fell silent. Hugo shot a look at Anci and Thomas, who reluctantly nodded their heads in agreement, having previously discussed and agreed to advance their own interests over some unknown foreigner.

Archie’s eyes narrowed, and he leaned to one side in his seat with a face devoid of any expression. The tense silence in the room deepened.

 

***

 

While his colleagues were being rewarded for their merit, Lansius was facing harsh complaints from fourteen freed slaves inside the dormitory. Instead of being grateful, these women vehemently refused their newfound freedom.

Something about opportunity? 

Can’t return home? Really…

He tried to listen, but his mental capacity had reached the limit. Outwardly, he only looked slightly tired with bags under his eyes, but deep inside, he was in pieces. He had risked so much, yet he couldn’t find the one he sought.

Damn, the fingers are all blackened. Is this toxic?

Lansius worried about his injured thumb and palm, now covered in coarse soot from the torches he had used during his searches. The torches also left a strong tallow scent on his padded coif.

Suddenly, the sole remaining Arvenian attached to Lansius, a young man, couldn’t hold himself back and exclaimed, “You want to be sold as slaves?”

“And what’s wrong with that?” A woman snapped back.

Their exchange triggered an avalanche of heated accusations, with the young man pitted against fourteen angry women.

Lansius watched the verbal melee with contempt from the sidelines. Only when it died down did he intervene, saying, “Now, now, everyone, please calm down.” He also signaled to the young man to step back.

“I apologize for the sisters’ outburst. My name is Leda,” said one woman in gorgeous blue traveling attire. “It’s just that you don’t know our situation. Where we came from, there’s only backbreaking labor waiting for us.”

“Or death in childbirth,” another woman hastily added.

Despite their attempts to explain the situation, Lansius’ lack of response deterred the women.

Leda continued, “Some of us come from Nicopola and Lowlandia, but we’re mostly Rhomelians. We’re born poor. The land was hard to cultivate. Even with children working in the field, there’s only food for a person or two, not the whole family.”

“Raids from the east are becoming more frequents. If we stay, we’re going to end up as slaves either way,” added another woman.

Lansius tried to understand their situation. “I get it, but now you’re free from this place. Isn’t that a good thing?”

The women exhaled or let out a sigh, but the woman in blue calmly said, “Can’t you see our clothes? Can’t you hear the way we speak? Sabina Rustica gave us education and a chance at a better life.”

Lansius suddenly realized that these women, who were born in villages, spoke and behaved like city folks. They were obviously educated, and it showed in their confidence.

This place is a school?

“We don’t mind being sold to the highest bidder. They’ll more likely to give us a better life than if we stayed in Rhomelia,” one of the women said, and the others shared their tragic stories one by one.

“Two of my sisters died young. One in childbirth. Another beaten by her drunken husband.”

“My mother died from hunger and my auntie’s family, who raised me, got sick with the black rye plague. I watched as her fingers rotted away. They sold me away to spare me from the same fate.”

“Anything is better than staying. If you think whoring is bad, you haven’t seen the brothels in Rhomelia where women are seasonal meat to be discarded before winter.”

Lansius raised his hand. “I-I get it… I was not aware of your plight. I apologize.”

A wave of relief greeted the response. “Can you do something to help?”

Lansius exhaled deeply. “I’m not a slaver, so I can’t help you with that.”

The group of women clicked their tongue or sighed.

“Can’t you go to Feodosia and sell yourselves?” the ill trained and undisciplined youngster couldn’t resist a taunt.

The boy’s comment was met with a chorus of jeers from the rest of the group.

“Alright, enough,” Lansius rebuked the youngster. “Just take it easy and let me handle it.”

The youngster stubbornly looked away.

“Hear me,” Lansius started slowly. “You can’t expect us to sell slaves… However, if you have a quill pen, ink, and paper, I may be able to help.”

The women frowned, puzzled by the request.

“Please wait a moment,” Lena said, gesturing to her sisters, who sent the youngest among them to gather the necessary supplies.

Lansius took a seat in the nearest chair facing the long table in the dormitory hall, and the rest of the sisters followed.

“What do you need the supplies for?” Leda asked as she handed them to Lansius.

“I’m going to write your name, age, place of origin, and skills you have,” he said while resting his back on the stiff wooden chair.

“And then?” she inquired.

“I’ll report to my superior, and then we might find a solution.”

Leda looked confused. “Pardon me, but will it really help?”

“If what you’re saying is half true, then some of you are bookkeepers, scribes, musicians, or bakers.”

The sisters realized what Lansius had in mind and grew excited.

“I promise nothing, but at least this is legal.” Lansius sharpened the quill pen and looked at the women. “Now that I’ve helped you, it’s time to return the favor.”

“What do you want?” Leda asked with reddened cheeks. “Companion for the night?”

Lansius paused but shook his head. “Nothing like that. Any of you know anything about a female squire from Arvena?”

Leda’s shoulder stiffened. “Are you looking for Thilde?”

Lansius shook his head as he remembered the woman they discovered at the small wooden cabin on the far side of the vineyard. “No, we already found her. She’s not the one I’m looking for.”

Many of them drew a breath of relief. “Thilde was new,” Leda commented.

The youngster fidgeting from curiosity. “So, what’s her story? Why’s she on a cell?”

“Thilde’s background story is different from ours,” Leda reluctantly explained. “She’s born an esquire and only recently taken from her family’s estate. Naturally, she wishes for her freedom back. A senior guard took a liking to her. We don’t know what happened, but they got into a row and she bit a chunk of his flesh.”

“No wonder.” Lansius felt disgusted as he recalled the wounds on Thilde’s limbs.

So it was torture…

“Unlike us, she never faced hardship and famine,” said another sister with pity on her voice, followed by nodding from the rest.

Lansius kept a stern gaze on the youngster on his side to keep him from throwing a stupid comment. The male raised his palms in protest.

Leda clapped her hands to gain everyone’s attention. “So, the master’s original question, do any of you know anything about a female squire from Arvena?”

“Sharp eyes, short hair, good with swords,” Lansius added descriptions.

No one answered.

“None of you?” Leda confirmed, before turning to Lansius. “I’m afraid your friend isn’t here. We oversee this dormitory and we’ll certainly know if someone special like her was inside.”

“Special?”

“Sword trained, short hair.”

Lansius felt utterly hopeless. “No chance you missed her?”

“I’m sure. For certain, we got nobody with short hair,” Leda clarified.

“I see.” Lansius sighed as his heart pained.

Leda sympathized with him. “I’m sure she’s in a better place. There’s a good chance that your friend is free somewhere out there.”

“The Den rarely accepts combatants. If your friend was caught, she would likely be sent to Feodosia,” another suggested.

Lansius felt torn. He had spent several precious days here, all for nothing but a cruel detour.

There's no hope in this. I'm just fooling myself. She's-

Leda sat down next to him and spoke in a soft, concerned tone. “You appear exhausted, master. Perhaps you should consider getting some rest.”

Moved by her sincere offer, Lansius exhaled sharply and reached for the coarse, thick parchment. He carefully dipped the quill pen into the ceramic inkwell and asked, “Your name and training, please.”

Before anyone could respond, a knock on the door interrupted them. They turned to the source and saw a man in a broken-white leather coat accompanied by a stout but shorter man. The door had been left ajar, so this was either out of courtesy or urgency.

“Master Lansius, they require your presence,” said the stout fellow.

Lansius felt a twinge of unease.

 

***

 

Chapter 17

Arms Bearer

 

The main hall was somber, with eerie shadows flickering on the walls as if the lanterns and chandelier breathed life into them. The Arvenians had taken the hall as their quarter and had acted accordingly by arraying their temporary beds across the floor.

Despite their numbers, the place was devoid of life. There were only faint whispers and weak groans. The floor was littered with piles of dirty linen bandages, also buckets that reeked of blood, piss, or vomit.

There were no medical staff besides the volunteers who had had their fair share of fighting today. They were mostly driven by a sense of camaraderie to care for their unfortunate allies.

Some had lost limbs, while others had lost a friend or family member. With only alcohol to ease the pain, many were lost in their own thoughts.

The cold evening air blew in as the night-watch pushed the door open.

Footsteps echoed as Jardin, Calub, and Lansius entered the hall. What greeted them was dampness, the smell of blood, and the rancid wine they used as antiseptics. Lansius immediately noticed a few eyes wandering at him, so he kept his gaze low. If he had to guess, he would say that the looks were directed at him in resentment or hatred.

With this many injured and dead, Lansius couldn’t shake the feeling that he had let them down. However, Calub, the Alchemist, seemed unfazed. Led by Jardin in front, they kept walked briskly toward the end of the hall where a stone circular staircase was located.

As the shadow from the staircase fell over him, Lansius exhaled deeply. “What does the Lor-“

Calub, who had barely ascended several flights of stairs, raised his hand. “He’s just a knight for now.”

Lansius had heard that they found someone named Archie and deduced that Hugo found what he was looking for. However, for the young Lord to use another disguise was surprising. “And why does the knight want to see me?”

“Better ask that directly,” Calub replied as they reached the second floor.

The spacious, illuminated room and the scented air felt a world different from downstairs. As he entered, Lansius noticed that the conversation had stopped and grew wary of the nature of the summon.

He wasn’t sure what to do when Calub turned to face him and whispered, “Be mindful that now they’ve found him, there’s no need to carry out another attack.”

Lansius’ eyes widened.

Just what did he imply?

He was yet to get an answer when Felis approached. She feigned friendly greetings whilst spoke softly, “Only ask for money. Your goal may lie in Feodosia.”

Despite how normal looking their exchange was, it still grabbed everyone’s attention.

“Better present yourself,” Calub said openly to allay the room’s suspicion.

Felis smiled and motioned Lansius to follow her. Meanwhile, Calub and Jardin made their way to the side.

Lansius noticed the stares from Anci and Hugo. While Anci eventually flashed his teeth, Hugo simply closed his eyes and feigned ignorance.

Something is indeed wrong…

“Now, go.” Felis smiled and then proceeded to bow her head slightly toward the chair in the middle, where a man sat idly to one side. It was the same person Lansius had met in Bellandia. His hair was longer now, and he was wearing a much plainer outfit.

“It’s been a while,” Archie addressed Lansius first. “Come closer, you can call me Sir Archie,” he instructed plainly.

Lansius swallowed his fear and knelt near his master. “Your servant is gladdened that Sir Archie is well,” an eloquence Lansius never knew he had flowed from his lips.

“You seemed well yourself.” Archie’s face looked bored or annoyed. “So, tell me, o servant of mine. Why didn’t you report your deeds to me?” he said without even looking.

The tone made him uncomfortable. “I-I’m just a clerk, Sir. I only partook a little in the fight.”

Archie moved his gaze toward Lansius, and after a few moments of thoughtful silence, said, “I know you’re a foreigner, so maybe your concept is different. But here, you need to claim your merit. Else, you’re going to be a deadweight.”

Not knowing where this conversation was going, Lansius could only play it safe. “My apology, but I only helped a little.”

Archie scoffed. “I remember our meeting. Back then, you acted like this too... Too shy for your own good.”

Embarrassed, Lansius quipped before he could think. “My good sir, do you wish for an ambitious retinue?”

It was almost a rhetorical, yet Archie responded lightly. “And what if I do?”

This tale has been unlawfully lifted without the author's consent. Report any appearances on Amazon.

The answer surprised Lansius, and he quickly regretted it.

Archie watched Lansius’ expression and chuckled. As his mood improved, so did the tension in the room.

As a lowly clerk, Lansius usually put up with humiliation, but today he felt exposed. The wound from his failure to find Stefi was still fresh. So, uncharacteristically, he fumbled in his bag and retrieved a scroll. “May I approach?”

With a finger, Archie motioned Lansius to come closer. “What’s this?”

No shame in trying…

“A gift for my good Sir’s freedom.”

Archie read the parchment, and his lips turned into a sinister grin. “Clerk, why do I see names and their professions?”

“Sir, I’m sure you’ll need them to rebuild your forces.”

“You offer me slaves?” Archie couldn’t believe what he just heard.

“Sir, we’re not enslaving them. We’re recruiting them.”

Archie snorted as he found the suggestion to be funny. “And how will you explain when the Imperium sent their agents?”

Lansius could’ve stopped there and excused himself as a foreign fool. However, his wounded pride wouldn’t let him. “Sir, they could inquire all they want. I made no trickery. It’s the freed slaves who wanted this. They begged me for this chance.”

The answer made Archie to lean forward in his seat. “Is this not a jest?”

“Sir, if you wish to find out, you may ask the Alchemist,” Lansius named a third neutral party.

All eyes were on Calub, who serenely enjoyed the limelight and proclaimed, “The clerk spoke the truth. I overheard that the enslaved Rhomelian wanted to join. They refused to return, as their homeland was rife with constant raids, famine, and extreme poverty.”

Archie shook his head and massaged his temple with one hand. “I have yet to ascertain whether you are the ones responsible for today’s battle. However, here you are bearing a substantial gift. Lansius, what kind of man are you?”

“An ambitious one, Sir,” stated Lansius nervously.

Archie couldn’t hold himself and burst into a fit of laughter. After he laughed his heart out, he exclaimed, “So why do you refuse to claim the highest honor?”

Refuse to claim? The highest honor?

Lansius was clueless, but felt obligated to honor the men. “Sir, I’m just the one making plans. It’s Anci, Hugo, and Arvenians who bleed for you. I dare not to claim the honor.”

“So you don’t deny making it?”

“Indeed, Sir. I made the plans, but they're not even worth mentioning.”

“To beat a hundred and fifty with just forty, and you said it’s not worth mentioning,” Archie said with a dry chuckle, and then he suddenly proclaimed, “Enough! You shall not make fun of me any further.”

Like a storm in a daylight, Archie’s wrath was so unpredictable. Lansius almost beg for a pardon, but Archie stood over him and asked, “Tell me o clerk, what is thy desire?”

Is this a trick...?

Cold sweat ran down his back. Then what Felis had said flashed through his mind. “Money,” Lansius said and quickly added, “I want to free an enslaved friend in Feodosia.”

The answer seemed to be correct, as a stiff smile was on Archie’s lips. He believed that he had exposed Lansius’ true colors. He recalled his father’s teachings: people fight for their own interests. “A man who asks for nothing cannot be trusted,” he mumbled to himself.

Lansius couldn’t hear the words, but saw the change in his master’s expression.

Archie gazed upon Lansius with renewed interest. “Lansius from Bellandia, from this moment on, I take you as a squire of the tent.”

The sudden declaration was met with a clamor from the room.

What the! What kind of job is that? I don’t even like tents.

“As for the money.” Archie reached for a small wooden chest and showed its content. The bottom part was filled with valuables. “One part for my House, another for the troops, and the rest shall be yours.” He grabbed a fistful from there and opened his palm for Lansius to see.

The emotional roller coaster made Lansius speechless, but he was so thrilled by the golden reflections. The prize he never expected just slapped him in the face.

Archie dangled the prize from his hand, so Lansius crouched with a raised hand to accept his reward.

The small coins and two heavy rings trickled into his hands. A few hit his bandaged right thumb, but the adrenaline dulled the pain.

Lansius stared at the five gold coins and two rings in his hands. It felt surreal, so he grasped them and saw it stained by traces of soot, ink, and blood from his hand.

It’s real… They’re real!

Filled by gratitude, Lansius exclaimed ecstatically, “All hail, Lord Arte of Arvena!”

Archie guffawed and slapped his thigh.

All hail, Felicity, my goddess of luck.

Lansius had received a substantial reward and it would be foolish to ask for more, yet he couldn’t betray his conscience. “My Lord, may I ask another thing on behalf of the wounded men?”

Archie looked at him cautiously. “Speak.”

“The men are in danger from fouled bandages. One man’s blood shouldn’t make contact with another's. It would be so kind to provide them with clean linen. They needed it more than their share of loot.”

“Is it true?” Archie beckoned to the others in the room, all of whom turned their gaze at Calub.

The Alchemist bowed slightly. “Indeed, Sir. This Lansius fellow seemed to know a thing or two about medicine.”

“Then it’s settled.” Archie rose from his seat. “Thomas, pick the worn-out and faded ones, and ensure that enough is distributed for their needs. I need men to fight wars, not clothes.”

 

***

 

The next day, the sky was clear and cloudless, displaying warm shades of pink, orange, and gold. Lansius rode in a slim cart, drawn by two swift horses, accompanied only by a coachman.

Lansius had taken the ride from Pozna. Instead of spending the night there like the rest of the Arvenians, Felis had persuaded him to press on. It was costly, but she deemed it necessary. Lansius went with her suggestion and rode with just a few hours of daylight remaining.

At first, he was doubtful, but the slim cart, with its sleek and light construction, proved to be fast and nimble. With nothing onboard but Lansius and his bags, it easily maintained high speed through the bends and corners.

The summer sunset was breathtakingly beautiful. The fields all around them were illuminated by the last rays of the setting sun, casting long shadows over the rolling hills and tranquil hamlets dotting the verdant landscape. For a moment, Lansius forgot about his troubles and simply basked in the peaceful beauty. It was a rare chance to escape from the harsh reality of medieval life, so he savored every minute of it.

His new brigandine, looted from the manor, felt comfortable despite the steel plates inside. It was a finely crafted piece that fit his body perfectly. Even the backing felt soft and supple. He might not find what he was looking for, but Sabina Rustica had made Lansius a wealthy man. His pouch was laden enough to free a slave, buy a farm somewhere, and live peacefully.

Driven by his newfound wealth and status, he dared to dream about living carefree with his family from Bellandia. He also fantasized about living together with Stefi.

A sudden realization hit him.

Hang on, when did I look at her like that?

The memory eluded him, whilst the cart overtook another horse drawn cart along the cobbled road. “This feels like a race.”

The coachman let a chuckle. “Worry not, maester. You’re in good hands.”

The wild and jerky ride continued eastward. Soon, they started to see the outlines of Feodosia city with its ancient derelict grey stone wall.

 

***

 

Chapter Note: Stefi is 18 and Lansius is 23 at this point (4422). They're 19 and 24 after new year in the barn in Ceresia.

 

 

Chapter 18

Autumn Stream (Flashback)

 

The sun shone brightly that day, and the warm weather was a welcome change. The sky, visible through the forest canopies, was a brilliant shade of blue. It contrasted greatly with the reddish leaves of the late fall season.

It was the tenth day after their departure from Bellandia. The Arvenians had crossed several hamlets and villages along the way, but only the Lords, Knights, and their retinues could stay for the night. The rest of the troops had to make do with their simple tents pitched in the fields.

Last night, they camped just outside the forest, in a clearing where they built a large campfire and a field kitchen. The site wasn’t ideal, but the woods provided them with easy access to firewood and opportunities to forage for wild berries and eggs.

After breakfast, Lansius and Stefi began packing their belongings. The strong morning sunlight made the situation rather hectic, as some had decided to march earlier than usual. Several men with their spears and shields were already forming groups and waiting on the dirt road.

This far from the frontline, they marched at their own pace. While it seemed lax, the rearguard who marched behind would ensure that nobody was deserting.

Stefi had taught Lansius how to pack his gear, and after more than a week of living on the road, he had mastered some simple tasks. Stefi untied the ropes while Lansius carefully pulled and wiped them off with a dry rag.

Ropes were costly, so care was needed to maintain them. They were literally the thing that held the roof over their head every day. Without ropes, the tent would turn into a large poncho. Made from braided natural hemp fibers, they were coated with wax to protect against mould and decay.

As Lansius worked with the ropes, Stefi gathered the bowls, spoons, and waterskins and said, “Pack them all up. I’m going to the stream.”

“Don’t take too long. Everyone is already on the move,” Lansius warned.

“No worries. We have Horsie, remember?” And then she left.

Indeed, she was right, Lansius admitted. He initially thought that only the rider would benefit from a horse, but he was wrong. As it turned out, having one would benefit the entire group.

Tents, battle gear, and foodstuffs were especially burdensome to carry. A pack animal could easily carry them, allowing the group to march faster and further.

Lansius continued to dry wipe the remaining ropes. Once he was done, he gathered them all and approached the horse carefully. After a week of traveling together, Horsie was already familiar with him, but Lansius was wary of the big animal. He approached from the front and only proceeded to the saddle once he was sure that the horse’s demeanor remained unchanged.

Although he winced at the horse’s strong odor, he put the ropes into the saddlebag and left gracefully with a relieved face. He repeated this process several times with the bedrolls, blankets, and their lantern.

Finished with it, he noticed Horsie nudging towards a patch of tall grass, so he pulled out his knife, cut them, and brought it to her.

As the horse ate, Lansius noticed more movements on the road. He spotted the usual group he had marched with had started their march. Even the traveling peddlers that followed their column were preparing to move.

Lansius patiently waited, but after a while, he couldn’t ignore it any longer. So, he rose, took his and Stefi’s bag, and tightened Horsie’s reins to ensure that she wouldn’t wander on her own.

The author's tale has been misappropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

Before leaving, Lansius took a good look at his surroundings to ensure that no one was eyeing the horse and their belongings. Satisfied that nobody was nearby, he made his way to where the stream was supposed to be, guided by its faint sound.

“Stefi,” he called, but there was no answer, so he tried again, louder. Still, there was no answer.

Realizing he had no other option but to descend the steep and possibly slippery path, Lansius cautiously checked the surroundings for any signs of danger. Despite being told that there were rarely any beasts in Arvena other than the occasional highland wolf, he took no chances. He was aware what was considered a monster by humans like him might be seen as a mere animal or beast by people of this world.

Lansius hesitantly began his descent as he found no evidence of danger.

At least there’s no goblin.

He remembered how Stefi had assured him that she had never heard of green-skinned monsters who walked like a human and used weapons.

As the path became steeper, he grabbed onto branches to steady himself. Halfway down, he looked up and grew wary of having to climb back up again. When he looked down, the vegetation obstructed his view.

“Stefi!” he called again, but the sound of the stream was loud enough to muffle his voice.

Lansius’ worry urged him to continue. He carefully descended the treacherous path, holding onto branches for support. Finally, with sweaty and reddened palms, he reached a flat area near the stream.

The ground was covered with gray river stones and black sand. The stream turned out to be wider and deeper than he expected. Lansius glanced up and marveled at how the lush trees had concealed the place.

Next, his eyes wandered at the stream which glimmered with the sun’s reflections. However, he spotted something. His eyes opened wide as he realized what he was looking at: a young woman, waist-deep in the stream, her bare skin glistening in the sunlight.

Their eyes briefly met, and Lansius quickly recognized her and her strong gaze, but then his eyes drifted toward two finely shaped round objects, which were normally concealed behind a black gambeson.

“I-I didn’t mean to,” Lansius finally snapped back, turning around with a reddened face.

Stefi said nothing but calmly rinsed her hair once more before wading to the banks. She walked toward a large boulder where she kept her clothes, grabbed her breaches and turned away. “Sorry, did you wait for too long?”

“S-sorry,” Lansius stuttered.

Stefi chose not to respond, but silently dressed up. Once she was done, she asked, “So, why you’re here?”

Lansius turned to face her. “I... oh, everybody had left.”

Stefi ignored Lansius’ slightly reddened face and said, “I probably took too much time… Sorry, the water wasn’t cold, so I was tempted to wash myself.”

Lansius nodded. “Can’t blame you. It’s been days.”

Stefi motioned for Lansius to pass her bag. As he did so, Stefi gave him his waterskin. “Better drink some.”

Lansius took a sip but hesitated to drink more, worried about the raw water. He typically made excuses to boil the water or mix it with wine to, hopefully, kill any pathogens inside.

Stefi put the utensils she had cleaned inside her bag. Afterward, she fished out a clean cloth and used it to dry her hair.

“Umm, shouldn’t we haste?” Lansius asked.

“Before we leave,” Stefi said sharply, and Lansius sensed a scolding was coming. “Lans, it’s best to keep this between ourselves.”

“I understand. Again, I apologize,” he said remorsefully.

Stefi shook her head. “I don’t blame you. It’s just that I had a friend who saw a woman’s thigh by accident. She reported him and he was forced to marry.”

Yikes...

“At first it was funny, but it didn’t end well for them," added Stefi ominously. “Also, if that happened to us, everybody would say that I’m taking advantage of you as my charge.”

Lansius bowed his head. “I swear, I’ll never mention it to anyone.”

"Well, let’s get going.” Stefi forced a smile, though her heart still pounded uncontrollably. Despite her words, marrying Lansius would be a blessing for a dead-end, masterless squire like herself. It was easy to tell that the man had no experience with women, but that only made her more protective of him. Despite how common it was, Stefi couldn’t bring herself to leech off a man.

Leading the way, Stefi showed Lansius an easier path upward. As she began to climb, she suddenly asked, “Say, since you saw mine, what should I do with you?”

Lansius shook his head and replied meekly, “You know I don’t have that much coin.”

Stefi looked at him. “Who said it had to do with money?”

“Eh?” Bewilderment was written all over his face. “You want to see me naked?”

Stefi giggled. “I’m a squire. I see men left and right, so that’s not a good bargain.”

“Then what?” Lansius was intrigued.

She motioned for him to come closer, as if to whisper something in his ear. He leaned in, eager to hear what she had to say. But before he knew it, Stefi had her hands on either side of Lansius’ face and was pulling him in for a kiss. It was sudden and unexpected, but he couldn’t help but feel a rush of excitement as her lips met his.

As abruptly as it began, she pulled away, a mischievous grin on her face. “I stole yours, so now we’re even!” she said, and nimbly climbed up.

“How- how did you know?” Lansius anxiously asked, but all he heard were faint giggles coming from her direction. He was confused by the mixed signals, but the big grin on his face didn’t lie.

 

***

Chapter 19

Specter

 

A month had passed since Lansius arrived in Feodosia, and the sharpness of his appearance had faded into a haggard weariness. He seldom left his room, save for a quick stroll to the baker at noon or for supper.

Lansius sat on the edge of his straw mattress bed, his back hunched and his gaze fixed on the dimly lit room. He wore his faded Blue Centurian tunic, a garment that stirred memories of his friend. Clinging to these memories offered him a bitter form of comfort.

A half-empty small jar of wine and an empty bucket lay on the floor near his feet. He had attempted to drink his sorrows away, but the taste of undiluted local wine was too bitter, even for his desolate mood. Outside, the final hour of sunlight cast a reddish-orange glow through the open slit in the window. Lansius noticed the warm hues and let out a heavy sigh.

Another day wasted…

He ached for the familiar comforts of home and family. Yet, he knew the perils of returning to his home in war-ravaged Arvena far outweighed his longing. For sure, the journey was fraught with danger, with northern men known to detain travelers without cause. Lansius' distinct dark hair, a clear mark of foreigner and the fact that he came from Midlandia direction would made him a clear target of suspicion. The risks were simply too great.

Without warning, Lansius' thoughts turning to the fruitless search he had undertaken and how it slowly turned him into a recluse. Day by day, he had waited for good news that never came. And each day, the cowardly decision he had made in Riverstead had come back to haunt him.

His stomach growled again, and the nauseousness returned. Lord Arte had granted him status, wealth, and the privilege of exercising his own will, but Lansius had squandered it all with his own irresponsibility.

With a heavy feeling, he fought the urge to lie down. He planted his feet firmly on the floor and took a few wobbly steps toward the table.

Guh…

He quickly took hold of the table to steady himself. Despite the proof of intoxication, Lansius stubbornly refused to acknowledge it. Rather, he attributed the weak knees to prolonged sitting.

Without meaning to, Lansius's gaze drifted to the table. Although it had been pristine upon his arrival five days ago, now a thin layer of dust covered its surface. Yet, the dust was the least of his concerns; sitting next to a jar of water and a wooden cup was an unassuming paper scroll.

The men he had hired were competent enough to submit a written report after their search. However, just like his own search, they had found nothing.

"There was no slave that fit the description." "Most likely she perished in the war." Lansius recalled the last conversation he had with them.

Anger sparked within him, but not because of the failure. He felt ashamed to maintain such a feeble and foolish hope for so long. The likelihood of finding Stefi alive was always grim. Before he had hired anyone, Lansius had visited the slave merchants in Feodosia. They could only offered their sympathies as they couldn’t find her either in their place or in their logs.

As Lansius reached out absentmindedly for the cup, he took a small sip of water and winced at its stale taste. Putting the cup down, his attention was drawn to the empty seat in front of him.

“Hey, if you’re dead, why don’t you tell me and save me all the trouble?” He blurted out at the empty space.

There was no answer but darkness that crept in as the sun inching closer to the west.

“Hmph, you’re probably floating freely and laughing at my misery,” he continued, but this time, the alcohol in his blood whispered an imaginary answer.

“Guilt? But what can I do in Riverstead? I’m no swordsman... To die at your side, is that what you want of me?” His heart pounding as he finally spoke some of his burden out loud.

“You’re not special. There’s nothing between us,” he denied his own feelings. "I’ve seen you naked once, but that’s nothing. I’ve seen plenty of naked girls before. Where? The internet. You don’t know? Hah! See... you know nothing about me.”

This time, there was no answer to his ramblings, only silence. Frustrated and ashamed at his monologue, Lansius retreated to the bed and held his head in sadness. Not even amnesia could erase the deep yearning he felt for a companion, and Stefi was the closest he ever had.

…

The last faint glow of the setting sun finally ebbed.

Lansius let out a long, tired sigh. Despite his misery, he couldn’t ignore the encroaching darkness. His earlier outburst had pumped so much blood into his head that he felt slightly sober. He grabbed his bag and lantern, and pushed the iron bolt lock open.

The corridor of the timber and stone inn was dimly lit, with only a single lantern casting a feeble glow near the stairs. The sound of creaking floorboards echoed as Lansius made his way downstairs.

Lansius quickly entered the dining area next to the kitchen. The innkeeper and her two kids were too busy to greet him. That was perfect. The least he wanted was for somebody to judge him by his looks.

For that same reason, he liked to come early. Today, there was just one guest in the corner. Keeping his head down, Lansius went to the small table by the window. As he was about to sit down, the man in the corner raised his cup. Lansius thought it was just a greeting, so he waved back.

“Lans, my man, you look unwashed.”

The man’s words sent a jolt down Lansius’ spine. He looked at the man and recognized the facial features along with the broken-white leather coat. “Calub!"

The alchemist raised his cup even higher as a smile formed on his lips.

Ignoring his suspicion, Lansius rushed to meet him. He had changed inns twice and used an alias, but a friendly face was something he yearned. Truthfully, he was worried about staying alone in Feodosia, especially with a sizable amount of money.

Calub carefully kicked the chair in front of him, and Lansius gladly took it. “So, how’s Feodosia?” The alchemist asked.

“Better than what I expected,” Lansius replied cheerfully, despite his issues.

The story has been taken without consent; if you see it on Amazon, report the incident.

Calub smiled. “It’s a small town but passed by many trade routes. You can find almost anything in here-” he abruptly paused. “Ah, what am I saying? Please pardon my ramblings.”

“What for...?” Lansius grew suspicious and asked carefully, “You’ve heard?”

The alchemist's response was solemn. "Lansius... I'm saddened that you can't find what you're looking for."

The mood turned heavy, and Lansius didn't give an answer.

"I have some connections who informed me about it," Calub explained. He poured spiced ale into another cup and offered it to Lansius.

Lansius took the cup, but sipped only a little as his stomach didn’t feel well.

Calub didn’t push for an answer, so Lansius pondered his situation. Meanwhile, the kitchen next door bustled with activity, the sound of crackling of fire and clanging ladles from the metal cauldron. Also, the rich aroma from the meat puddings being cooked.

“So, how is Lady Felicity doing?” Lansius asked after he remembered just how much he owed her.

“She’s fine. She runs a tavern, you know. We should visit her, but perhaps not tonight,” Calub replied, and glanced at the innkeeper. “Can we get one bowl of porridge, please? For hangover.”

“That’ll cost extra,” the innkeeper replied without looking.

“Make it tasty then,” Calub said without asking for the price.

Lansius could only watch in silent. After some hesitation, he finally asked, “Calub, am I chasing a ghost?”

“Don’t say such a thing,” Calub uttered, but he didn’t elaborate. He knew better than giving Lansius a false hope.

A rather plump lass no older than fifteen arrived with two bowls of stew, a small lump of blackened meat pudding, and warmed up bread. Lansius hadn’t ordered, but each guest got the same meal.

“You better wait for the porridge,” Calub suggested while stirring at his stew.

Lansius nodded. He was grateful for his concern.

The stew was steaming hot, so Calub broke his bread and dipped it before eating them.

“Mm, how’s Sir Archie doing?” Lansius asked.

“Now you’re talking.” Calub dipped another piece. “It’s good that the squire is thinking about the master.”

Lansius exhaled sharply from guilt. He had accepted the honor as squire, but ended up like this. “He gave me freedom of will.”

“I’m sure it doesn’t include wasting your life away. Lans, shouldn’t you return to your master’s side?”

Lansius couldn’t challenge that notion. “Since you’re here… does it mean you come to fetch me up?”

Calub shook his head. “Last time was a contract, but I’m not joining the Arvenians.”

Something didn’t add up, Lansius thought. “But then, why are you looking for me?”

Calub paused for a moment. “Well, it’s not easy, but as I’ve said before, I have connections.” He pulled a thin brown leather wrap from his inside coat pocket and put it on the table.

“What’s that?” Lansius asked.

“An invitation.”

The answer puzzled him, but the content may hold the answer. “May I?”

Calub motioned him to do as he pleased. Lansius proceeded to open the rugged leather and reached out for a thick envelope inside. He noticed the purple wax seal that bore a crest of a regal-looking man riding a horse.

Lansius didn’t recognize the crest, but he knew that good quality paper was expensive. He looked up at Calub. “Is this for me?”

Calub nodded and Lansius carefully unsealed the wax, pulling out the paper.

He saw neat handwriting on the letter with distinctly legible and glossy black ink, clearly the work of a skilled scribe. Although it was an invitation, Lansius felt more like he was being summoned by the noble who sent it. “What does this baronet want?”

“I haven't the faintest idea,” Calub exhaled sharply. “Nevertheless... I thought it would be beneficial for you. That’s why I accepted the task of delivering that letter.”

With too much on his head, instead of responding, he tore off a piece of bread and dipped it into the stew. He and Calub were comrades, but Lansius hardly knew the alchemist well. The fact that Calub now brought an invitation from a baronet in Midlandia was unsettling.

Who is he working for?

Calub didn’t press for a response and instead quietly ate his stew. The plump serving girl returned with a bowl of gruel and placed it in front of Lansius.

“Gratitude,” Lansius said to the girl, who bowed her head before leaving. He stirred the gruel with his spoon and noticed pieces of cheese and salted meat swirling around. Feeling somewhat calmer, he turned to Calub and asked, “What is this invitation about? Can I decline?”

“Of course,” Calub reassured him. “It’s not a summon. But why don’t you meet them first?”

Lansius hesitated, so Calub went on, “It’s clear that they have an interest in you. The Midlandia’s nobles may be ruthless, but they’re also fair.”

Upon hearing that, Lansius stopped stirring. “But I’m a squire to Sir Archie.”

“That’s exactly why you need to meet them. Your master needed Midlandia’s support. You’ll do well to build a relation with a baronet to help Sir Archie’s cause.”

Lansius couldn’t find fault in his friend’s logic, but he remained indecisive. “I need to consult this first.”

“By all means,” the alchemist remarked lightly.

"Will you accompany me?"

Calub smiled and replied, "I could, but I shouldn't. They are only interested in you, and we wouldn't want to make a rude gesture."

Despite the questions, Lansius didn’t feel like accepting. Now, he had a carefree life. Why would he risk it for something vague? He had tried hard to improve his station in life: working as a farmer, teacher, workhouse clerk, forest survivor, and squire—all in a single year—but all had led to nothing.

Fate had a way of pushing him back to square one, leaving him feeling powerless. He felt like a dry leaf caught in the whirlwind of conflicts.

This year, Lansius had witnessed more violence and desperation than most men experience in a lifetime. The traumas from Riverstead and the Amertume forest never left him. Because of this, he was reluctant to even hold onto hope.

Yet despite his emptiness, a faint yet novel ambition began to kindle within him. His eyes sparkled as he pondered whether there was still something—or someone—worth living for. Though he had lost Stefi, the thought of his family in Bellandia gave him pause for hope.

Perhaps this’ll pave the road to return home.

 

***

 

One week had passed since Lansius began his journey to Toruna. Today, the sun rose over the medieval countryside, casting a warm glow on the landscape. A refreshing breeze swept through the fields, carrying with it the unique aroma of ripe crops ready for harvest. The narrow path meandered through the golden fields, the stalks gently swaying in the breeze.

The sound of hooves against the dirt road echoed through the quiet countryside. Lansius rode in a horse-drawn cart laden with goods, sharing the space only with the old coachman sitting up front.

Before he left on this journey, Lansius had consulted Sir Archie, who recognized that the baronet of Toruna was an influential man in his own right, and also close to the powerful Seneschal Bengrieve. Because they needed all the influence they could muster, he agreed to send Lansius on his first errand as a squire.

“There.” Suddenly, the coachman pointed to the south after they passed over a hill.

Following his hand, Lansius spotted a manor beside a small river, flanked by recently harvested farms, orchards, and a nearby village. “Is that where the baronet of Toruna lives?” he asked.

“This is Toruna,” the coachman replied.

Lansius opted for silence, sensing that the old coachman may have been struggling with disabilities. Instead of dwelling on the matter, he allowed himself to become fully immersed in the breathtaking beauty of the harvest season, a reminder of the bountiful fields of Bellandia. After a month of seclusion in Feodosia, he felt rejuvenated, his old self having returned.

“Always, good harvest. Land is blessed,” the coachman added.

Lansius politely nodded. The land was indeed prosperous, with a good population, and looked well-governed.

It took another hour before they reached the manor. The coachman stubbornly drove the cart through the vast courtyard and up to the entrance of the manor, as if Lansius were an esteemed guest.

The guest cursed this bad mannerism that may ruin his first impression. He saw two armed men accompanied them from the gate, but they kept their distance.

“Go on. Go down,” the coachman instructed.

Lansius carefully dismounted from the cart and gazed up at the imposing three-story structure that loomed before him. Though not a castle, it radiated an air of authority and grandeur. The walls were built with smooth, large grey stones, while the wooden parts were painted white, creating a striking contrast. At a glance, there were no vines or moss, making the entire building appear immaculately maintained, as if it had been constructed only recently.

Now, this is a manor. 

Compared to this, Lansius thought, Sabina Rustica was aptly named a rustic villa.

A surprised boy-page approached Lansius. “Eh, we expect a delivery, not a guest,” he complained innocently.

Lansius couldn’t resist a smile. "It's alright, I can wait outside." He pulled out a letter, showing the crest on the purple wax seal.

"Gratitude, maester, please wait here. Don't go anywhere," the boy said and ran inside. His footsteps echoed inside the cavernous hall.

 

***

 

Note : Some readers may have drawn premature conclusions about this chapter because of the introduction of a female character and what appeared to be a comedic scene. I want to clarify that this is not a harem or any similar story-line, but rather a setup for future events. 

I would also like to remind readers that this is not a time travel genre, but a portal fantasy. The date even follows the Elven Calendar, so please expect a low-fantasy setting rather than 100% historical accuracy. Thank you for your understanding.

 

 

Chapter 20

Henchmen

 

Lansius stepped inside the medieval manor house, his senses filled with awe. The Great Hall was immense and filled with long wooden tables and benches that may accommodate thirty or forty people with ease. The high ceiling made the air feel clean, not stale, dusty, or moldy.

At the hall’s far end, Lansius saw a raised platform, likely the high table where the host would sit. However, it was the big glass window upstairs that caught his attention the most, letting in warm, sunny light that filled the Great Hall with a gentle glow.

As a page-boy led him further into the manor, Lansius noticed a group of servants moving about their daily tasks, too preoccupied to take notice of him. Behind them, two guardsmen trailed them from a distance.

Soon, the page-boy escorted Lansius into an antechamber, a place where a guest could wait or rest. “The steward will be here- please make yourself, mm... comfortable,” he stammered. “Oh, there’s water in the basin and washcloth.” The page boy tried his hardest to deliver his line.

“Gratitude, I’ll be waiting here.” Lansius smiled and the page-boy hurriedly left.

Lansius saw the bench, a small table, and the stone basin.

Better to clean up.

Custom dictated the guest to wash their face and hands before meeting a respectable host, but Lansius wanted to go above and beyond to show that he wasn’t a country bumpkin. After all, he was Lord Arte’s squire. Disguised or not, he needed to keep a good appearance, not to tarnish his Lord’s name.

With that in mind, he changed out of his traveling clothes and into a deep blue doublet he had taken from Sabina Rustica. Although it was a little loose around the waist, he could easily fix that with his belt.

He wrapped the sword belt around his waist and suddenly felt nostalgic for his long-lost friend, but he quickly dismissed the sentiment. Today wasn’t the time to reminiscing about the past.

Just then, a servant knocked and entered before Lansius could reply. A young boy appeared and bowed deeply. “Maester, I’ll clean your boots.”

Lansius was taken aback. He had never had this treatment before. “Eh, um, what should I do?”

“Just stand there, maester,” the boy replied energetically as he scrubbed Lansius’ boots with a horsehair brush.

Lansius couldn’t help feeling uneasy about the child labor, but the boy looked happy, with chubby cheeks, clean clothes, and good manners.

He probably received an education and a better job than most Arvenians… Probably also sleeps in a comfortable bed.

Lansius briefly pondered about morality, but shook his head. He wasn’t here to judge.

The boy quietly left, closing the door behind him after finishing his task.

After enduring a grueling two-week journey by cart and foot, Lansius finally found himself alone in the waiting chamber. He let out a deep sigh as he lowered himself onto the bench, feeling the weight of exhaustion settling heavily upon him. With a tired hand, he took out his waterskin and took a long swig of water before settling in to wait.

...

As the sun began to set, the manor sprang to life with bustling activity. Lansius, now cleaned up and refreshed, could imagine that a feast was taking place in the Great Hall, as was customary for feudal nobles.

The lord of this manor may have been just a baronet, but it was clear to everyone who saw it that Toruna was a rich, fertile land. It beggared belief that someone who wasn’t a Baron could own such a grand estate. Meaning, either the baronet of Toruna was a rising star at Midlandia’s court, or old money.

A much older gentleman appeared at the door. “Excuse me, maester. The baronet requests your presence at dinner.”

Lansius rose from his seat. “Please, call me Lansius. I’m just a clerk turned squire.”

The old steward smiled warmly, but remained silent as he led Lansius up an elegant staircase and through a series of corridors that eventually brought them to a private dining hall. It was smaller and more intimate than the Great Hall, but no less impressive.

The tale has been illicitly lifted; should you spot it on Amazon, report the violation.

Though they were on the second floor, the ceiling was high and two beautiful chandeliers illuminated the space with an unflickering white light that was brighter than any candles Lansius had ever seen. The walls were plastered evenly and painted in bright color.

At this time of year, the room was furnished with colorful tapestries depicting scenes of battles and hunting. One in particular intrigued Lansius, a small green-colored tapestry that illustrated what looked like dwarves and their underground citadels.

Regrettably, he couldn’t approach the tapestry out of respect to his host. Nevertheless, he marveled at the room’s other features, including murals, painted statues, and two gorgeous suits of armor.

The steward gestured for Lansius to take a seat on the far end of a long, exquisite table. “The baronet will arrive shortly.”

Lansius sat and found the air pleasant, filled with the sweet scent of fresh flowers or fruit. Ironically, such a lovely place might hide a dangerous threat, like the lair of a dragon. He noticed two guards standing by the exit. From their demeanor and discipline, he could tell that they had proper training.

One piece of advice from his long-lost friend rang in Lansius’ head: be prepared to not go home when a noble has summoned you.

Tonight it’s either a comfy bed or a dungeon...

There were stories of nobles summoning low born, only to accuse them of a crime they never did and throw them in the dungeon.

Why did I even bother showing up?

Before Lansius could get cold feet, the sound of marching footsteps outside announced the arrival of the master of the house.

Lansius stood and made sure not to gawk at his host as he entered. To his surprise, the baronet was an athletic man dressed in a red silk outfit.

Following the baronet were a lady in a dark gown and veil, as well as a squire and a page-boy.

“Just sit wherever you like,” the baronet said as he took his seat at the opposite end of the table.

The lady seemed bothered by Lansius’ presence and just stood there.

Why is she so tense? ... Don’t tell me I still smell, but I've already cleaned.

“Audrey, you’re not going to sit?” the baronet addressed her.

“I will not take part in this scheme,” the lady blurted out, catching everyone’s attention.

A scheme..?

Lansius' throat felt dry. Meanwhile, the baronet merely laughed at the lady's words and turned to his guest with a faint smile. "My name is Stan, and this lovely lady here is my lovely sister," he said, emphasizing the last two words in a peculiar way. "And you're here because the seneschal ordered me to invite you on his behalf."

The seneschal?… Lord Bengrieve!?

The stakes were getting higher, and the situation was spiraling out of control. “Sir, my apologies, but I’m just a clerk turned squire. I’m hardly important,” Lansius tried to reason.

“It doesn’t matter. Let’s talk over dinner.” The baronet nodded at his steward, who signaled the servants to bring out the food.

But his sister refused to be ignored. “What does he have to do with this?” the lady demanded.

Lansius felt a sting of offense, his self-esteem knocked down a notch.

“Audrey, you said you hardly know him,” the baronet said, as if patronizing her.

The lady clicked her tongue in protest and approached the baronet’s table hurriedly.

Lansius froze as he tried to make sense of what was going on. It was then that he realized the reason for the lady’s black dress and veil.

She’s in mourning! Oh, no... did she lose someone in Sabina Rustica?

Cold sweat ran down Lansius’ back. He could already taste the rotting dungeon, the stench of piss and decay.

The two bickered in private, leaving Lansius standing nervously as if waiting for his judgment. They were still at it when the three servants arrived with silver platters.

The servants brought a variety of appetizing dishes. Lansius spotted roasted meat, aromatic stews, sweet and tasty puddings, and an assortment of freshly baked bread. One of them also poured him a generous amount of pale ale in a beautiful silver goblet.

With his fate uncertain, Lansius decided to eat and drink as much as he could before rotting away in the dungeon.

“My guest!” the baronet yelled suddenly, making Lansius’ heart skip a beat. “We have reached a consensus.”

“Y-yes, my good sir,” Lansius steeled his heart as the baronet in red and the lady in black watched his every move.

“On behalf of Lord Bengrieve, I’m going to give Lady Audrey to you,” the baronet guffawed at his own silly joke and jumped from his seat. He was just in time as the lady picked a handful of green grapes from the table and threw it at him.

“That’s not how it goes!” the lady complained as Sir Stan dodged the grapes. She snatched up a nearby cup of wine and hurled its contents at her brother, who was surprised but stayed put. He seemed to accept the splash, but before the wine could hit him, a gust of wind blew out of nowhere.

The baronet smirked in triumph as he saw the wine spray back onto the lady, drenching her as if she were a cat caught in a downpour.

Magic!

Lansius was uncertain of what to do or say, but he slowly scanned the room, taking in the scene around him. He had heard of mysterious individuals, known as mages, who wielded magical powers. If someone like Sir Stan could employ one, it meant that he held great influence despite his low rank.

The guards and the servants were struggling to suppress their chuckles, while the steward and squire appeared uninterested. However, Lansius could not spot any visible signs of the mage. He felt foolish; he had been expecting to see someone with a long beard, wielding a staff and wearing a pointy hat. In truth, he had no idea what a mage looked like.

“Fine,” the lady spat after her humiliation.

Sensing the tension in the air, the baronet attempted to defuse the situation. “Lady… let’s be civil,” he suggested. When it didn’t seem to have the desired effect, he added a gentle threat, “Or else I’ll have to confine you to your room… without alcohol.”

"Drop the pretense, we're not related!" she snapped back, before pointing her finger at Lansius. "Hand him over as my retinue, and we'll call it even."

Lansius squinted his eyes at this new development.

"Are you going to hurt him?" Sir Stan asked playfully.

The lady merely grunted in response.

Upon hearing this, the baronet clapped his hands twice and exclaimed, "Deal!" before quickly adding, "Now, let's eat."

Merriment erupted on his command. The troubadour took center stage, playing a lively tune. The baronet, as if famished, dipped a pretzel into the stew and devoured it. Ironically, despite his command, only the lady in black and Lansius were joining him at the table. The other in the room were merely in waiting.

Meanwhile, Lansius repeated the words that had been echoing in his mind.

Did I hear that right? Hand me over... is this some kind of feudal employment, but on what grounds?

Clearly, Sir Stan's earlier comment about giving the lady to Lansius was in jest. However, their final decision for him didn't seem like one. Nonetheless, Lansius' limited understanding of noble etiquette meant he couldn't be certain and needed to seek advice before reacting. Otherwise, he could offend them.

The lady in black, after having some assistance from a maid, approached Lansius. “Eat,” she commanded coldly.

“Yes, my lady,” Lansius answered despite the many unanswered questions in his mind.

“I’ll meet you after,” the lady announced, making it clear she wouldn't be partaking in the dinner. With those words, she pivoted and departed, her veil swishing behind her, radiating an air of determination.

 

***

 

Chapter 21

The Lady in Black

 

The feast hosted by the baronet of Toruna was delightful. Lansius would’ve never thought that the baronet was a natural party maker. Sir Stan even hand-fed morsels from his own plate to the troubadour, danced with them, and poured ale for his subordinates.

Lansius felt privileged to witness these supposedly private moments between a lord and his closest retinues.

The harvest season brought an abundance of grains and vegetables, sparing Lansius from the dreaded menu, such as roast hedgehog, brain jelly, or viper soup. He was always anxious about being expected to eat something or potentially offending someone.

Fortunately, Sir Stan had an uncanny, relaxed attitude toward the men beneath his station. He didn’t even try to make small talk, but motioned for Lansius to dig in and enjoy the merriment. This put Lansius at ease.

As with any other lowborn, Lansius wisely feared the noblemen, as offending them could result in flogging or a trip to the dungeon. Thus, seeing how a noble behaved so relaxed was a revelation.

Despite the ongoing confusion about the nature of the summons, and the issues with the lady in black, Lansius found his appetite. He was yet to learn about why he was here, but food was food. After living as a farmer for two years, he was too grateful for any opportunity to eat good food.

And he ate with a clear conscience. After all, food was in abundance around harvest, so this wasn’t a privilege of the rich. Lansius ate well and enjoyed the feast.

The meal was the best he ever had, with no salted meat in sight, meaning it was freshly cut. He could taste ginger, pepper, and possibly cloves, which were a rarity.

Surprisingly, Sir Stan mostly ate brown bread and vegetable stew with only a few slices of meat. For dessert, they had a sweet pudding made from milk, egg, and day-old bread, topped with cinnamon and honey.

The music ended with a round of applause from everyone, including Lansius. The troubadour bowed elegantly while Sir Stan walked away after his last cup of water. A cool breeze entered the chamber as if signaling the end of the feast.

Lansius felt this was his only chance. He dared to approach the baronet and asked, “My good Sir, I thank you for the hospitality, but I still don’t know what is to become of me?”

Sir Stan paused, unexpectedly reached for Lansius’ shoulder and patted him firmly. “For better or for worse, you have caught the eye of a powerful man. My advice to you… play to his tune.”

“But Sir, I am Sir Archie’s squire.” Lansius couldn’t reveal his master’s true identity.

“Oh, the Arvenian Lord,” Sir Stan mused, which shocked Lansius. However, he ultimately refused to give a counsel. “Well, that’s hardly my problem, but I’m sure someone will sort it out. Now, if you’ll excuse me.”

With a vigorous stride, the baronet left, leaving Lansius to wonder about his fate.

The old steward called out to Lansius, “Maester squire, I believe you have a place to visit.” He then motioned his hand toward a tall guard and said, “He will escort you there.”

 

***

 

Lansius was surprised by the interior of the manor. Instead of a gloomy castle, the corridor was fresh and lively, with bright lanterns on the sides or hung above the staircase. The white plastered walls reflected the light, creating a welcoming ambience even on the darkest of nights.

Led by the guard, Lansius arrived at the parlour, reserved for confidential discussions. Before knocking, the guard looked at Lansius, cautioning, "The lady has been injured in recent conflict. She's prone to emotional outbursts. If you require assistance, just knock on the door."

Lansius didn't get a chance to inquire; the guard had already knocked. A maid appeared, bearing a tray covered with a linen cloth, and without a word, she left the room.

"Come in and close the door," a voice beckoned from within.

Now, without anyone's interference, something about her voice stirred a vague sense of familiarity within him. Yet, Lansius couldn't quite place it, and there was little he could do but walk in as instructed. Upon observing a lady elegantly clad in a black gothic gown, he gently closed the door behind him, isolating himself with her and leaving the guard stationed outside.

Just as the door closed, she raised a finger to her lips and beckoned him closer with her other hand.

Something didn’t feel right, but Lansius cautiously followed her instructions. He had only taken a few steps when the woman suddenly lunged at him.

“What are you—” he started, attempting to raise his hand in surprise, but she tackled him harshly, knocking him off balance. He felt himself falling backward, and then suddenly, everything went dark.

...

 

Lansius groaned in pain, the sensation jolting his consciousness back to the present.

"Be quiet and stay still," a female voice commanded, a dagger resting in one hand.

Recalling her attack, Lansius instinctively turned guarded, almost rising to his feet.

"Lans, stay still," she repeated coldly, showing the dagger.

She didn't need to. The way she called his name, the voice, suddenly something clicked. He turned his gaze around, expecting Stefi, but found only a woman with a black veil.

"We don't have much time. My apology for attacking you, but-"

"Show me your face." Lansius couldn't help it anymore. He recognized the voice and dared to risk punishment.

The woman sighed. Without a word, she removed the black veil that covered her head, more akin to a wedding veil than a typical coif or headscarf.

If you spot this narrative on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

Lansius beheld a complexion of unnatural paleness, a result of makeup, contrasted by two piercing brown eyes that seemed fierce enough to make children weep in fright. Meeting her gaze, his eyes reflexively widened, his muscles tensed, and for a moment, he forgot to breathe. He could only stare at the face he had yearned to see for so long.

"It's me," she revealed sombrely. "But now, you shall address me as Audrey of Toruna."

"But-"

She raised a finger to her lips. "Answer me first, why are you here?" she asked in an interrogative tone.

Did she suspect me of betraying the Arvenians?

Still sitting on the floor, Lansius explained, "I was invited here."

"Invited..? Why?"

"I'm just as clueless, but I have the letter in my bag. That'll prove my words."

She slowly reached out to his bag, rummaged through its contents, and took out a letter. After reading it, she shook her head.

"Stefi, how did you end up here? I was-" He stopped. The mention of the name seemed to trigger something within her.

"Stop calling me that," she protested as if in agony.

Lansius approached her. "I apologize. Are you hurt?"

He noticed Audrey was gritting her teeth, a sign that something was terribly wrong. Then, it dawned on him.

The veil... did she use it to conceal a head injury? 

"Never mind me," she said, clutching Lansius' dagger firmly in her hand. "What happened with the rest of the Arvenians?"

Anticipating post-traumatic stress, Lansius took a deep breath to compose himself. Using a softer voice, he assured her, "You may not believe it, but Lord Arte is safe. He's in Midlandia."

"The young Lord escaped Riverstead?" she asked, her suspicion dissipating.

Lansius nodded and tried to sound cheerful to sell his story. "We rescued him from the slavers' den."

Audrey's face betrayed the turmoil inside her.

"It's me, you can trust me. Why do you look in pain? Tell me where it hurts," he asked, concerned.

She shook her head, gradually regaining her composure. Slowly, she sheathed the dagger and tucked it away.

"If you're comfortable, tell me all your worries; let me help shoulder them," he offered gently.

She looked at him, her lips forming a pout. "The Lansius I knew wasn't this bold," she remarked, her tone lighter.

"Things happened..." Lansius replied, memories of the events that led him here flooding his mind, including the events in the Amertume Forest. Emboldened by these thoughts, he took her hand and said, "Love, I have been there looking for you. I've searched everywhere."

His own words surprised him, and Lansius paused, lost in thought.

When..?

He hadn't even realized it before, but the pain he'd felt when he couldn't find her, the pain that drove him to drinking—now all of it suddenly made sense. He loved her. She was more than just a comrade to him.

Audrey stared at Lansius. Her gaze seemed more intense than before.

He looked away and felt Audrey move closer. She sat beside him, resting her head on his shoulder and muttering, "I'm glad you're safe."

"So I am," he agreed, holding back tears of joy.

I thought I lost you...

The heavy lump in his heart, the one not even alcohol could manage to erase, was beginning to feel lighter.

For a moment, they sat in silence.

"Why didn't you recognize me earlier at supper?" he asked.

"Your appearance surprised me, but it's better that way."

"Why?"

"Lans, we're not in Arvena anymore. It's better not to let them know that we know each other." She then added, "I don't know these guys. The last time I..." Her face was suddenly riddled with pain.

"You don't have to recall that memory." Lansius was worried about her memory from the last war.

"I can't recall much, it always gives me a headache. But I woke up here which I believe is far away from Riverstead. They treat me well. Even called me as if I'm adopted. But they never explain anything to me."

Lansius found it hard to believe but chose to reassure her gently, "You are you; nothing has changed."

She looked at him with softer eyes and confided, "You're probably here because a Midlandian nobleman wants to use you."

“Lord Stan wanted me?”

She shook her head. "He's just another pawn. The mastermind is Lord Bengrieve..."

The name made Lansius' heart skip a beat. "Why does he need me? For what?"

Audrey exhaled sharply. "How could I know that? I don't even know their plans for me.”

Lansius scratched his head. "Could it be related to Sabina Rustica?" he ventured, more to himself.

“Sabina what?” She furrowed her brow. “I’m not familiar with Midlandia. I hope that’s not a brothel.”

“No, no, well... sort of,” Lansius admitted awkwardly.

Her sidelong glance held an intensity that made Lansius falter.

“Is it just me, or has that look in your eye grown fiercer?” he asked.

“The veil does also help with that,” she hinted cryptically.

"So, you have no idea why this powerful man is interested in me? I doubt he's interested in a lowly clerk or squire like myself?"

Audrey pondered. "I'm not sure, but perhaps it has to do with your origin?"

Lansius furrowed his brows. "Origin?"

She glanced at his hair and Lansius instinctively realized she meant his black hair, the mark of a foreigner.

A foreigner, huh... Indeed, having a foreigner can be useful if they need a scapegoat, especially one with clear, undeniable proof.

Lansius let out a long sigh. His black hair continued to become a blessing and a curse in one. Despite his newfound worries, he felt a burden had been lifted from his chest. "At least I found you. That's what matters most."

She pouted and looked away, a response Lansius was all too familiar with.

“Why did you change your name?”

Audrey abruptly stood and retreated, masking her emotions as she moved to a seat across the room. In that moment, a realization dawned upon Lansius: Despite her present state, Audrey had likely been a captive, possibly even sold into slavery. He once read that in the Imperium, the stigma of slavery was so profound that freed individuals adopt new identities. The old name was seen as unlucky or even cursed.

He followed her, taking a seat opposite hers. He finally asked the question that had been plaguing at him. “What’s happened to you? That fine black gown, everyone referring to you as a lady, even the baronet calling you his sister... Did you marry someone?”

Audrey stared at him, disbelief etched across her face. "Why would anyone want a female squire with no lands or titles to her name?"

Lansius could only nod in understanding, choosing not to press further. He was well aware of her tendency to become stubborn under pressure.

Over time, she slowly began to open up. "At first, I thought they needed a female squire for some reason, but they haven't assigned me to protect anyone."

Lansius pondered this, trying to determine whether the Midlandian nobles were allies or potential threats.

"We're mere pawns in their grand game," Audrey murmured with a grim acceptance.

“Let them try,” he retorted, his face stoic and his voice determined. “One way or another, I’ll find a way out.”

Her gaze held a glimmer of admiration. "To be the master of your fate is a dangerous idea... Remember the wine that soaked me earlier?"

Lansius' eyes widened with sudden comprehension. "Magic?"

She nodded. “One of his retainers must be... Sir Stan is Lord Bengrieve’s most trusted henchman. Having a mage under him is not that far-fetched.”

The thrill from his close brush with magic still lingered, yet Lansius had something else on his mind. With the noise of the guard outside, he worried they might not get another chance. "What about us?" he dared to ask.

"Us...?" Audrey echoed, her tone was of surprise.

"I'm now Squire to Lord Arte. Am I not good enough?" He tried a line he had picked up from traveling minstrels.

She blinked, clearly taken aback. "Lans, do you realize what you're saying?"

Lansius could only offer a small smile. "My feelings are sincere."

Audrey shook her head. "Why would you want me?" she muttered, more to herself than to him. "I am just a sword maiden, Lans. And a broken one at that." She turned slightly, sweeping her hair aside to reveal a scar upon her head.

Lansius felt a surge of emotion; anger at whoever had harmed her and an overwhelming urge to care for her.

She continued, "Sometimes, even in daylight, I feel as though I'm walking through a nightmare. I even assaulted you. I fear... I'm not the same person you once knew..."

He took her hand and hold it tight to offer reassurance. "All the more reason for me to stand by you."

Audrey broke a smile. "The hurried hare falls prey to the waiting hound," she recited.

"...What does that mean?" Lansius questioned, puzzled by her sudden adage.

"It's what my master used to remind me," she began, her voice dipped in nostalgia, "Haste leads to unpreparedness and danger." She took a deep breath, meeting his gaze, "We need to focus on surviving now. Afterward, we can talk about us."

Understanding dawned on Lansius and he nodded, appreciating the pragmatism behind her words. "Promise?" he sought assurance, offering his hand.

Audrey took his hand, her grip firm and steadfast. "I'll renew my oath to you. No matter the circumstances, I'll protect you."

Outside, the gentle whisper of the wind caressed the night, offering a deceptive tranquility in this idyllic, rustic corner of the world.

 

***

Chapter 21-2

A Lady Named Audrey

 

A gentle breeze swept through the mansion’s private yard adjacent to the garden. The sun was still cool, and the cold breeze was abundant—a perfect time for training.

Inhaling deeply, Lansius filled his lungs with the earthy scent of the changing seasons. He drew his blunt training blade and lunged at the lady dressed in a black gambeson. She parried his thrust, but it lacked finesse, leaving her open for a follow-up attack.

However, she had already anticipated Lansius’ next move. Taking a step forward, she sidestepped his thrust, guiding his blade aside with her protected underarm. With a swift motion, she tapped the pommel of her sword against the left side of Lansius’ head.

“You’re dead,” Audrey said, her tone full of disappointment.

“It’s still too early,” Lansius said, offering an excuse.

Audrey sighed. “You went into battle with just this?”

“I used a spear,” he countered.

“That’s no excuse. Again!”

Lansius retreated a step and raised his sword. He knew Audrey’s teaching style was brutal.

As he had feared, Audrey lunged forward with a thrust. Lansius moved his sword to parry, but as their swords connected, the lack of force behind her blade signaled that it was a feint.

Oh, crap!

He instinctively raised his left arm to shield his head and took a step back. His guess was correct: his wrist took the brunt of a blow from her left fist.

“Ha! Guessed it right!” he proclaimed, only to feel something poke his gambeson-protected stomach.

“You blocked a fist but missed the sword. Lans, you’re getting worse. You’re unfit to be a squire!” Audrey chastised.

The words were a blow to his ego. He offered a faint smile but gripped his training sword’s hilt more tightly.

“That’s more like it. I see anger in your eyes. You said you wanted to protect me? Back up your words with steel,” Audrey challenged.

Lansius grinned and sidestepped to the right. Audrey adjusted her position accordingly. They moved almost as if they were dancing in a circle.

There!

Lansius noticed exactly where the sunlight was hitting the stone floor most intensely, and he lured Audrey into that spot. The moment she blinked against the sun’s glare, Lansius quickly stepped forward.

Audrey heard his rapid footsteps and took several steps back. Once her eyes adjusted, she saw that Lansius had closed the distance and launched a horizontal cut, which she blocked.

A metallic clang filled the air as their swords met. A faint smile graced her lips. “That’s more like it.”

Suddenly, she turned the clash into a grapple, both of them half-swording as they tried to overpower each other. Lansius sensed that Audrey was not putting her full strength into it. “Are you injured?” he asked.

“I’ve been injured for weeks, maybe months. And they won’t let me train.”

“So this is your first training in months?”

She flashed a grin. “Yep, and I intend to enjoy it to the fullest.”

Lansius swallowed nervously. In a deft move, Audrey shifted her weight backward, disrupting his footing and balance. As he struggled to regain his poise, her piercing gaze forced him to momentarily close his eyes.

SMACK!

Audrey laughed, withdrew her sword, and ran. She had just slapped Lansius.

Lansius froze, feeling a stinging sensation on his right cheek. “Why did you do that?” he shouted.

Audrey, however, was laughing as if she were thoroughly enjoying herself. “I couldn’t help it. You were too close and too unguarded!”

“Come here,” he retorted, chasing her into the wooded area outside the garden where servants usually collected firewood.

 

***

 

Toruna Mansion

Two figures observed the events in the garden through a window inside the manor.

“Stan, are you sure it’s okay to let them roam free?” asked a female servant with long brown hair. Her tone lacked the usual deference.

“It may sound crazy, but I trust that man. He seems level-headed and reasonable,” replied the baronet, still clad in his flamboyant red silk robe.

“I hope so. I’ve put in a lot of effort to heal that woman. It would be a waste if she escaped.”

Sir Stan chuckled. “You’ll be compensated either way.”

“Certainly,” she said without doubt. “I’m just curious about why Lord Bengrieve wanted to save her.”

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. Please report it.

“It’s best not to question our Master’s motives,” Sir Stan said, smiling.

The servant nodded quickly. “Right. I trust that you have guardsmen on standby?”

“Of course, they’re keeping watch and have horses ready,” Sir Stan reassured her.

Moments passed before she ventured, “Stan.”

“Yes?”

“Can I stop doing this? I’m tired. I wish to return to my own life and live carefree.”

The man chuckled, completely disregarding her pout. “Hannei, you’re too valuable to our master. Just be grateful he stopped pressuring us to marry.”

“Eugh,” she groaned and shuddered. “You should abandon your life of debauchery and marry someone more suitable. Just stay away from me.”

Stan grinned, flexing his toned arms and abs, which were fully visible as he wore his robe loosely. This annoyed the servant, who muttered something under her breath. Suddenly, a cold breeze blew toward the baronet.

“Alright, alright, cut it out. You’re making me want to pee!” Stan barked, comically shielding his crotch with his hands.

The servant sighed at her friend’s antics, waved her hand dismissively, and left.

⠀

***

⠀

Lansius chased Audrey into the wooded area and found her out of breath. The long confinement had ruined her stamina. Still, she turned around with her sword drawn. However, Lansius dropped his blade and approached with open arms.

With a ragged breath, she looked at him and questioned his gesture. “What are you doing? We’re still training!”

“Hugs?” Lansius quipped.

“We don’t have that kind of relationship,” she retorted, her cheeks reddening slightly.

Lansius chuckled and dropped down onto the dew-wet grass, leaning against a tree. He unbuttoned the top part of his gambeson to cool off. “Ah, it feels nice to sit down like this.”

Audrey rolled her eyes but followed suit, sitting down in front of him. They sat in silence, catching their breath and listening to the rustling leaves and the gentle breeze. The ground was still cool from last night, while the sun was still far in the east.

Lansius noticed that Audrey’s mood had vastly improved since yesterday; the suspicion and coldness were gone.

“Lans, I apologize for the slap,” Audrey began, interrupting the silence.

Lansius glanced at her. “Hey, it’s training. I bet you were aiming for another punch.”

Audrey pouted and crawled toward him. “You can slap me back if you want,” she offered.

She then closed her eyes, looking nervous as if waiting to be slapped, and it sent Lansius into a stifled laugh.

Hearing Lansius’ reaction, she opened her eyes and furrowed her brows.

“Not fair,” he complained. “How could I hurt someone I like?”

The atmosphere grew awkward as both averted their gaze. Audrey had spent the night reflecting on Lansius’ affectionate words, but her oath to her master prevented any thoughts of marriage.

She exhaled deeply. “I also apologize for yesterday.”

Lansius caught her gaze and saw guilt written all over her face. “You were just confused by my sudden appearance. I get it. Apology accepted.”

Audrey sighed a breath of relief.

“Considering how things went yesterday, I’m surprised Sir Stan allowed us to spar so readily,” Lansius mused.

Audrey glanced around, ensuring no one was within earshot. “I’m not sure why, but I’m grateful for the opportunity to train. My arms feel sluggish.”

Lansius nodded. “How’s your injury?

Her hand reached the top of her head and rubbed it. “Sometimes it feels itchy, but the headaches are just painful.”

“Isn’t there any medication?” Lansius asked.

“Sir Stan offered me some, but it dulls my senses. I’d rather not.”

The chirping of birds interrupted their conversation. “A love song,” commented Lansius.

“I didn’t know you speak bird,” Audrey quipped.

“Oh, I know many things,” Lansius shot back, making her laugh.

“We should get back to training before anyone becomes suspicious,” Audrey suggested as she stood up.

“Wait, tell me more about your name change first,” Lansius urged.

Audrey stiffened. “I told you about it already. What more do you need to know?”

Lansius also stood and said, “Easy, you only have to tell me if you want to. I’m not forcing you to do anything.”

She nodded once, so Lansius continued, “You explained briefly, but I’m a foreigner. I don’t fully understand.”

Audrey looked away and said, “Don’t call me by my old name. Anyone who falls into slavery is considered dead, and their name becomes cursed. So, anyone who survives picks another name.”

Lansius sighed. He had liked that name and felt sentimental about it.

Audrey’s reaction was also a contrast to that of the slaves he had liberated in Sabina Rustica.

I guess there’s a different culture even inside the Imperium.

“You would do well to like my new name. None other than Lord Bengrieve gave it to me.”

He did what?” Lansius was stunned.

Audrey shrugged. “I was told that’s the case. And then I was adopted into this baronet family. Can you believe it?”

Lansius shook his head. “Unbelievable,” he muttered.

Audrey shook her head and said, “They won’t give me a straight answer, so I’ll have to rely on you for that.”

Lansius picked up the training sword and swung it twice to shake off the dew. “What do they want from Arvenians like us?”

“Lans, we’re not even Arvenians. I’m born in Centuria, and you’re not even from the continent.”

 

***

 

The fall season arrived in Midlandia, ushering in a bountiful harvest. While the inhabitants reaped the fruits of their labor, other regions of the Imperium found themselves in the throes of a threatening famine.

The grave situation worsened with the intractable nomadic incursion in the west, escalating beastmen attacks in the south, and the northern provinces breaking away from the Imperium.

The Elven Calendar year of 4423 was shaping up to be the most challenging year the Imperium had faced since its inception. As for Lansius and Audrey, despite the joy of their reunion, they found themselves in a precarious situation.

“Lord Bengrieve wanted me because I’m a foreigner?” Lansius asked, having just been briefed.

“That much I can tell you,” Sir Stan replied. “But officially, it’s me who wanted you. Best not to mention our Master’s name outside this study.”

Lansius pondered a little, while Sir Stan sat comfortably in his padded chair with a smug look on his face. The two of them were alone in the luxurious chamber. They even had fresh flowers giving the place a floral scent.

“But why does my background matter so much?”

“This is only between you and me,” warned Sir Stan. “We’re going on a campaign.”

Lansius was intrigued. “To Arvena?”

“No, to the south.”

“South?” Lansius was surprised.

“We need to secure our rear before heading north.”

Lansius nodded. He didn’t know much about the political situation in the region.

“I’ll have someone brief you about the south, but in the meantime, you need to study and train.”

“Will I be involved in battles?”

The owner of this manor chuckled. “Lansius, you’re a squire under me. Act like one.”

Lansius straightened his back. “Yes, Sir.”

“Good. Since your Lord has temporarily transferred you to my House, I’ll start paying you. There will be a bonus for confidentiality.”

Lansius wasn’t surprised. Lord Arte really needed to curry favor with Midlandia, and lending him out wasn’t a big deal. Recalling Audrey, he decided to risk a question. “What about Lady Audrey? Why was she adopted?”

Sir Stan grinned. “For that, you’ll have to ask Master Bengrieve. I’m sure he’ll summon you next season or so. But... it’s better not to inquire about Lady Audrey.”

Lansius furrowed his brows.

“You can ask, but he’ll likely give you a false answer. So, a piece of advice, squire: learn to live with mysteries.”

Lansius nodded hesitantly.

...

Just as Sir Stan had told him, Lansius and Audrey spent the ensuing months training, preparing for their roles as pawns in Midlandia’s grand scheme.

Outside of Toruna and Midlandia, the world was changing rapidly. Throughout fall and winter, Lord Arte gathered support from the Midlandian nobility, solidifying his status as a shrewd politician. He talked and finagled his way into becoming a favorite at court.

When winds from the eastern sea blew inland, news arrived: Calub had successfully recruited a small band of followers at Sir Stan’s behest. Upon their arrival in Toruna, Calub, and his recruits caused quite a stir. The alchemist’s influence was strong enough to persuade Sir Stan to grant Lansius permission to meet with the mage.

 

***

 

Chapter 21-3

The Mage

 

A spring thunderstorm was howling outside. Inside Sir Stan’s manor, the servants began to light the chandelier. The thunderous booms could be felt despite the manor’s sturdy stone construction.

Lansius cleared his throat. He wasn’t in good shape. His face and body were bruised, and both of his palms were bandaged from training. His buttocks remained sore after continuous horse riding, even during winter.

I should’ve carried a flask or something.

He wasn’t thirsty, but his throat felt bad. He wanted to get something warm, but he couldn’t possibly pass up the opportunity to meet the mage.

Sir Stan had just granted his permission after receiving Calub’s recommendation, and Lansius feared the baronet might reconsider his decision. So, he patiently waited just outside the chamber, waiting for a summon.

His thoughts returned to the Alchemist. Calub turned out to be more influential than he initially thought. The way the two conversed made it clear that Calub was well-acquainted with Sir Stan and was even trusted enough to vouch for Lansius regarding the mage.

The man was either humble or simply concealing his status as an agent of a powerful noble.

At first, Lansius felt deceived, but he soon understood that secrecy was paramount in their circle. In exchange for such treatment, he gained access to a wealth of knowledge. The old Imperium history book he had read in Riverstead paled in comparison to the volumes the manor possessed.

In one manuscript, Lansius discovered detailed lore about the Ancients, the first beings to roam this planet. They were nearly immortal and, through their guidance, nascent species such as the Elves and Dwarves reached their peak during the Ancient Era.

Currently, during his time off from training, Lansius engrossed himself in reading about early humans. These beings, the Grand Progenitors, were said to have lived even longer than the elves and were depicted much like the demigods from Greek mythology, complete with heroic deeds and epic tales.

While Lansius had heard about this before he read the books and manuscripts in Toruna, the grand figure was shrouded in great mystery. Everybody talked about the Ageless One as if he were a constant, much like the sun or the sky.

Only recently did Lansius understand there was more to the stories than just an immortal being. The Emperor turned out to be one of the early humans, a Great Progenitor.

The creaking of the heavy oaken door alerted Lansius. Audrey decked in her usual gothic attire, stepped out from the chamber. Compared to last autumn, she had recovered some of her muscles.

“How was it?” asked Lansius as Audrey closed the door behind her.

“Ah, nothing. She — the mage is just curious about my eyes.”

“She? The mage is a woman?”

Audrey let out a sigh. “Turns out to be.” She had been suspicious about several guards and the squire, but never a maid.

“What about your eyes?” asked Lansius.

“She said she wanted to invite a colleague of hers, a Hunter Guildsman, to give a check.”

Lansius nodded nervously. He knew something was abnormal about those eyes, but he never thought it was something serious. “Is it magical or something?”

Audrey couldn’t hide a faint smile. “I wish that's the case... Now go on, the mage wants to meet you.”

Drawing a deep breath, Lansius was about to enter when Audrey whispered, “She seems trustworthy.”

He paused in front of the door, their eyes met, and he whispered back, “How can you tell?”

“I trust my instinct.”

Nodding, Lansius cautiously opened the door.

“Come in,” came a female voice from inside.

Lansius entered and saw the mage in person. She wasn’t much older than Audrey, wearing servant attire, but was relaxing on a comfortable-looking couch like a pampered lady.

“Please sit,” she pointed at one chair in the corner where the desk was.

“Now that both of you know about me, I don’t need to be in disguise anymore,” she mused, as Lansius approached the chair.

The mage undid her off-white headscarf and pulled out her brown hair, which turned out to be a wig, revealing long, blonde hair beneath it.

The sight of her hair shocked Lansius. “Please excuse my curiosity, are you, my Lady, a noble-born?”

“Even a dull blonde catches the eyes. eh?” she scoffed. “Hardly, but I get that a lot.” She scratched her head with little regard for Lansius. The casualness of her demeanor emphasized their status disparity. “So, you asked to meet me. Why?”

Lansius had thought about this so many times that his heart almost burst. “I want to learn about magic.”

“Learn about magic? Well, I suppose I could find you a book.”

How easily she agreed didn’t bode well for Lansius. “No, I read a book about the history of magic. That’s not the one I seek for.”

She paused to glance at Lansius momentarily. “Good, I hate books. The Imperium's alphabet is driving me nuts.”

The author's narrative has been misappropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

She can’t read the common tongue?

Lansius tried again. “I want to learn magic. Can you teach me?”

“Oh, it’s the same as that girl before you,” she said flatly, with a hint of boredom.

"Eh?" He couldn't believe what he just heard. "Audrey wanted to learn magic too?”

The mage found the reaction to be funny and chuckled. “She didn’t tell you? How quaint. I thought you two are a couple.”

Lansius was rather taken aback. “Well, we still have our secrets.”

The mage smiled judgmentally.

“Um, so can you teach me magic?”

She picked a comb from her pocket and began to comb her hair. "I can’t teach. Magic is a talent anyway. Some have it, most don’t.”

Lansius pushed on. “At least you should test me.”

“Test...? Oh that test, so you did your homework. Well, I suppose I could.”

“Great, then what should I do?” asked Lansius excitedly. Despite knowing about the test from the history of magic, the book didn't say anything about the procedure.

“Cast a fireball or something,” she mused, almost laughing.

“How?” Lansius asked, brimming with anticipation for instruction.

The mage was stunned. Even the dumbest men in Midlandia knew that conjuring a fireball or any element was impossible. “Aren’t you supposed to be smart? Even Calub vouched for you.”

“Err... why does a fireball have to do with me being smart?” defended Lansius.

“Because it’s impossible!” she responded, a hint of tiredness in her voice.

“Oh, uh, right...” Lansius felt dumb.

The mage exhaled deeply in her seat, muttering, “C’est pour ça que je déteste les gens.“

The words sent a tingle through Lansius’ ears, stunning him. They sounded like a foreign language he had once studied, likely in school. He nervously asked, “Parlez-vous... français?“

The mage jumped from her seat. Her eyes went wide as she hid herself behind the chair as if fearful of Lansius.

“No way,” Lansius commented with his mouth agape. His suspicion was confirmed.

“What are you?” she challenged, wielding an ivory comb as her weapon.

Lansius rose and answered, “I-I’m from Earth.”

“The fuck, why did you say it like that? You’re an alien or something. Where are you from?” she snapped.

“I can’t remember. I lost most of my memory,” Lansius tried to explain.

Unconvinced, the mage’s eyes darted to Lansius’ hair. She had always thought of Lansius as just a foreigner, but now her curiosity was piqued. “Are you Asian?”

“I don’t know, but I guess so.” He shrugged, uncomfortable under her intense gaze.

She squinted at him, clearly evaluating his appearance. “But you don’t look Asian.”

Lansius replied weakly, “Really, I don’t remember anything. I could be from anywhere.”

As the mage gathered her thoughts, the earlier tension slightly dissipated.

Breaking the silence, Lansius asked, “So, how?”

She lifted a hand. “Quiet, I’ll do the asking.”

“At least tell me your name,” Lansius asked meekly.

She hesitated for a moment. “People call me Hannei.”

“That doesn’t sound French.”

“Fuck you!” the mage retorted passionately and with expertise.

“Ok, calm down,” Lansius tried to de-escalate.

Great, she got an even shorter fuse than Audrey!

“Prove to me that you’re... from Earth,” the mage responded.

Lansius chuckled. “Like how? As if I could pull a smartphone from my pants.”

“Smart phone...? That sounds dumb. Are you fooling me?”

She doesn’t know about smartphones...?

Lansius’ eyes widened as he processed the implications. “No way. You got into this world before the year 2000?”

Hannei gasped, her hand flying to her mouth in shock. “You reached the millennium?”

Lansius nodded. “A good two decades,” he revealed, watching her carefully for her reaction.

Hannei shook her head in disbelief. “No way! But I've only been here for ten years.”

Lansius frowned, his mind racing as he tried to make sense of their differing timelines. “That doesn’t make any sense... unless time here moves slower than on Earth?”

She paused, looking visibly perturbed. “Ugh...” she grumbled, the theory not sitting well with her. But after a moment, her curiosity seemed to take over. “Tell me about Earth before the millennium then, prove to me that you’re from there.”

Lansius sat back in his chair, grateful for the change in subject. He was too happy to have met another Earth-born that he momentarily forgot about magic. “Well, what do you want to know?”

Hannei looked at him intently before asking, “Tell me about Olympia?”

He tried hard but almost found nothing. “The mountain in Greece...?”

“What? No, it’s a ship. Try to remember, it’s a big, big action movie,” she clarified.

“I don’t remember...” Lansius paused and then something hit him. He slowly asked, “Do you mean Olympia, the sister ship of Titanic?”

“Titanic, what’s that?” replied Hannei with furrowed brows.

Lansius was shocked. “Tell me who won World War 2?”

“World War? Do you mean the Great War? Are you joking with me?” She shot her strongest gaze at Lansius.

Lansius didn’t even blink. Compared to Audrey’s eyes, any eyes looked cute. “The Great War is the 1st World War,” he began. “There’s another one, the Allies against the Axis: Nazi Germany, fascist Italy, and Japan, you don’t know any of that?”

Hannei shook her head and asked, “Why are you using that word? It’s Deutsches Kaiserreich.”

Lansius gulped. “You mean, in your year 2000, Germany, is still ruled by a Kaiser?”

“Is it not the case in your world?” replied Hannei nervously, and both drew the same conclusion. Somehow, they were coming from a different Earth.

A parallel world? Just unbelievable...

Lansius slumped in his seat as he tried to gather his thoughts. Meanwhile, Hannei returned to her seat, looking devastated. However, she found some solace and commented, “Well, at least, we’re still from Earth.”

Lansius nodded. They should have more in common with each other than with the rest of the Midlandians or Arvenians. “Do you watch TV?” he asked.

“Yeah, and also cinemas,” replied Hannei.

“Shampoo?” asked Lansius.

“Oh, how I wish I had them.”

The atmosphere was growing friendlier. Thus, Lansius dared to ask, “So, can you tell me how you learned magic?”

She bit her lip. “No, I can’t. As much as I want to, I just can’t.”

Not giving up so easily, Lansius tried again, “Can’t you test me or something?”

“The test is only to check the potential. Even if you have it, magic isn’t something any mage can teach.”

“Well, no harm in checking--“

“I just told you... I’d rather not,” Hannei raised her voice.

Lansius tried his best to persuade her. “Please, I’ve come to this place without anything, not even my memory. At least can you check it?”

Hannei let out a long sigh. Without saying a word, she rose from her couch and walked toward Lansius. “Just stay still,” she instructed, placing her palm over Lansius’ forearm.

She then recited, “Gloire au Père, au Fils et au Saint-Esprit. Comme il était au commencement, maintenant et toujours, pour les siècles des siècles.”

Lansius didn’t recognize the prayer; his French was not that good.

Being close to her, he began to realize that Hannei’s eyes weren’t entirely brown, but a bit golden. The prayer stopped, but all Lansius felt was the warmth of her palm. “So?”

Hannei pulled her hand away, took a step back, and simply shook her head.

Lansius chuckled and used his hands to cover his face. “Oh, I thought I had it, you know. Being summoned to this world and all,” he rambled, embarrassed.

“Don’t sweat it. Magic is rare unless you’re an elf,” Hannei consoled him. "Although your mana is exceptionally low...."

"Is that bad?"

“Not sure, it could be some treatable injury, but I’d rather not give you false hope.”

Lansius exhaled deeply and nodded. “A question then. Why do you recite something in French?”

“It’s just something to attune me to my source.”

“Source?” Lansius blurted out.

Hannei drew a deep breath. “Enough. I gave you what you wanted. Now leave.”

“Wait, we still have a lot to talk about.”

“You’re too noisy for your own good,” she retorted, returning to her couch. “While I’m not a member of the Mage Guild, the craft is still a secret. I’ve told you things I shouldn’t have. So zip your lips.”

Then, with more urgency, she added, “If you want to live longer, keep the Earth thing between us. Don’t tell anyone about our origin, not Sir Stan, not Lord Bengrieve, not even your lover.”

 

***

 

Chapter 22

Banner of the Unknown

 

Spring of the year 4424 arrived in earnest, and finally, Lansius received the summons he had been waiting for. After a three-day trip on horseback, Lansius and his escorts found themselves in a beautiful castle, grander than anything he had ever seen before. The towers were imposingly tall, the archway grand, and the gates majestic – however, since it was late, he was ushered in speedily and had little time to marvel.

The next day, Lansius was bathed, given a fresh set of clothes, and served a small meal as he waited. He waited for hours until suddenly, guards and servants came. They escorted Lansius through a dizzying array of corridors, stairs, and hidden pathways until a maid opened a great lacquered door that led to a luxurious study chamber.

The maid gestured for silence, while another servant gently shoved Lansius in. The door closed, and Lansius found himself face-to-face with the renowned Lord Bengrieve, seneschal of Midlandia.

Judging from the lavish chamber, there was little doubt of the identity of the man now sitting calmly in his comfortable looking padded chair, reading scrolls on his elegant, small circular table, completely unbothered by Lansius' entry.

The most powerful man in Midlandia...

The chamber was occupied by only him and Lansius. Remembering the maid's gesture, Lansius could only wait anxiously for his host to address him.

He knew his status too well to even try to cough or draw attention. To Lord Bengrieve, he was just a nuisance.

Releasing tension from his weary legs, Lansius took in the tasteful design of the room. Absent were grandiose furniture or gaudy art pieces; instead, a single painting complemented the clean, lily-white plastered wall, and sleek marble floors added to the room’s elegance.

A large glass vase filled with freshly cut flowers lent a pleasant floral scent to the airy chamber, and the most striking feature was the natural light streaming in from the adjacent open garden, connected by a series of large folding windows. However, a towering metallic statue, the size of a giant bear and painted in a deep, glossy blue, stood as an oddity, clashing with the otherwise serene surroundings.

Is this supposed to be artwork?

The silence was punctuated only by the occasional chirping of birds outside, and despite the fully opened window to the garden, there was no chilling spring wind coming in.

He couldn’t shake off the feeling that the temperature was being controlled by a mage. He had only recently met one who turned out to be an extraordinary character. But, it was revolting to think that the high-nobles employed these rare, powerful individuals like glorified bodyguards and even portable air conditioners.

To use them like this when they’re needed the most in the fight at the border. Isn’t this decadence?

Lansius wanted to ask Lord Bengrieve many things, such as why he saved Stefi, why he wanted him, and whether he would release them. Unfortunately, he was merely a henchman and it was not his place to ask.

The fact that Lord Bengrieve didn’t bother to dress up and remained in his black silken robe conveyed the gulf of status between them. Although this realization made Lansius uncomfortable, he knew better than to let his pride get in the way of his duties.

The sight of the recently blooming flower garden gave him some much-needed respite. The garden was highly decorated, complete with its own fish pond, working fountain, and even a mini waterfall.

Pipes and pumps, or is it magic?

“Lansius, why are you here?” the host finally spoke after throwing down his last scroll to the table.

It was not a casual greeting, and Lansius quickly replied, "I'm here to serve you, My Lord."

Lord Bengrieve gazed out into his garden, his eyes seeming lost in thought as the sweet chirping of birds filled the air. After a moment of silence, “Lansius, what is thy desire?”

“My Lord, I wish to fulfill your order,” Lansius replied despite the growing tension.

The host turned his head and gazed directly into Lansius. “Lansius,” he repeated slowly, as if savoring the name. “What is thy desire?”

As if hypnotized by the sharp eyes, Lansius suddenly remembered a rumor that Bengrieve did not forget anything that was spoken to him. A powerful man with a perfect memory. “To save myself and the people closest to me,” he nervously admitted.

“A selfless guardian,” the host remarked disinterestedly. “To whom have you directed this protection?”

“To lady Audrey, the girl you saved, and for my family in Bellandia.”

The Lord’s expression was unreadable, and he turned his gaze to the garden once again. After a moment of thoughtful silence, “Prove your worth and I’ll arrange for my men to escort your family out of Arvena before the war begins.”

This tale has been pilfered from Royal Road. If found on Amazon, kindly file a report.

Did I hear that correctly?

“Yes, My Lord.” Lansius trembled as he bowed his head deeply. Never in his wildest dreams did he expect something like this to happen.

In just a few words, Lord Bengrieve had gained Lansius’ allegiance.

⠀

***

 

Lansius returned to Toruna and saw the military buildup around the area. He knew enough to realize that war was imminent. After his meeting with Lord Bengrieve, Sir Stan and Calub entrusted Lansius with more information.

One piece of news was Felicity’s betrothal. Calub broke the news and stated that Felis had gotten her wish to become a noble. Lansius was utterly surprised, but eventually gladdened. In Felis he hoped to find a reliable ally, so he wrote a letter to congratulate her.

Another revelation was the campaign to the south. Instead of marching directly north to Arvena, Lord Bengrieve had unexpectedly launched a campaign against a small barony in Lowlandia.

Sir Stan explained that the plan was to secure Midlandia’s exposed flank before committing to a major push against Lord Gottfried in Arvena. While the southern campaign against a small barony looked like an uneven battle, Midlandia couldn’t afford a prolonged siege or to waste men and supplies. They needed a quick and decisive victory.

The problem was the presence of a powerful Viscount in Lowlandia. Although the province was fragmented, the Viscount had backed most of the baronies in the area to maintain his regime’s status quo. These small baronies acted as a buffer, separating his region from Midlandia.

For this campaign, Sir Stan would be accompanied by Lansius, Audrey, and Calub. However, they would separate from the main army. Midlandia needed someone to lead a diversion, and that person turned out to be Lansius, along with Toruna's ragtag band of misfits.

He was selected primarily for his status as a foreigner, which provided a convenient scapegoat should he be captured. His vulnerable circumstances also made him an easy target for manipulation.

Initially unsure, Lansius accepted the mission after Calub convinced him. Despite having only a season to train and equip his troops in Toruna, he chose to embrace the risk. Under the guise of a raiding mission, Lansius' small band of poorly trained troops embarked on what seemed, in all respects, to be a suicide mission.

 

***

 

Lowlandia, summer 4424.

A full year since the fall of Arvena, and nine months since Lansius first set foot in Toruna. The relentless passage of time mirrored the unceasing winds that swept across the Great Plains of Lowlandia.

The Lowlandia province, far to the south of Midlandia remained desolate despite the approaching harvest season. There was no abundance of golden crops and ripe fruits in the orchards. Instead, only endless fields of yellowing steppe grasslands stretched as far as the eye could see, with little signs of life.

Lowlandia was sparsely populated and economically poor, with limited farmland scattered across its vast landscape. The Great Plains, vast but lifeless, separated the province’s two viscounties and eight baronies into eastern and western parts.

The western part bordered with two other provinces via a treacherous mountain range that effectively served as a natural boundary. On the other hand, the eastern part shared a border with Midlandia, along with one of the two Human Eastern Kingdoms.

Despite being a part of the Imperium, Lowlandia was closer to a lawless province. The local lords had quarreled and warred against each other for centuries, with the High Court paying minimal attention and unwilling to get involved as long as tribute was paid.

From time immemorial, the Imperium had seen the region as unimportant. The province was largely infertile, and its only other feature was the border with the deadly Great Marshland to the south. However, for the local lords, the place was ancestral, and they would eagerly defend it with their blood.

󠀠

***

󠀠

Viscount Side

Lord Robert, the Lion of Lowlandia, once again took to the field. A ragtag troop flying an unknown banner had raided his land. Despite his advanced age, his eyesight hadn't failed him. He calmly surveyed the opponent's formation arrayed across the open plains.

“Our right wing and left wing are ready, My Lord,” Michael reported as he gently reined in his horse to a stop. The excitement in the youngster’s voice was evident as it was his first battle as the Marshal.

The Viscount didn’t share his enthusiasm and remained silent. No bite, Robert observed. He had moved both of his wings as bait, but the opponent’s formation remained unchanged.

Robert’s passiveness unintentionally caused unease among his men.

“My Lord?” the Marshall asked again after a while.

“I heard you the first time, Michael,” Robert said to the Marshal who was also his future son-in-law.

“Our men are eager to fight. Would you give us the order?” Michael feared the opponent might try to flee.

Robert weighed his decision. Unlike Michael, who was in his prime, Robert was full of wrinkles and grayed hair. However, he had what the younger man lacked: experience. Michael was like a set of armor that had never seen battle, pristine and without a scratch. Robert, on the other hand, had fought in over twenty battles.

“Michael, retreating doesn’t necessarily mean an army is weak,” Robert warned.

“But that’s all they’ve done since invading our lands, My Lord,” Michael replied.

Robert’s warning fell on deaf ears, but he acknowledged that Michael wasn’t completely wrong. Ever since Robert had assembled his troops and given chase, the invaders hadn’t attempted to fight. Instead, they simply ran from every engagement. This behavior puzzled Robert and made him timid, while Michael saw it as weakness and grew bolder.

“What do the scout reports say?” Robert asked.

“My Lord,” Michael said proudly at his preparation, “I’ve sent riders in three directions. They reported no sightings, only empty plains.”

Robert took a deep breath. It was against his guts, but he felt that his men needed the confidence of a war leader, not a superstitious old man. “Very well, since the enemy isn’t taking our bait, Marshal, you may lead the center column. Keep the two cavalries to guard your flanks. And I’ll hold the reserve with a hundred cavalry.”

The trumpets and bugles rang out, signaling the march. Banners unfurled at the front of the formation, fluttering in the wind. The captains rallied their troops, and thousands of soldiers advanced in polished armor and helmets that glistened under the sunlight.

Robert watched as the column marched past him, his highly decorated armor and fierce-looking warhorse adding to his lordly presence and inspiring his men. Yet, the armor was just for show. In reality, he was too frail to fight.

Before the sun rose higher, the center column had successfully rejoined with its two wings, which had earlier tried unsuccessfully to provoke the opponent.

In total, there were approximately one-thousand men, bolstered by two-hundred cavalry, thrown against an opponent with no more than-four hundred.

Despite the three-to-one advantage, Robert felt uneasy. He wondered why the enemy had chosen to fight that day. After pondering for a while, he concluded that something unexpected must have happened, forcing the opponent to engage. "I suppose I overestimated our enemy," he mused.

"You're being cautious, My Lord," a senior knight beside him responded.

"Let's follow our center." Robert spurred his horse, and his entourage of knights, squires, and servants followed closely behind.

 

***

󠀠

 

Chapter 23

The Die is Cast

 

The Banner of the Unknown.

“They’re coming!” Audrey pulled the reins of her mount and came to a stop.

Before her stood Lansius, the leader of their ragtag army. Though many dismissed him as a no-name exiled noble from a distant kingdom, Audrey trusted him enough to join his seemingly suicidal offensive.

“Listen up! Everyone waits until we’re within crossbow range, then we pull back to the trenches,” Lansius gave the order.

His command did little to ease the fear in his men, but Lansius paid no heed. He looked at Audrey and spoke, “Lead the cavalry and make the breakthrough as planned.”

Audrey stared at him with a cold, piercing gaze that could easily frighten children and adults alike.

“I’ll be fine. Go, move as planned,” Lansius answered, almost cheerfully. He knew Audrey well enough to understand the meaning behind her stare.

“Good luck then,” she replied.

“You too. Let’s get some drinks after this is over,” he said, despite the overwhelming odds.

Audrey went to her cavalrymen and rallied them. Soon, fifty riders moved out against the opponent’s right-wing.

At least she’s with the cavalry…

Lansius thought while suppressing a sigh of relief. He knew that if the worst happened, Audrey would have a good chance of escaping. Two seasons had passed since their fateful reunion at Toruna Manor, yet here they were, facing yet another armed conflict. Lansius felt a sense of despair in their new lives as henchmen.

Lord Arte, who was busy gathering followers and currying support from Midlandia's nobility, had given his approval for Lord Bengrieve to employ Lansius. Now, Lansius had to assume a fake identity as an exiled knight from the Mercantile Kingdom. If he were caught, he would surely lose his head.

While Lansius was lamenting about his situation, fear continued to haunt his troops' rank and file. Even with their cavalry riding out in strength, they were hardly convinced.

The Midlandians had enlisted for what they believed would be a simple raiding party, not a pitched battle. They saw Lansius as an exiled noble from a foreign kingdom, with no reputation or standing to claim a fiefdom, and so no one suspected him of starting an open war.

Yet here they were, facing off against the Lion of Lowlandia, the biggest name in the region. The sight of the viscount's banners, fluttering boldly in the wind, sent chills down their spines.

Many muttered curses under their breath, their eyes darting nervously between the enemy’s imposing formation and their own ragtag troop. The thought of fleeing to save themselves constantly crossed their minds.

Although Lansius had treated them well, nobody wished to die for someone else’s cause. Many felt betrayed, like sacrificial pawns led to a butcher’s shop. The thought made their stomach churn.

The only thing that stopped them from killing the black-haired bastard and break formation was desperation.

It was clear to all that their situation was beyond hopeless, with flat grassland stretching in all directions for miles, leaving nowhere to hide. Whoever fled would be easily chased and slaughtered, or captured as slaves.

Their fear drove them to quietly follow Lansius, who had yet to show signs of panicking.

Unbeknownst to his men, Lansius himself was inches away from a nervous breakdown.

Am I really doing this?

Watching the lines of men in formation moving toward him made him second guess. However, Lansius had bet everything on his reckless plan. He had spent his money on recruiting more men, horses, and equipment, risked the trust of his benefactors, and even jeopardized the love of his life, who stubbornly wanted to participate in this madness.

Lord Bengrieve and Sir Stan's initial plan was simple: Lansius was to create a diversion, allowing Midlandia to freely siege another barony to secure their back-line.

Lansius had learned there was a bitter relationship between prosperous Midlandia and the poor Lords of Lowlandia, who secretly supported raiding activities on their vast border. Now, with Midlandia poised to fight a major war against the unified northern people, they needed to secure their weakest border.

To ensure victory, Midlandia was willing to sacrifice hundreds of men to prevent the Old Lion from learning and sending a relief force to their besieged neighbor. However, despite their apparent hostility, Lord Bengrieve wished to maintain good relations with the powerful Viscount.

Thus, Lansius, the foreigner, was the perfect candidate. Even if he and his command were caught, there would be little evidence that could be traced back to Midlandia’s court.

Externally, Lansius went along with this plan. It was a simple plan. His job was to take this cheaply recruited company as a decoy for as long as possible, before their eventual capture and demise. Lansius was to escape with the cavalry and abandon the rest to their fate.

However, he couldn’t bring himself to sacrifice the men. The troop under him might be nothing but the unfortunates, the rowdies, and the lowest scumbags in all of Midlandia, but they were still his men.

But mercy wasn’t the main reason why Lansius had reneged on the plan. For he had seen a sliver of hope, and ever since learning of the possibility, he had been torn between risking everything for a chance to win big, or playing it safe by sticking to Lord Bengrieve’s plan.

Only now, as he faced the enemy, did Lansius begin to feel truly at peace with his decision.

If you lot are destined to die, then let’s test our fates against the heavens.

Lansius thought about his troops and his own bold gamble. Despite Lord Bengrieve's trust in him, he had deviated from his benefactor's plan. The decision was fueled by his desire to bring a greater reward to his master and to prove his own worth quickly.

The author's content has been appropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

He also believed that his deviation from the original plan posed little risk to Lord Bengrieve, as the troops he sent were meant to act as a decoy, distracting the Lion from Midlandia's ongoing siege.

Since Lord Bengrieve had already written off the fate of Lansius' troops, the possibility of securing a victory offered tremendous merit. Thus, trusting his instincts, Lansius had ordered two hundred men to build a camp and dig three horseshoe-shaped trenches twelve days prior. The first trench was the longest, followed by two other smaller trenches behind it.

The first trench would serve as the main combat line, while the smaller trenches behind it would act as support and reserve. Lansius had chosen this location because the ground was soft and could easily be dug.

The scouts had learned that the area was occasionally flooded when the monsoon came, which made it easy to get clean water by digging crude wells. Because of this, they were able to escape diseases such as deadly diarrhea.

While Lansius and his men worked on their dig site, Sir Justin, a surviving Arvenian knight, turned mercenary in Lord Bengrieve’s service, had led fifty cavalry and two-hundred men deep into Lord Robert’s territory to raid and lure him out.

Things seemingly advanced as planned; however, they had badly underestimated Lord Robert’s forces.

 

***

 

Calub, the alchemist who had also joined Lord Bengrieve’s mercenary company, jogged over to Lansius' side. He gestured for Lansius to speak in private. The two moved away from the rest of the troops, and Calub whispered, “The scouts weren’t making it up. It is a thousand.”

Hearing that, Lansius felt a knot of dread in his stomach. While he had prepared to face an army twice his size, the prospect of battling a force three times as large left him with little hope of success. The overwhelming numbers made his already high-risk plan even more precarious. “How in the world could a Viscount muster a thousand men?”

Calub brushed aside Lansius’ complaint and asked, “Can we win this?”

Lansius saw the concern on Calub’s tanned face and avoided his gaze. He needed time to think.

Four-hundred of our ragtag army against a thousand of the best Lowlandians? We’re doomed…

Calub exhaled deeply and massaged his temple. He then looked around at the advancing enemy troops in the distance and changed the subject, “Is Audrey with the cavalry?”

Lansius nodded weakly. “Yeah, why?”

“Good. She should be able to make her escape. Then I’ll pack.” Calub turned away.

Lansius caught Calub’s arm and asked, “You’re leaving?”

“You’re not?” Calub was in disbelief. “Lans, this whole thing, your plan is breaking apart. We should flee while we can.”

Lansius shook his head. “They’re more numerous than expected, but that doesn’t mean my plan won’t work. Let’s give it a chance.”

Calub muttered under his breath, but remained indecisive.

“They’re getting closer!” one of the lookouts cried out fearfully.

Lansius strained his eyes as their cavalry formed a wedge formation, while the Viscount’s right wing across the field took shape in a line formation.

The sight of hundreds of galloping horses across the green grassland was a spectacle. Massive, colorful flags flew from the bannermen, adding to the stunning visual display.

“I can’t watch.” Calub turned away, his voice filled with dread. “By the Ageless, have you forgotten about those days in Feodosia?”

“That’s why the big boy is with her.” Lansius nervously wiped the sweat from his forehead as he watched the two cavalry on a collision course.

“Him? That’s… not entirely promising,” Calub said with an equally nervous smile.

“Lances down! They’re lowering their lances,” the lookouts cried out, drawing everyone's attention.

The vibrant spectacle came to a sudden halt as the two sides clashed in a brutal head-on collision. Lances shattered and pierced through flesh with sickening thuds. In mere moments, cavalrymen were thrown off their horses or impaled by steel-tipped lances, reducing many valiant men to mere casualties.

The gruesome spectacle left everyone gasping and feeling sickened.

 

Watching as Audrey courageously led her cavalry, gave Lansius a much-needed mental slap to the face. She trusted him enough to put her life on the line. He clenched his fist and felt his blood slowly boil. There was little time to observe her fight as the enemy’s main group had closed in on Lansius’ position.

“Sound the signal. Move to the trench,” Sir Justin, one of the few who had plate armor, ordered.

In response to his order, three-hundred men started to descend into the trenches, where another hundred stood ready.

The men looked pale, and a few were already quivering.

The poor and unfortunate, also the scum of every town and village. They are every bit unfit as soldiers. More like a bunch of bandits...

Lansius let out a sigh, but knew that only they were available to a no-name upstart like himself.

Sir Justin approached Lansius from his post. His familiar-looking squire followed behind.

“Sir Justin, Hugo,” Calub addressed them.

Hugo bowed his head to Calub. Fate had played a cruel joke on him by reuniting him with Lansius as a subordinate. They had buried the hatchet and now Hugo tried to win Lansius’ trust, but he ended up in this suicidal plan. He lamented his luck, and like the rest, desperately wanted Lansius’ plan to work.

Sir Justin nodded at Calub before turning to his squire, Hugo. “Protect us,” he commanded.

Hugo dutifully placed himself between them and the enemy and raised his shield.

Lansius saw the knight’s gaze shift to him. “Commander, last chance,” Sir Justin said, giving Lansius the option to retreat or prepare for battle.

Lansius, despite feeling drenched in cold sweat, summoned his courage and responded, “I think I’ll risk it. Sir, can I count on you?”

The older gentlemen nodded. “I’ll give it my best.”

“Gratitude, Sir.” Lansius bowed his head slightly.

“Don’t feel too indebted. If things go awry, I only need to discard half my armor to run. My horses are fast and my men are strong enough to escort me out.”

The honesty of the former knight, now mercenary, elicited a chuckle from Lansius. “Sir, please call me by name. I’m hardly your superior.”

Sir Justin grinned. “I’m pretty sure they made you the commander.”

“Men will follow someone they respect,” Lansius remarked.

The knight seemed happy, and he turned his gaze toward the advancing enemy. “Lord Robert has good troops.”

“Indeed. Meanwhile ours...” Lansius couldn’t resist comparing.

The knight snorted. “What we got might be not as good or well equipped, but at least they’ll follow orders.”

“That’s true…” Lansius admitted as he watched their last group of men descended into the trenches with a mixture of gratitude and guilt.

Surely, following me was a big leap of faith for them, especially when I employed such an unknown strategy that involves digging a series of ditches in the middle of nowhere like here.

“I better go,” Calub suddenly announced.

“Calub,” Lansius called out. “Next time, remind me to double-check our opponent’s strength.”

Calub let out a deep breath. “If we make it out of this alive.” Then he turned to the knight. “Sir, may I ask, why did you agree with this plan? You must have known that Lord Robert is a good warlord.”

The knight chuckled. “I’ve always wanted to see the Lion in the field.”

Calub let out a sigh. "Lans, I hope your plan works."

"If it doesn't work... see you in the afterlife?" Lansius joked, finally pushing past his fear limit.

Calub chuckled and made his way towards the trenches. He was needed on the far right where the fighting was likely to be the fiercest.

"We need to move," Hugo interrupted urgently. Just then, the sound of an arrow slicing through the air reached their ears.

"Right, right…" Lansius took a final glance at the enemy formation before quickly making his way to the ladder.

Sir Justin and Hugo followed suit, with a few crossbow bolts whizzing above their heads as they descended. Finally, at the bottom, the smell of earth and humidity greeted them.

One of the aides handed Lansius his crossbow, which he proceeded to check how the string felt. The dampness in trenches could affect the string, but he felt that the tension was alright. Next, he checked the bolts in, two quivers on his belt, each with twelve bolts.

Sir Justin secured his poleaxe while Hugo fetched his bascinet helmet and assisted him in fastening it firmly.

Lansius finished up by wearing a sallet helmet. Its layers of linen padding felt comfortable. It wasn’t a full-face but had a retractable visor. Now, after a lot of doubting and second-guessing everything about his own decision, he finally felt a sense of clarity. With everything in place, he knew it was time to face whatever lay ahead.

⠀

***

 

Chapter 24

Noise Before Defeat

 

The newly dug trenches were still relatively fresh, the earth around them moist and sticky despite the summer heat. Several men trudged through the trenches as they prepare for the impending battle, their boots covered in red mud.

Lansius tapped his salet, and the reassuring metallic ring echoed through the air. Then he pulled down the visor to test it. The helmet limited his view, but he knew he needed protection for his head.

Lansius surveyed his surroundings, taking note of his men’s dirt-stained gambesons and emaciated faces. The weeks of marching and sleeping rough had already weakened their bodies, and common maladies such as colds had further sapped their strength. The air was thick with the stench of their sweat and urine.

Sir Justin had taken the rowdier men to his part of the trenches, leaving Lansius with this group to manage.

He lifted his visor and locked it in place. Now, he could feel the weight of their stares, silent anger for sending them into a battle where they stood little chance of survival.

They feared they would be slaughtered like helpless livestock. Four-hundred poorly equipped men stood no chance against Lord Robert’s veteran vanguard.

I better address this least they rebel at the last minute.

“Gentlemen,” Lansius called out, his voice wavering slightly with apprehension.

Now, all of their attention was directed at Lansius, whose introverted side was screaming for him to back down, but he steeled himself. The trenches weren’t wide, so he climbed the ladder halfway up to make himself more visible.

“Most of you know that I’m a poor rider,” Lansius began, his tone light. “I can’t outrun anyone on a horse, and I’m not much faster on foot. So, if things go wrong, I’m probably not going to make it.”

A few cracked their lips at his dark humor.

“But don’t worry,” Lansius continued. “I’ve staked my life on this earthen fortress we’ve built. It’s a well-known strategy in my homeland. Great kings and generals have used it against formidable foes, whether human or fell beasts.”

The men murmured among themselves, some nodding in agreement.

Lansius noticed a warmer expression as he spoke again. “Our opponents are unaware of this strategy. We have the upper hand and an abundance of weapons, and we know this place like ants know their burrows. So, are you with me?”

The men responded with nods and a growing wave of enthusiasm.

“Gentlemen, look around you. Are they, not your fellow kin? Do you not trust them? I’ll tell you this: if you cover their backs, they’ll cover yours. And I’ll do the same. We’re in this together. So, do we fight, or do we give up and accept the chain on our necks?”

Hugo stepped forward and shouted, “I say, let those bastards have it!”

The men cheered and clamored in agreement. That effectively rallied them.

Lansius was thrilled. Although he knew he was lying, he had no other choice. “Ten silver coins for every man who fights valiantly today!” he proclaimed, “Fight with all your might, and I promise to personally reward you even more!”

The trenches echoed with a resounding cheer. Lansius had won over the soldiers’ hearts and minds. It was true that the lure of money could make even the most perilous and unimaginable tasks bearable.

 

***

 

Viscount’s side.

Robert observed as the center column closed in on the opponent’s line, anticipating a fierce battle. However, something unexpected occurred. In response, he promptly dispatched a scout to investigate. While it seemed trivial, Robert knew that morale was a finicky matter. Surprised men could flee despite having an overwhelming advantage.

While they awaited the scout’s report, their attention was drawn to the ongoing cavalry skirmish on their right flank.

Finally, the scout returned with the news, “My Lord, as you suspected, the main enemy force has moved into a ditch.”

This news ignited a debate amongst the command staff, with each member offering their opinions.

“Is it really just a ditch?” Robert interjected, hoping to clarify the situation.

“My Lord, it appears to be deeper than a man’s height. At least two men could walk side by side. They also have crossbowmen. One even fired at me,” the scout answered.

Robert grew restless. He sensed that this wasn’t a mere ditch, but could it be a distraction?

If you stumble upon this narrative on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen from Royal Road. Please report it.

“Did they purposely make it? But for an earthwork of that size, enough to cover hundreds of men would require a lot of preparation,” the senior knight who rode beside Robert offered his counsel.

Robert massaged his chin and said, “You’re right. Send-“

Suddenly, the knight on the lookout cried out, “Riders ahead! Riders ahead!”

Everyone was caught off guard as dozens of riders broke through their right wing and charged toward their position. Their right-wing cavalry was in pursuit but lagged behind.

“Clever bastards!” exclaimed the senior knight. “Our knights in plates can’t catch them. My Lord, with your permission,” he asked, more of a formality, and shouted to his men, “Fifty knights, on me!”

The remaining horsemen hurriedly escorted Robert in the camp’s direction.

“But the main battle,” Robert protested, but his men were having none of it. Protecting their lord was paramount. Nothing else mattered.

Despite this temporary setback, they remained confident in their main troops and believed that the opponent’s cavalry charge was a one-trick pony. With that threat now thwarted, they saw this retreat as merely a noise before their ultimate triumph.

 

***

 

“What the hell is going on?” Michael demanded answers from his staff, who were just as puzzled. They just saw the enemy launched a desperate cavalry action, but now the enemy main formation slowly disappeared into a ditch.

A senior staff rode his horse further to get a better look, but still couldn’t find an explanation. As far as they knew, a ditch or moat was meant to impede or block movement, not to hide troops. The rank and file began to speculate on this oddity, attracting a lot of attention.

Uncertain about what to do but feeling the pressure to take action, Michael ultimately ordered his crossbowmen to test the enemy.

Over a hundred crossbowmen marched onto the field, but they were without their helpers or large pavise shields. They had to rely on whatever cover they could find or some assistance from other units. The ensuing shooting exchange was brutal, but it quickly became apparent that their side was badly outmatched. The enemy had better cover inside their ditch and could fire with impunity.

The sight of their retreating crossbowmen disturbed the entire column. They had been confident with their three-to-one advantage and expected an easy battle, but now fear began to seep in.

 

“Marshal, it’s time to attack,” urged the staff.

“Very well,” Michael took a deep breath. “Signal the men.” He knew that further delay would only worsen the troops’ morale.

Five-hundred of their hardest fighters took to the field while Michael and his staff stayed behind with the remaining three-hundred.

The vanguard, clad in plate armor and shields, marched forward in loose formation and soon endured a hail of crossbow attacks. Bravery was present that day. They held their formation and only charged when they were within a stone’s throw from the enemy’s ditch.

Michael lost sight of the vanguard as they fearlessly descended into the ditch. Behind them, closely following, were the men-at-arms. They may have been less equipped than the vanguard, but they were equally eager for violence and recognition.

However, despite their numerical superiority, they were withered by relentless crossbow attacks. The noise of the bolts’ high-pitched sounds as they sliced through the air continued to scream at their ears.

“Where are they coming from? Why do they keep coming?” Michael vented his frustration as the enemy showed no signs of being distracted, even under assault.

His senior staff tried to divert Michael’s frustration by pointing out a group of brave men who made a defensive line with shields. However, their defense was short-lived and collapsed under the enemy’s ceaseless ranged attacks.

The amount of ammunition required to maintain such a constant barrage was tremendous, and it made Michael feel queasy. Doubt began to form in his mind. Was he falling into a trap?

A scout was spotted galloping toward them, his horse kicking up dust and dirt as it approached. As he drew closer, he pulled up sharply and quickly dismounted. “Marshal,” he said, catching his breath. “There’s more than one ditch. At least two more behind the first one.”

Michael winced while his staff looked at each other in shock and disbelief. They had been outmaneuvered and outwitted. The realization hit them hard, and Michael felt a sinking feeling in his stomach. Only now did they understand why the ranged attack didn’t lessen at all.

As they had already committed to the attack, Michael and his staff could only watch in horror as their comrades mercilessly fell victim to the ranged attacks. The scene was both humiliating and heartbreaking. They had relatives and friends among the assault force who were now fighting for their lives. But there was nothing they could do. The assault must succeed at all costs.

Not surprisingly, the assault began to falter. Several groups had seen enough blood, broke formation, and retreated.

“Round them up,” Michael ordered his staff, fearing that the retreat could turn into a rout.

Before they could do anything, a rider emerged from their right galloping towards Michael. The rider pulled up abruptly after he found Michael. “Marshal,” he said breathlessly. “The enemy cavalry has broken our right wing. They’re aiming for Lord Robert’s position.”

Michael instinctively pulled the reins of his horse, ready to rush to his Lord’s side. However, a knight grabbed his arms and stopped the young marshal.

“Marshal, you are needed here,” the knight said sternly.

“But Lord Robert is under threat,” Michael stated angrily.

The knight’s grip on Michael’s arm tightened. “You can’t leave this spot or else our entire formation will collapse!”

Michael tried to compromise. “I’ll leave my banner-“

“The men will still recognize you,” said the knight firmly.

Michael groaned but remained in his place.

“Lord Robert is a skilled fighter, and he has capable knights with him,” the knight tried to reassure him.

Michael took a deep breath and surveyed the battlefield. “Then tell me, what’s our next move?”

“I believe we just need to focus on winning what’s in front of us,” the knight replied.

Michael looked at his staff and made his decision. “Alright, send the rest of the troops forward.”

“Marshal, I believe we’re the only group left,” his staff reported.

“Then we shall commit ourselves,” Michael said resolutely and dismounted.

Words that the Viscount was retreating spread like wildfire, but before anyone could react, a general attack was ordered.

Michael and his staff joined the remaining men-at-arms and marched with their shields raised. Behind them, the levied troops followed. The latter were trained peasants with little armor and weaponry. Their inadequacy was only remedied by their sheer size. At their rear, a score of cavalry remained vigilant to deter anyone from desertion.

However, the Lowlandians showed their mettle today. Michael and his comrades were ready to give it their all, and as they charged forward, the barrage of crossbow bolts began to dwindle. A path opened up to them. With great cries that echoed across the field, they fearlessly plunged towards the trenches and the battle descended into chaos.

 

***

 

Chapter 25

The Bloody Harvest

 

The thunderous sound of clashing metal and the piercing cries of combatants filled the air. Blade and lance sliced through the air, striking helmet and armor with bone-crunching force.

A knight was thrown from his horse, crashing to the ground with a sickening thud. Blood gushed from his mangled helmet, splattering the polished surface of his armor. In contrast to the unmoving master, the riderless horse bolted out of control.

Anci, the victor, proceeded without care. He had just bested another knight. Decked in white brigandine and bascinet helmet, he pressed his mount to pick up the pace.

Cavalry skirmish was a swift, but brutal exchange of blows, with riders passing each other in quick succession, before circling back for another round. However, Anci’s objective today wasn’t cavalry supremacy, but to capture the enemy leader.

Driven by the promise of a large bounty, his Midlandia-trained riders had bravely clashed against the opponent’s right wing. Against all odds, their fifty light cavalry prevailed and were now aiming for their opponent’s rear, where Lord Robert’s personal banner was spotted.

This turned the fighting into chaos as half of Lord Robert’s reserve scrambled to block the invader’s cavalry advances.

Anci smiled at the opponent's reaction. He relished the opportunity for more fights. Officially, he had only agreed to join this mission because Lansius had pleaded with him to come. The former clerk, now a fake knight, had convinced him that there would be a great battle, complete with knights to capture. Lansius had said he needed Anci to co-command the cavalry.

However, even for a glory-seeker like Anci, jumping into a fight in Lowlandia wasn't an attractive prospect. He regarded Lowlandia with a healthy dose of skepticism. Its knights were generally poor, and a fight without the potential for ransom held little interest for him.

What ultimately persuaded him to join were Lord Arte's wishes for him to make a name for himself, his own innate love for violence, and the sizable payment that Lansius had offered him to safeguard the commander.

The rhythmic pounding of the horses' hooves echoed across the open plain. Shouting through his visor, Anci ordered, "FORM UP ON THE COMMANDER!" He had spotted Audrey, the one individual he had sworn to protect.

Anci’s riders obeyed and tried to reform their formation. Anci urged his mount forward. Its powerful muscles rippled beneath its glistening skin under the hot summer sun.

In the distance, the enemy cavalry loomed, a dark, foreboding wall blocking their path. The air was thick with tension and filled with the sound of clinking armor as the two similarly numbered sides charged toward each other.

But equally, they were not. The Midlandians had spent their lances against Lord Robert’s right-wing. Their horses were tired, and not all of them had emerged unscathed.

Meanwhile, Lord Robert’s reserve was as fresh as ever, clad in their polished plate cuirasses.

The Midlandians’ side was also disorganized. They had yet to fully form a cohesive formation. Despite all this, they fearlessly charged into the opponent’s deadly embrace. However, at the critical moment, Audrey led her fifteen riders to execute a sharp right turn.

It was so masterfully done that the enemy’s heavier cavalry failed to catch her move. As they turned to intercept her, the enemy left their right flank vulnerable, and that was when Anci’s riders joined for an onslaught.

“Nyahaha!” A sickening laughter was followed by a flash of a metallic object that cleaved through the wind in a giant, powerful swing. With a loud metallic clang, one knight crashed to the ground after Anci’s broadsword connected with his arms and pauldron.

The hardened iron skin was merely dented, but the victim’s arm was mangled, and he struggled to crawl himself to safety.

Audrey’s riders had deftly dodged the enemy and lured them into Anci’s trap. The alpha of the pack grinned devilishly at Audrey’s success, as his riders wreaked havoc upon the enemy’s ranks. Anci had marked a new prey, an astute rider who happened to cross his path.

The marked man, a stalwart knight by appearance, noticed Anci’s approach and reacted accordingly. Within seconds, they closed the gap between them, Fate dictating that they would pass on their left side. The knight raised his lance without hesitation, preparing to strike. Meanwhile, Anci kept shouldering his broadsword confidently.

When they were but a lance’s distance apart, Anci leaped into action. He put all his weight on the left stirrup, extended his body to the side, and with a lightning-quick motion, slammed the incoming lance with his broadsword.

This tale has been unlawfully obtained from Royal Road. If you discover it on Amazon, kindly report it.

The lance wobbled out of the way but didn’t break, sending splinters flying between them as the knight and his stead struggled to balance themselves.

Anci’s horse swerved, nearly throwing him off balance as he came alongside his opponent. They locked eyes from their visored helmets. In jousting, this would have marked the end of the round, but Anci wasn’t finished. In that brief moment, the young squire wrestled control of his sword, twisted his body to face the passing knight, and unleashed the sharp metal into the knight’s back.

A dull clang rang through the air as the tip of Anci’s sword made contact with the knight’s back plate. Though the knight's back plate wasn't broken, he was not entirely immune to the impact. The knight continued to ride as if unharmed, but astonishingly dropped his sword and crouched lifelessly in his saddle.

An additional dent had been etched on the tip of Anci’s sword. He had been using them hard like a blunt mace. His horse made noises as if complementing his master’s latest win. He grinned and patted his horse while suppressing tremendous pain from his torso.

Bah, I shouldn’t twist it that much!

Groaning, Anci scanned the surroundings and found no immediate threats as the enemy was turning around wide to give chase. He counted his riders and found only twenty-seven, including himself and Audrey; the rest were either injured, dismounted, or dead.

Even Anci, an excellent rider by anyone’s standards, had been dismounted during the early battle. But as any seasoned cavalryman knew, being dismounted was far from the end. He simply whistled to call his horse and rejoined the fight.

Including the last one, Anci had bested eight riders, but not without paying the price. Part of his brigandine had been torn by a lance, and his left shoulder was swollen from the fall. His right arm was lacerated, and the coat of steel plates inside his brigandine couldn’t protect him completely from the lance’s attack. Even without penetration, a rib or two was broken, making breathing painful.

He lamented about not purchasing a cuirass, but he had an eye on something else. As Anci continued to press forward, Audrey began to slow down.

Anci caught up with her. “Change of plan?” he asked, opening his visor and slowing down to a trot.

“Anci, we’ve done it,” Audrey exclaimed.

“Huh, isn’t the goal to capture the Viscount?”

“Not necessarily. Lans said if we forced The Lion out, then it’s already a win for us.”

“Ah, fkin good!” Anci grinned widely. “I’m still in shape, but my horse needs rest. Then shall we?”

Audrey nodded. “Yes, let’s pull back and regroup.”

Anci let out another groan as he unconsciously twisted his injured torso to reach for the saddlebag. After a few tries, he finally found what he was looking for; a brass circular object. With a gentle nudge of his foot, he coaxed his horse to turn around.

Lifting the mini buccina, Anci blew into the mouthpiece, producing a distinctive sound that he repeated twice. Instantly, every surviving cavalryman began to move in one direction.

 

The opposing cavalry was in pursuit but weighed down by their heavy plate armor. Their horses were exhausted and unable to keep up with Audrey’s forces, who were lighter.

Equipped only with ringmails, brigandines, and a few cuirasses, despite having less expensive warhorses, Audrey’s cavalry was able to outrun the enemy.

This had been their tactic from the start. Initially, Audrey and Anci committed their cavalry to battle, only to then switch to evasion, tiring the enemy's heavy cavalry into a chase. Their light cavalry was controlling the tempo and maintaining the initiative.

Meanwhile, the main battle between Michael’s center column and Lansius’ ragtag army in the trenches raged on.

***

 

Banner of the Unknown

The sound of fighting was deafening in the trenches. A messenger shouted repeatedly to get Lansius’ attention, “Sir, a message from Master Calub.”

“What did he say?” Lansius yelled back.

“Traps are working. We’re holding,” the skinny messenger reported.

“Do you have anything from Sir Justin?” Lansius asked as he put his weight on his right foot to keep the crossbow’s metal stirrup down while he drew the string with both hands, effectively priming the mechanism.

“There’s so much fighting. We haven’t been able to,” he reported while kneeling behind Lansius.

“You hear that?” Lansius yelled at Hugo.

“I’m a bit busy here!” Hugo replied as he fended off a knight with his sword. Earlier, his poleaxe had been broken in a vicious fight.

Lansius faced the messenger. “Go to Sir Justin. Tell him we’re holding.”

“That’s all, Sir?” he asked in between the sounds of swearing and frequent metal-to-metal clashes that echoed through the underground trench.

“Go,” Lansius confirmed, loading a bolt into his weapon and taking aim.

“Left, left!” he shouted to anyone in front of him. Meanwhile, the messenger disappeared behind his men and into the other side of the trenches.

Hugo quickly ducked to the left, and Lansius squeezed the lever trigger, causing the string’s release to echo violently in his hands. The wooden shaft hurtled towards its target, exploding upon impact against the knight’s breastplate and sending wooden shrapnel flying.

The victim staggered and fell backward, a steel-tipped bolt protruding from his breastplate. His side attempted to evacuate their fallen comrade, while another knight squeezed to take his place. However, the narrow and confined trenches made movement difficult, particularly in heavy plate armor, and the slippery red clay ground only made it worse.

Hugo got up from his kneeling position. He had been shielding his face from being peppered by wooden shrapnel, of which a few dislodged in his ringmail. He charged at the unprepared opponent alongside another squire and made a bloody result.

In contrast to the attackers, Lansius’ men had come prepared by tying ropes onto their footwear, providing them with much-needed traction for work and fighting in trenches. Meanwhile, the knights in their sabatons struggled to move without slipping on the slick, clay-like ground.

With all this advantage and preparation, Lansius’ smaller force had miraculously managed to hold their ground against the larger, better-armed opponent, but they were left utterly exhausted. Unable to press for dominance.

As the bitter and bloody struggle continued, everything hung in the balance, and the slightest shift could tip the scale in either side’s favor.

 

***

 

Chapter 26

The Misfits

 

Following the initial assault, Lansius’ first trench was no longer able to use crossbows as freely anymore. It became mainly a melee affair. But the crossbow, as planned, had done a great job in blunting the initial assault.

Moreover, Lansius had put the bulk of his crossbowmen in the second trench, where they could fire freely at any incoming enemy on the surface. These ranged attacks became Lansius’ best defense against the enemy’s onslaught, preventing them from being slaughtered from the top like animals trapped in a gutter.

Lansius' side didn't have a monopoly on crossbows; their opponents had tried to use them as well. However, they were unprepared. Anticipating a melee, Lord Robert's men had failed to bring a sufficient number of crossbows into the trench.

Meanwhile, Lansius had amassed a large stockpile of bolts, enough to last an hour. He had also trained more than half of his men in the use and maintenance of crossbows. Bows took ages to master, but crossbows required only two days to learn the basics and two weeks to become proficient enough for battle.

While Sir Stan had equipped the troops with spears, polearms, and a few dozen crossbows, Lansius allocated more of his war fund to acquire a hundred more crossbows, even going so far as to spend his own personal five gold pieces—equivalent to 100 silver—to buy forty additional crossbows.

Still not satisfied, Lansius borrowed thirty heavy arbalests from Toruna's armory, along with a large supply of bolts. To further bolster their arsenal, he sold some of their surplus supplies to purchase additional ammunition.

All these preparations enabled his troops to maintain a high rate of fire against their opponents. This proved especially effective against the enemy's transitional armor, which was primarily ringmail rather than proper plate. Lowlandia was a poor province, and despite its involvement in multiple conflicts, its men-at-arms lacked the best equipment the Imperium could offer. Its plates made from mild iron offered little protection against Midlandian steel tipped heavy bolts.

But now, the battle had entered a new phase.

Steel clanging echoed as Hugo exchanged blows with the new opponent. At one point, the knight turned it into a sword grapple. However, Hugo was a tad faster and slipped his sword into a thrust. The steel tip dug deep into the knight’s unprotected inner right elbow, causing him to recoil in pain.

Despite not being the greatest fighter, Hugo’s agility and sure-footedness from using the rope trick gave him an advantage in the close and confined space. Hugo wrestled the opponent down with that advantage, but another fighter intervened.

Hugo took a step back and another knight in engraved plate armor wielding a shield and mace took the spot easily. The other fighter also faced difficulties with his opponent and was saved only by Hugo’s intervention.

This unnerved Lansius. The opponent was getting better at this game.

Despite their initial setbacks, Lion’s knights and men-at-arms had slowly adapted and regained their edge. There was no more hurried attack or half-hearted assault, only cold precision and a steady push.

Exhausted, Hugo signaled for a replacement. Lansius and his crossbowman seized the opportunity to fire at the enemy. However, the knights were prepared and readily shielded their upper bodies, making the bolts thud harmlessly upon impact.

Another pair of fighters bolted to the front. Meanwhile, Lansius reloaded his crossbow and realized he could hear heavy breathing coming from the enemy’s direction.

The hot and humid conditions underground made it difficult for anyone in full-face helmets to breathe through their small vents. As a result, many of Lansius’ opponents had their visors open, despite the risk of getting hit by stray bolts or deadly shrapnel.

“Keep it up! Once we stop the vanguard, the rest will fall,” Lansius suddenly rallied his men. Upon hearing his words, the new pair of fighters charged forward with their poleaxes.

The rest of Lansius’s men behind didn’t respond verbally. Having borne the brunt of the assault, they were exhausted, but their eyes showed renewed determination.

However, determination alone was not enough to win the fight. Despite their best efforts, the new pair of fighters struggled in their fight and continued to lose ground against the more-skilled opponents.

Hugo looked at Lansius, who nodded, agreeing to another swap.

Despite the advantage, the opponent did not rush. They were acting like a cat playing with a mouse in their grasp. When they spotted another swap, they were so accustomed that they readily raised their shields.

Watching them, Lansius deliberately withheld from firing his crossbow. Instead, he aimed it around threateningly to give his men some breathing time. The trick worked, and his fighter could retreat without problems.

At this range, and in the absence of wind, everyone knew that not even plate armor could provide invulnerability. However, the problem still persisted: a crossbow would not be very effective against a shield.

A bearded man stepped forward. He wore a sallet along with a heater shield and an axe. From his looks, he was eager to fight.

Unauthorized reproduction: this story has been taken without approval. Report sightings.

“Careful, don’t get cocky,” Lansius warned the bearded guy.

Thomas chuckled. “No worries, I got my beard back.”

The man could have an easy life in Midlandia, following Lord Arte and Sir Peter on their political tour, but Thomas decided to follow his guts. Out of respect, Lansius had put him in reserve, but the man yearned to fight.

Thomas and Roger, his younger pair, approached the opponent’s line calmly. The mace-wielding knight suddenly lunged at Thomas. Thomas dodged a blow from a mace and countered with a ferocious axe attack.

The knight blocked with his shield and felt a jolt in his arm and shoulder. Thomas kept hacking at it, but a shield bash took him by surprise.

Thomas stumbled back as the knight swung his mace. He raised his shield to block, crouched low, and lunged at the knight. It was such a short distance that the knight failed to react.

The knight lost his footing as Thomas launched a series of blows. The knight immediately fell and Thomas pinned him down, ready for the killing blow, but a halberd greeted him from the front.

The axeman released his prey and took several steps back. Two knights assisted their fallen comrades readily. One dragged the guy back, another kept brandishing their halberd.

“Thomas!” Lansius shouted.

Old Thomas barely ducked when two bolts screeched through the air and landed at the two who tried to evacuate their friends. One got hit in the thigh and groaned in pain, another was unconscious from a big dent in his helmet.

“On me!” Thomas charged into the opponent’s confused line while Roger tried his best to contain the other knight from interfering.

Hugo sprang into action and joined the fray while Lansius frantically reloaded his bolt. This may be the break they were waiting for.

 

***

 

Thomas, Hugo, and Roger fought admirably with tenacity. However, despite the golden opportunity, they’re facing the creme of Lord Robert’s men-at-arms. The knights soaked the damage and reformed their line.

In this confined space between the two red dirt walls, there was no place for flanking, and Lansius men’s momentum stalled. They took two for ransom and injured several, but failed to make the breakthrough they desperately needed.

Just as the fighting stopped as both sides took breathing.

“Get down,” the crossbowman beside Lansius yelled, as he thought he had found his chance.

Already anticipating the attack, the men ducked. The bolt flew straight but narrowly missed the knight’s helmet. Lansius too fired his crossbow, but the bolt got deflected at the other knight’s pauldron and flew harmlessly into the earthen wall.

After they had spent their ranged attack, the opponent suddenly charged forward.

Fuck! They’re waiting for this.

“Fall back,” Hugo screamed as if reading Lansius’ mind. Thomas and Roger acted like a rear guard and tried their best to defend against the charging knights.

 

***

 

Lansius’ men retreated, more panicked than orderly. Suddenly, one of the guys in front screamed. Lansius stopped and saw Roger’s shoulder pierced by a spear. Blood was gushing through his gambeson.

Lansius tossed his crossbow to his assistant and dashed back. “Lend me a hand,” he cried as he dragged the wounded guy as fast as he could.

Hugo and Thomas were close to their limit, answering multiple attacks at once. The opponents clad in plate fearlessly rushed like raging bulls.

A spear slipped and nearly impaled Lansius. It made him slip into the red mud. A female in ringmail moved past them, pushing them, and used her shield as cover.

“Carla, don’t get reckless,” her friend warned her from behind.

“Mind your business! If they fall, then we’re also going to die,” Carla said defiantly.

“That’s more like it,” Lansius commended while redoubling the effort to drag Roger. There was not enough space for two, but a few hands reached out to them to help.

Carla eventually took the front after Thomas got hit on the side of his helmet. Afterward, they picked up the pace and suddenly the width along the trenches got wider.

They finally reached a place that Lansius named the gatehouse. It was not only wider but it was also separated by a wooden fence with a functioning gate.

As they passed the wooden fence, Lansius, Hugo, and the rest just dropped to the ground. Red sticky soil was the least of their problems.

A few men who were in charge of the gate, less experienced but protected behind the fence, readily brandished their spears and fired their crossbows against the incoming knights and men-at-arms.

After a short skirmish that felled several of their members, the Lowlandians lost their momentum and retreated back, seemingly into the far end of the trenches.

Lansius slumped with his back against the reddened wall. Hugo and Thomas were next to him. Despite being wider than the usual trench, it was only enough for four people to stand abreast.

Fresher personnel passed between them to reinforce the gate. The fighting grew quiet around them, so Lansius could hear crossbow bolts being fired overhead.

“Fighting still rages top side,” Hugo commented after watching Lansius looking upward.

Lansius nodded. He knew that it meant that the opponent still had more men coming. However, this was all within expectation.

Looking at his men working hard to survive made him breathe a sigh of relief. His biggest gamble had paid off. From the beginning, Lansius’ problem wasn’t only the enemy, but also his men’s willingness to fight. Truthfully, they were nothing but misfits. Poorly recruited and motivated only by raiding and looting.

Exacerbating the problem, Lansius had no reputation. Despite all his fair treatment, no Midlandians would trust him with their lives. Thus, he had deceived them. He had led them to a place where they couldn’t possibly run, so their only option was to fight for their lives. This trench strategy was essentially that.

Lansius gambled that, even without divine rights, beliefs, or ideologies, men would always fight for survival. And once again, he had proven the assumption to be correct. His men were exhausted, bruised, and battered, but still motivated to fight. And the Arvenians gladly showed them the way.

Ever more experienced, Hugo began skillfully reorganizing his men. In a short time, a fresh group of thirty men sallied out. Their rallying cries pumped everyone’s morale as they exited the gateway.

“Tough lads,” Hugo commented as he noticed Lansius gaze at the men.

Lansius nodded. “Any words from other sectors?”

Hugo searched around and called, “Oi, messengers.”

One perked up and headed toward them.

“What’re the words from Sir Justin and Master Calub?”

“Sir Justin and his men had captured a dozen. Several fell, but they steadily gained ground. As for Master Calub, his traps worked; the enemy was kept in check."

Hugo looked at Lansius, who nodded, satisfied.

Anything other than getting wiped up is good news.

While the battle raged on, they could afford some quick treatment. A barber who followed them was their designated healer, as was the norm for this era.

The barber cleaned Hugo’s small wounds with wine and wrapped them with a clean linen cloth. Meanwhile, Thomas got a cut on his cheek and lost a lump of hair from a narrow slash. Part of his beard was reddened with blood.

Lansius took a deep breath. The realization that these men bled for him was overwhelming.

Suddenly, the wooden fence came alive again. The second group was being pushed back, and the knights were hot on their tails.

Thomas put his sallet back while Hugo took a crude-looking halberd from one of his men. Lansius too rose up, ready for the finale.

 

***

 

Chapter 27

Young Man’s Game

 

The air was thick with the sound of thunderous footsteps and rallying cries as Lord Robert’s men-at-arms charged toward the wooden fence. Though their stamina was failing and the enemy’s tactics unpredictable, their pride burned fiercely.

In the confined space, no more than a few men’s breadths, they hurled themselves against the sturdy gates with all their might, using their weight in place of a battering ram.

But the defenders were well-prepared. Armed with polearms and crossbows, they pushed back the attackers and made them pay a tremendous price.

Despite the sacrifices of eleven of their bravest, the two-meter-tall wooden fence remained seemingly impregnable. Bloodied by a persistent stream of crossbow bolts, they could only drag the wounded along with their retreat.

Deep in the trenches, they licked their wounds and prepared for the inevitable.

 

***

 

The wooden gate groaned as it swung open. Many of its posts were bent or pushed from their spots. The chipped and splintered wooden fence stood as a testament to the relentless assault of their opponents.

Lansius emerged from the gate in his battered grey brigandine, accompanied by his men who surveyed the scars of battle with him. “Hugo,” he called out with a weary yet resolute voice.

Hugo rested his crude halberd and replied, “Yes, boss?”

“Pick your best men,” Lansius commanded.

With a sigh of relief, Hugo turned to his men and rallied them. “Come on lads, for the finale.”

With Lansius and Thomas behind, Hugo led a contingent of his best men into battle. They quickly located Lord Robert’s exhausted troops and offered battle. An intense melee ensued, but it soon became clear that the opponent’s men-at-arms were on their last leg.

The once fearsome troops were reduced to a sorry lot. Their best fighters lay wounded or dead on the ground, leaving only the inexperienced ones to carry on. Their breathing was ragged, and their movements sluggish as the stifling heat and humidity drained them of their last bit of strength.

Trapped in the trench, with Lansius’ crossbowmen positioned to cut their escape, Lord Robert’s side had no choice but to surrender.

…

The deputy commander knelt before Lansius, casting aside his helmet adorned with a great plume. He offered his sword as a token of surrender. It should have been the marshal doing this, but word had it that he had lost an eye to shrapnel.

“I accept your surrender and guarantee the safety of your men who lay down their arms,” Lansius reiterated the words whispered by Sir Justin, who had just arrived from his front.

His men clamored as Lansius finished the words. They shouted victory in loud emotional voices and threw their fists in the air. Many of them looked at Lansius intensely and made him uncomfortable.

“VICTORY!” The word was repeated and echoed, spreading through the trenches like wildfire.

Eventually, the fighting ceased in all the trenches. The defeated had accepted their fate and surrendered their weapons.

Sir Justin conversed with the deputy commander, while Hugo, Thomas, and their men ensured security. Guarding numerous hostages wasn’t easy, but they were like assets waiting to be cashed in.

Lansius stood with Carla, his temporary adjutant, away from the limelight. Suddenly, the sound of hooves followed by a large shadow loomed over them. Carla instinctively drew her sword and readied her shield, but soon recognized the figure of a female cavalryman on the ground level.

She must’ve trotted along the trenches until she found me.

Lansius pulled his sallet off.

“So you survived?” Audrey asked as she opened her visor.

“You seem to be displeased?” Lansius retorted.

That made Audrey laugh so hard that her visor fell in a comedic manner, causing Lansius and his men to burst into laughter as well.

Before the laughter subsided, Lansius ordered Carla to fetch back the ladder. They carefully flew their banner first to avoid getting shot by the other trenches by mistake. Audrey was already present, so there was a low risk, but Lansius insisted just to be safe.

Lansius climbed up after Carla and witnessed the battlefield, which was littered with casualties. Across the grassy plains, many were groaning in pain. Some writhed, while a few calmly waited for the slow coming of death. The aftermath was always a sad scene.

The tale has been illicitly lifted; should you spot it on Amazon, report the violation.

In the distance, the enemy’s retreat had turned into a rout. The decisive factor had been the great show of force by Audrey’s cavalry. They had made by forming a wide line, even though in truth, they only numbered twenty-seven riders. However, to the remaining enemy, their presence was evidently too much to bear.

 

On the other hand, Robert’s cavalry had left the field, unwilling to risk themselves by going near the trenches.

Lansius expected the rout, given the isolation of the enemy commanders and vanguard. The remaining levied men and armed villagers had little motivation, and the few knights and remaining men-at-arms had no choice but to retreat. Now, they no longer flew their banners.

“Get me Sir Justin,” Lansius said to Carla.

Sir Justin emerged from the trenches. “What do you need, Commander, a party?”

Lansius chuckled. “That can wait. Sir Justin, I see all those beautiful horses and knights. What do you think we should do?”

Sir Justin laughed and shouted down to his men, “Time for a ransom hunt!”

The knight’s words were greeted with fierce jubilation from his men. Quickly, they made their way to the back trench, where they had hidden their horses.

Lansius saw Anci approaching. He looked mauled, but still alive and kicking as per usual. “Anci, go nuts,” he said to encourage him.

“Haha, eazy,” Anci replied. “Come, Hugo, don’t be a slowpoke,” he taunted Hugo, who just climbed up.

“Fook you and your blasted horse,” Hugo cursed, drawing laughter from the troops. They knew Anci and Hugo had grown up together as squires to the same knight.

Then something occurred to Lansius. “Audrey, let them surrender and arrange for talks if you could.”

With her visor returned to its place, Audrey threw a hard glance at Lansius before nodding once and spurring her horse forward.

 

***

 

Viscount Robert

In the aftermath of the rout, the enemy’s smaller, yet fiercely motivated riders pursued Robert’s fleeing troops, scattering his other units from the battlefield. The only remnants of Robert’s forces were those who had sought refuge within their camp.

They attempted to barricade the camp, but they lacked sturdy walls for protection, and many had abandoned their posts, taking their mules or carts with them. In this dire situation, Robert’s loyalists urged him to flee. However, he knew his slow-moving baggage train would be easy prey for the enemy. When that happened, it would be a lost cause.

Right now, he still had the numbers to force the enemy into the negotiation table. However, Robert suspected the enemy held numerous hostages, enough to make his own nobles turn against him. Many of these captives were sons, uncles, or husbands of influential families.

Even if Robert managed to escape and secure himself within his castle, he would face internal conspiracies. The families of the hostages would be driven to overthrow Robert’s rule to ensure the safe return of their captive kin.

This precarious situation meant that a large number of Robert’s still numerous men and cavalry were reluctant to fight, fearful that their actions might endanger their relatives.

The enemy had triumphed, a fact Robert was forced to acknowledge. Believing that bravery was not only demonstrated in victory but also in defeat, he sat beneath his tent, patiently awaiting a negotiation while his men valiantly organized a final stand.

However, a group of riders acting as messengers arrived, bearing an offer of negotiation from their leader. Robert welcomed the opportunity for dialogue, and a truce was swiftly declared. The hostilities halted on both sides.

As both armies tended to their wounded and collected their fallen, a large ivory tent was erected between them, a symbol of forthcoming discussions.

...

As the victor’s cavalry patrolled the vicinity and stood guard at the site, the Lion of Lowlandia made his appearance, exuding an air of calm dignity. A small retinue of knights accompanied him as a protective entourage.

Despite the sweltering heat and his evident fatigue, Robert remained clad in his armor, resolute in leveraging every potential advantage in the forthcoming negotiations.

His adversaries welcomed him readily, though ironically the ivory tent was his own, one of many things he would lose in the aftermath of this conflict. Yet even in the face of defeat, Robert maintained a straight-backed posture, wearing an expression that suggested he was relishing every moment.

However, Robert mostly maintained his silence, allowing a trusted aide to handle the negotiations. To his surprise, his counterpart mirrored his approach.

There was no gloating in the adversary’s leader’s face. The man named Lansius sat quietly in his seat, observing the proceedings without interjecting. Both leaders exchanged several glances but refrained from direct conversation.

The first topic of discussion was the status of the hostages. A knight was dispatched to verify their condition and reported back that they were safe, kept in separate pits throughout the trenches as a precaution. The knight also confirmed that Marshal Michael had survived, though likely at the cost of an eye.

Robert drew a deep breath and nodded to his knight, his silence conveying his relief.

The second issue raised was the fate of Robert’s baggage train. Given their distance from the nearest settlement, supplies would be precarious. Fortunately, while the victors insisted on confiscating all wealth, they were reasonable enough to leave almost half of Robert’s food supplies intact.

This was more than sufficient for their march back home, and Robert was appeased. With the two main subjects addressed, Robert turned his attention to the opposing leader. To Robert, this Lansius was an intriguing figure. Not because of his black hair that marked him as a foreigner, but due to his lack of the pride or entitlement typically flaunted by the nobility.

The discussion soon hit a deadlock when the subject of land rights was broached.

“I beg your pardon, but your side lacks a valid casus belli against my Lord’s domain. While we acknowledge your military superiority, you cannot lay claim to White Lake without risking intervention from the Imperium,” Robert’s representative argued with conviction.

Sir Justin scoffed at this. “Stop this nonsense. It’s common knowledge that the lords of Lowlandia have been competing and seizing lands not rightfully theirs for generations. The Imperium has never intervened.”

“We are not brutes! My Lord only engages in battle when his rightful claims are threatened,” retorted Robert’s representative.

“Says the one who didn’t send an envoy this morning and launched an assault without even a parley,” Sir Justin shot back.

Robert’s side reeled from the statement, but chose to ignore it. “In the last conflict, Viscount Jorge pledged Korelia as payment for a joint attack on the Southern Alliance. When Lord Jorge reneged on his promise, My Lord was justified in reclaiming what was rightfully his.”

The crux of the matter was that Lansius held no legitimate claim to Robert’s domain. In reality, Robert would capitulate due to his defeat, but Lansius couldn’t legally retain Robert’s domain without the appropriate justification.

If Lansius forced his way, it would be seen as taking White Lake hostage, a move that would invite all the lords of Lowlandia to attack.

Robert was curious to see how this young man would navigate this messy issue of casus belli.

 

***

 

Chapter 27-2

Cessation

 

Lansius, Leader of the Banner of the Unknown

When the question of casus belli was raised, Lansius shifted his posture for the first time, drawing the attention of those around him. “Let’s put that problem aside for now,” he suggested, his tone surprisingly pleasant and friendly. “What if this has all been a misunderstanding?”

Robert’s aide looked at him in confusion, and Robert turned to Lansius with a hint of disdain. “A misunderstanding?” he challenged.

Seated comfortably, Lansius simply nodded. “I want you to continue ruling White Lake as you always have.”

Surprise flickered briefly across Robert’s face before he countered, “That must be a jest! I’m a defeated noble. Why would you make such an absurd statement?” His response was roundabout, seemingly designed to provoke Lansius into revealing his true intentions.

“My lord, I assure you I’m not jesting. I am extending an offer for cooperation between us,” Lansius replied resolutely, deliberately addressing Robert as his lord in an attempt to placate him.

“There’s no cooperation between the victor and the defeated. The relationship is between the conqueror and the subjugated. Why resort to pleasantries?” Robert retorted.

“I never intended to conquer you, Lord Robert,” Lansius responded with patience. In truth, he had nothing to offer that would impress Robert, but his ambitions lay elsewhere, and he might still have a chance to achieve them without relinquishing too much of his spoils.

Taking a deep breath, Robert asked, “Then how do you explain today’s battle?”

Lansius paused before answering, “Let’s consider it a mock battle.”

“A mock battle? For what purpose?”

“To bring about change,” Lansius declared enigmatically. “The realm south of Midlandia has been stagnant for far too long. I wish to change that.”

 

***

 

Viscount Robert

Robert was momentarily stunned by Lansius’ declaration.

Does he intend to unite Lowlandia?

The feuds among the Lowlandian nobles were older than the third Imperium itself. The ambition persisted, but nobody openly expressed it among peers.

Yet, Robert found it hard to dismiss Lansius’ statement, given the astounding victory his ragtag group had achieved over Robert’s larger, seasoned force. Many of his men were veterans who Robert had personally recruited, trained, and led for more than two decades.

A blind bravado had been his undoing, but Robert felt the need to credit Lansius to create a near-miracle victory. That made him ponder what he could accomplish with someone like Lansius serving as his Marshal. Perhaps even the unification of Lowlandia was within reach, he mused.

However, he quickly dismissed that notion and instead asked, “Please indulge me? What exactly is your plan?”

“I wish Lord Robert to continue his rule, with a few beneficial changes for both of us,” Lansius clarified.

Suppressing a mix of skepticism and hope, Robert nodded. “Please, continue.”

“I propose military protection in exchange for a strategic castle as a base, and a portion of your income. The funds would be used to purchase food and other supplies from your domain, allowing wealth to circulate locally and preventing you from becoming any poorer than before.”

Lansius’ rough use of the language suggested a lack of noble upbringing, yet his innovative ideas were intriguing.

“So, a mercenary company?” Robert ventured.

“Not quite. A mercenary is hired to fight someone else’s war. That’s not my intent,” Lansius clarified.

“And what about rebuilding my forces? Would you permit it?” Robert asked, half in jest.

“Certainly, we are not your conquerors. You may do as you please.”

Robert’s gaze narrowed. “You’re not afraid I might betray you?”

“There’s always a risk. But I believe in time, you’ll see the larger picture and choose to ally with us,” Lansius stated firmly.

Robert stroked his small goatee. Despite the absurdity, he found himself warming up to Lansius. He wasn’t as polished as many noblemen, but his voice held a note of genuine empathy. Moreover, his demeanor was devoid of ill will and even suggested humility.

His instincts told him to trust this young man. The decision wasn’t difficult. As a defeated noble, his options were limited: Capitulate and be sent somewhere remote as a hostage, or take a long journey to the old capital in Centuria, besieged by wars with the western nomads.

Accepting Lansius’ plan offered a way to retain his position, albeit with reduced power and wealth. It was an enticing proposal.

If you encounter this tale on Amazon, note that it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

“Before the battle, I heard reports from the villages your men visited,” Robert reminisced about the scout’s remarks several days prior. “I fully expected to hear about damage or looting, but to my surprise, there were none. Instead, the village chiefs reported your men purchasing food at fair prices. Why?”

Lansius smiled, seemingly flustered. “I may not look the part, but I’m not a robber.”

The old Viscount chuckled for the first time as a hunch dawned on him.

He purchased those goods to garner public support. He knew he would likely triumph in battle. How audacious!

Robert was amused, for in a war such a strategy seemed impractical and offered little gain. Yet he admired a war leader who refrained from looting the poor. “Perhaps you’re on to something,” Robert muttered as he considered the offer. “Would you also permit me to run my court?”

“That’s my intention. Let’s make this into cooperation. I’ll handle military affairs and My Lord shall take care of politics. This way there’s no need for a casus belli.”

Robert glanced at his aide, who nodded in agreement. Even they found the proposition appealing.

However, propelled by curiosity, Robert asked further. “Why all the complications? Wouldn’t it be more straightforward for you to rule the region yourself?”

“No, that would invite too many problems. I don’t want to get entangled in court politics,” Lansius declared, his true intentions remaining a mystery.

 

***

 

The victor and the vanquished set off toward Robert’s domain to orchestrate the transfer of power. Their pace was slow yet steady, their ranks weighed down by the wounded. The baggage train was also heavy with the confiscated armor and weapons from the defeated. They also had prisoners to consider and ransoms to secure, necessitating careful progress to avoid unnecessary risks.

Sir Justin led the troops while Calub tended to the wounded. In this era, medical care was scarce. The best they could do was to dispatch the gravely wounded to the nearest village for basic care.

Lansius wished for more comprehensive care for them, but Robert refused it as the situation hadn’t yet stabilized. The threat of conflict still loomed, as Robert’s allies might attempt to intervene.

Ironically, they remained on a war footing until they could safely escort Robert to his castle to exercise his authority. This was the very reason Lansius had set up camp deep within Robert’s domain, effectively holding him and his commanders hostage.

Nevertheless, the transfer of power eventually occurred without a hitch. Only then, Lansius sent words to his benefactor, explaining his victory and his reasons to ask for Korelia as a base of power in the region.

In the letter, Lansius expressed his wish for Lord Bengrieve to send him a replacement commander and contingent, so he could return to Midlandia. However, Lansius had greatly misjudged his benefactor’s reaction.

 

***

 

Following Viscount Robert’s disastrous defeat, the Lion of Lowlandia carefully ceded Korelia to the victor, an unusual arrangement that led many to assume a secret agreement had been made.

Regardless of the truth, Korelia was no longer under Lord Robert’s control. Although a small fief with limited resources, Korelia held strategic importance as a middle ground between the western and eastern parts of Lowlandia.

The town could serve as a gateway to unify the province under one’s rule, but its lack of arable land posed a problem for supporting a larger population.

Beyond the small castle town, there were only several villages spread to its eastern side. With little arable land but grassland, its population was small and mostly composed of herders.

Despite being a humble fief, the transfer of Korelia disrupted the balance of power in the region. Adding to this tension was the fall of Orniteia Barony to Midlandia after a siege. Now, every neighboring lord was plotting their moves. They knew conflict was inevitable.

 

***

 

Fall of 4424, Korelia. Two months after Lansius’ victory.

Lansius, the temporary officer of Korelia, was awed by the sight of the cloudless blue sky above him. It was unlike anything he had ever seen before, with a seemingly endless expanse of grass stretching out as far as the eye could see. It felt as if Korelia was the only human settlement in this part of the world, surrounded by the vast emptiness of a nomadic steppe.

Have I ever visited Mongolia?

Lansius asked himself, but his memory offered no answer. While he could remember movies, books, or even games, he hardly remembered anything else. He couldn’t even recall his nationality or origin, but that didn’t bother him anymore. Now, this life was all he had.

Sitting under a rectangular field tent, Lansius contentedly watched the building project he had envisioned for Korelia taking shape. The gray-colored canvas flapped in the breeze as the sun rose higher on the eastern horizon.

Several hundred men dug trenches on the west side, while another hundred worked on the southern side of the town. They were making trenches for city defenses.

He hated trenches, but there were not enough woods to construct a palisade even for just one side. To compensate for the lack of defense, Lansius had ordered his men to make picket fences and stakes using whatever wood was available.

Usually, this kind of work was frowned upon by the population. Unless they were exempted from annual tax. But, instead of the usual forced labor, Lansius was offering wages much to people’s delight.

While Lansius believed in treating people fairly, his real intention was to prevent sabotage or dissidents. Moreover, he theorized that paid labor worked faster and was generally more reliable.

Just this week, Lansius’s view was vindicated. Aided by Lansius’ goal-oriented payment, the workers managed themselves efficiently. The defense work began to take shape right on schedule.

Another factor that contributed was the quick harvest time in Korelia. The area didn’t have big farmland, and after the festivity ended, Lansius had the full labor at his disposal.

A billowing cloud of black smoke caught Lansius’s attention. It was the blacksmith Calub had invited from out of town to produce nails and bolt heads for their side project. Though the local smiths couldn’t produce swords or armor, they could handle simple repairs and maintenance.

Lansius had wanted Calub to head another project to build workshops. They wanted to employ craftsmen, artisans, and volunteers to produce crossbow parts.

As Lansius watched the project progress, a sudden horse’s neigh drew his attention. He glanced up and saw a friendly silhouette approaching.

“I see that you’re well enough to go outside today.” A hint of a smile was on Audrey’s lips as she approached closer and covered him with a fur coat.

“Ah, thanks.” Lansius felt the warmth and found it pleasant.

Audrey noticed how windy it was. “Mm, perhaps you shouldn’t be out here for too long.”

“Do I look that pale?” he asked.

“Well, it’s always wise to prevent,” Audrey remarked smugly.

“You sound like Calub,” he chuckled. “Lemme check your forehead for a fever.”

His jest was shot down by a cold stare. “Not funny. You’ve been bedridden on and off for almost three weeks. Everybody is terrified.”

Lansius’ chuckle died down quickly. “Yeah, I know. I’m sorry to make you worry.”

Audrey kept staring and Lansius could only look down.

She let out a soft sigh before tenderly patting Lansius’ shoulder. He caught her hand with his own, savoring the warmth of her touch.

After a moment of comfortable silence, she asked, “I heard about the letters.”

Lansius exhaled deeply, awash in a mix of emotions. His recent victory had set off a chain of unexpected events, many completely beyond his control. And nothing could have prepared him for the response from Midlandia.

The triumph he had fought so hard to achieve now seemed to be pulling him further from his desires and closer to the chaos of war. On the other hand, it had also opened the door to great opportunities.

 

***

 

Chapter 28

Lord of Korelia

 

A gentle autumn breeze brushed against the grey canvas of the field tent, causing the edges to flap lazily in the morning sun. Standing at Lansius’ side, Audrey looked stylish in her tailored black dress. It was barely a few months old, a gift from Lord Bengrieve, their benefactor. Contrasting that, a worn belt adorned her slim waist. The same one that she had worn when they first met last year.

Lansius thought the black dye used for that dress was worth a fortune. He still couldn’t fathom why they treated Audrey so well. A tingle of suspicion was always on the back of his head. “Who told you I received letters? Calub?”

“I doubt anyone will miss fifteen mounted armed guards escorting two carriages,” Audrey replied as she continued to massage Lansius’ shoulder.

Lansius licked his lips and felt that he might be overreacting. Messengers from high-ranking nobles usually came with armed men for protection which easily attracted unwanted attention. “I got two letters. One from Lord Bengrieve and another from Sir Stan.”

“What do they say?” Audrey asked.

“Sir Stan, your adopted brother, is praising us for our surprising victory. He also sent sizeable gifts to commemorate it.”

“I’ve noticed the fully loaded carriages. How about Lord Bengrieve’s letter?”

“That’s the tricky one,” Lansius exhaled sharply.

“I doubt it’s that bad,” Audrey said as she kneaded his shoulder.

“Well, he… congratulated me for a brilliant victory.”

“That’s a good start.”

“But he rejected my pleas to send one of his captains along with fresh troops to take over Korelia.” Lansius exhaled deeply.

“That means we’re not going back then,” Audrey said, surprisingly calm.

“You don’t look unhappy?” Lansius asked.

“Why should I? Better to reign on the farm than serve in a castle,” she said eloquently.

Lansius tried hard not to grin at the wise words. Her education in Toruna was showing its fruit.

“Is that all he said?” Audrey asked.

“He thinks I’m foolish for believing that Midlandia would want to endeavor into another Lowlandia territory. I guess the least they want is to open an even wider front... He also calculated that it’ll be hard to achieve peace, with all the neighbors at each other’s throats, thus requiring great manpower just to keep the peace. And all that for a province with nothing but a sea of grassland.”

“Go on,” Audrey encouraged. She sensed that the more Lansius spoke, the more at ease he became.

“Umm... since we won the battle and were able to make an interesting deal with Lord Robert, he instructed me to… rule and survive.”

Audrey’s fingers froze. "Rule?"

Lansius met her gaze. "He offered me this land if I could survive."

She took a step back. “Lans, that means lordship. Korelia is a Barony."

Lansius let out a deep exhale, trying to downplay the issue. “The title may sound grand, but while the land area is huge, Korelia's worth a mere fraction of Sir Stan's Toruna. It's all bark and no bite.”

“Did he really offer you that?" she asked in disbelief.

He looked up briefly, gathering his thoughts before revealing, “Attached to the letter is a vellum bearing the seal of the Lord of Midlandia. It's a duplicate of a recommendation letter for patent to the High Court."

Audrey gasped and covered her mouth.

Clutching his fur coat tighter, Lansius added, "I don't know what Bengrieve's scheme is, but that's what he's offering."

Barely recovered from her surprise, Audrey tapped Lansius' shoulder. "You realize it's still a grand offer?"

"A grand prize for a grand risk," Lansius quipped. “Lowlandia’s feuds run deep. Everybody has a claim to another’s land. Soon, they’ll be knocking on our door with a siege engine."

Audrey was still at a loss for words, so Lansius continued, "That Bengrieve is dangling a prize in front of his pet and waiting to see whether I'll bite or not."

Dangling a morsel in front of a mongrel, was a known proverb in Midlandia. It meant that it was likely a ruse, because the master would always eat it and leave only scraps for the pet. Still, Audrey sensed something was amiss, “Lord Bengrieve is taunting you."

Lansius caught her eyes. "Even if he is, my hands are too small for a prize like this. It’s unthinkable to defend Korelia against a siege without reinforcement from Midlandia.”

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

“I say we risk it,” Audrey declared.

Lansius chuckled but went quiet after sensing her serious gaze.

“You’re making ditches and fences, also inviting blacksmiths, carpenters, fletchers. Don’t tell me you didn’t come prepared," she pointed out.

A hint of a smile was on Lansius’ lips. Noticing that, Audrey leaned closer and whispered, “I know your ambition too well, My Lord.”

Lansius blushed at her words and tried to refute them. "You know well that I just want a peaceful place to live," he said.

Audrey played along with his game. "You still thinking about returning to village life?"

"I have to say that I still fancy the idea," Lansius admitted. "No politics, no responsibility, no guilt." To live as a hunter in a distant village like Torea was Lansius' go-to escapist imagination.

But Audrey didn't share his enthusiasm. "I only see hardships," she remarked grimly. "Hunting weekly, butchering game, stitching my own torn cloth. Stuck in rainy seasons and only visiting town a few times a year for supplies."

Lansius chuckled at her answer.

Undeterred, Audrey continued, "I'd rather live in a big city with a servant who does groceries. But then, I prefer to eat out when the weather's nice. Also, watch plays or go to the festival," she finished with a smile. "Trust me, I've been there. Secluded life isn't fun."

Lansius couldn't help but tease her. "And what about cooks? You often say it's a necessity."

"Indeed," Audrey replied. "I need someone who can indulge me with a variety of seasonal dishes for lunch. Glazed fire pit roast for supper. And don't forget a maid who'll help this lady bathe and dress."

The image of this stiff-faced cavalry captain being pampered like a princess sent Lansius into a fit of laughter. Normally, Audrey would hit him when he laughed at her expense, but this topic turned out to be an exception. Audrey looked proud of her jest, even delighted.

Despite his laughter, Lansius felt that Audrey's dream was justified. She had gone through so much in her life: driven out of her family, lost her Knight Master, and been a victim of war twice, even almost sold into slavery.

"How about marrying a Baron?" Lansius teased.

"I hope not the small Barons who till the land and shear sheep," Audrey replied almost deadpan.

The image of himself dressed in gaudy clothing, wielding shears against a flock of sheep made Lansius laugh. "All title, no substance," he exclaimed as if venting out frustration.

Audrey happily added, "All glitter, but not gold."

Their shared laughter conveyed a deeper understanding between them.

Afterward, the wind picked up again, causing the canvas above them to flap noisily. Feeling the chill in the air, Audrey signaled their entourage in a separate tent to ready the horses. She then turned to Lansius with her last concern: “Was the battle that hard on you?”

Lansius tried to shrug it off, but the memories were still fresh in his mind. “The battle was gruesome,” he admitted. “But what shocked me the most was the aftermath.”

This memory triggered a wave of guilt inside him. Around forty had fallen in battle, but almost a hundred had died after from blood loss, infection, and gangrene. Despite Calub’s stockpile of alcohol, Lansius’ knowledge of sanitation, and his order not to perform bloodletting, they still lost that many.

“I seriously think that you got sick because you exerted yourself too much,” Audrey disagreed.

“Is that so?”

“You were doing so many things, taking care of the wounded, also the deal with Lord Robert.”

“Well, there are so many things to do. Our men need treatment, supplies, and housing. And I certainly can’t treat Lord Robert and his men badly, since I wanted them as allies.”

“See? You’re doing too much,” Audrey replied warmly. “Next time, put more faith in your subordinates. After all, it’s not your first time leading men into battle.”

Lansius felt a weight on his mind. “You know, the first time I led men into battle was against slavers, and I didn’t pity them. But the last time... I don’t hold any grudges against The Lion and his men.”

“Lans, we’re not fighting without a cause. The end goal is to get our home back. That’s as noble as it gets.”

Lansius disagreed with her take but realized that modern values were not always applicable in this feudal world. He reminded himself that Audrey was born and raised in this society. Still, he tried to explain his stance. “Trampling on others who are not our opponents to advance our cause isn’t exactly noble.”

Audrey almost laughed. “Nobles fight, and men die all the time for lesser causes. A little blood on our hands is tame compared to them.”

Lansius understood that Audrey was merely pointing out the reality, but he couldn’t help feeling a churn in his stomach. “I’m not heartless. Witnessing men die haunts me.”

“You’re a softie, you know,” she remarked.

“Sorry, but not sorry.“

“Hey, I didn’t mean it badly.” Audrey turned to face him. “I mean, I actually like it that way.”

Her words surprised him.

“What’s the word…? Ah, compassionate heart! Perhaps you’re the rare kind of noble who could rule with one,” Audrey remarked, teasing him gently.

“I take that as a compliment?”

“Rightly so, My Lord,” Audrey exclaimed, baring a rare cute smile.

Lansius noticed a squire, a pageboy, and a cup-bearer girl coming from a smaller tent in the distance, leading the horses.

“Can’t we choose older candidates?” Lansius asked, feeling bad for employing underage children.

Audrey shook her head. “They’re the lucky ones. Their parents fought hard to put them into your entourage. And that was before Lord Bengrieve said anything about making you a Baron.”

Lansius looked Audrey in the eyes. “Do me a favor, even if I’m a Lord, call me by my name as usual.”

“Not possible, My Lord. At least not in front of people.”

As her hair swayed in the wind, Audrey continued, “You know, the locals speak ill of the wind. They believe it carries diseases and miasma.”

Lansius nodded. Even with his fur coat, he wasn’t feeling all that well. “You’re right. Let’s head back.”

Without waiting, the two walked toward their entourage.

⠀

***

⠀

In the first month of fall, 4424, Lansius declared himself as the new Lord of Korelia. He claimed to receive support of Midlandian nobles. This news spread quickly, and Lord Robert of White Lake confirmed the transfer of ownership and pledged his support to Lansius.

Lord Robert's support was driven by his own predicament. As a fallen Lord, he and his House faced the possibility of ruin or exile. Even if Robert had escaped to his castle, life would not have been the same. His own nobles would betray him and plan to oust him from power.

Lansius' decision not to imprison or exile Robert and his loyalist came as a surprise to Robert and he knew it was his House's last chance to survive in Lowlandia politics. In their struggle, Robert and his loyalists grew to rely on Lansius' mutual support.

This bond was further strengthened when Lansius made generous terms, allowing Robert to rule nominally as the Lord of White Lake. This was in stark contrast to the brutal takeovers often seen in Lowlandia.

Lansius' aim was only to claim a portion of White Lake's income instead of ruling directly. To ensure submission, he integrated a portion of Robert's men-at-arms and stationed them in Korelia. He also incorporated neighboring estates owned by Robert's knights to gain their service.

However, Lansius was not the only one making moves. Behind the harvest and festivities, the seeds of conflict were being planted and set in motion in the shadows.

⠀

***

 

Chapter 29

Unseen Hands

 

Korelia Castle and town were perched atop a plateau, providing a breathtaking view of the vast steppe that stretched out in all directions. The castle towered high on the hill, while the town was nestled on one side. The people of Korelia relied on a small stream that flowed from a nearby river for their survival.

To the north of Korelia lay their only forest, a verdant expanse of towering trees that stretched as far as the eye could see. In stark contrast, the eastern side of the region was characterized by sheer cliffs and treacherous, rocky terrain that posed a challenge for even the most skilled climbers.

Despite the presence of a meandering stream, the area had little arable land for farming, and most of the townsfolk were shepherds who tended to their flocks of sheep, goats, and ducks that grazed on the sea of grass.

Located halfway between the east and west parts of Lowlandia, Korelia had the potential to become a trade hub. However, the city’s small population and the long arduous journey to the west discouraged most traders from doing business.

Despite being economically meager, Korelia was strategically significant as it served as the gateway between the east and west. Its possession meant military supremacy over the entire Lowlandia, and every ambitious lord sought to control it. While no House ever united the entire province, the greed-fueled vision persisted.

The unforeseen losses suffered by Lord Robert, coupled with the unexpected emergence of Lansius as the new Lord of Korelia, shattered the precarious balance of power in the region. Almost instantly, the wheels of war turned once more, and the people of Lowlandia braced themselves for the inevitable storm that was to come.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle.

Two weeks had passed since Lansius declared himself the new acting Lord of Korelia. There was no ceremony or preparation simply sending letters to adjacent neighbors of the change. Because of this, the Small Council chamber was abuzz with clerical and administrative tasks. Inside, two men worked tirelessly facing each other across a long mahogany table.

Hugo glanced up from his work and asked Calub, who was poring over a scroll, “What do you make of our Lord’s relationship with Audrey?”

Calub raised an eyebrow but didn’t look up. “What’s prompted this sudden interest?” he asked.

“Well, I just think it might be good if they marry,” Hugo chuckled as he spoke.

"Midlandia wants Lansius to wed a nobleman’s daughter to secure his position," Calub reminded him. "I believe Lord Robert’s daughter is the prime candidate.”

“I’m aware, but with them already allied, there’s little to gain,” Hugo gave his take and later added, “Meanwhile, the rumors are wild, I tell you.”

“Really?” Calub asked and gave full attention to Hugo.

Hugo leaned over and lowered his voice. “Well, for a young and successful man without a lover. There are all kinds of rumors, some even whisper about his virility.”

Calub exhaled deeply, sounding both amused and tired. "Give the man a break. He should have a good reason.”

“Well, the guys were just curious why he remains unmarried,” Hugo defended his men passionately, but he had exhausted the topic.

The two men returned to their work, busily tackling the daily tasks of running the small town. They were responsible for feeding and clothing soldiers for the winter, managing supplies, overseeing construction projects, and more.

Most of the clerical duties understandably fell into Calub’s hand. As a member of the Merchant-Alchemist guild, Calub was highly educated and had taken on most of the clerical duties, including the role of Lord Lansius's treasurer. Meanwhile, Hugo’s background was more of a warrior, a squire with an enviable commanding experience.

Calub finally finished cross-checking Lansius' calculations. These were the projected incomes for Korelia.

 

Stolen from Royal Road, this story should be reported if encountered on Amazon.

Calub mulled over the numbers. They looked impressive, but he knew the expenses would be equally staggering, especially considering the potential siege they anticipated next year.

As the man responsible for managing Korelia's finances and ensuring that everyone, from the men-at-arms to the servants, was paid, Calub was constantly busy. Still, he wasn't opposed to the idea of adding more men. He knew all too well that they still didn’t have enough. In the face of impending war, they needed every defender they could get.

While Lord Lansius managed to retain most of his forces with lucrative contracts, side jobs, and year-round housing and meals, a portion of their forces had returned to Midlandia. Anci and Thomas were among a dozen cavalrymen and scores of men who had returned.

As far as Calub knows, Anci wasn't interested in the affairs of Lowlandia. He was only there because Lord Arte wanted him to make a name for himself and for monetary gain. Meanwhile, Thomas was motivated by more personal reasons. He wished to protect Lansius, and after seeing Lansius win the battle and command an army, he felt his presence was no longer needed. His loyalty lay with House Arte.

Both returned to Lord Arte's side to act as escorts. The future Lord of Arvena, needed to make a personal appearance in the capital to plead his case and garner support. If he managed to gather enough, then a campaign to retake Arvena would be in sight.

Meanwhile, Sir Justin had been busy setting up his new manor just east of Korelia.

It was close to midday when Calub groaned, dropping a scroll into the table.

“Problem with the blacksmiths again?” Hugo asked.

“No, it’s bigger. The food price keeps rising,” Calub answered as he rested his back against the chair.

Hugo knitted his eyebrows. “But the harvest is not even last month?”

Calub sighed. “Indeed, but the price won’t come down.”

“That’s funny... Do we need to buy supplies from other towns?” Hugo suggested.

“I’m afraid we can’t. The letters say it’s the same everywhere,” Calub replied.

“In all Lowlandia?” Hugo was alarmed. “This doesn’t sound right... Anything we can do about this?”

“Not much, I’m afraid. The merchants noticed the disturbance and kept their stock tight,” Calub said pessimistically.

Hugo's instincts told him that something was off. "Do you suspect foul play?"

"I do," Calub replied. "They want to limit our supply. They're probably planning for a siege next year."

Hugo was alarmed. "Has Lord Lansius been informed?"

Calub shook his head. "No, he's still recovering. I don't want to burden him with this."

Hugo made up his mind. "I'll talk to Audrey first. This is too urgent to ignore."

He left the council chamber in search of Audrey, knowing that rising food prices could lead to famine and spell disaster for Korelia. The town's people were not wealthy enough to have food surpluses, and many depended on trading their livestock for grains to survive the winter.

If grain prices were rising high, then nobody in Korelia could afford it. With their troops stationed in the town, the shortage would only worsen. Famine was a dreaded word in this world, and if it were to strike Korelia, no strategy they possessed could save them from utter destruction.

 

***

 

Lansius had started to feel better this week, and despite Audrey’s wishes for him to rest longer, he was determined to check on the forest to the north. So, today they went for a ride, accompanied by ten riders and his entourage. At Lansius’ insistence, nobody walked. Audrey rode with the blonde cup-bearer girl, and Stirling, the new squire, shared a ride with the pageboy.

Although many believed he was merely bored with the castle, Lansius was conducting a general inspection. After an hour or two, they returned to the castle.

As Lansius’ horses slowly climbed the small hill, they soon saw the sturdy oaken gate and the weathered stone curtain walls of Korelia castle. The castle had endured many sieges, some victories, but many more losses.

As their group approached the castle, the guardsmen stationed at the gate readily opened the heavy wooden doors with a creak. The sound echoed through the courtyard as Lansius and his entourage rode in, the clatter of their horses’ hooves filling the air.

In the distance, they could see Hugo and some of the staff waiting near the entrance of the imposing Great Hall.

They dismounted near the entrance, and the stable boy took care of the horses.

Lansius asked Hugo, “Did anything happen while we were away?”

Hugo replied, “No, My Lord, it’s been quiet around the castle.”

Lansius nodded while still getting used to being called a Lord.

“My Lord,” Hugo spoke again. “May I have a word or two with Lady Audrey?”

Audrey looked at Hugo questioningly.

Lansius chuckled and replied, “Sure, granted. Let’s not be too formal between us.”

“As you wish.” Hugo bowed his head slightly.

 

***

 

After a midday meal and some rest, Audrey informed Lansius about the rising grain prices. He froze momentarily but quickly formulated a contingency plan in his head.

He drank another cup of boiled water and went straight to the Small Council chamber, where Calub and Hugo were waiting for him.

“My Lord,” the two rose from their seat.

“Help is coming,” Lansius tried to liven the mood, but deep inside he was deeply troubled.

Audrey closed the door behind them as Lansius headed straight for the wooden cabinet, where he kept his scrolls and parchments. He rummaged through it for some time, but despite his efforts, he couldn't locate the specific item he sought.

“My Lord, why don’t you tell me what you need and let me search for it?” Calub offered to assist.

“It’s alright, Calub, maybe I missed it the first time,” Lansius said with a smile. He continued searching until he finally found the parchment he had been looking for.

Calub watched him intently as Lansius began to make calculations. “Not enough,” he muttered after a few moments.

Calub let out a weak sigh while Hugo looked troubled.

“Is it about the grain?” Audrey asked.

Lansius nodded, then paused. “Give me a moment. I need to think,” he said, walking to his seat and slumping down. Audrey and Calub followed suit.

I should’ve known... Starving an opponent is a valid tactic, and price manipulations are as old as history. This also means we’re up against a capable opponent. Nasty and morally questionable, but possibly a genius.

The looming threat of famine could undo everything they had worked hard for in Korelia. If the people and troops rebelled due to food shortages, their defenses would be rendered useless.

Sitting across the large mahogany table, Hugo coughed once before speaking up. “My Lord, I can arrange to get supplies from White Lake. I reckon we could make three return trips before winter sets in.”

Lansius looked at Hugo and replied, “I believe Robert is in the same situation. After our last battle, he needs fresh supplies. Asking him for food right now will risk a revolt from his men.”

“Can’t we just purchase more food? I know it’s expensive, but we got the money, right?” Audrey’s bluntness loosened up the tension somewhat.

“Well, we could buy enough, but at this price, that would put a big hole in our treasury,” Calub remarked.

Lansius disagreed, “We can’t do that. If we suddenly buy a great sum of food, the price will rise higher. Then everybody, including our allies, will suffer.”

Lansius’ explanation caused Hugo to cross his arms and exhale deeply in frustration. “We’re really in a mess then,” he muttered.

Silence hung heavily in the room as Lansius stared blankly at the ceiling, lost in thought. Meanwhile, Calub furrowed his brows as he scanned his scrolls, hoping to find a solution.

It had only been two weeks since their proclamation, and the emerging forces in Korelia had already witnessed the cruelty of the neighboring Lowlandia Lords. Their gift to Lansius for his daring declaration was a famine in the face of their first winter.

 

***

 

Chapter 30

Fog of Famine

 

The chill of autumn crept through the small window of the Small Council chamber, causing shivers among those gathered inside. Within the nerve center of Korelia’s bureaucratic operations, the new Lord and his most trusted retinues strained their minds against the looming threat of famine.

Despite their efforts, they were still struggling to devise a plan.

“Say, Korelia's townsfolk are mostly herders, right?” Audrey brought up an interesting point. “Can’t they survive by eating the livestock?”

“A butchered lamb can feed a family for two weeks. But if you trade that lamb, you can get enough grain to last more than two months,” Calub explained from a practical standpoint.

Audrey nodded in agreement with Calub’s explanation.

Meat is many times more expensive than grain. To survive winter with just meat would be impossibly expensive.

Lansius had a sudden idea. “What’s the current price of food in Midlandia?” he asked.

Calub quickly searched through his scrolls. “It’s normal,” he replied. “In fact, the price of grain in Midlandia is currently at its lowest.”

Turning to Hugo, Lansius’s mind was already focused on the most efficient way to travel. “Can we travel directly to Midlandia?” he inquired.

“We can,” Hugo answered with a renewed spirit. “We’ll need cavalry escorts to deter outlaws, but that's easy to arrange.”

“Hold on,” Calub interjected. “We only have ten narrow horse-drawn carts. They’re narrow and can only hold three barrels. If we want to transport larger quantities, we’ll have to use the merchants’ wider carts.”

“Hugo, can the wider carts travel alongside ours?” Lansius asked.

“Speed and terrain may be a problem, but the ground is firm this season. I’m sure we can find someone who knows the route,” Hugo replied.

Lansius tapped the table softly, lost in thought. He realized that even with the fastest carts available, a second trip would be too risky. If winter arrived sooner than expected, they could get stranded. “That’s alright. We probably can only manage one trip,” he remarked.

Calub expressed his doubt, “Only one trip?”

Meanwhile, Hugo and Audrey exchanged surprised glances.

Calub pressed on, “Even if we managed to convince all the merchants to lend us their carts, we would only have around thirty at most.”

Audrey chimed in, “Still, thirty cartloads full of grain sounds like a lot to me.”

“It may be so, but the grain isn’t just for winter alone. We also need enough for next spring and summer. There’s no trade going on in spring with the roads muddy from winter and the start of the rainy season. Come summer, they’re probably already marching on us,” Calub warned.

Audrey clicked her tongue and looked at Lansius with concern. She had been the one who drove Lansius to claim Korelia instead of returning to Midlandia.

“It’s okay. War is inherently chaotic, but we can be flexible and adapt to changes.” Lansius tried to calm her down.

The chamber fell silent afterward.

Calub massaged his forehead, having been mulling over this problem since morning. Meanwhile, Lansius gazed at the ceiling to collect his thoughts.

Thirty carts… With one return trip, I can probably feed the troops with rationing, but there won’t be enough for the townsfolk to get through a famine.

He could follow Hugo’s suggestion of three return trips or settle with two, but he couldn’t shake the feeling that it was still too risky. There was always the potential for an unforeseen variable.

We have the money, but not the transport.

Lansius took a deep breath as he found his position ironic. Medieval-era transport was crude, inefficient, and largely ineffective.

If only there are other places to buy food… hang on... this isn't a food shortage.

In a fit of surprise, Lansius slapped the table, attracting everyone’s attention. “Get that cup-bearer, girl.”

The story has been illicitly taken; should you find it on Amazon, report the infringement.

“You’re that thirsty?” Audrey misunderstood and went to the door.

Lansius let it slide. “Ah, yeah, tell her to bring drinks too. We could use some refreshment.”

Non-council members were forbidden to enter the chamber, so their entourage waited outside.

Calub read through Lansius’ actions, but before he could voice his suspicion, a lovely-looking girl entered the chamber. Cecile’s hair wasn’t the usual brown, but a pale blonde.

“You asked for me, My Lord,” Cecile said gracefully with a hint of fear.

It was understandable, as she had only known Lansius for two weeks and rumors about the black-haired foreign Lord who defeated the Lion were rampant among the servants.

“Relax, nobody will try to harm you,” Audrey said in a friendly tone as she snatched the embroidery-covered flask from Cecile’s hand and proceeded to pour drinks for them.

“I believe you can ride a horse?” Lansius asked Cecile as calmly as possible. He didn’t want to look brutish in front of a new employee.

“Indeed, My Lord. I’m able to ride,” Cecile replied.

“Good. Go with Carla and Stirling, and please summon Sir Callahan for me,” Lansius ordered gently.

Cecile was surprised, nonetheless, bowed gracefully, and left the room. Her father, Sir Callahan, was the first of Lord Robert’s knights, who switched allegiance to Lansius.

Soon, there was a knock on the door.

“Come in,” Lansius answered.

A female swordsman, who had gained fame in the last battle, entered the room with Stirling, the new squire.

“My Lord, I’ve been told to escort the cupbearer lady to her estate and summon Sir Callahan?”

“Indeed. Can I trust you two with this task?” Lansius asked.

“At once,” Carla answered firmly.

“Stirling,” Lansius called out before they left.

“My Lord,” the good-looking lad responded.

“Audrey mentioned that you’re a skilled rider and familiar with my horse’s temperament,” Lansius said, mulling over his thoughts but not hesitating. “I want you to ride it. If you can handle it, I’ll put you in the cavalry.”

Stirling’s eyes sparkled with excitement. “Yes, My Lord,” he replied, bowing slightly before closing the door behind him.

One of Lansius’ constant thoughts was to strengthen his cavalry, but there was also another more personal reason.

Audrey brought Lansius his cup. “He’s a good lad.”

Lansius nodded and took a sip of pale ale.

“I heard his knight master died in the trench,” Hugo chimed.

“A crossbow bolt to the jugular,” Lansius answered. “Likely mine.”

Audrey leaned in closer to Lansius, her voice low and serious. “His knight master was abusive. He hated him.”

“If you want to, I could rotate Roger with him,” Hugo suggested, fearing Lansius might feel guilty whenever he saw Stirling.

“No need. He’s under my care, now,” Lansius replied, taking a sip of ale and putting aside his guilt. He rested his back on the solid wood chair and tried to focus on the matter at hand.

Now that things are in motion. I've got to plan for contingencies.

Sensing a lull, Calub cleared his throat, gathering everyone's attention. “My Lord, you’ve yet to explain your plan?”

“Well, we can’t purchase grain in Lowlandia, so our only option is Midlandia,” Lansius explained ever so briefly.

“Midlandia’s prices are better, but it’s a month-long journey. We also don’t know how much the merchants would ask for their carts,” Calub reminded them.

“Who says I’m going to pay for their carts?” Lansius refuted his assumption, causing confusion to run over the trio’s faces.

Ignoring them, Lansius rose and approached the window for some cool breeze.

“Then how do you suppose…” Hugo’s face turned serious. “My Lord, do you intend to force them by arms?”

Lansius glanced at Hugo. “No, we don’t need to. Just tell them that we’re going to assemble a return journey to Midlandia. If they apply, then we’ll provide escorts for a small fee.”

“That’s all? You sure they would take it?” Hugo wasn’t convinced.

“Of course, merchants love cheap escorts. Also, there’s a big opportunity for profit in Midlandia,” Lansius explained passionately.

“I see… but why the fee?” Hugo asked curiously.

“Merchants are suspicious by nature.” Lansius snorted, “If they hear that something is free, then they’ll get worried about unseen risks.”

Hugo nodded slowly, impressed by Lansius’ explanation. He had never considered the merchant’s distrust, but it made sense.

Still, Calub saw a flaw in the apparent plan. “My Lord, we have no control over what the merchants will load into their carts,” he pointed out.

“I realize that. They may load other goods, but I reckon mostly grain and foodstuff because profit dictates so.”

“That solves one problem. Still, even if they all buy grain, a mere thirty cartloads won’t be enough. And there's no guarantee they’ll sell it cheaply when they return.” Calub’s words alarmed the room.

Hugo and Audrey stared at Lansius, who gestured for them to calm down.

“It’s true that thirty carts won’t be enough. After all, there are six thousand people in Korelia. It also true that it won’t be enough to push the grain price back to normal.”

Calub nodded and asked, “Then, My Lord, why are you smiling?”

“Eh?” Lansius licked his lips, trying to hide it from the rest.

“You have a plan?” Hugo was surprised.

“Lans!” Audrey vehemently protested. Like hungry wolves, they pressed him for an answer.

"Alright, I might have a solution, but it's a gamble and a risky one at that," Lansius finally conceded, revealing his plan. "First, we buy salt. Nothing but salt."

Everyone was taken aback. Before anyone could question him, Lansius motioned for silence and continued, "The issue with Korelia isn't grain; it's currency."

Calub instantly understood, having worked with the scrolls. "My lord, are you serious? You intend to pay people in salt?"

"Why salt?" Hugo inquired, looking puzzled, but was ignored.

Lansius let out a sharp exhale. "That's why I said it's a gamble."

Hugo cleared his throat. "I still don't understand, but how do you plan to pay for it? Even a cart is worth tens of gold coins."

Lansius licked his lips and murmured, "The Seneschal of Midlandia, our supreme benefactor, Lord Bengrieve."

Hugo groaned, while Audrey scoffed.

"My lord, please don't say you're taking a loan from him," Calub objected.

Lansius nodded resolutely. "It's better than facing a famine."

Their relationship with Lord Bengrieve had become strained after their recent victory. Furthermore, the Seneschal was a formidable figure in his own right. They owed him a great deal, and he held all their dirty secrets. Even Lord Arte and Lansius' family were at his mercy.

Calub sighed, realizing they had no other choice. He helped Lansius write two letters. Once finished, he dripped purple wax onto each, and Lansius used his newly minted silver signet ring to seal them.

"Do you think this will work?" Lansius asked Calub afterward.

Calub patted Lansius on the shoulder and replied, "It had better, or else..." He shook his head, leaving the consequences unspoken.

 

***

Chapter 31

Lion Tamer

 

The following morning, Lansius met with Sir Callahan at the castle. After a brief conversation, he shared the details of the plan and handed Sir Callahan letters to be opened in the presence of Seneschal Bengrieve of Midlandia.

Sir Callahan, Cecile’s father, was chosen for his charisma and intelligence, qualities that enabled him to effectively connect with both nobles and merchants. His blond hair bore evidence of his northern aristocratic lineage. With this background and gifts from Lansius, Callahan was expected to help smooth relations between Korelia and Midlandia.

Lansius also entrusted Sir Callahan with five keys to chests filled with gold, silver, and jewelry from their recent victory. Although there were five chests, they were intentionally filled to less than half capacity to mitigate the risk of an attack on the convoy or betrayal by one of their own.

Callahan was considered trustworthy enough to handle the vast sum of money involved. In this regard, his daughter’s employment at Korelia Castle served as an added layer of security, making Cecile akin to a hostage.

Without delay, preparations began, and news of a planned return trip to Midlandia with an armed escort spread throughout Korelia. Lansius gathered all the military carts he had and loaded them with leathers, furs, and other local commodities.

Since winter was approaching, he believed he could make a profit by selling these items to offset their expenses. As expected, all merchants who owned horse-drawn carts jumped at the opportunity. Affordable armed escorts and a direct route to Midlandia were too good to pass up.

By the end of the week, preparations were complete, and the last element of Lansius’ plan arrived. Sir Justin and forty riders, half of them were new recruits. Though satisfied with Sir Callahan, he wanted people from different backgrounds as an extra measure of protection to prevent collusion.

Now, with Sir Justin on the team, the convoy escort consisted of a diverse mix of Lowlandians, Arvenians, and Midlandians.

The following morning, just after dawn, Lansius bid farewell to the caravan and cavalry escort. Cecile’s farewell to her father was particularly emotional. The last time they had parted, Callahan had returned with a large gash on his back.

With a gentle stare and a nod, the two silently said their goodbyes. Cecile held back her tears until the caravan and her father were out of sight. The fate of Korelia now rested squarely on the caravan and its cavalry escort.

 

***

 

Three weeks after the caravan's departure, the air in Korelia turned dry, and a chilly wind blew from the north. Animals such as bears and foxes had gone into hibernation, signaling the onset of winter.

Despite the usual slow season, Korelia bustled with activity this year. Digging work accelerated, and two wooden towers were under construction. An enlarged, crude picket fence encircled the west side of the town, its sharpened tips positioned to deter cavalry attacks.

The upcoming war weighed heavily on Lansius' mind. After surveying the region, he realized that nothing would stop an enemy from the west from reaching Korelia Castle. With no river, bridge, or natural bottleneck, the open steppe left Korelia vulnerable. Despite its size, Korelia was like a city-state with only the castle and town worth protecting.

As winter approached, Lansius, faced challenges in improving his situation. The Lowlandian nobles predictably wouldn't build relations with him, as doing so would mean recognizing his claim over Korelia. Furthermore, he was a non-Lowlandian, non-noble, and not even Imperium-born, so his neighboring Lords would treat him like a pariah, lest they attract hatred from their peers.

Lansius planned to train his troops, but Sir Justin, his new Marshal, advised against it. Although Lansius introduced a new system and paid salaries, a Lord could typically muster his troops for only forty days, and Lansius had already exceeded that limit.

Quietly abandoning the plan, he recognized that the concept of a standing army was still foreign in this era. After surveying their billets, he also realized that he might be asking too much from his men. They were primarily Midlandians, this year they had marched, fought an uneven battle, and dug trenches to earn extra money. Now they spent their winter away from home to guard Korelia from daring surprise attacks. So, Lansius decided to tread carefully, lest his men grow resentful and desert.

Instead, he concentrated on bolstering defenses and producing crossbows. Interestingly, while no Lowlandian nobles sought him out, a steady stream of guests arrived, eager to meet the new Lord of Korelia.

Baronets, knights, and village elders with nothing to do in their lands after the harvest ended traveling to Korelia for hospitality, as was customary for a new Lord. They had no immediate reason for the trip other than boredom and the chance to enjoy a free feast at the new Lord's expense.

For Lansius, the guests were a source of constant annoyance. Because of them, he needed to dress up in bright, colorful, and uncomfortable tunics and fur coats to show his status.

He referred to them as his circus costume, but wearing them alone was not so bad. For him, the worst part was engaging the guests in pleasantries.

Lansius dreaded small talk. On a personal level, he found the exchange mostly hollow and superficial. He also had a lingering suspicion that people ridiculed him behind his back because of his crude language and abysmal social skills.

Nevertheless, his sense of responsibility and the presence of Audrey made him tolerate it. She became his social and emotional crutch in social events, giving him the confidence he rarely possessed.

As was customary, the Lord would dine together with his retinues, old and new, along with socializing with the guests.

The tale has been taken without authorization; if you see it on Amazon, report the incident.

That day, a pair of elderly knights had come to greet Lansius. Although they were too old to answer his call, Lansius wanted to show his benevolence and invited them to join him for supper in the Great Hall.

The airy hall was filled with a warm glow from the chandeliers, casting flickering shadows across the polished floor. The high ceiling soared above, supported by old but sturdy wooden beams.

Long wooden tables with benches ran down the center of the hall and were adorned with platters of roasted meats, loaves of bread, and bowls of steaming vegetables.

At the far end of the hall, a massive fireplace blazed, its crackling flames casting cheerful light and warmth throughout the room. The walls were decorated with tapestries of ancient battles, while at one end of the room stood a raised platform where Lansius and his closest companions sat.

A skald had just finished reciting an old poem about the tales of a heroic Lowlandian boy and a Midlandian princess.

The atmosphere was lively, filled with the sound of chatter and laughter, and the occasional clink of goblets being raised in toast.

“Well, as long as they didn’t brag about themselves for too long and don’t borrow money,” answered Lansius.

Audrey chuckled. Both had their share of wine.

“I doubt they’re that insidious, My Lord. They’re merely wanting to see the powerful Lord of Korelia.”

“The Black Haired Lion Tamer of Korelia,” Lansius corrected her.

Audrey smirked but tried to hide it, knowing that Lansius disliked that moniker. As she finished her meal, she noticed a small morsel remaining on her plate and delicately used her fork to tuck into it, attempting to eat it with grace and poise, like a lady.

“You seemed to enjoy this yourself, Lady Audrey?”

“Nonsense, I'd rather stand behind you in armor than wear this frilly gown.”

Lansius couldn’t resist himself. “Your clean plate clearly shows otherwise.”

“My Lord, food is food. I’m against letting a good meal go to waste.”

This time, Lansius chuckled. “You know, I always think lowly of a Lord that holds feasts in the face of a famine.”

Audrey snorted. She remembered how Lansius was against throwing a daily feast, but then he realized it was just a means to feed his retinue.

“A feast is hardly a party,” Audrey commented. “Just with a bit more food and entertainment. Besides, we have plenty of fresh meat available.”

Lansius nodded his head in agreement.

Due to the large number of herders in Korelia, there was an abundance of meat and poultry. However, the townsfolk could not survive on meat alone. They needed grains to sustain the population until the next harvest. Wheat and oats for the wealthy, barley and rye for the poor.

Lansius was acutely aware of this problem, but he had to push his concern aside for the time being, as he could do nothing but wait for the caravan to return.

He gazed upon the lively Great Hall and sighed.

Audrey noticed, so Lansius explained, "I feel bad letting Calub and Hugo labor hard while I'm enjoying a fancy supper."

She sipped her cup of watered wine and replied, “We need you to be healthy, My Lord.”

“So I can plow the land and pluck chickens in spring?”

It came so out of the blue that Audrey burst into laughter and frantically covered her mouth. Her innocent laughter made the hall even more pleasant.

Unbeknownst to them, the restrained affection between Lansius and Audrey became a sought-after interest for everyone in their presence. The love between a Lord and his squire was scandalous, but everyone, including the guests, was delighted.

They spoke highly of a man who chose to love his squire instead of some noble-born woman. After all, the Lowlandians were a hardy breed of people. They admired women who were strong and as capable as men.

This sentiment naturally grew because the region was often inhospitable and marred by frequent wars and conflicts.

As the feast ended, as was customary, the Lord and Lady Audrey were the first to retire. Leaving the Great Hall and walking through the inner corridor, they were accompanied by Cecile and Stirling.

The two new retinues were enjoying their work. Lansius had proven to be a just leader. Personally, they thought that the new Lord was too soft, but his reputation as a war leader was undisputed.

They grew to respect Lansius despite his lack of superior physical or social qualities.

They took the stairs, and Lansius turned around to address them. “Thank you for the day. You may retire now.”

“My Lord,” the two bowed their heads.

“Thank you and good night,” Lansius warmly said.

The two left the premises. Stirling headed to the Great Hall where squires and other male retinues slept for the night. Meanwhile, Cecile went to a room she shared with Carla and another servant.

Even without them, Lansius and Audrey couldn’t spend their time together. The guard posted on the stairs kept a watchful eye.

Lansius could tell them to leave, but that would arouse even a greater gossip.

That didn’t stop intoxicated Lansius from trying. “Don’t you want to come in?” he asked.

Audrey’s answer was a strong gaze that made Lansius blink and shudder. “It went off again.”

“Not sorry,” Audrey said with a pout.

Lansius grinned, remembering what the Magus they had befriended in Midlandia had said about Audrey’s eyes. She said they were not normal and likely the result of an unknown magic Audrey’s master had bestowed upon her without her knowledge.

“So, see you tomorrow?” Lansius asked.

Audrey nodded. “Good night, Lans,” she said with a smile and left for the night.

While Lansius was openly showing affection, Audrey was more reserved about it. She had grown to care for Lansius, but she feared she would be a hindrance.

Despite her expensive gown and silver accessories, Audrey knew she had no land or estate to her name, and her social status was unclear. Not even a bastard, her adoption into a baronet family held little weight.

Audrey couldn’t help but feel like a burden to Lansius, knowing that he would gain nothing from marrying her. As a rising star, it seemed inevitable that Lansius would eventually wed the daughter of another nobleman.

Pausing by a small window, Audrey took a moment to breathe in the cool evening breeze, a welcome respite from her swirling thoughts. Each day was a renewed struggle to maintain a careful distance from Lansius, yet each day, he managed to draw her in afresh, making her fall in love all over again. With these conflicting emotions swirling in her mind, she retreated to the sanctuary of her guest chamber for the night.

 

***

 

A week had passed, and a new day dawned in Korelia, marked by its bustling routine. Ever since the new Lord had settled, there had been no idle moment. Each day brought progress, whether in building inside or outside the city.

The defensive network advanced rapidly until today’s busy work was interrupted by a single cry. “They’re back, I’ve seen them. The caravan is back!”

Just after midday, the trade caravan from Midlandia was spotted in the distance. In droves, hundreds of men, women, and children rushed out to catch a glimpse of it.

The return of the caravan quickly became the highlight of the day. With rising grain prices, their return was filled with hope, especially for the most impoverished who could barely afford even the cheapest grain for their bread.

As they watched, they noticed an additional ten horse-drawn carts. Now, there were forty carts of different sizes, accompanied by a hundred cavalry escorts. For the first time in weeks, the most impoverished had a sparkle in their eyes. Not even the hot midday sun could dampen their spirits.

As the first caravan made its way into the city, a wave of cheering erupted, filling the air with excitement and anticipation.

The jubilant crowd soon discovered that the ten additional carts were a gift from the Lord of Midlandia to commemorate Lansius’ victory, and the news spread like wildfire. The cheers grew louder, echoing through the main road and into the surrounding streets. It was a moment of pure joy and celebration.

The merchants wasted no time, quickly unloading their goods at their respective shops and immediately opening for business. Hundreds of eager customers lined up to purchase the affordable grain, with the long queue lasting until sundown.

For a few days, the arrival of affordable grain led to a dip in local market prices. However, this brief respite was short-lived, as prices began to rise again on the fourth day.

Despite the arrival of the grain caravan, Korelia’s situation only experienced a slight improvement before continuing to decline. The crisis had not been averted, and Calub’s words of caution rang true.

 

***

 

Chapter 32

Little Timmy

 

Despite the grain caravan’s success, the relief it brought to Korelia was short-lived. The price of grain dipped for a few days, before steadily rising again.

The next morning, Lansius visited the worksite, accompanied by Calub, Cecile, Carla, and Stirling, along with two guards who provided security.

Arriving while the sun was still in the east, he closely inspected the progress made on the site, ensuring the ditches were deep enough and equipped with a simple sewer system to prevent mud accumulation.

He also checked the nearly finished picket fence. Though rough and crude, it should serve as an effective deterrent. Now, not only the castle, but also the town, had additional protection measures.

While a wall or a wooden palisade would be better, Korelia didn’t have the timber and resources to build one. Even the picket fence may put some strain on Korelia’s only forest for decades to come.

In this regard, Lansius envied the Romans whose region could supply them with endless timber for fortifications. Compared to them, Lowlandia was akin to the Eurasian steppe.

Satisfied with the inspection, Lansius approached the wooden tower, which was halfway completed. Calub had informed him that the platform could be used to address the men.

Lansius climbed up and gazed at the numerous workers toiling away on the defenses. He took a deep breath, but the tension refused to leave him. Nevertheless, he turned to Stirling and said, “Go ahead. Get their attention.”

Stirling nodded, turned towards the workers, and bellowed in a loud, crisp voice, “Attention, all! You stand in the presence of the Lord of Korelia! Gather around and listen!” His energetic tone made his presence felt.

The workers took notice, dropped their tools, and gathered around. Lansius saw many familiar faces, mostly the troops that had stayed with him since the previous year.

“Please, do not be alarmed. I am here to speak with you briefly,” Lansius said, projecting his voice so that everyone could hear him over the sounds of wind and other noises. “First, it’s the third day, so we’re here to pay for your work.”

This announcement attracted short cheers from the crowd.

“It’s usually the treasurer’s job, but there’s a slight change. Today, we’re giving you a new option… You can choose to be paid in cash or salt.”

At the mention of salt, there were murmurs among the crowd.

“The usual rate is three days of work for two silver coins. Now, I can offer you a cup of salt for the same-“

The crowd grew lively all of a sudden.

“Order! Order,” Stirling shouted, trying to maintain control.

“Three days of work for a cup of salt. The rate stays until winter ends,” Lansius paused. “Next week, the ground will probably be too hard to work on. However, the workshops will be ready.”

The crowd listened intently.

“I’ll pay the same rate for the workshop. Two silvers or a cup of salt-“

Just like a beehive being struck, the crowd was buzzing. Their faces were overjoyed. For many, their biggest fear of not having enough food for winter was now allayed.

“Order, say your piece after the Lord is done.” Stirling tried to rein in the crowd.

“The workshops will remain open throughout the winter, and if you choose to work there, while it won’t be much or taste as good, we’ll provide you with two free meals a day.”

At this point, the crowds just couldn’t believe what they heard, leaving Lansius to continue his speech. “We will also provide firewood for the night, and those who do not have access to firewood for their families can spend the night there.”

Again, there was only a little cheering. Instead, all Lansius got were murmurs and a different kind of look from the crowd.

If you find this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the infringement.

Did I say something wrong?

However, Lansius pressed on. “Lastly, the small amount of salt you’ll get probably won’t be enough for meat curing. So I’ve ordered the castle, just for this winter, to buy more fresh meat and we’ll pay in salt. A bucket of salt for a fat lamb, less for smaller ones.”

Despite Lansius’ expectations, the crowd reacted differently. Doubt was etched on their faces.

Calub took the stage after Lansius had said his piece.

I’m really not a good speaker…

Lansius thought as he descended from the tower.

"Fellow Korelians," Calub began, addressing the crowd. "I have the Lord's speech in writing. The town crier will share the details in the main plaza over the next few days. With that said, let's get down to business."

Afterward, Calub started the roll call, and each worker was given the option of taking coins or salt.

Now, only time would tell if Lansius’ plan would work or fail.

 

***

 

Timmy.

Last summer, little Timmy lost his job, shelter, and meals when the family he worked for faced difficulties due to a livestock stillborn disease that had afflicted their herd.

Timmy joined forces with other similarly unlucky children and resorted to begging for alms or food in the streets of Korelia. Although his situation was dire, he wasn’t the unluckiest. Little Tia held that title, having lost her flock to a wolf attack, which also left her with a limp.

The children formed a group to survive. Tia’s knitting skills came in handy for making winter clothes from scraps of leather or unused rags. However, they struggled to find food.

It was a well-known fact that the poorest inhabitants of Korelia faced a bleak fate every winter. Korelia was a harsh place to live. Its winter mercilessly culled those unfortunate enough to lack food, fire, and shelter.

A shepherd family without enough livestock faced hunger or death. It was a deadly dilemma.

Butchering too many of their herd would make them poorer the following year, but butchering too few could lead to the loss of a family member from hunger.

Timmy lost his last aunt and several friends the previous winter, and this year, it might be his turn. This year, the situation was even more dire as food prices rose so high, making it unaffordable for most.

After the harvest was over, there was very little work to be found, and many resorted to pickpocketing and even robbery.

Before the situation became critical, the new Lord took over. They called him Black Haired Lion Tamer, and his reputation preceded him, leading many to expect the worst.

Unexpectedly, the new Lord initiated a series of works with the promise of pay. Most of the work involved digging trenches just outside the town. It hardly required any specific skills. Naturally, many of Korelia’s poorest applied, including Timmy.

Sadly, little Timmy was deemed too small.

However, many of the older kids in his group were accepted. The promise of pay materialized every three days. They were ecstatic. For the first time, they could sleep with a full stomach.

The work and pay continued to enable them to sustain themselves. But they knew winter was coming. Fear lingered in their minds that there would be no work if they couldn’t dig as the ground froze in winter.

As luck would have it, the situation improved when a much-talked-about caravan arrived, and grain prices dropped, much to everyone’s delight. But the price drop was short-lived.

For the poorest in Korelia, even with all their savings combined, they could only secure a paltry amount of grain.

That close to winter, things were looking grim. Many joked about the Lord’s digging project, which would be a fitting burial site for them.

Then one day, the Lord showed up and offered payment in salt. The poorest took the offer and ran to the market to trade their cup of salt for grain.

For them, it was nothing less than a miracle. The amount of grain they received from trading a cup of salt could feed a person through winter.

Suddenly, the situation changed rapidly for the better. Many were called back by their shepherd master. Now that everybody had salt, they gathered what they had and started a meat-curing process.

More and more shepherds sold their livestock for salt and gained enough to produce sausages, corned meat, and even meat jerky. Processed meat products fetched a high price at the market and boosted Korelia’s meager economy for the upcoming year.

Timmy and Tia weren’t the lucky ones. There was no work available for children and the crippled, but that didn’t deter them. They heard about the workshop that provided free meals twice a day and a working fireplace every night.

It sounded too good to be true, and naturally, there was a big crowd of applicants. Unsurprisingly, the two weren’t accepted but permitted to spend the night.

Their first evening spent in the workshop would forever be etched in their memories. The warmth of the roaring fireplace, fueled by an abundant supply of firewood, provided a comforting reprieve from the biting cold outside.

To their delight, they were even given a woolen mat to sleep on, which felt like a luxurious treat. The skilled craftsmen employed by the Lord kindly offered the children gruel in exchange for their help with cleaning.

During the day, they were assigned simple tasks, and in return, they received a slice of bread and a bowl of hearty stew, ensuring everyone had enough to sustain themselves.

As winter settled in, the first snowfall was quickly followed by a blizzard. Timmy and Tia watched and learned as craftsmen, carpenters, and apprentices crafted crossbow parts, strings, and bolt shafts.

The situation in the workshop was far from ideal, but now even the likes of Timmy and Tia could survive Korelia’s winter and hope for a better future.

Hundreds, if not thousands, of Korelia’s poorest residents, shared the same sentiment. Whether they were daily laborers, shepherds, orphans, or destitute townsfolk, they were all equally grateful. Under the rule of the new foreign Lord, they sensed they could not only survive but also thrive in Korelia.

Though they had not yet fully placed their trust in him, they were beginning to see him as their beacon of hope.

What had started as a move to prevent an uprising had inadvertently galvanized support at the grassroots level. Unbeknownst to Lansius, he had mobilized the entire Korelia to his cause.

 

***

 

Chapter 33

Salarium

 

Winter had arrived in Korelia, and the landscape had turned into a beautiful white blanket of snow. As was the norm, many of the original staff had gone on leave to spend time with their families. However, this custom was not for the benefit of the staff, but mostly due to the constraint of the castle’s design.

Built mainly as a defensive structure, it had limited living space. When the outside castle ground was buried in snow, the castle’s inhabitants were forced to conduct all their activities in the Great Hall.

This winter, around twenty staff, a dozen retainers, and guardsmen shared the castle’s limited living space.

Despite the lack of space, they carried on with their daily activities. Training, lunch, downtime, supper, and sleeping were done in the Great Hall. There, the younger staff members learned to read and write under the tutelage of their seniors, while some even practiced poetry, music, or singing.

The place was lively, but despite Lansius’ effort to free some space; comfort and personal space were still a challenge.

As for Lansius, he spent most of his time in the Great Chamber, a private place reserved only for the Lord’s family. Without one, he surrounded himself with his closest circle around the large fireplace.

The chamber was a good place to relax, with a high ceiling that made it airy and more spacious. Its walls were fully plastered and colored in pastel white, while the ceiling boasted colorful decorative plants and floral patterns.

In there, Lansius ate, read books, and chatted with Audrey, Cecile, and Stirling about everything. However, two topics were off-limits: his origin as a farmer in Bellandia and his true origin.

For Lansius, the time was a well-deserved break away from guests and other responsibilities. Only at the start of winter could he enjoy a peaceful dinner.

Not everything was as enjoyable as he wished. Every day without fail, Audrey would drag him for sword training and indoor archery.

Today, after sword and archery training, Lansius was talking with Stirling, who showed a keen interest in how Lansius’ had solved Korelia’s rising grain prices.

Lansius, bundled up in three layers of thick clothing and a warm fur coat, winced as he shifted in his padded chair, the bruises from a brutal sword sparring session still fresh on his skin. “First, tell me everything you know about the situation.”

Stirling, the only one standing in the room, straightened his back and gathered his thoughts.

The crackling from the fireplace filled the Great Chamber as they waited for an answer. Sitting next to Lansius, Audrey and Cecile also showed interest in the topic.

“My Lord, arranged for thirty carts to travel to Midlandia to purchase food.”

“Go on,” Lansius said.

“But while the merchants bought grains, My Lord ordered all ten of your military carts to buy salt secretly.”

“That’s correct. Please continue.”

“After that… My Lord paid the workers in salt. Also bought sheep and meat with salt. And then everybody seemed to have enough food for winter,” Stirling expressed his confusion.

Lansius smiled as Audrey and Cecile watched him intently. The two were also curious.

“Try to answer this question: is the problem in Korelia the rising price of grain, or the lack of grain?” Lansius prompted the group.

The lad and lass furrowed their brows, clearly thinking hard. Meanwhile, Audrey pursed her lips and looked away.

“You should give it a try,” Lansius encouraged.

Audrey held onto her golden fur coat tightly before stating, “I’m only interested in solving problems with steel.”

Lansius let out a chuckle. “You’ll make a poor Baroness if you think that way.”

“I only need the money, not the title,” Audrey responded without any hint of regret.

Lansius snorted and shook his head in amusement.

Meanwhile, Cecile and Stirling listened intently. As the Lord’s closest confidants, the two were privy to such information. While at first, the Lord and Audrey tried to conceal it, they eventually grew tired and displayed it openly in front of the two.

Lansius, thinking he had given enough time for Stirling to think, eventually asked, “So, what’s your answer?”

Stirling drew a deep breath before answering, “The problem in Korelia is the rising price of grain, not the lack of it.”

“Exactly. As was usual after harvest, there was enough grain in Korelia. The only problem is the price.”

Stirling nodded while Cecile, and Audrey kept looking with great interest.

“To lower the price, we could bring grain from outside, but we know it won’t be enough. After all, thirty carts of grain cannot feed a whole town and troops through winter and spring,” Lansius mused.

“That’s what happened, right?” asked Audrey.

Lansius nodded. “Indeed, the merchants bought twenty carts of grain, and the Lord of Midlandia gave us another ten. But that only pushes the price down for… four days? As more people buy, the price will always rise.”

Stolen novel; please report.

“Then, My Lord, why don’t you force the merchants to lower the price?” Stirling asked.

Lansius leaned forward, emphasizing his point. “A town needs merchants. They’re the ones risking their lives and money to bring goods to us. It’s not the nobles, but the merchants who purchase linens, medicine, or even a simple iron nail from other places and bring them through winding routes to Korelia.”

Lansius glanced at Cecile’s face and saw that the girl was also listening intently.

“Coachmen and guardsmen need to eat and place to sleep, right?”

Cecile nodded quickly. “Of course, My Lord.”

“And those cost money, correct?”

“They do. Even horses need fodder, and it’s not free,” answered Cecile.

Lansius chuckled. “Smart lass. You make your father proud.”

Cecile blushed and found herself staring at the stone floor. Audrey patted her on the back gently, saying, “Take the praise and wear it proudly.”

Lansius focused on Stirling again. “Everything costs money. If you send people to buy things, you’ll rack up considerable traveling expenses. And those expenses will be counted toward the goods they carry. And only then they’ll take profit so they can embark on another journey.”

“But, My Lord what's this got to do with the price of grain?” asked Stirling.

“I wanted you to understand the merchants’ situation. Most of the time, they don’t govern the price. They’re merely buyers and sellers. If the price rises, they’re not the ones who are at fault.”

Stirling nodded deeply. The Lord just challenged what his cruel knight-master had taught him about merchants.

Lansius looked at Cecile and continued, “The merchants aren’t evil. They’re greedy, but mostly only motivated by profit. They have no schemes other than avoiding losses and getting a good trade.”

“Now that we have that cleared up, let’s move on to the topic of salt,” Lansius declared, sensing a growing interest. Deep into the winter, they had exhausted everything, so anything new was met with excitement.

“To me, salt is just another currency.”

“Currency, My Lord?”

“You have gold coins, big silver, and small silver, also copper and iron. Think of them as currency.”

“I see,” the young squire nodded his head. “But, why salt?”

Lansius reached into his purse and drew two silvers. “There are at least two good reasons. Name one and get a coin.”

“Because salt is useful in meat curing, My Lord,” the blonde blurted out.

“That’s correct and here’s your prize.” With a smile, Lansius put a coin into Cecile’s open palm.

“Gratitude, My Lord.”

“Now, is there any other reason?” Lansius asked the squire while showing a silver between his thumb and finger.

Stirling thought hard. “Because salt is expensive?”

Lansius smiled but balled his hand into a fist. “We all know that. In landlocked Lowlandia, salt is worth its weight in silver. Can you tell me the reason?”

“My Lord, salt has many uses. For medicine, cooking, also alchemy,” answered Stirling proudly.

Lansius motioned for Stirling to take the coin.

“Gratitude, My Lord,” the lad humbly accepted it.

The crackling from the fireplace again filled the chamber. This time, the flames had dwindled, and the embers were barely glowing. Cecile rose from her seat and hurriedly shoved two small logs of firewood into the fire.

“Salt is so expensive here. I've heard almost nobody in Korelia has even a plate of it in their homes,” Audrey commented.

“Only the richest and the town butcher have that much,” Cecile said as she returned to her seat.

Stirling stood uncomfortably. "But why is only My Lord buying salt? Why don’t the merchants buy grain too?”

“That’s because almost everybody in Korelia is poor. Merchants don’t stock items that people can't buy,” Lansius explained.

Lansius watched the ember in the fireplace grow brighter and decided that he had provoked enough critical thinking into them. “Let’s summarize,” he began. “First, we don’t have the resources or time to transport enough grain to Korelia to lower the price.”

The trio understood that much. Nobody batted an eye.

“So, what I did was to bypass the high grain price using salt. Remember, the problem isn’t a shortage of grain in Korelia.” Lansius paused. “There’s enough grain in Korelia, in the merchants’ storages.”

They showed slight surprise.

Lansius continued, “Our problem is the merchants. They can’t sell their grain cheaply because they follow the market to maintain their margin.”

“And salt fixed it?” Audrey asked.

“Yup. The value of ten carts of salt we brought from Midlandia could probably purchase enough grain to feed Korelia for more than two years.”

The trio’s eyes widened in disbelief at the amount of grain that could be purchased. They exchanged surprised glances before Audrey spoke up. “But then, why make it complicated? If the goal is just to buy grain, why can’t you use silver and gold to buy grain?”

“That’s the monster hiding in the shadows,” Lansius remarked. “If you use silver to buy grain, the price will keep increasing in Korelia and neighboring cities. You can say the merchants will have so much silver that they don’t want it as much as before.”

Lansius could see that the concept was difficult to understand, but he pressed forward nonetheless. “However, if you use salt to buy grain, the price increase is small.”

“But why?” Stirling asked.

Lansius chuckled. “But you have answered it already. Remember, salt has many uses: to cure meat, medicine, and all. Meanwhile, silver is only good for trade, making cutlery, or jewelry. Silver has little real usage for common people, unlike salt.”

The trio began to grasp the concept.

Lansius knew he had his work cut out for him if they wished to learn more, but for now, he was satisfied that they were trying to understand the basic principles.

“That’s why salt is just as acceptable as silver or copper. It's even better in our case because many Korelians can find real use for it.”

A currency that also has direct utility, imagine... No wonder the Romans loved it.

Lansius recalled how the word salary itself was believed to be derived from salarium or salt. Because the Romans once paid their soldiers with salt.

“I still don’t get it, but if it’s fixed, it’s fixed,” Audrey commented lightly while reaching out for her cup on the small table. Cecile readily filled her cup with pale ale.

“Though I’m still curious, how did you know that the merchants would react well with salt instead of the usual coins?” Audrey asked after she had sipped her drink.

“It was a gamble,” Lansius admitted. “But a currency that has real usage is powerful. It's resilient and stable. That’s why the merchants played along. They took the risk because they can sell salt easily for profit outside of Korelia.”

As he finished his explanation, Lansius leaned back in his chair.

Stirling rubbed his chin as he pondered. Suddenly, Lansius recalled something, “And you know what the funny thing is?”

The trio looked at each other but mostly shrugged.

“It’s only working for Korelia.” The Lord laughed, leaving his friend and two attendants puzzled.

Korelia was a special case. It had an unusually large number of poor shepherd families who benefited greatly from Lansius’ salt scheme. Salt was heavily used to preserve meat and make delicacies, such as sausages, ham, and long-lasting meat jerky.

Lansius hadn’t thought about it, but it was the missing component in Korelia’s nascent industry. With products to sell, many gained more than just enough to survive the winter.

Naturally, the same scheme wouldn’t work for other places whose main populace was farmers. A farming community didn’t need a large amount of salt. Thus, there was no incentive to take salt payment or use it as a bartering commodity.

Still, Lansius didn’t disclose everything. He kept the fact that his scheme to pay in salt was causing him to lose money, with a little loss on every payment. His treasurer, Calub, had raised concerns, but Lansius viewed it as an investment.

He wanted to give something to the people of Korelia, something for them to hope for other than just another war in the future.

But Lansius knew that despite averting famine, the threat of war loomed large. Despite all his preparations, there was a high chance that he would eventually need to abandon Korelia to its fate.

 

***

 

Chapter 34

The First Winter

 

Maester Calub, the Alchemist, Treasurer of Korelia

The harsh lady of winter had blanketed the Korelia landscape in fresh, pristine white snow. It was a cycle that had begun since time immemorial. At first glance, it appeared that nothing had changed in Korelia; the cold and bitter winds that battered the landscape were the same that their forefather endured.

However, upon closer inspection, one could see that the Korelians this year had a different look in their eyes. Warmer, but more vigorous, as they no longer had to abandon their unlucky neighbors to die at the height of winter.

Although nothing appeared to have changed from the outside, a long-lost hope had been rekindled within. Everywhere in Korelia, whether at home or in winter shelters, people spoke highly of the new Lord of Korelia.

The old mentioned his name in their toasts, while the young were eager to pledge their support to his cause. Not even the cold winter weather could dampen their spirits.

Likewise, the scrawny troops from Midlandia shared the enthusiasm. Typically, contract soldiers like them were only called upon for wars and left to fend for themselves during winter and spring. However, the new Lord was providing them with steady pay, winter quarters complete with food and blankets.

Although the Lord sheltered inside his castle, his name was on everyone’s lips.

Calub, who had recently bought a house in Korelia town before winter, faced daily questions about what the Lord was like. Everybody who met him at the workshop was curious - the carpenter, fletcher, and local merchants all wanted to know.

The alchemist, who knew little about Lansius, only divulged small details, fearing he might reveal things he shouldn’t have. Although he knew from Audrey that Lansius used to work as a clerk and a teacher, he had never worked as a merchant or noble. However, Lansius was suspiciously knowledgeable about trade, military, and leadership.

No wonder Lord Bengrieve wanted him as his henchman.

Lord Lansius remained a mysterious figure, even to his closest confidants. Audrey, who had known him the longest, still didn’t know everything about him.

Calub’s move to a house in Korelia town was done hastily. Along with Hugo and the rest, he had planned to just stay in the Great Hall for winter. While as the treasurer, he had a separate room, but it was almost ancient and unsuitable for winter.

When Lansius heard about this, he urged Calub to buy a house in town, preferably close to the workshop, so he could easily reach the workshop if weather permitted.

Lansius was fully supportive of the move and even allowed Calub to bring along Margo, the pageboy, and Roger, who had recently recovered from his injury.

Calub was thrilled with the new arrangement. He was able to purchase a spacious two-story building with an attic at a discounted rate because the owner was keen to get into the new Lord’s good grace. But the most important feature was the cellar.

The house boasted a large stone-walled cellar that was perfect for his alchemy lab. With the winter downtime, he planned to replenish his dwindling supply of alchemy concoctions. Although he could conduct his experiments anywhere, he preferred not to do so in the castle, as it posed a risk of fire or hazardous gas leaks.

For Calub, following Lansius’s leadership had been a highly rewarding experience.

Better than crawling in the depth of the earth. Seeking a rare find in dwarven catacombs.

The memory was bittersweet for Calub and his comrades. They had lost a dear friend in the labyrinth. That was when Felis and another member decided to call it quits. They had made a name for themselves, but reality caught up with them. Entering the labyrinth was always a gamble with their lives.

Calub had buried many friends in that place, but the last one was special. She was a fifth-generation beastgirl - tough, headstrong, and playful like a child. They had met when they were little and grown to become adept explorers.

Like many who arrived on the vast shore of Progentia, the old continent, they tried to better their lives and their family. One big haul of artifacts from the depth of dwarven catacombs would net them enough money for life.

However, the depths of that underground world were home to horrors that claimed the subterranean as their lairs.

This narrative has been purloined without the author's approval. Report any appearances on Amazon.

Calub and his last team were among the few lucky ones who returned mostly intact. With enough money for retirement, Calub officially entered the Alchemist guild, while Felis started a tavern in Feodosia.

As a member of the prestigious guild, Calub mingled with the educated class in Midlandia and was quickly enamored with a number of freethinkers. With his capital, he sponsored several projects. The most ambitious of which was the school for the commoners and landless gentry.

For the educated Midlandians far from the center of the Imperium’s seat of power, the world was changing. In Midlandia, there were more landless gentries than ever before, intellectuals, guild members, or entrepreneurs who stood on their own without farmland to support them.

People like Felis and Calub became part of this burgeoning new social class. Although the term landless was a mockery from the nobility, they wore it proudly as a token of their free-willed spirits unbound to the old idea of feudalism.

 

***

 

A similar situation happened to Hugo and his band of guardsmen. They had planned to sleep at the Great Hall but were sent to a mansion east of town. The mansion was old and only a portion of its fifteen rooms were in good condition, but this freed out quite a space for people who stayed behind in the Castle.

Hugo’s nascent infantrymen, a project of his Lord, happily received this order. This arrangement gave them more freedom to socialize with the townsfolk in between winter and heavy snow.

The benefits went both ways. With Hugo gone, the castle staff could relax a bit. Audrey was the only high-ranking staff member left in the castle, and she tend to overlook minor issues and avoid any actions that might demoralize the staff.

Lansius knew that winter was a harsh season, and he took every precaution he could to make sure that the castle ran smoothly.

 

***

 

Lansius, the acting Lord of Korelia

“Ugh…” Lansius panted weakly after reading the letter from Midlandia. Despite sending ten of Lowlandia’s finest horses, Bengrieve’s reply was still razor sharp. That was why he had delayed opening the letter brought by Sir Justin and Callahan.

Audrey, on the other hand, was lively. She leaned from her chair to hear Lansius better. “Is there any mention of me?”

“No, you’re safe,” he reassured her.

“So, what does it say?”

“Well, he thanked me for the gift, but I’m still getting lectured.” Lansius sighed. “He wrote that I shouldn’t do rash things like purchasing ten cartloads of salt. And also, he advised me against playing a hero.”

Their benefactor wasn’t keen on risky gambling. Securing ten cartloads of salt without advance notice wasn’t easy even for Bengrieve.

“That salts must've been really expensive,” Audrey commented.

“Yeah, it cost a fortune. It could pay for an army for ten months. Thankfully, the salt plan worked.”

“If it didn’t, then Bengrieve would…” Audrey left the sentence unfinished, grinning mischievously.

“No, please don’t say it. That’s too much,” Lansius pleaded, slouching in his seat.

“I’m still curious how Bengrieve decided to help you.”

“Well, I assured him that I’m his pet. Inside those five chests were all the wealth left from our victory. Now, I’m nearly penniless. There was only enough for troops and the castle staff’s expenses.”

Audrey nodded her head. “So no more building projects next year.”

Lansius shook his head.

She sipped her drink and changed the subject. “I’m still curious that five chests can purchase that much salt.”

“I borrowed a little.”

“Eh?” Audrey was surprised. “And what’s the collateral?”

“Besides my neck and my family, also you…” admitted Lansius.

“I figured…” Audrey let out a sigh.

“I tried to pawn this castle, but he didn’t see the value.”

Audrey snorted at the notion. “At least he sees value in us. So, how much are we in debt?”

“Well, the plate armor we ordered, even just partial sets, was still quite a sum. But no worries, I’ll work hard and shear lots of sheep next summer,” Lansius joked, making Audrey chuckle.

Lansius sensed that Lord Bengrieve was supportive of his cause. As if the seneschal was gambling on Lansius’ future victory for reasons Lansius had yet to decipher.

Is he that rich to give me big loans so easily? Or is it simply cheaper to send money than men to help Korelia?

As Lansius pondered Bengrieve’s inexplicable support for his cause, despite refusing to send any form of reinforcement, the sun’s intense rays baked his bedchamber walls, located on the upper floor of the castle. He had removed his fur coat and mittens, feeling the warmth.

The staff referred to his chamber as the Lord’s chamber. It was furnished with tapestries hung on the wall. Made from thick wool like a carpet, the colorful tapestry served as decorations as well as insulation. The castle’s stone brick was frigid during winter, and without the tapestries, the room would feel like cold storage.

“Well... at least you solved the famine. The people loved it. Everybody got enough grain for winter and salt to do stuff. I’ve heard it’s the first time Korelia was this prepared for winter.”

Audrey’s words brought Lansius back from pondering. “Huh, really? Where did you hear such a thing?”

“Mm, is it from Cecile or probably Calub? Could be Sterling or Hugo, can’t remember.”

“Sterling?”

“Oh, that’s the squire’s real name. Turns out, his abusive knight-master even changed his name out of spite,” she explained.

“Poor lad...”

Audrey continued, “The point is, the Korelians are happy under your rule.”

The way she proudly said that made Lansius grin from ear to ear. “That’s funny. A long time ago, a certain squire told me that I’m dumb because I don’t know how to prepare my straw bed or clean a bowl using firewood ash.”

Audrey whistled nervously, “I don’t know what you’re talking about, My Lord.”

That made Lansius chuckle.

Audrey suddenly exclaimed, “Oh, I think it’s almost ready." And went to the fireplace.

At Lansius’ urge, they had prepared a pottage, a kind of stew cooked inside a metal cooking pot, inside his chamber.

The stew was made of wheat and beans, mixed with a bit of cheese and eggs. Although it was considered a poor man’s food, Lansius had been eating it for three years and felt that winter wouldn’t feel right without it.

As he enjoyed a bubble of peace and familiarity, Lansius asked himself just how long he could enjoy this peace before paying the price. He also wondered whether he could enjoy this again next year.

Where will I be next winter? 

 

***

 

Chapter 35

Echoes of Ceresia

 

The lord’s chamber boasted a fireplace spacious enough to fit a small cauldron, which now was bubbling and steaming over a wood fire. The aroma of simmering pottage mingled with the sweet scent of burning wood and the cool, crisp winter air that wafted in through a small, narrow window.

Audrey carefully stirred the pottage with a wooden spoon while Lansius took in the delightful aroma.

“It smells delicious,” he commented.

Audrey brought a bowl of the pottage and placed it on the small table by the fire, topping it with slightly charred bread. “Let me taste it first,” she said as she sat across from Lansius and slowly blew on the porridge-like mixture.

Lansius cut the bread in half, revealing a soft and warm interior beneath a crispy crust. Audrey took a spoonful of the pottage and murmured something incoherent, but Lansius understood from her gesture that he should try it too. He scooped up a spoonful of the savory concoction.

Gah~ it’s still hot!

As the taste of the pottage hit him, memories flooded back, but then something hit him squarely on the tongue. “Audrey, why is it so salty?”

“I... err... it’s a superior version, yeah, that’s it!” she seemed nervous.

“A what?” Lansius suspected that Audrey had put too much salted meat into the pottage.

This isn’t a mistake, this is gluttony.

“Need more peas,” Audrey exclaimed, grabbing the bowl and spoon from Lansius. She scooped another mouthful as she ran to the fireplace. There, she added more water and stirred the pot vigorously.

"You know, Audrey, you can be quite puzzling," Lansius said.

"Why's that?" she asked.

"Just a while back, you wouldn't share a cup with me, yet now you don't mind sharing a spoon."

Audrey made a clicking sound with her tongue before replying. "What choice do I have? The castle's kitchen only has metal ladles and all your spoons are silver. The pottage just doesn't taste the same without a wooden spoon, and I only have this one."

“R-right... Sorry for complaining then," Lansius responded, realizing he should simply be grateful for their return to normalcy. The issues of his lordship had put a wedge in their relationship.

Their bond reminded him of a castle, its sturdy walls creating a distance between them. Despite their apparent closeness, an unseen barrier always lingered. Audrey had built this barrier intentionally, with the goal of protecting Lansius' future. No matter how hard he tried to scale the walls, he always fell back down.

"By the way, Lans, was there any news about your family?" she asked, leaving the pottage to simmer. It needed some time to cook.

Lansius' expression grew serious. "The letter didn't specify much, but I believe smuggling people out of Arvena isn't a simple task."

"I trust him," Audrey stated, taking a seat.

“Really?” Lansius was surprised by Audrey’s confidence.

“Lord Bengrieve isn’t the type to speak cheaply. If he says that he’ll even employ the Hunter Guild to get your family out of Arvena, then he’ll do so.”

Lansius paused for a moment, contemplating Audrey’s certainty. “How can you be so sure? You’ve only met Bengrieve a few times.”

“It’s in the eyes,” she explained bluntly. “When he said that, he meant business.” Audrey's straightforwardness made Lansius feel somewhat guilty for doubting the man.

“I hope so... It’s been years since I last saw my family...” Lansius stood up and approached the narrow window, peering out at the vast open plains below, now covered in a white sheet of ice. The reflective surface made for a beautiful display of sunlight.

The winter in Korelia was harsher than Arvena's, though less snowy. The snow barely reached ankle-depth, but the cold seeped in much deeper.

Suddenly, Audrey muttered something that sounded like an apology.

"Hmm? Did you say something?" Lansius questioned.

“I said I’m sorry,” she replied with a frown and a bitter expression.

Lansius looked at her, surprised. "Sorry for what?"

“If I hadn’t messed up back then, you could have returned to your family and escaped Arvena. Instead, I made you wait for nothing.”

“That’s not true. It was chaotic back then. Even if we had met, I still wouldn’t have been able to escape west and reach my family,” Lansius comforted her.

Despite his words, Audrey remained consumed by guilt. She was still haunted by the idea that she had willingly chosen to stand with Riverstead's defense rather than fleeing away with Lansius, only to end up in a hospice after the city's surrender.

Stolen from its rightful place, this narrative is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

It pained Lansius seeing Audrey shouldering a guilt that wasn’t hers to bear. He held her hand, looked deep into her eyes, and spoke, “Audrey, it was me leaving you. You haven't wronged me in any way.”

She averted her gaze, but her face softened. Lansius noticed how her head injury was now covered by thick, healthy hazelnut-brown hair. The big scars that made her wear a veil last year were now fully covered.

This is such a mood wrecker for such a beautiful day.

Thinking quickly, he called out, “Stefi Stephania!”

“Lans!” Audrey was taken aback and immediately charged at him, unleashing a flurry of punches. The first punch stung, but the rest were playful.

Lansius laughed at her reaction, shielding himself from her blows. "Okay, okay, I apologize."

“Humph! Don’t ever call me that again,” she threatened with a pout.

Lansius nodded, struggling to contain his laughter. Audrey turned away. He understood her reaction; after all, she had narrowly escaped being sold into slavery. The stigma attached to slavery was so strong that many changed their names once they regained their freedom.

Audrey’s case was even more complicated because of the Sabina Rustica incident. While the slavers were illegal, the fighting by Arvenians in Midlandia was considered a serious crime.

Moreover, with Lord Arte's involvement, the risk heightened, making it crucial to cut all traceable links. As a consequence, even though he wasn't present in Sabina Rustica during the incident, Sir Stan's father felt compelled to adopt Audrey into his family.

That was the official reason, but Lansius and even Audrey herself were doubtful. However, one thing was sure, Audrey’s origins as a citizen of western Centuria made her adoption an easy fix.

Reflecting on all this stirred something within Lansius. "Come here, girl."

Contrary to his words, Lansius was the one who moved towards her.

"Eh, what are you-" she began to protest as Lansius enveloped her in a hug from behind.

"I can't help it. You look so cute today."

"Stop it, Lans," Audrey protested, her cheeks turning pink. “If you want to succeed, you need to marry a noblewoman. Uwaa~ don’t sniff my hair, it’s dirty and sweaty!”

Ignoring her protests, Lansius buried his face in her hazelnut brown hair. Audrey made a quick attempt to free herself from his arms, but Lansius held her firmly. "But it's winter, you can't possibly be sweating that much- uff, okay, maybe just a little," he teased.

Audrey gripped his arms and managed to break free, displaying her strength. “I’m practicing daily, that’s why it’s sweaty,” she retorted while staring at Lansius with a hint of killing intent.

Eh, no, it’s just her usual gaze.

“Your eyes, Audrey... they’re a bit unnerving,” Lansius remarked, his thoughts drifting back to an event that took place in Toruna the previous year. Spring had yet to fully arrive when a black carriage trundled up the mud-soaked country road to the manor's entrance.

That day, Sir Stan had welcomed a member of the Hunter Guild. The person was invited to confirm the mage's suspicions about Audrey's eyes. The guildsman, a man in his fifties, expressed surprise to see someone outside of the Hunter Guild with a skill akin to Carnivore Sight.

This ability could trigger a primal fear in beasts. It was useful to deter aggressive beast from attacking, or to stun a rabbit from running away.

Audrey herself confirmed the guildsman's assessment, revealing she seldom faced problems with wild animals. Although the guest wouldn't elaborate further, Lansius suspected that the ability also worked against humans, as he had experienced during their regular sparring sessions. It was nearly impossible to fight Audrey while maintaining eye contact.

“Not sorry,” Audrey glared.

“Ah, right, I’m sorry,” Lansius apologized, though he felt the hug was worth it.

“I need to go,” Audrey announced, grabbing her golden fur coat.

“Where to?” Lansius asked.

“To practice. I need to teach Carla and Sterling.”

“Why don’t you stay a bit longer? Like you used to...”

Audrey looked at him quizzically. “What do you mean?”

“Drey, I feel like you’ve been avoiding me more. Are you hiding something?”

She clicked her tongue. “I keep no secrets.”

“Then why?” asked Lansius.

Audrey hesitated for a moment before responding. “It’s not you. It’s me... If I stay by your side, no noble will offer you their daughter.”

Lansius drew a deep breath. “I already told you, I don’t want that.”

“Lans, you’re the smart one,” she pleaded. “You should know that marrying someone like me is a dead end. Worse, I’m oath-bound to-”

“I know about your vendetta. I can help you with that,” Lansius interrupted, trying to comfort her.

The sound of the cooking pot boiling filled the room. Audrey looked down, deep in thought. “I don’t think I can accept that. I’m sure you’ll find someone better. A proper lady…”

Lansius grabbed her hand, feeling the warmth of her palm and fingers. “Remember Ceresia?”

Audrey looked away. “What about it?”

“Just us and horsie in a barn, and a roaring fireplace.”

She smiled softly as she remembered those simpler times. "There were also two old men and a couple of boys in there."

Lansius chuckled, but his laughter faded quickly. A thought came to mind. "Drey, what if I weren't a noble?"

Audrey furrowed her brow, caught off guard by his question. "What do you mean? Are you thinking of giving up?"

"No, no, I mean, just imagine for a moment, what if I were just a simple clerk from Riverstead?"

"If that's the case," her words trailed off as memories from the past resurfaced. Suddenly, her expression changed, as if she had figured out the answer to a long-standing riddle. Acting on impulse, she rose on her tiptoes and gently pulled Lansius' head toward her, pressing her lips against his in a tender, unexpected kiss.

Their lips locked together, and time stood still. Lansius was surprised at first but quickly melted into the kiss, his heart beating wildly. They parted too soon, and Lansius wished it had lasted longer.

Audrey took a step back, her cheeks turning a deep shade of red as she covered her mouth with her hand. Lansius couldn‘t help but stare at her, grinning happily.

I always thought she had issues with me!

Audrey dashed to grab her fur coat and left the room in a hurry. Lansius chased her and called out to her shamelessly, “Mwah!“

“Nuoo!“ Audrey objected furiously, quickening her pace along the corridor. The guards and attendants looked at each other, probably thinking the two were out of their minds.

Later, Lansius heard that Carla and Sterling had received the sparring of their lives. Lansius felt bad for them, but he couldn't apologize since that would require explanations.

In the following days, Audrey avoided him as much as possible, which was difficult since they shared a castle. They only met at dinner, where she would sit near Lansius, where the best food was served. However, she intentionally kept her mouth full at all times and wasn’t involved in the conversation.

The staff smelled something fishy and tried to pry information out of Lansius, but he wouldn’t give them anything, fearing they might try to stage something.

After all, the Korelians had a vested interest in this matter. They would benefit greatly if Lansius married another Lowlandian noble‘s daughter.

This situation led Lansius to understand that, in the end, it was just Audrey and him against the world. But for once, he was at peace. For months, he had struggled to define their relationship, and only now he was sure that Audrey loved him back. For Lansius, that was all that truly mattered.

He had made a mistake in the past, but he wouldn’t let it happen again. His past mistake had taught him not to negotiate with his happiness. Even if people who depended on him would hate him for it, he would gladly shoulder the blame.

 

***

 

Chapter 36

The Coming of Spring

 

Cecile, cup-bearer to the Lord of Korelia

The burgeoning romance between Lord Lansius and Captain Audrey soon became the castle’s chief topic of conversation. The tale of a noble falling for someone of humble birth never failed to captivate the people’s hearts. As a cup-bearer, Cecile was privy to the unfolding saga. Initially skeptical, she eventually grew to admire the couple.

Cecile understood that the staff’s fascination with the love story stemmed largely from Audrey’s humble beginnings, a reflection of their own. Most of the staff hailed from esquire families, contrasting with Cecile, whose father was a knight.

Esquires, descending from squires or knights, held a distinct social position – not quite nobility, but more than mere commoners. This status of lower nobility was not hereditary and expired with the individual’s passing.

Many of the younger staff members were absorbed in this love story that transcended social boundaries. The skald, a soldier bard named Sigmund, clandestinely fueled their fascination with epic songs of forbidden love on the battlefield.

To them, Audrey symbolized their hopes and dreams. However, the older staff members, fearing a tragic end, disapproved of such a union.

Cecile’s initial impression of Audrey was far from favorable. The intensity of the Lady Captain’s gaze had been disconcerting. Even Cecile’s knight father had never displayed such ferocity during training sessions.

However, beneath her intimidating façade, Audrey proved to be warm and helpful. Cecile discovered that her powerful gaze came naturally, even when Audrey attempted to suppress it.

In time, Cecile and Audrey formed a bond. As the highest-ranking women, they became the defenders of the female staff, with Audrey assuming the role of matriarch and Cecile serving as her second. Any complaints of harassment were directed to them for resolution.

Thankfully, such incidents were infrequent in Lord Lansius’ household, where discipline was strictly upheld. The Korelian troops, unlike those in other baronies, received regular payments and supplies, which created a small but efficient force.

The peaceful environment was also a testament to Lord Lansius, who refrained from womanizing and treated his female staff respectfully.

Likewise, Lady Audrey, despite her rank and intimate relationship with the castle’s Lord, integrated effortlessly with the staff. Although occasionally brusque, her behavior was likely influenced by her squire upbringing. Cecile would remind herself that Audrey was not raised to be a lady-in-waiting; she was a fighter at heart.

Once, Cecile inquired about Audrey’s decision to become a squire. Audrey recounted how her knight master, Isolte, had made that choice for her.

As a child sold off by her family, Audrey served in a baronet’s household. When a bear threatened their lands, the baronet hired Isolte, a renowned huntress, to deal with it. Unable to provide sufficient payment, the baronet offered Audrey to Isolte instead.

This practice was not unheard of. Baronets, essentially wealthier knights, often struggled financially, a fact Cecile knew well from her own family’s experiences.

Despite her hardships, Cecile found herself envying Audrey. As Captain, Audrey demonstrated exceptional swordsmanship and horsemanship, outshining many of her male counterparts.

While Cecile took pride in her own equestrian skills, Audrey was in a class of her own. A few more feats would earn Audrey knighthood. Furthermore, with the Lord’s affection, her future seemed secure.

However, life seldom unfolds as expected, as Cecile would later discover.

During the harsh winter months, the female staff slept together in a large, well-heated chamber, while the male staff, squires, and troops occupied the Great Hall. Given that Korelia was a small castle, only the Lord’s chamber and the guest room possessed decent fireplaces.

One night, while they were huddled together, Audrey casually revealed her vendetta to the curious servants, a story that even Cecile hadn’t heard before.

Audrey confessed that her ultimate goal was to vanquish the beast that had slain her knight master and the rest of her group. The survivors of that disaster, mostly from the younger generation, had vowed to reunite when they came of age to hunt down the beast.

When a servant inquired about the beast’s strength, Audrey admitted that it was more than formidable; it was a monstrosity.

She also confessed her doubt about their chances of success. Compared to her master, an extraordinary Mage Knight and a member of the Hunter Guild, Audrey felt she didn’t hold a candle in comparison.

Ultimately, Audrey knew their chances of victory were slim, but she was resolute in her determination to try. Revenge or death, those were her objectives.

Cecile felt a mix of pity and envy for this female warrior. She understood that Audrey’s status as a squire and her oath stood in the way of reciprocating Lord Lansius’s advances. If Audrey were to marry him and bear his child, it would complicate the pursuit of her oath.

This tale has been unlawfully obtained from Royal Road. If you discover it on Amazon, kindly report it.

When Cecile asked if Lord Lansius knew, Audrey confirmed he did. As the older staff had forewarned, such relationships rarely concluded well. Their prophetic words rang true.

Winter finally gave way to spring, marked by the melting snow on the roof.

 

***

 

Cecile cleared her thoughts and knocked softly, twice. “Excuse me, My Lord. It’s Cecile, your cup-bearer.”

“Come in,” came the response from within.

As she pushed open the sturdy wooden door, Cecile saw the Lord in his blue doublet, absorbed in his work at the desk.

“Just a moment,” he said without lifting his gaze.

Cecile, understanding he was deep in thought, replied politely, “Yes, My Lord.” Unprompted, she replaced the water jug on the table, readied a clean cup, and filled it with water. She then waited patiently.

Cecile had adjusted quickly to her new role. Her upbringing as a lady-in-waiting had prepared her well. She knew how to appear engaged while waiting, to avoid prying, and to keep her opinions to herself unless asked.

Her tutor had also cautioned her against being overly sociable, to recognize her status, and to prioritize her master above all. However, Cecile had never anticipated becoming a cup-bearer, a position of considerable influence.

A cup-bearer was a trusted confidant who not only attended to the Lord but also accompanied him throughout the day. The Lord valued her insight and commentary. The role signified complete trust, as a lord would only drink from a cup served by the cup-bearer.

However, Cecile’s appointment was unusual. Usually, a Lord would choose a longstanding friend or someone he trusted unconditionally. It was uncommon to select someone he had never met. Initially, Cecile felt unsure about this arrangement.

She was aware that she obtained this position due to her father’s shift in loyalty to Lord Lansius. Despite this, she refused to let it discourage her. She recognized the potential it offered her House and resolved to commit wholeheartedly.

It wasn’t long before the Lord finished his work. “Apologies for the wait. Please, take a seat,” he invited, approaching the table and drinking from the cup.

He preferred water in the morning and a pale ale during lunch and supper, with his only stipulation being that the water must be boiled to ensure purity.

“Have you eaten?” he asked once Cecile was seated.

“Yes, My Lord. Your servant had some porridge this morning.”

“Was it good?”

She nodded politely. “It was, My Lord. It was warm and hearty.”

“Ah, that’s good to hear. Umm… I still have some fresh bread that Sterling brought this morning. Feel free to help yourself to a slice or two.”

“Thank you, My Lord, but your servant must decline.”

The Lord offered a smile and settled into his seat.

Raised among nobility where social grace was paramount, Cecile could easily tell that the Lord wasn’t fond of small talk. Nevertheless, he made the effort, even for a subject like her. Having spent the entire winter in his company, Cecile recognized the Lord’s genuine friendliness.

Unlike many nobles who sought to exert power and control, the Lord of Korelia was approachable. He treated his subjects fairly as if they were family. The castle’s discipline was primarily maintained by Hugo, the Marshal deputy, and to a lesser extent, by Audrey as the Captain.

Cecile was uncertain about the arrangement’s effectiveness, but the castle staff appeared content and in high spirits.

“Today, let’s visit the workshops to check on working conditions. Let’s go incognito,” the Lord announced from his seat.

“Understood, I will need to fetch my traveling cloak—”

“Yes, please do. No need to hurry. We have plenty of time,” he responded cheerfully.

“…But first, My Lord,” Cecile paused.

The Lord noticed. “Speak up. What’s on your mind?”

“Thank you, My Lord. It’s about my father, Sir Callahan. Your letter when he visited Midlandia last fall, ensured that he received the best treatment possible.”

The Lord nodded. “Ah, think nothing of it. It’s my duty to look after my retainers. How is he? Is he recovering well?”

“Indeed, My Lord. I received a letter this morning. Father’s injury has fully healed. Before, even the chill of the night caused him pain, but now he can bear the winter like everyone else.”

“I’m glad to hear that,” he replied with a smile. “You should visit him. After being confined to the castle all winter... Why not take a week or two off, starting tomorrow?”

Cecile was surprised by the unexpected offer.

“If the messenger managed to deliver the letter, the roads should be clear of snow by now... Oh, take a bag of salt, some fur, and freshly made meat products as gifts. I hope that’s enough,” the lord suggested casually as if these weren’t valuable items.

Overwhelmed, Cecile fell to her knees. “M-My Lord, you’re too generous. How could we ever repay this?” She trembled. Deeply homesick, Cecile had never expected to see her home again after her appointment. Yet, she had been granted a visit last season and now another opportunity arose.

The Lord was taken aback. “Please, Cecile, there’s no need for this. Stand up.”

“My Lord, you arranged for a Saint Candidate in Midlandia to heal my father and paid for the treatment. My House and I are forever indebted to you. Please, at least let me pledge my loyalty.”

“But I already accepted your oath as cup-bearer, remember? Cecile, please stand up,” he urged her again, extending his hand, but Cecile remained kneeling.

She knew her family had never experienced such generosity. Despite the hair color and the knight status, her once-great House had fallen. Aside from her father’s horse and the armor set, they were no better than the average townsfolk in Midlandia.

The treatment by a Saint Candidate for her father was already a luxury and now a considerable gift was promised. That would easily secure her family’s livelihood for another year or two.

“I, Cecile, daughter of Sir Callahan, pledge my life in your service, My Lord,” she declared solemnly.

“That’s too much, Cecile. It’s unwise,” Lansius warned her.

His disapproval surprised Cecile, who assumed her pledge had been refused.

Lansius sighed deeply. “Listen... we’re likely heading into war soon.”

“War, My Lord?” Cecile asked, holding back tears.

“Yes, and probably against a larger force. I can’t guarantee victory, so I don’t want you to risk your life for me. Pledge it to someone you love dearly instead.”

His fatherly words deeply touched her. Lansius didn’t behave like a typical lord, eager to accept any loyalty pledge from his retainers. He genuinely cared for their well-being.

“My Lord, forgive me, but even if you refuse, it’s my wish to serve you.”

The lord sighed again. “How old are you, Cecile?”

“I’m turning 16 this year, My Lord.”

“You’re too young to make such a weighty commitment. You have a long life ahead of you, and I don’t want you to have any regrets later on.”

“My Lord, your words are too kind, I’m just a servant...”

Lansius extended his hand once more, and this time Cecile accepted. She stood up, her face flushed and eyes glistening with emotion.

“Cecile, you may rest for today. I’ll have Sterling accompany me.”

“There’s no need, My Lord. I will fetch my cloak immediately.” She exited the chamber and sped to her room, her dull blonde hair trailing behind her as she ran.

In the lawless province of Lowlandia, where loyalty and mercy were rare virtues, Cecile discovered a Lord who stood apart from the rest. Her heart swelled with pride after pledging herself to her Lord’s cause. From now on, their fates would be intertwined.

His fall would be her downfall. Cecile was determined to serve a noble who truly deserved her unwavering allegiance.

 

***

 

Chapter 37

Children from the North

 

The first light of dawn broke through the dark clouds, casting a soft, golden hue over the small castle. The rainfall from the previous night had ceased, leaving the air cool and fresh. Lansius stood by the window, gazing at the transformed landscape outside.

The ditches had turned into a water canal, and some sections had inadvertently created a crude-looking irrigation system. It would have been a great success if it had been intentional, but Lansius had no such plan.

Despite his insistence that it was a mere coincidence, the people of Korelia praised him, believing their Lord was simply being humble.

Good things do happen sometimes.

As Lansius observed the canal-like structure, he wondered once more if the land could benefit from diverting the river stream slightly. A small man-made lake could prove advantageous, especially if it could support the fish delicacy he’d enjoyed in Torrea village.

“Sterling,” Lansius called, his gaze still fixed on the window.

“Yes, My Lord,” the young squire replied, bowing slightly.

“Were you present when I invited the old staff to discuss farming and fishery?”

“I believe so, My Lord.”

“Please, remind me of their responses,” Lansius requested, prompting the squire to gather his thoughts before replying.

“About farming,” the squire started, “they complained about poor soil quality. They said they tried many methods, including plowing, but most of Korelia’s land remained barren.”

“But Korelia does manage to grow barley and wheat?”

“Only in the areas with the best soil, My Lord.”

Lansius nodded in acknowledgment. “And the matter of fishery?”

“They informed us that the river was too shallow and with few fish. In the past, a Lord attempted to dig a man-made lake, but it only resulted in a swamp and a breeding ground for undesirable insects.”

Lansius sighed softly, weighing the risks.

And they can’t use ducks to combat insects, because this world’s ducks are large, aggressive monsters, half the size of an ostrich.

Lansius knew well about them. Only the bravest men bred ducks. Even a few years old, ducks could trample farms and were strong enough to either jump or kick most fences. Their eggs and feathers were valuable, but sadly, their meat was difficult to cook.

The Lord of Korelia exhaled deeply. He had no experience in farming or fishery. Worse, he had no experience living in the steppe. He knew about yurts and cheese, but that was about it.

Last season, Lansius had tried consulting with Calub and Sir Callahan for assistance. They came up with several ideas but had to wait until the road cleared from mud and the rainy season.

Lansius looked at the parchment again that detailed his projected expenses for half a year. The biggest one was for the trench work, which he paid for in salt. Each worker received the equivalent of 5 copper per day for work that lasted effectively 90 days.

The combined cost of the trench work and the salt scheme was more than twice the upkeep of his army. However, he saw this as an investment and aid relief.

The second largest expense was the cost to maintain his military of 400 men-at-arms and crossbowmen. The standard rate for men-at-arms on a campaign was about 4 copper daily, including meals, while cavalrymen cost around 8 copper daily.

The previous year, Lansius and Sir Justin negotiated a standby rate that also included free lodgings and armament leases. This rate was half of the original campaign rate: 2 copper daily for each man-at-arms, including meals, and 4 copper daily for cavalrymen.

Considering that even master smiths, carpenters, and artisans only earned 4 copper daily, this was already a good living wage.

 

With 1.3 million copper in the coffers and 720,000 in expenses, Lansius’ current wealth was around 600,000 copper or slightly less than 2,500 gold coins.

While 2,500 gold might seem substantial, Lansius and his treasurer were far from comfortable. Their expenditures were hemorrhaging funds, threatening to drain their reserves within two years.

Feeling stumped, he turned away from the window, grabbed his fur coat, and headed to the door. “Let’s ride a little.”

“Should I ask for Lady Audrey, My Lord?” asked Sterling.

Lansius almost chuckled. Audrey still avoided him for what happened a few days ago. “No need, just you and a few riders.”

When the weather permitted, Lansius forced himself to ride as practice and to ensure his horses’ stamina. Spring rides were especially important because the horses were restless after spending almost the entire winter in the stable. As their rider, Lansius felt responsible for taking them out as often as he could.

The author's narrative has been misappropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

 

***

 

Lansius and his squire, Sterling, rode aimlessly through the countryside, allowing their horses to find their own paths. The landscape was a mosaic of vibrant colors, with the sun casting a warm glow over the spring grassland. Their journey eventually led them to a cluster of three yurts nestled among the grazing white sheep.

A shepherd with a round face and long brown hair emerged, a welcoming smile on his face. “Welcome, guest, welcome,” he greeted them warmly, noticing their fine clothing and horses.

Lansius looked at Sterling, who rode beside him, saying, “Let’s have a rest. Tell one to be on alert. The rest can dismount.”

“Yes, My Lord,” Sterling replied.

Upon hearing that, the shepherd’s reception grew even warmer. As they realized the guest was Lansius the Salt Giver, the shepherd’s family sprang into action, bustling about in a flurry of excitement.

The child dashed off to fetch water from the small stream, two women hurried to gather firewood, and an even older man, leaning on his cane, grinned happily as he held open the flap that served as their home’s door.

“Please, My Lord, come in and rest. I’ll prepare fresh drinks and sweets for you,” urged the shepherd.

Lansius and Sterling dismounted. “Gratitude. I just need a place to rest my legs. Don’t let me bother you.”

“Please, My Lord, it’s a great honor to have you here,” the shepherd gestured politely, inviting the guest to his house.

The yurt was more spacious than it appeared. It was warm but airy and had an abundance of natural light coming in from above. The floor was covered by a combination of carpets, leather, and rugs.

Before entering, Lansius began to remove his boots to avoid tracking dirt inside, which immediately caused a commotion. The old man with a cane reached out to Lansius, attempting to stop the esteemed guest from taking off his footwear. The shepherd did the same, speaking rapidly in protest. Meanwhile, Sterling, alarmed by the sudden change in atmosphere, instinctively rested his hand on his hilt and yelled, “Don’t touch the Lord, stay away!”

Seeing their reaction, Lansius laughed, diffusing the confusion. Lansius was aware of the custom as he had heard dozens of stories from the staff regarding the Korelia and its culture, so he asked, “I insist on leaving my boots and entering barefoot; will that be acceptable?”

There was a back-and-forth argument, but the host, while a bit embarrassed, was exceedingly pleased. “Please, My Lord, our carpet isn’t clean.”

Lansius chuckled and entered barefoot. A table and cushion were provided for him, so he sat there and made himself comfortable. Sterling quickly followed and sat beside his Lord.

“Thank you for your hospitality. We brought gifts in return for your refreshments.” As Lansius said that, Sterling reached for his bag and opened it up for his Lord to decide.

“My Lord, please, you don’t have to,” the shepherd said bashfully.

“I insist,” Lansius said as he selected several items from the bag. “A lacquered comb for the women; salt and spices, also for the women; dried medicinal herbs for your father; and honeyed mead for our gracious host.”

Lansius’ gifts stirred up a commotion as the host initially refused them out of respect. However, Lansius knew the custom and insisted on offering the gifts.

Sterling could only blink. He had heard about the custom but had never experienced it firsthand.

As everyone settled down, the host poured a milky-gold beverage with a strong buttery aroma. With Cecile the cup-bearer on leave, Sterling did his best to scrutinize the drink. The butter tea was too rich for him, and he shook his head, not knowing whether it was safe or not.

Lansius laughed it off and drank heartily. In truth, he knew his lactose intolerance would cause issues later, but he couldn’t resist trying the unique beverage.

Just a cup... Oof, a bit strong smelling, but buttery smooth. Wait, a hint of tea?

Lansius realized the golden color must come from somewhere, so he inquired, “What did you use to make this?”

The host eagerly shared the ingredients. Lansius noticed dried leaves and asked for some along with boiled water, which the host happily provided.

Soon, the women and child returned and joined in the feast. They prepared the snacks over an open hearth at the center of the yurt.

Stirling, following instructions from Cecile tried to engage in conversation on behalf of their Lord. He asked about the winter, their herds, and recent news in this part of Korelia.

Though their dialect was difficult for Lansius to understand, he grasped that the winter had been milder, and spring had arrived early. The shepherd also personally thanked Lansius for his salt payments and mentioned that his brother and son were working in Korelia before winter, digging trenches and later in the workshops.

Lansius nodded happily.

The old man urged his son, the host, to bring another beverage. Lansius politely refused, but the host had brought a wineskin and poured two cups for them.

“Horse milk wine,” the old man introduced. Stirling drank it and his face said it all, much to the host’s delight.

Lansius sampled the alcoholic drink and found it more enjoyable than anticipated. Next, the snacks were served on a large wooden platter. He chose a honey-glazed baked pastry and a tofu white crunchy morsel.

“This one is made from dried yogurt,” the host explained, noticing Lansius’ curiosity.

Lansius tasted both, finding the sweetness refreshing but not overpowering. He glanced at Stirling, who seemed thoroughly impressed by the treats.

Around that time, Lansius took the cup of boiled dried leaves and smelled it.

Definitely smells like tea.

He took a sip and was taken aback by the bitter taste.

Smells like tea, colors like tea, but tastes like burnt charcoal.

“It’s good medicine for a long night with the ladies,” the host informed, and everyone burst into laughter.

As they enjoyed their snacks, the host prepared steamed dumplings filled with minced meat. When they were ready, Lansius accepted one graciously. He let it cool briefly before taking a bite, finding the mutton flavor quite strong but managing to swallow it down, pleasing the host.

A sauce would be perfect for this...

Soon, a vegetable dish with dried meat on the side was served.

“Well, this has certainly turned into a big feast,” Lansius remarked, bringing a smile to his host’s face.

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

***

 

After the feast, as a parting gift, the host opened one of his wooden boxes and pulled out two remarkably lightweight shawls. “A modest gift for your men,” he said, presenting the shawls to Lansius for him to bestow upon his men.

Intrigued by the shawls’ quality, Lansius furrowed his brow. “Why for my men?” he asked, examining the delicate, warm, yet strong fabric and its astonishing lightness. “Such a gift is fit for a Lord.”

The host shook his head modestly. “I wouldn’t dare, My Lord. These shawls are worn only by nomad families like us.”

The subject was of great interest to Lansius, so he dared to ask, “Friend, I apologize if this may offend you. Could you tell me about your family history?”

The shepherd appeared uncertain but glanced at the old man, who nodded, granting permission. “Our great-grandfather came from the Caladan Sea in the north.”

“The northern sea of grass,” Lansius acknowledged the name.

The host nodded and continued, “He and many of his relatives were enslaved during a raid, and somehow, they were smuggled this far south to Lowlandia. They labored for the old Lord in Korelia, who granted them their freedom on his deathbed.”

Lansius nodded respectfully, taking in the story.

“Now, we’re free, but not exactly welcomed to live in the town, so we live as our ancestors did, on the pastoral lands, grazing and dwelling in our yurts.”

Discrimination is rampant everywhere, even when they have the same skin color as Sterling. It’s simply because they’re different.

“How many of you live like this?” Lansius asked.

“Now, there are at least a hundred families,” the old man replied proudly. “Many more than when I was a child.”

Lansius was pleased to hear this. He had always thought that Korelia felt like a colony, with its people trying hard to live like those in Midlandia, but the land and climate were entirely different.

Here, it was more suitable for a pastoral lifestyle, and seeing these shepherds thrive confirmed his view.

With the quality of the shawls lingering in his mind and sensing a potential trade opportunity to elevate all of Korelia, Lansius made his decision. “I would like to meet as many tribes as possible for a discussion. Perhaps a grand banquet on the west side of the castle. What do you think?”

The old man seemed surprised. "We will do as we are told. The land belongs to you. But what would you ask of us?"

"Be at peace. I won't ask for tax or tribute. I want to talk about friendship and trade among our people. I sincerely believe it would benefit everyone."

The old man smiled. "There's an old saying that unity is the ultimate strength. My family and I will do our best to send your invitations to the other tribes."

Lansius nodded and extended his hand. Without hesitation, the old man grasped it firmly to seal the deal. As the sun cast golden rays over the plains of Korelia, Lansius found an unexpected ally in his quest to defend his realm.

The newfound bond signaled a crumbling of old barriers and the dawn of a new era of trust. Spring had arrived, and Summer, bringing with it the threat of wars and sieges, was fast approaching.

 

***

 

December 23 Update: the First Book will soon be stubbed (date to be confirmed). Expect chapter numbers to jump by 10 or 15 for consistency.

If you wish to avoid stubbed, the First Book is from ch 1 to 37. If you've read up to ch 38: The Guild Rep, you'll be fine. 😄

This chapter is essentially the start of Second Book.

 

Chapter 38

The Guild Rep

 

Korelia

As the midday sun reached its zenith, casting a warm glow that bathed the land in golden light, the air was alive with the sweet fragrance of freshly bloomed wildflowers. Lansius was just returning from a memorable riding trip where he had met a nomadic family who welcomed him into their yurt.

Now, his black destrier carried him with power and speed through the verdant fields. The wind ruffled Lansius’ black hair and fur coat as he allowed his horse to gallop to her heart’s content on the final stretch toward Korelia Castle.

From afar, the castle’s walls and towering main keep beckoned them. The imposing structure was visible from tens of miles away.

As he approached, the main gates came alive with the movement of guards and soon creaked open heavily. Lansius passed through the gatehouse and rode into the courtyard where Calub, unexpectedly, was waiting for him.

“You’re here? Will you be joining us for supper?” Lansius asked as he dismounted. A horse master immediately stepping forward to take care of his temperamental warhorse.

“The Mason Guild representative has arrived,” Calub reported, as a small group of attendants gathered around Lansius.

“Finally,” Lansius remarked, surrounded by two page boys ready with drinks, clean boots, or a change of clothes. “Gratitude, I'm good. Go help Sterling, he might need some assistance.”

As if on cue, Sterling and the rest of the guards, riding horses less impressive than Lansius' destrier, arrived. The pages hurried toward the dashing squire, eager to assist, even before Sterling had dismounted.

Lansius observed that Sterling was particularly popular among the younger staff, especially the female servants who seemed to fawn over him. The thought brought a chuckle to him as he walked with Calub. To avoid having to explain his amusement, he asked, "What do you think about the representative?"

"He seems capable. The Midlandia Mason Guild isn’t known for doing things by halves," the reliable alchemist-turned-advisor responded.

“Now let’s see just how far he can fix this castle,” Lansius remarked.

“And whether our pockets will permit it,” Calub said, much to the amusement of Lansius, as they bypassed the Great Hall and went straight to the inner part of the castle.

The reason for inviting the Masons was Korelia’s frigid winter and the castle’s appalling heating. Despite being tight on money, having spent much on salt purchases, armor, weaponry, and delicate parts for crossbows, Lansius felt the need to improve his staff’s living conditions.

The castle was in dire need of repair. Several rooms had holes exposed to the elements, leaks, inadequate fireplaces, and non-existent heating. Though he didn’t need to, Lansius wanted to undertake these repairs, because he believed that people were the most important assets or resources, not just the physical structures.

However, Lansius’ enthusiasm was quickly dashed a few minutes after their introduction.

Mason Caine, who looked more like an accountant with neatly combed hair and a sharp nose, sat relaxed in his padded chair. He used a handkerchief to wipe his lips after taking a sip of ale. “The guild has records of this castle, and it’s quite old,” he said while looking at the ceiling. “I’m afraid our options are very limited, My Lord.”

“Couldn’t you conduct a survey first before deciding?” Calub suggested, trying to persuade.

“Certainly, master Calub, but I prefer not to raise false hope.”

“Fair enough, I look forward to your assessment,” Lansius replied warmly, seemingly concluding the conversation. Yet, he had more to discuss. “Maester Caine, if you will, can you tell me whether the guild also has this castle’s layout?”

Caine shook his head. “The layout was always made, kept, and destroyed on-site upon completion. Otherwise, the nobility could pressure us to reveal our work on their adversaries’ defenses.”

Lansius nodded. “What about the siege of Ornietia Castle? I heard the attackers could breach it very quickly by attacking its weakest point. They didn’t even need tunneling.”

Caine smiled, making his sharp jaw even more prominent. “I assure you we had no part in that matter.”

“Aside from how Midlandia awarded your Guild a contract to enlarge two castles?” pried Lansius.

“The timing was most unfortunate, but it had nothing to do with us,” the maester replied, the same smile still on his lips.

Lansius smiled, looked around the chamber, sensing its archaic design, and asked, “I know a bit about design. May I ask what the main problem is in at least fixing the heating issue?”

The narrative has been stolen; if detected on Amazon, report the infringement.

“I may be able to apply the Centuria technique to install several pipes from the main fireplace to adjacent rooms, but that could take months and cause problems from all the chiseling on the stone structure.”

“Don’t chisel the stone. Just place the pipes hanging on the wall.”

Caine was surprised by the answer and for a moment couldn’t process what he heard.

Lansius continued, “Speak candidly. I won’t be offended; otherwise, many details will be lost, and we’ll be wasting time for nothing.”

“My Lord, the aesthetics would be ruined. The pipes, unfortunately, are unsightly, not to mention dangerous from the heat and potential leaks.”

“I don’t mind. Unburied pipes are easy to fix. I prefer an ugly, functional solution rather than freezing in a beautiful chamber.”

Calub chuckled as he watched the Mason’s baffled reaction and added, “The Lord of Korelia is a man who values function over form.”

Caine’s usual smile returned to his lips. He was starting to like the new Lord of Korelia. “If that’s what My Lord wishes for, I think it can be arranged.”

“Can it be done before this winter? I also need a similar system for the workshop in town,” asked Lansius.

“Heaters for workshops?” Caine was uncertain. “It would be dangerous if they’re made of wood.”

“We’ll quarry small stones for the flooring. Korelia’s winter is far too long, and a lot of time will be spent doing nothing. I want a communal workshop where people can gather and work on their winter crafts.”

Caine nodded in understanding. “It should be easy to install. But, My Lord, are you sure about the cost?”

“Make an offer on paper, and we’ll discuss it. I’m aware that metal pipes take a long time to produce and transport; can you install it before winter?”

“I’ll try, My Lord, but...”

“Speak openly,” Lansius reassured him.

The Mason sighed softly and explained, “Working in Lowlandia is inherently dangerous, especially in a fief that has just recently experienced a change of power. There are rumors that Korelia will soon be engulfed in a war. Because of that, it’s difficult to convince skilled workers to come here.”

Lansius nodded his head lightly and said, “It’s not that big a deal. I’ll win the war. In fact, I’m hoping they come so I can use their baggage train to fund more projects.”

Caine seemed impressed by the bold answer and appear to appreciate Lansius’ straightforward manner, which was more akin to that of a tradesman than a noble. “Your words please me, My Lord,” Caine responded, a genuine respect in his voice. “I shall do my best to assist you and Korelia.”

“One more thing,” Lansius said, trying to find the right words. “Do you have a device to spin fleece with a wheel?”

“Spin fleece with a wheel, My Lord?” Caine squinted his brow.

Lansius nodded. “Yes, the device that could spin fleece into yarn almost effortlessly. I have those in my homeland. The device makes clothing so cheap that everyone can afford it.”

Now, everyone was intrigued, even Calub.

He continued, “I can describe roughly how this device works if you can secure the rights and trade secrets.”

“Leave it to me. I know just the master carpenter for this kind of work,” Caine replied in a heartbeat.

 

***

 

“My Lord, a word, please,” Calub requested after the Mason Guild representative had retired to his guest room.

“Yes, speak freely,” replied Lansius, as they were the only ones left in the Great Chamber. The only attendant they had was escorting the guest.

“Do you truly know about such a device?” Calub inquired.

“The spinning wheel?” asked Lansius. Seeing Calub nod, he explained, “Yes, the device does exist, and I plan to make many of them.”

The problem is, I know what it looks like and have a general idea of how it works, but not the specific mechanism...

“H-how efficient is that thing? Is it faster than two women working together to spindle the yarn?”

“Probably more, way more," Lansius ventured. "With that device, one person can produce as much as ten times the yarn.”

Calub was left speechless. “My Lord, Lans, why didn’t you tell me you knew about such a thing? We could have started making one when we were in Midlandia.”

Lansius hesitated, then scratched his head. “Well, today something just reminded me of it. You see, I rode south earlier and met a lovely shepherd family who gave me a remarkable shawl. I’ve never felt anything quite like it.”

“And where is this shawl, My Lord?”

“Sterling has the bag. Come, let’s find him," Lansius said as he moved toward the corridor. “And, oh, you must join me for supper. Half the staff are on leave, and Audrey is eating in her room.”

“Is there something happening?” Calub almost inquired further, but Lansius’ expression was telling enough. “Alright, I shall accompany you.”

Together, the two strolled down the corridor and arrived at the Great Hall.

Korelia Castle had limited living space, so most of the male retinues stored their gear in a series of cabinets in a small open room at the far end of the hall, hidden from guests behind a pillar. Sterling emerged from there, having put away his riding coat. “My Lord, do you need anything?”

“The bag. I need to show the shawls to Master Calub.”

Sterling quickly retrieved the two shawls he had stored in a separate compartment of his bag. As he pulled and waved them in the air, Calub was mesmerized by their lightness. They floated as if they were weightless, even lighter than the thinnest linen.

The presence of the Lord, alongside Sterling displaying a unique shawl, quickly attracted a crowd of curious staff members.

“Almost like silk,” the alchemist-trained Calub commented as he reached out for the nomad’s shawl.

“They’re also good for warmth, don’t soak easily, and like silk, they offer some protection against sharp edges, even arrows,” Lansius explained.

“Arrows?” Calub couldn’t believe what he just heard.

“Their legend has it that even if an arrow pierces the skin, the garment made from that material would often remain intact, making it easy to remove the arrowhead and lessening the risk of poisoning or infection.”

“Fascinating... Even if only half of it is true, that’s mighty impressive,” Calub commented, eagerness in his voice.

Lansius nodded, happy that someone else could see the potential.

“So, is this why, My Lord, you asked for the spinning wheel?” asked Calub.

Lansius grinned. “I want to unite them into Korelia. Alone, the town has a difficult future. We have no natural resources other than a sea of grass and a stone quarry to the east. However, if the two communities cooperate, we could start a better path.”

Not only Calub, Sterling, and the other retinues gathered around were intrigued, even though they didn’t know what a spinning wheel was.

The Lord continued, “I want a strong, mutually beneficial relationship between the townsfolk and the pastoral community. They can provide the fleece, the town provides them with sustenance and hospitality. Then, with the town’s expertise, we could produce these shawls faster and with more intricate patterns for trade.”

Calub was impressed. He never thought that Korelia had the potential to make a good product with its scarce resources.

Sterling felt a nagging in his mind, dared to ask, “My Lord, I thought you wanted them as allies?”

“I don’t want just an ally,” Lansius explained passionately. “I want a true ally, not just scouts or light cavalry. I want one that is inseparable from us, sharing our front lines because they have a vested interest in our survival.”

Calub couldn’t help but grin, rubbing his chin and feeling honored to be part of Lansius’ plan. Last winter, he had even considered advising Lansius to leave Korelia due to the impending war. He had heard from merchants, who were fond of Lansius’ rule, that five neighboring lords were mustering armies. Of these five, four were likely only guarding their interests against the war, but one, in particular, the Lord of the Three Hills, was building siege engines.

Calub wished he could see Lansius’ vision fulfilled and would gladly give his left hand to make it happen. However, he knew that Korelia’s future was still held hostage by the neighboring Lords. Blood feuds ran deep in these lands.

 

***

 

Chapter 39

Batu

 

The next day, Sir Justin and his small entourage arrived at Korelia Castle. Since the last season, like other low nobles, he had worked to manage his land to make it self-sufficient and profitable. As someone knowledgeable about horses and horse trade, the Arvenian-born knight tried his hand at horse breeding, thinking it might yield good results. However, progress was slow and required patience, just like everything else.

This season, after arranging for his estate to operate without him, Sir Justin was ready to resume his duties as Lord Lansius’ Marshal. His arrival at Korelia was also prompted by an urgent matter he had learned of through his contacts in the sometimes shady horse trade. Unfortunately, the Lord was away, so Sir Justin decided to meet with Calub instead.

He strolled along the corridors with a relaxed gait, whistling a carefree, wandering tune, until he encountered Calub in front of the small council chamber.

"Sir Justin, good to see you," Calub greeted.

"The pleasure is all mine. Well then," Sir Justin politely gestured for them to enter. Despite being a knight and a mercenary, he was neither arrogant nor condescending, and he was known for treating the staff with respect.

Once seated inside, the Marshal wasted no time, asking, "So, where’s Hugo?"

“Oh, your deputy was stationed at the Eastern Mansion,” replied Calub.

“Mansion, we have those?” asked Sir Justin.

“Turned out yes. A fifteen room mansion. It’s old and only one wing was usable, but it’s suitable for the retinues and guardsmen to winter.”

“Splendid, that answered where should I sleep tonight,” said Sir Justin excitedly.

Calub offered a sly smile. “I’m sure Hugo can arrange things for you.”

Sir Justin chuckled. “He wouldn’t like it, but that’s his problem.”

The two chuckled for a moment.

“So,” Sir Justin changed his tone into a serious one. “I have contacts at several places. They reported that the Three Hills are mustering their forces.”

“Viscount Jorge,” Calub muttered and added, “Three-thousand infantry and one-hundred cavalry.”

Sir Justin’s lips turned into a grin. “So, you’ve done your work, impressive, master Calub.”

Calub chuckled. “The last time, bad information nearly killed us, so, of course, I did my work.”

Sir Justin drew a deep breath. His memory flew to the plains, where they had won their biggest victory against Lord Robert. “Has the Lord said anything about this?”

“I saw him making plans, but nothing concrete at this moment,” Calub remarked.

Sir Justin crossed his arms, disliking the odds. “We only got four-hundred men and at best a hundred cavalry. About the same as the last time.”

“Without Midlandia support, this is all we can get. Even this much is already an achievement," Calub remarked.

Sir Justin sighed and confessed, “I don’t like this. Even with those new defensive works, I doubt the Lord of Three Hills will be stupid enough to repeat Lord Robert’s mistake. Also, the report says they’re stacking supplies already. I fear they’re going to attack sooner than later.”

Calub seemed surprised but glanced toward the window and saw the dark clouds forming on the horizon. “There’s still time to prepare. The rainy season will still last for two weeks.”

The Marshal rested his back against the hard wooden seat and pondered about their options.

Suddenly, the door creaked open. “Oh, I didn’t know we opened a council meeting today,” said the Lord of Korelia as he entered.

The two rose from their seat. “My Lord.”

“At ease, gentlemen,” he motioned for them to return to their seats. “So, what have you discussed?” Lansius asked as he took his seat.

Sir Justin gestured for Calub to speak, but Calub declined. “My Lord, there’s news that The Lord of Three Hills is preparing his troops and-“

“and siege engines, yes, I know that much.”

The two were surprised. Sir Justin looked at Calub, who shook his head.

Lansius continued, “Let’s not worry too much. There’s still two months before the road is hard enough for anything."

“Two months...?” The Marshal found it hard to believe, leaving Lansius smiling in victory.

“I know you’re relying on your merchants, and Calub is relying on his Guild’s connection. But I just recently secured more reliable eyes and ears.”

Marshall looked enthusiastic, while Calub furrowed his brows, trying to guess, and finally asked, “My Lord, who supplied you with this information?”

Unlawfully taken from Royal Road, this story should be reported if seen on Amazon.

Lansius slumped into his seat, tired from riding. “Oh, you’ll meet them soon.”

 

***

 

Just after midday, hundreds of riders and horse-drawn carts appeared on the horizon, approaching the western plains of Korelia Castle. The nomads, invited by Lansius, had finally arrived. They were an impressive sight, with their vibrant garments and sturdy steeds.

Their carts carried their families, goods, and provisions, while seemingly an endless wave of white sheep and goats trailed behind them, grazing lazily on the recently green Korelian grass.

The Lord of Korelia and Sir Justin rode with a detachment of riders to welcome their new guests. Excitement filled the air as the two groups met, extending their arms in gestures of friendship.

The people of Korelia watched in awe as the nomads, more numerous than they had ever imagined, set up their camps. In just a few hours, hundreds of white yurts stood against the lush green landscape, creating an impressive sight.

Before sunset, Lansius and his entourage were invited to join the elders in their largest tent for a feast. The air was filled with the aroma of horse wine, sweet honey-glazed snacks, and steamed dumplings. Laughter and music resonated throughout the camp.

Following custom, Lansius declined a wooden chair and sat on a cushion directly on the rugs, much to the hosts’ delight. Despite his eagerness, he struggled to understand their dialects and mostly let Sir Justin, Calub, or even Sterling do the talking, while Lansius nodded and smiled as required. It was taxing, but he needed this alliance to work.

The proceedings went better than expected, with neither side demanding anything from the other. Lansius sought mutual respect and understanding, rather than their service. He treated the nomads not as subjects to bend the knee but as business partners working toward a mutually beneficial relationship.

As expected, the day concluded with just warm greetings and introductions, but nothing concrete. Lansius sensed that the elders would send someone important when they were ready to discuss further.

In the meantime, he welcomed the nomads to graze on Korelia’s plains, just northwest of his castle. Using the nomad’s presence as a pretext, he also ordered the Korelian shepherds to graze on the eastern side of town.

The next day, an envoy arrived at the castle bearing gifts, led by a man in his prime with sharp eyes and a commanding aura.

Lansius knew he had met the one he had been waiting for.

 

***

 

Lansius had invited the man, named Batu, and two other guests into the grand chamber for a discussion. Equally, Lansius had Calub and Sir Justin on his side. Both sides were seated and separated by a table. Drinks were poured, and they had introduced themselves earlier.

“I thank you for this invitation. It’s an honor to enter the castle,” Batu began. Fortunately for Lansius, his accent was better than the rest.

Is he educated?

“The honor is also mine,” Lansius replied formally.

“So, what does the Lord wish to discuss with a humble shepherd like me?”

Batu’s eloquence awed Lansius. “As I stated yesterday, I wish for a trade relation.”

“It seems our shawl is of great interest to you,” Batu was pleased. “However, they are time intensive and we hardly make more than we needed.”

“I understand the challenge. Let me explain. We wish to acquire just the raw material, the winter fleece to be exact.”

The two guests murmured amongst themselves until Batu looked at them. He then replied to Lansius. “Only the raw material, not a finished shawl or garment?”

“Indeed, I want the pastoral community to produce the raw materials while the Korelians weave them into garments,” Lansius clarified his concept as best he could. “I want Korelia to create something unique to sell to Midlandia and beyond. I believe these quality garments are the perfect choice. If this works, everyone can prosper.”

Batu considered this for a moment. “What do we gain from this?”

“Supplies. We’ll trade fairly for your winter fleece. We have grains, salt, fruits, iron, linen, and wood.”

“Only our winter fleece?”

Lansius smiled, having thought this through. “Aside from the winter fleece, I’m interested in horses. And as you know, there’s no such thing as too many horses.”

Lansius’ answer brought laughter from Batu. “My Lord, you even understand our proverb. We’re honored.”

“Have we reached an agreement?” Lansius inquired.

“I would like to think so,” Batu nodded. “I’ll inform my elders and ask for our members to take oaths and honor this deal.”

“That won’t be necessary,” Lansius interrupted. “I don’t want to force anyone. Let the bartering process determine the outcome. If we offer too little, anyone is free not to sell their winter fleece.”

Batu smiled but shook his head. “I appreciate your good intentions, but it’ll be hard and breed destruction upon my community. Some families may be tempted to trade too much and disrupt the bartering rate for anyone else.”

This guy understands that far?

Batu continued, “Our offer is likely several hundred bags of fleece each spring to be traded for a fixed amount of supplies. I’ll consult with the elders about their needs and what we can offer.”

“What about this year?” Lansius asked, desperate for some raw materials.

“Most of the goats have shed their winter fleece, but we still have some in stock. I think there’s enough to make a hundred shawls.”

Lansius nodded, feeling the tension in his shoulders loosened. Observing this, Batu decided it was time to address a more challenging issue.

“My Lord, you’ve employed a member of our community as a scout. While I don’t speak for everyone, know that we don’t want to take sides in Lowlandia’s conflicts. We simply wish to live in the Great Plains in peace.”

Lansius nodded vigorously, showing his understanding. “I only want scouts and will pay accordingly – nothing more.”

“Nothing more, My Lord?” Batu asked, sounding skeptical.

“I don’t desire your allegiance,” Lansius asserted. “Your friendship alone is enough. Even if I am no longer the Lord, I hope you will honor our agreement and maintain a relationship with the Korelians.”

Lansius’ statement sparked murmurs among the others. Even Sir Justin looked questioningly at Calub.

“It seems I’ve misjudged you, My Lord," Batu said, glancing at Calub and Sir Justin. "You’re a larger character than I anticipated.”

Lansius was wary, unsure if the remark was complimentary or critical.

Batu went on, “The working opportunities last year and the payments in salt have saved many families. No one perished last winter, and after witnessing your character today… I’m prepared to align my tribesmen to your side.”

Eh, didn’t he just say?... was that a trick question?

Upon Batu’s words, the two other men proclaimed, “The Naimans agree. We’ll fight under your banner.”

“The Jadarans praise the agreement,” the second man added.

They’re only a few hundred men and women, where does this bravado come from?

Lansius was deeply moved. “I do not wish for your kinsmen to die for my cause.”

“My Lord, you misunderstand,” Batu replied, eliciting chuckles from his men.

“It’s rare to find a character worth fighting for. You’ve barely ruled for a season, yet you’ve already saved numerous of our elders and children. Let it be known that as barbaric as the Imperium’s painted us to be, we nomads know gratitude and will repay it in kind.”

A tingling ran down Lansius’ spine. He never anticipated that his salt payment scheme would reach beyond Korelia. Glancing at Calub, who nodded encouragingly. It was true they had allowed outsiders to help with the ditches, but he hadn’t expected anything to come out of it.

As it turned out, that seemingly small act of kindness had earned him the lasting gratitude of the nomadic people.

 

***

 

Chapter 40

First Cohort

 

The dawn of a new day bathed the spring steppe in hues of gold and green. As the sun emerged, it cast long shadows across the undulating field, illuminating the beauty of the awakening landscape. However, the tranquility was soon disrupted as hundreds of men and horses took to the field.

The four hundred Korelians had marched out from the western town gate and quickly fell into a line formation facing west.

On the right wing, Sir Justin as the Marshal led the first company, comprised of the most elite soldiers – battle-hardened Arvenians, Midlandians, and his small band of mercenaries.

In the center, Deputy Hugo directed the second company, consisting of a small group of Arvenians mixed with Midlandians. The center was reinforced by Roger, one of Lansius' squires, entrusted with leading the fourth company.

On the left wing, Lieutenant Sigmund, also known as the skald, was in charge of the third company, which was composed similarly to the center.

This was Lansius’ new formation. The traditional approach had a knight or man-at-arms leading four individuals to form a Lance. A hundred Lances constituted four hundred men, a mix of cavalry and crossbowmen. However, the traditional formation proved unwieldy in large-scale battles, leading Lansius to reform them at least at the hundred-men level.

These troops of mixed origins called themselves Korelians, as they were now based in Korelia. Facing them in the field was the light nomadic cavalry, advancing from the west. Led by Batu and his brethren, the nomads halted, awaiting a signal from the Lord of Korelia.

From a hill, Lansius ordered his staff to wave two large red flags bordered in black atop two poles. This signal prompted Batu to unleash his nomadic cavalry against the Korelian line. In three waves of forty horsemen each, they rode against the morning wind, with the silhouette of Korelia blocking the sun from their eyes.

The pounding of horse hooves echoed across the plains like a distant thunder growing steadily louder, steadily closer.

The nomads, perched on their lean, swift steeds, braced for the charge. Their faces were set, eyes gleaming with the thrill of the imminent clash. They chanted in the old language of the Caladan Sea Grass from the Great North, their war song stirring a chill down the spine.

Their cries intensified, contributing to the wild energy reverberating across the open field.

As Batu and his hundred brethren closed in on their target, the Korelian line formation reached a fever pitch. Half of them cursed their Lord for this intense training, while the other half relished the excitement after months of winter monotony.

“Close formation, shields up!” the company leaders commanded, trying their best to organize their troops.

Despite being only a mock battle, there was undeniable fear in their eyes as they felt the ground shudder. The sight of hundreds of charging cavalry was nothing short of demoralizing.

“Brace your long spears, blunt end forward,” Sir Justin ordered, echoed by the others. The four rows of Korelian men-at-arms, shoulder to shoulder, pointed their long spears at the enemy. For training purposes, they kept the lethal tips wrapped and staked into the ground. Within a few breaths, the Korelian front transformed into a wall of spears.

Then came the moment of truth. With a shout that echoed across the battlefield, the nomadic cavalry launched their attack. They hurled their training spears at a full gallop, then naturally slowed their horses to a trot and deftly maneuvered to avoid engagement.

The projectiles arced through the sky, briefly casting a shadow against the sunlight. There was hardly time to brace as the blunt missiles, tipped with sacks filled with pebbles and dirt, peppered the Korelian formation.

Despite their circular shields, armor, and helmets, ultimately it was the men who absorbed the brunt of the assault. Many recoiled in pain or shock upon impact.

“Hold your ground, keep your chins down!” Hugo shouted at his men. The veterans around him echoed his command. “Strong hands, strong shoulders, brace your necks!”

The soldiers reeled momentarily under the force of the attack, but they quickly regained their footing. Their shields rose once more, and just as quickly as they had arrived, the battle cries and thundering hooves receded. However, it was only a temporary reprieve, as a new wave of horsemen was already closing in for another attack.

In the face of suffering, rallying cries erupted from the Korelians’ ranks. Their fear and doubt had evaporated. Through their pain, they discovered their valor.

...

The training continued with several variations for two weeks, pausing only for rest or when rain made the plains too muddy and risky for training. By then, Lansius had incorporated the militia from the Korelia populace.

Despite Lansius’ low expectations, the townsfolk arrived in droves, eager and willing to participate. In total, six hundred volunteered for training, providing their own gear while the Lord supplied them with spears and shields.

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

The participation of the townsfolk boosted morale and intensified training. Lansius himself joined Sir Callahan to train in the newly formed heavy cavalry. Thirty of formerly Lord Robert’s knights participated, along with the Midlandian riders from the previous year’s campaign.

What Lansius drilled into his men during this training was unforgettable. Most memorable was the practice of orderly withdrawal, a basic but complex maneuver that the men-at-arms rehearsed almost daily. This training also forced the four commanders, Sir Justin, Hugo, Sigmund, and Roger, to coordinate effectively and maintain a good tempo within their ranks.

On the fourth week, Lansius stopped the training. While he still saw flaws and a lot of room for improvement, he understood this was the limit of what a non-standing army could achieve.

He and his advisors contemplated requesting additional training before summer, but they were cautious not to push them too hard. The training was, after all, demanding. It was also a drain on resources, as the army consumed more food and alcohol to keep morale high.

A significant number of bolts were expended during training. While many were retrieved and reusable, enough was broken or lost, resulting in a cost of a gold coin per day for bolts alone. However, this was an expense Lansius was willing to bear because, in Lowlandia, war was the sole currency of his survival.

After another week had passed, the time came for Lansius to bid farewell to the Korelian Nomads. With so many nomadic communities in one place, the grazing grounds were fast becoming inadequate. Their horses, sheep, and goats had grazed almost the entire northern side of Korelia. They also yearned to return to their traditional grazing grounds, where they had left a portion of their tribe behind.

During a modest celebration, Lansius joined Batu, his brethren, and their elders in a feast. Knowing that Lansius had yet to take a wife, they offered several candidates as concubines, as per their tradition.

The proposal embarrassed Lansius tremendously, and he rejected them with a great effort to be as polite as possible. The nomads, too pleased with the opportunity to tease the Lord of Korelia, took no offense. Lansius, in turn, gave them a generous supply of what he could spare as a farewell gift.

 

***

 

Ten days after the Nomads’ departure, the rain in Korelia seemed like a distant memory as the sun shone ever brighter. The transition from spring to summer had begun.

Sensing this shift, Lansius poured more effort into his planning, often working late into the night at his worn oak desk. Accompanied by the warm glow of lanterns and the familiar scent of beeswax, Lansius patiently scribbled his strategies, occasionally glancing at a bird’s-eye view map of Korelia.



Such a map was a rarity in this era, so Lansius had crudely drawn it himself from the highest vantage point in the castle’s lone tower. Although the map lacked scale, it had proven invaluable in planning his defense.

Lansius had identified a small creek just west of the town that attackers from the west consistently used to supply their camp. It was so vital that he had considered fouling it with animal carcasses or tannery waste, but such a vile trick could be cleaned up by the opponent within a few days.

He could attempt to ruin or divert the water from its source, but the enemy could simply dig wells and establish their camp elsewhere. This part proved to be a big issue as it would introduce an unpredictable element, a wild card he wished to avoid.

While he could inconvenience his opponent by ruining their water supply, he ultimately decided against it, preferring to know where the enemy would set up camp, rather than preparing blindly.

With that issue settled, he returned to his central question.

What can I do? A bait and trap attack?

He began to sketch out a classic bait-and-trap plan on the map, but he quickly realized that it was highly unlikely the enemy would repeat the Lion’s recent mistakes. Lansius suspected that the opposition would avoid his trenches and instead attempt a different strategy.

Moreover, news of the enemy building siege engines was concerning. Maester Caine, the representative of the Mason Guild, had warned before departing that Korelia’s castle and walls were old and not designed to withstand the latest siege engines likely to be fielded by the Three Hills.

Feeling stumped, Lansius leaned back in his chair and ruminated on the situation.

He had secured the cooperation of the sturdy and brave Korelian nomads, but their numbers were concerning. The entire Korelian nomadic population numbered less than six hundred. They could muster two hundred cavalrymen, but even a mere fifty casualties could set the nomads back for generations.

Lansius estimated that there were fewer than two hundred male riders. Half of them were too young or too old to be combatants. Perhaps only a hundred could be relied upon.

Drawing a deep breath, a wave of emotion welled up within him. Lansius had witnessed so much death in just a few years, and now the last thing he wanted was to ask for more people to shed blood for him.

Although he was tempted to rely on his new allies, deep down Lansius didn’t want them to get involved. However, he was short on options. Even with the help of the nomads and the militia, the enemy might still outnumber them.

What Lansius had at his disposal was:

400 men-at-arms/ crossbowmen

600 militia

100 cavalry, geared toward heavy cavalry

100 nomadic horse archers

It was a significant number, but Sir Callahan and Justin had advised him that he couldn’t afford a high-casualty victory. A Pyrrhic victory would merely serve as an invitation for another lord to invade Korelia.

Lansius let out a deep sigh before jotting out his plan for tomorrow. The first was to reinforce the ditch as the muddy season was over. He also wanted to make a small encampment in the forest up north, in case he needed a place to hide some of his men or supplies for reinforcement. Then, he also needed to allocate more time to train with his lance on horseback.

Ugh... more lance training.

Physical training was not his forte. Although he enjoyed horse riding, the experience of doing so in armor and helmet, which only had small holes as vents, felt like a nightmare. Moreover, he had to practice fighting on foot in armor, in anticipation of the high probability that he could be unseated and need to battle his way back to safety.

His retainers insisted on these rigorous exercises, to the extent that Sir Callahan was training him daily on horseback. Sir Justin and Hugo also engaged him in sparring sessions. Lansius understood their motivation, but his body was sore and the armor he used was an uncomfortable fit. The custom-made armor he'd ordered had yet to arrive.

With a heavy sigh, Lansius gazed at his rudimentary map of Korelia and its surrounding area. He had made little blocks of wood to represent units, the infantry and the cavalry. He just didn’t know how many boxes would be on the enemy’s side.

The Three Hills was a viscountcy, similar to Robert’s territory, but boasted a greater population and wealth. Although the Lord of Three Hills had suffered many losses, Lord Jorge was young, ambitious, and aggressive. He also had a streak of winning recently. Which made him a dangerous opponent to face head-on.

 

***

 

Chapter 41

Imperfectum

 

Calub’s House

“Master, you really should take a break and a bath,” the page boy suggested.

Chuckling, the alchemist responded, “Do I truly smell that bad, Margo?”

“No, master, but the workshop does carry a strong odor," the youth said innocently.

Calub let out a faint smile. “In that case, would you kindly prepare a bath for me?”

With the decision made, Margo promptly retreated upstairs to arrange the bath.

Calub had resided next-door to the workshop throughout the winter and continued to do so. Lord Lansius didn’t mind him staying out of the castle as it was relatively near and there were guards present day and night at the workshop.

Originally, it was the workshop’s occupants who suggested the place to him. The vacant house was owned by a shepherd who had turned to trade. The man was more than willing to part with his old home in exchange for some additional capital.

While the house was not vast, it featured two stories, an attic, and a cellar. Calub paid a substantial sum for the property, but he considered it money well-spent. As was his habit, he established his alchemy lab in the basement.

Initially, he lived there with only his assistant, Margo. However, as time passed, he became attached to a few of the orphaned youngsters from the workshop.

Calub welcomed the kids into his home, giving them the entire second floor and the attic. Among them was a bright lad named Timmy, who showed an uncanny knack for maintaining the house and had a meticulous way with tools.

Another who caught his eye was Tia. Despite her limp, she was adept at various chores and proved to be an exceptional cook. The two children, along with Margo, managed the household chores, and while there were occasional mishaps, they generally did well.

This arrangement allowed Calub the freedom to conduct his experiments to his heart’s content.

A knock sounded at the door.

“Just a moment, Margo. I’ll be right up,” Calub called out.

As the door creaked open, a familiar female voice echoed, “Really, in a basement again?”

Calub turned in surprise to see the speaker, exclaiming joyfully, “Hannei!”

“How are you, old buddy?” asked the blonde woman in a blue tunic and a plain off-white surcoat as she made her way down the stairs.

“Why are you here? I’m doing quite well. I believe I’ve even put on a bit of weight,” he replied, patting his stomach.

The girl giggled. “I’m here to visit, but honestly, I heard you’re now a high-ranking official. Yet here you are...” She glanced around the basement with a smirk.

Laughing, Calub countered, “Then let me show you my office in the castle.”

Hannei laughed heartily. “I’m just joking. You seem busy, Calub. I could always come back later.”

“Nonsense. I’m merely tinkering with some small stuff. Just let me take a quick bath, and then I’ll take you to the castle. I imagine you’re eager to meet Lansius as well.”

“Not particularly. Actually, forget the castle. Let’s just enjoy some good food in town.”

“That sounds delightful,” Calub agreed.

As Calub went for his bath, Hannei made herself comfortable upstairs.

“So, you’re Margo?”

“Yes, My Lady.”

“No need for formalities, dear. I’m not of noble birth,” Hannei replied with a warm smile that accentuated her brown eyes which looked golden from an angle. It complimented her long dull blonde hair.

Margo blushed. From the moment he had opened the door and caught sight of the woman beneath the hood, he had been utterly smitten. “Yes, master. Might you like a drink while you wait?”

“Only if that doesn’t bother you too much,” Hannei replied.

Before Margo could respond, a young girl emerged from the kitchen area, carrying an earthen jug.

“I apologize for my limp, master,” little Tia said, understanding that her walk was not pleasant to look at.

“What happened to your leg? Please, sit,” Hannei invited.

“It’s not needed, I-“

“I insist.”

Tia reluctantly sat next to Hannei who proceeded to examine the girl’s leg.“

"You weren’t born with this, were you?”

“No, master. I was bitten by a wolf last year.”

“I’m so sorry to hear that,” Hannei said, her brows furrowing in concern.

At that moment, Calub emerged from his room, donning his characteristic broken-white leather coat adorned with numerous pockets. His hair was neatly combed, and he radiated a fresh aura.

Calub noticed the pair and asked, “Ah, Hannei, could you possibly help Tia?”

She looked at Calub and shook her head. “It’s going to be very painful.”

Calub started to ponder for options.

“Master, could you really cure my limp?” Tia asked, her eyes filled with hope.

“But it’s very painful, my dear. And it may still fail,” Hannei explained gently.

“We could manage the pain with poppy milk, and I have some painkillers,” Calub chimed in.

“Calub, those are expensive! Are you serious?”

“I am. Old medicine loses its potency over time, and I was planning to make some new batches, anyway.”

Hannei was skeptical but decided not to push further.

“If you’re serious, then seek help from a physician. Depending on their assessment, I can decide whether to proceed or not. You’ll also need to stock some supplies for at least two nights,” she said, after mentally running through what would be required.

The news brought a wave of happiness to the household. Little Tia was loved by all. She cooked, knitted, and repaired items, making them look as good as new.

If you discover this narrative on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

After some discussion, they decided to attempt the procedure the following day. Today, the two old friends had plans to enjoy a meal in town. They wanted to share stories and tidings, as well as gather necessary supplies.

During one of their chats, Calub remembered an important detail. “Hannei, I forgot to ask. Who did you travel with?”

“Oh, right,” Hannei frowned. “Remember what happened in Perugia and last time in Lutesia?”

“You’re not saying... here in Korelia?” Calub asked in disbelief.

“Yes, despite precautions, it happened again,” Hannei’s face looked angry at her incompetence.

“Don’t blame yourself,” Calub advised. “The way things work, it’s often beyond our control. Let’s just hope that nothing bad happens this time.”

They both exhaled simultaneously.

 

***

 

Lansius, Council Chamber

Sir Justin’s relocation to the Eastern Mansion had stirred up an issue that needed attention. Though he initially shelved it due to pressing matters with the nomads and spring training, he had now submitted a report detailing the scandalous activities that had occurred upon his arrival.

The report, brimming with confessions from the women and girls caught at the mansion’s gate, promised to be a delicious read. Sir Justin had sent it with the sole intention of teasing Hugo, confident that Lansius would revel in the juicy details.

“My Lord, please. It’s a misunderstanding. I didn’t organize such a party,” Hugo pleaded.

“I already told you I believed you, Hugo,” Lansius chuckled. Despite this assurance, Hugo felt as though judgment had already been passed.

“Mercy, My Lord!” Hugo implored, his hands covering his face in a gesture of regret while slumping in his seat. “I only meant to cater to the men’s ‘needs’. Last winter, they pined so for their families, it was becoming utterly unbearable to witness.”

“You should have arranged for them to be sent home,” Lansius suggested nonchalantly from his seat.

“B-but, My Lord, please forgive us,” Hugo pleaded a note of desperation in his voice.

Lansius realized his mistake after watching Hugo’s reaction. “No, no, you misunderstood me. I meant that you should adjust their rotation schedule, so more of them can return home.”

“My Lord, that’s… an exceptionally generous and brilliant idea,” Hugo responded, taken aback.

“Then do it,” Lansius said, leaning back in his chair. “While I found nothing condemnable in your actions, try to prevent a potential spread of sexual diseases in the future.”

“My Lord, I assure you, they were all clean.”

A chuckle echoed in the room as Audrey interjected, her tone laced with mischief. “I’m sure the deputy personally inspected each one of them.”

“No, I didn’t. Never,” Hugo responded emotionally. His greatest fear was likely that this incident would reach his squire brother, Anci, who would relentlessly bully him for such a blunder.

“Anyway, I heard you’re engaged,” Audrey changed her angle of attack.

“A would-be fiancée,” Hugo corrected her.

“So, when can I meet her?” Audrey seemed overly excited at the prospect.

“Soon…”

“So, who’s her father? I’m sure Lans-, I mean, My Lord would like to know?”

“Of course, I meant to ask for My Lord’s permission,” Hugo remarked and then faced Lansius, said, “Dame Lucielle is from a baronet family. She lost her father last year due to old age. Sir Callahan sent me a letter, suggesting I meet her as he’s the girl’s uncle, albeit a few times removed.”

A baronet family, huh? That’s quite a catch. I must remember to thank Sir Callahan for his help.

“Is she attractive and well-formed?” Audrey probed before Lansius had a chance to respond.

This is rare, seeing her asking for other women this way.

Hugo glanced at Lansius, who simply shrugged in response.

“Well… she’s appealing enough. Her family estate is quite substantial and it would fall into ruin under inadequate management,” Hugo explained.

“Don’t marry out of financial necessity or pity,” Lansius advised. He knew that many lower nobility estates in the area boasted expansive manor lands but lacked the essential capital for their development. Many noble families had fallen into hardship after depleting their savings.

“I will take your words to heart, My Lord,” said the younger but more mature-looking squire.

“Good, then invite her here when you see fit. But keep in mind we’re on the brink of war. Are you certain you wish to marry now?”

“I appreciate your insight, My Lord. I’ll ponder this further,” answered Hugo readily.

“Best to discuss it with her. Adjust the rotation schedule for the billet, and then you can invite her here,” Lansius concluded the discussion.

“My deepest gratitude, My Lord,” Hugo responded before exiting the room, head held high.

The door closed gently behind him.

“I didn’t realize you were so considerate,” Audrey remarked, standing behind her chair and leaning into it.

Now they were alone in the council chamber. “Oh really? And what exactly do you mean by that?”

“Nothing. Not much at all,” Audrey replied with a playful smile. The chair she leaned against swayed gently.

“I haven’t seen you much at training lately. What have you been up to these past few weeks?” Lansius inquired, noting that Audrey seldom sought his company unless others were present.

“Just practicing on my own,” she replied nonchalantly.

Lansius could only nod in response. Their relationship had become somewhat strained, a situation complicated by recent events. “Would you like to go for a ride or do something together?” he suggested.

“I have an appointment to attend to today, my apology, My Lord,” Audrey politely declined before leaving the chamber.

Her formal address, referring to him as ‘My Lord’, prompted a sigh from Lansius as he contemplated their complex relationship.

 

***

 

With nothing on his schedule, Lansius returned to his chamber. Yearning for a ride to clear his head, he gathered his riding gear and prepared to depart. As he emerged, he found his entourage, Cecile and Sterling, waiting for him.

“My Lord, a messenger just arrived,” Cecile reported, offering up an envelope of superior quality, bound and sealed. With the spring rains finally subsiding, the roads had become navigable again, and messengers began to arrive in Korelia.

Recognizing the signet on the wax seal, Lansius broke open the envelope. The letter was from Lord Robert, detailing the tax assessments from his realm after the previous year’s harvest.

While primarily a formality, the missive intrigued Lansius due to its quality. The letter of that era wasn’t crafted from ordinary pulp paper, but from a thin, almost translucent animal hide known as vellum. It was penned with a sharp-tipped quill made from a large bird’s feather.

The consistent black ink and elegant handwriting suggested the work of a highly skilled scribe. Despite its cursive style, the text was perfectly legible.

“Cecile, ensure our staff treats the messenger well. I’ll meet him tomorrow along with the council members,” Lansius instructed. Turning to his squire, he added, “Sterling, let’s go for a ride.”

The two young attendants bowed in acknowledgment.

Suddenly, Lansius felt compelled to add, “Cecile, there's no need to inform your father about this.”

Cecile smiled and nodded. “Yes, My Lord, I understand.”

Lansius had no desire for another training session.

As he was about to leave, Cecile motioned for a private word. Lansius nodded once in acknowledgment and turned to Sterling, "Prepare the horse for me. I'll be there shortly."

Sterling nodded without question and headed toward the stables.

"What is it?" Lansius asked gently.

"Pardon me, My Lord, but I think you should know that Lady Audrey is trying her best to practice archery on her own," Cecile reported. As the cup-bearer, responsible for Lansius' drinks, she was his most trusted confidant.

"Archery? You mean with bows?" Lansius asked, showing great interest.

Cecile nodded. "Yes, My Lord. She bought two from the tribesmen."

Lansius rubbed his chin. "She could have told me about this."

Cecile giggled. "No lady likes to show when she's fumbling. It's considered unsightly."

Lansius could only smile. "How good is she with the bow?"

"Right now..." She shook her head. "Especially not on horseback."

"She trained horseback archery on her own?"

"Indeed, My Lord. She believes it's more practical to use bows on horseback than mini crossbows. She... Lady Audrey is trying hard to be useful in her own role."

Lansius nodded silently. He knew Audrey had been addressing many issues, acting as the matriarch that held the female staff together and kept the younger staff in check. She was also the figure that the rest of the army respected.

Cecile continued, "My Lord, please don't mention this to anyone."

"Gratitude, I will heed my trusted cup-bearer's advice."

Cecile smiled and bowed slightly. Lansius then headed towards the stables in a much better mood.

Upon seeing Lansius, his destrier perked up eagerly, akin to a dog being offered a walk. With the day’s fair weather, Lansius opted for a trip to the northern forest to inspect its outskirts.

Upon their departure from the castle, the destrier trotted excitedly. Over time, Lansius had grown accustomed to the horse’s temperamental nature, learning to trust it to carry him safely.

Unlike a vehicle, a horse was more akin to a moody AI. The more robust the horses, the more unpredictable their behavior.

Accompanied by four others, Lansius and Sterling rode in a column formation. Sterling’s riding skills had improved significantly, allowing him to keep pace with Lansius despite riding a less powerful horse.

They had barely left Korelia when they encountered an unusual sight. Lansius reined in his destrier, who neighed and jerked in protest. He patted her to soothe her mood. The horse loved running, so halting her just short of the open plains made her irritable.

However, Lansius couldn’t peel his eyes away from the strange spectacle before him. A woman was clinging to a large tree, precariously perched on a lofty branch.

The sight of her silhouette up so high was enough to induce dizziness.

A blonde girl? Is she nobility?

“Excuse me, my lady,” Lansius called up to her.

“H-hang on, give me a moment, please…” came a melodious voice from above.

“My lady, that’s dangerous!” Lansius warned. A fall from such a height could be fatal.

“I know,” she responded.

Her actions left Lansius and his companions perplexed.

“What’s the lass doing up there?” Sterling asked, noticing a group of children hidden behind the bushes surrounding the tree.

“Oh, please don’t bother the kids. They’re just helping me to— eh, ahh!” Her hand slipped.

“Look out!” shouted one of the guards, causing Lansius’ heart to skip a beat.

 

***

 

Warning! Slice-of-life. I don't want trouble, those who dislike, can stop right here. No pressure to read. ❤️

For long time readers who just returned to the story, please make sure you have read the expanded chapter 21 before reading this chapter.

Chapter 21-2: A Lady Named AudreyChapter 21-3: The Mage

 

 

Chapter 42

Fortuna Virgo

 

“Look out!” A guard’s warning echoed through the air, making Lansius’ heart pound in his chest.

Oh, shoot!

Lansius was closest and almost directly beneath her, so he swiftly urged his horse forward with a press of his thigh. But the lady tumbled headfirst and he misjudged her trajectory. Their heads collided with a sickening thud.

“Kyaa~”

“Uwaa-“ Lansius’ world turned pitch black, yet his arms reached out instinctively, desperately grappling in the air. Suddenly, a weight crashed into him. Blindly, he snatched at the flailing form, pulling her close into a tight embrace.

The sharp jolts of pain from her flailing limbs were yet to register when his mount surged forward in panic. “Waaa!” Their cries of surprise merged as the destrier was startled by the unexpected burden.

“Easy, girl, easy!” Lansius fought to control the terrified horse, but she galloped a considerable distance before he could calm her down.

“I got her... My Lord, is everyone alright?” Sterling gasped, his breath ragged.

“Well done, Sterling,” Lansius praised, still clutching the woman tightly to him. She reciprocated the hold, her hands latched onto his coat and arm.

Clothes, frills? And what is this softness…?

The woman beneath his hold was panting heavily. “My lady, are you hurt?” asked Lansius, still without his sight.

“Eh umm, no. I don’t think so...” Despite their precarious fall, her answer was surprisingly coherent.

“My apology, I couldn’t catch you safely.”

“No, no, it’s my fault. I shouldn’t have climbed that tree. Ouch~” She whimpered, no doubt feeling the aftereffects of their collision.

Lansius suddenly became aware of their awkward embrace. “Sterling, can you help... um... adjust the lady’s riding position?”

“Of course... my lady, please excuse me,” replied Sterling.

“Oh... Oh! Right… thank you,” the lady responded, shifting in the saddle as Lansius carefully withdrew his hands.

After a bit of readjustment, she finally sat securely in the saddle. The destrier could easily handle two unarmored riders but voiced her dislike openly. Lansius patted the horse’s neck while trying to open his eyes. His sight gradually focusing on the beautiful golden blonde before him.

A golden blonde in Korelia?

“Earlier, did he refer to you as ‘My Lord’? Are you Lansius, by any chance?”

Eh, she knows me? Hang on, I’m the local lord, so that shouldn’t be surprising.

“Indeed, I am,” he replied, squinting to get a clearer look at the woman who was curiously peering back at him.

“Oh, it really is you!” Her voice was filled with excitement. “Lans, it’s me, Felis!”

“Fe... Felicity?!” Lansius exclaimed, his voice echoing with surprise. “Why are you here? Am I hallucinating?”

“Haha~ No, you’re not. I’m really here.” Her giggles floated back to him, as lighthearted as he remembered.

“But why- Wait, what were you doing up in that tree?” Lansius asked.

“Oh, I was searching for some fruit. But first, let me reassure the children.” Felis called out to the children gathered around the base of the tree, “Kids, it’s alright. He’s an acquaintance. Thank you for your help.”

The children waved their farewells enthusiastically. She was just as merry as Lansius remembered.

Meanwhile, Lansius’ vision gradually cleared.

“I’m sorry about falling onto you. Are you alright?” Felis asked, her gaze filled with concern.

“No, it’s fine. Just a bit tender.” He touched his forehead, wincing at the slight sting.

“Just a bit of redness, but no bleeding,” her instinct from her days as a labyrinth explorer took over.

“And you? We hit pretty hard,” Lansius asked, worry lining his voice.

“Ahaha, I’m fine. Calub always says my skull is pretty hard.”

Her light-hearted response drew a chuckle from him. "More importantly, I heard rumors... Is it true that you're engaged to him?" Lansius whispered.

"To Sir Archie, yes," she nodded with a smile. "Sorry for keeping it a secret; he wanted it that way. But now, it’s not that much of a secret anymore."

That means she's really Lord Arte’s betrothed...

“So, Lans, where were you headed?”

“Just out stretching the horse’s legs. Oh, I can ride now,” he said, beaming with a sense of accomplishment.

“Yeah, I noticed. Are you sure it’s well for me to share the ride?”

“No problem. I couldn’t possibly leave you here alone; you have a knack for getting into trouble. So, where are you staying in Korelia, and who’s accompanying you?”

“That can wait. Right now, I’m on a mission to find Costard fruit,” she declared passionately. “Do you know where it grows?”

Unauthorized use: this story is on Amazon without permission from the author. Report any sightings.

“Costard? Can’t say I do,” Lansius mused, then turned to his squire. “Sterling, do you know anything about this fruit?”

Sterling, who was not a local, turned to the other riders. One of them rode forward. “The Costard fruit is a local delicacy, My Lord.”

“Is it in season, and do you know where we might find it?” Lansius asked.

“Yes, My Lord, it’s currently in season. You should find some in the forest. Generally, the ones hanging low taste the sweetest. The ones on the high branches tend to be a bit sour.”

“What?!” Felis squealed in surprise.

“So, your little tree-climbing adventure was for naught, huh?”

“Huhu~ There’s no need to rub it in. You used to be so sweet, Lans.”

Felis’ dramatic antics sent Lansius into a fit of laughter. “Well, you’re lucky... I mean, you always are. As it turns out, I’m heading into the forest. Let’s go find that elusive fruit of yours.”

“Lucky~,” Felis sang out happily.

Guided by the Korelia-born rider, they set off towards the north.

 

***

 

Their destrier trotted energetically across the open plains, barely burdened by the extra weight. Soon, they reached the edge of the forest. Due to the challenging terrain and tall vegetation, they moved carefully.

“So where are you staying?” Lansius asked as they slowly ventured into the forest.

“At the inn. I arrived just yesterday.”

“Did you bring any guards? The journey to Lowlandia can be dangerous.”

“Hey, I’m quite the explorer, you know!” she protested. It wasn’t an empty claim.

Felis had spent her teens exploring ancient Dwarven ruins on the old Progentia Continent, the place where this world's civilization originated. Each labyrinth was teeming with deadly creatures. Despite her delicate appearance, she was a monster in her own right, even more so than Audrey.

During one of the nights on their march to Korelia, Calub, a little tipsy from wine, recounted a tale from his days as an explorer on the old continent. He shared a particularly memorable story about young Felis, who once found herself trapped in a ruin. She had run out of crossbow bolts, her dagger had broken, and she was forced to resort to wrestling, biting, and even using her hair as a garrote to fend off goblins.

When Calub and their comrades finally located her, her armor was in tatters, her nose and fingers broken, a few teeth missing, her jaw damaged, and her skin marred by bloody cuts. Yet, she didn’t shed a tear. Her only requests were for bandages, a new dagger, fresh bolts for her crossbow, and a lion’s share of the discovered treasure.

Thankfully, this world’s humans, although similar in appearance, possessed some unique traits, one of which, as Lansius had discovered, was the ability to regrow teeth.

Despite her fearsome reputation, Lansius knew Felis enjoyed being treated like a normal girl. “So, where’s your trusty crossbow now, expert explorer?” he teased.

“Ah, erm… I left it…” Felis admitted nonchalantly.

“Where?”

“In Midlandia~” Felis answered innocently.

Lansius let out a chuckle.

“But I didn’t travel alone. I don’t know the way, either,” she admitted innocently.

“So you joined a group of merchants?” he ventured.

“Bingo! We tagged along with one. They were happy to have us,” she said proudly.

No wonder, she looked every bit a noble.

“So, who’s the unfortunate guard leader?” Lansius asked.

“Guard leader...? No, I only brought Hannei with me.”

Lansius swallowed hard. “She’s here?!”

“Lans, don’t tell me you’re still afraid of her even after spending several seasons in Toruna?”

“I am, she’s volatile," he whispered in protest.

“Haha~ you’re overreacting. She’s my adorable friend.”

Lansius felt a shiver run down his spine, but the lack of guards raised an important question. “Why did you come to Korelia? Aren’t you supposed to be preparing for your wedding? Don’t tell me you ran away!”

Felis sighed before answering. “Archie isn’t around, so I’m bored~”

That was expected. Lansius had learned that Lord Arte, now confirmed as her fiancé, along with Sir Peter, Anci, and Thomas, were visiting the Capital to gather support for the occupied Arvena.

“Felis, you’re the one who wanted to marry into nobility. I supported you before, and even more so now, knowing you're with Lord Arte. However, it’s not all roses. There’s a lot of boring stuff and little freedom,” Lansius found himself repeating the words he had written in a letter last year.

“I know, I’m just bored... I don’t mean to run away from it. After all, it’s my dream.” Felis smiled angelically.

“That’s good to know. But seriously, traveling this far just because you’re bored.” Lansius sighed.

“Why not? Calub and you are here. Also, I heard that you got a castle,” she said, her lips turning into a smirk.

“So that’s your real intention...”

She’s probably going to act like a princess. I must protect my staff from her... But then again, probably they’re going head over heels for her.

“Eh, there’s also another issue... I’m not sure, but I think there’s a problem back home,” Felis dropped an unexpected bombshell.

“What kind of problem?” Lansius asked anxiously. He couldn’t afford a crisis in Midlandia while Korelia was still under threat.

“I’m not sure. You’ll have to ask Hannei about that.”

“Mmm, let’s invite you two to stay at the castle then.”

“Ah~” Felis turned to face him, her voice dripping with allure. Her deep blue eyes were truly mesmerizing.

“W-why are you looking at me like that? I’m innocent,” Lansius protested in advance.

Being this close to her, sharing a ride, his heart pounded fiercely. Her hair’s fragrance and her natural scent enveloped him.

“Sleeping under the same roof again, are we?” Felis teased.

“N-No, no, no! That’s taken out of context- I wouldn’t dare. I’m with Audrey now!”

“Fu-fu-fu~ so you confessed already? Oh, I can't wait to see Audrey again." She had met Audrey last spring when Lord Arte visited Lord Bengrieve, and since then, she had been rooting for them to get married.

“Y-yeah, she’ll be thrilled to see you.” Lansius was grateful for the change in topic.

“She’s not riding with you? Does this mean that she’s pregnant?”

Preg-nant...

“Eh! Don’t start rumors like that!” he blurted out once he regained his senses.

This drew the other riders’ attention, but luckily, Sterling was there to wave it off as nothing.

“Ah, not yet then... That’s a shame,” the audacious lady lamented.

She’s actually serious about that?

“Felis, maybe you hit your head in the fall, let me check,“ Lansius’ sarcasm was at its peak, but...

“Sure, sure,” Felis agreed enthusiastically.

He ended up examining her head. There was no bruise. Her thick hair or her luck must have cushioned the impact.

“Find anything?”

“Sadly, no... It must be a birth defect that allows you to spout nonsense like that!” He tickled her waist, which sent her into fits of laughter.

“Ahaha! Stop it, ahaha~ stop it! Or I’m going to tell Audrey,” she gasped between laughs.

Then, out of nowhere, a small branch fell squarely on Lansius’ head. “Gahh!”

Felis laughed at his misfortune. “See, even the forest is against you. No more tickling or something worse might happen,” she warned playfully.

Lansius had nearly forgotten that Felis wasn’t ordinary. She carried with her an aura of peculiar fortune—be it a curse or a blessing.

Despite all the dangers she had faced in her exploring days, including the time when she was trapped, luck was always on her side. This led several individuals try to rely on her.

Calub had relayed to Lansius the stories that circulated about Felis' previous group. They had depended on Felis as their scout, and she had discovered a new section of the labyrinth, which led them to unspoiled treasure. However, when the labyrinth collapsed, she was the only one fortunate enough to escape.

Such incidents seemed to trail in her wake, prompting other adventurers to approach her with a mix of awe and caution. The lesson was clear: Felis’ presence was a serious matter.

It was only out of sheer desperation for wealth that Calub and Hannei welcomed her into their team.

Calub had once said that proximity to her could drastically change a person’s fate, though not always favorably. He even jestingly suggested that if Felis were to be involved in a war, it could lead to a crushing defeat, only for her to miraculously survive and capture the attention of the victorious leader, potentially her ideal partner.

Back then, Lansius had brushed off such stories as exaggerations. However, Felis had indeed captivated Lord Arte, using nothing more than her golden hair and blue eyes.

In a sense, Calub’s words rang true, making everyone who knew her background nervous. Her luck could bring about the best or the worst of situations, as unpredictable as a roll of the dice.

Lansius suspected that her presence had significantly altered his destiny. After all, meeting Felis was the reason he went to the inn where he encountered Thomas, Anci, and Hugo. This led him to Sabina Rustica and the young Lord Arte.

Felis was also the one who directed him to Feodosia, where he received an invitation to Toruna and later met Audrey and Lord Bengrieve.

However, Lansius was also aware that this fortune was a double-edged sword. For example, in the aftermath of Sabina Rustica, the real winner wasn’t Lansius or the Arvenians, but Felicity, who secured a future with a high-ranking noble.

Now, she had appeared once more, unannounced, on the eve of a war. A wave of apprehension swept over Lansius. The arrival of Felis was like the raising of a curtain, a signal that the upcoming events would be monumental. The forthcoming summer held the promise of something grand and unavoidable.

 

***

 

Chapter 43

A Warlord's Persona

 

Lansius and his riders reached the dense part of the forest. Their pace slowed due to the narrow path, a trail familiar to the riders who occasionally hunted deer, boar, and foxes.

The destrier neighed a few times, displaying curiosity about its surroundings. At one point, the horse even attempted to snap at a lizard hanging from a tree branch.

“Lans, I think even your horse is laughing at you,” Felis teased, patting the horse’s neck.

“No, the horse suggesting that I tickle this extra passenger some more.” Lansius moved his fingers in the air to emphasize his point.

“Hya~, no more, no more.” Felis shielded her waist with her hands like a child.

Lansius chuckled at her response while silently pleading with the forest not to drop another branch on him.

“Ah! Now I understand why your hands were so naughty,” Felis suddenly declared while they were avoiding low-hanging branches.

“What? My lady, my hands are on the reins,” Lansius defended himself.

“Before, when I fell, I felt your hands touching me all over,” she accused.

He suddenly remembered feeling something soft in his hand.

Wait, that wasn’t her waist?

“Erm... please don’t say things like that,” he pleaded, glancing nervously around. He had enough trouble with Audrey and he couldn’t afford a rumor.

Worse still, what if she tells Lord Arte or Bengrieve...

Shaming a lord’s spouse was a great offense. Enough to send a minor noble like Lansius to the chopping block. He gulped nervously.

His reaction was not lost to Felis, whose beautiful face regressed into wicked laughter. “I’ve got you now, Lans,” she declared, a victorious smirk on her face.

He sighed and conceded. “Name your price.”

 

***

 

As Lansius and Felis rode together and entered Korelia, the inhabitants respectfully slowed their pace and bowed their heads. Usually, Lansius’ route took him directly to the castle, but today, in deference to his guest’s wishes, they made a detour to an inn where Felis had stored her belongings.

Having served as a lord for several months, Lansius was familiar with the townspeople’s customary greetings. However, the atmosphere was different this time. Their responses were closer to reverence than simple acknowledgment.

The difference, he realized, lay in his companion. Felis, with her cascading golden hair and bright blue eyes, riding a warhorse, perfectly embodied the image of a high-ranking noble.

In a land where most nobles sported varying shades of brown hair, her golden locks were a distinct anomaly. Her appearance was so striking that even Lansius understood the townspeople’s reaction.

As they continued their journey, Felis sat comfortably, nonchalantly enjoying a Costard fruit which to Lansius resembled an apple. Three more of these fruits were neatly packed in a cloth resting on her lap, presenting an image reminiscent of a pampered princess.

Her interest in the fruit also made Lansius order one of the riders to take a young sapling to be planted in the Eastern Mansion.

Slightly embarrassed, Lansius guided the destrier carefully through the crowds towards the inn. All the while, the gaze of Korelia’s residents was fixed on them. Whispers and comments followed their path, with some people even trailing behind for a closer look. In response, Sterling and the other riders grew vigilant, reinforcing their perimeter with any guards who happened to be nearby.

Above them, the sky was favorably clear, with only a smattering of clouds.

Upon their arrival at the castle, the guards and staff mirrored the townspeople’s astonishment. The sight of a golden-haired woman was a rarity associated with the ancient northern dynasty. This dynasty was once known for its powerful great kings and lords before the era of the Third Imperium.

Although the dynasty’s power had waned and blonde hair had become less uncommon, reverence for their lineage persisted. The irony was that there was nothing royal about Felis’ heritage. She was merely fortunate to have been born with golden hair.

As they rode through the courtyard and into the entrance of the keep, Lansius spotted two familiar figures waiting. Felis, sharing his ride, noticed the presence of another blonde and exclaimed with joy, as if she had discovered another member of an endangered species.

What Felis’ saw was Lansius’ cup-bearer, Cecile.

“Greetings, my Lord, my Lady,” Cecile managed to say, concealing her surprise admirably. Lansius noted the grace with which she handled the unexpected situation.

As they halted, Carla, a female squire in training, swiftly moved to assist Felis in dismounting from her horse. Lansius dismounted next, with Sterling, who had been shadowing him closely, lending a hand.

The powerful destrier snorted and whinnied as it was led away by the stable master, and all eyes were drawn to Lansius.

Seizing the moment, he introduced his companion. “This is Lady Felicity, fiancee to Earl Arte of Arvena.”

While the revelation stirred shock amongst the onlookers, Cecile managed a solitary blink before bowing respectfully.

“Hello, you may call me Felis.”

Cecile, choosing to maintain formal etiquette, replied, “Madam Countess.”

Lansius interjected, "Her marriage hasn't been finalized yet, so you can still address her as Lady."

Cecile nodded in understanding, "Yes, My Lord."

If you come across this story on Amazon, it's taken without permission from the author. Report it.

Felis, ever cheerful, complimented Cecile with a great smile, "You have lovely hair. What’s your name?"

Flattered, Cecile blushed, "This servant is named Cecile, My Lord’s cup-bearer."

Felis greeted her warmly, "Nice to meet you, Cecile. I look forward to your care today."

Lansius, observing the interaction, noted to himself that unlike most women who were drawn to the good-looking Sterling, Felis seemed more interested in his cup-bearer. "Cecile," he called. "Find Lady Audrey and inform her that a friend has arrived. But do not mention who it is."

Felis appeared delighted at the prospect of surprising Audrey.

Meanwhile, Cecile raised an eyebrow, but Lansius gave a confirming nod, and she proceeded to fulfill her task.

As Cecile led the way, Lansius escorted Felis to the Great Chamber. He chose a guarded corridor to avoid the Great Hall and any unnecessary attention. Lansius was showing Felis the Council Chamber when Audrey found them.

“FELIS!” Audrey screamed, rushing towards her, with Cecile trailing behind.

“Kyaa~ Audrey!”

The two women hugged each other warmly. Despite being shorter, Audrey was surprisingly strong, and she twirled the taller Felis around like a younger sister. Their bond was special. They had only met briefly in Toruna, but something clicked between them right away.

Both were daredevils in their own ways, not conforming to societal norms. Each had been born a commoner, yet they were rising through the ranks and gaining status.

Lansius himself didn’t know much of the details, as he had been in Cascasonne meeting with Lord Bengrieve when Felis visited Toruna. Thus, he hadn't witnessed their friendship developing. He only learned about it afterward, but it was a pleasant surprise, as he owed much to both of them.

As the two descended the stairs, they left Lansius behind. When he tried to follow, Audrey's pointed gaze nearly made him trip.

Ok, understandable, have a great day…

Deciding to return to his chamber, Lansius took the stairs but paused as he remembered a previous promise. He let out a resigned sigh and called, “Cecile.”

“Yes, My Lord,” she responded, her voice void of any hint of annoyance.

He began to make an unusual request, “Could you ask Sterling and a few other staff to move the guest bed from castle storage to this room? Our guests, and Audrey, will be using my room.”

Cecile remained composed as she inquired, “Guests, My Lord?”

“Yes, there’s one more... She, too, is a friend of Audrey’s. But I must caution you, Felis is a gentle person. The other guest, however, is... more challenging.”

Cecile acknowledged, “I understand, My Lord… but if they take over your quarters, where will-“

“Oh, I’ll sleep in…” Actually, the Lord of the castle wasn’t sure either.

Hugo’s room is in disrepair... Calub’s? No, I don’t want to bother his room. He’s an alchemist and treasurer as well. He might have documents and I don’t want to disturb… Guest room? No, there are a lot of important guest messengers. A Lord can’t be spotted using the room next to them.

Finally, he settled on an unconventional choice, “… the Council Chamber. Would it be possible for the staff to prepare a bed there for me?”

“Of course, My Lord.” Cecile bowed her head a little.

“And don’t forget bedding and a blanket,” Lansius added, feeling a pang of guilt for imposing these tasks on the young girl.

She’s not even 17, this is considered child labor, right?

“Anything else, My Lord?”

“No, Cecile. You’ve been a tremendous help.”

“I’m grateful for your word of praises, My Lord.” She graced him with a smile, bowed, and went to fulfill her duties.

As he watched her leave, Lansius couldn’t help but marvel at how much his young staff had developed over the past few months. Aside from Cecile, the squires, in particular, had truly come into their own.

Under Audrey’s rigorous training, Carla, Sterling, and Roger had matured noticeably. Either that, or they had all sustained head concussions that somehow resulted in improved competence.

Roger’s spear wound from their last encounter had completely healed. Carla had tempered her impulsive tendencies, and Sterling had begun mastering Isolte’s Elandia-style fencing technique.

Lansius dreamed of knighting them one day once he received his official title from the High Court. As of now, he was only an acting lord, a mere pretender.

Their swift advancement inspired Lansius, although his own progress on horseback felt slower in comparison.

I might spend more time with Callahan tomorrow.

As he contemplated this, the blond knight appeared, following behind his daughter. “My Lord, my father wishes to see you.”

“Yes, Sir Callahan.”

“My Lord, Sir Justin has sent word that the East Lowlandia merchants are growing restless.”

“Ah,” Lansius mumbled. He had been delaying the meeting with the merchants, feeling he wasn’t ready.

The older man sensed the tension and asked politely, “Do you still feel uncertain, My Lord?”

“Indeed, Sir,” he admitted. “A lot is at stake, and I’m not confident enough.”

The merchants were a part of the parties involved in last year’s rising grain prices. Whether they were directly involved or not, they now came bearing gifts and honeyed words, proposing deals. Lansius couldn’t help but feel wary of their approaches.

“May I offer some advice, My Lord?” asked Callahan, ever resourceful.

“Certainly,” Lansius responded, his interest piqued by what his mentor might say.

“My Lord, if I may be so bold, you often show too much gentleness towards those around you. While we, your retainers, appreciate this, it may lead to difficulties. Many might interpret your gentleness as a weakness, a soft spot to be exploited.”

Sir Callahan’s unexpected counsel struck a chord. Lansius nodded, murmuring in acknowledgment, “I’ll keep that in mind.”

“Don’t show your gentleness to the world, My Lord. Show it only to those you care. For all others, let them see the face of a conqueror,” Callahan advised.

 

***

 

Merchants from Eastern Lowlandia

As of the previous fall, three merchants from Galdia, Salceslia, and Edessa had been keen to engage with Lansius, smelling profits in the high grain prices.

While they were not the masterminds behind the price manipulation, they had spotted what the western Lowlandia merchants were doing and had played along, driving up the price even further.

They had hoped to exploit the vulnerability of the two Lords, Lansius and Robert, but they began to worry when neither sought their assistance. Price manipulation was inherently risky. They had invested all their savings into buying grain to sell it at a higher rate.

As prices rose, the poorer individuals simply couldn’t afford enough and bought less. However, this was expected. Their target wasn’t the ragged poor, but the nobles who need to prepare for the upcoming conflict.

Yet, Robert’s passive response and Lansius’ lukewarm reception cast doubt on their plans. The Lord of Korelia had deliberately left them in suspense for a week, during which they slowly became acquainted with the Korelian market and the city’s situation.

Witnessing Korelia survive last year’s crisis and transform into a budding salted meat industry was surprising, further eroding their confidence.

At last, today, a blond knight invited them to meet with Lord Lansius. They had thought this was the opportunity they had been waiting for, but instead of the castle, they were led into the trenches where the Lord had set up a training shooting gallery, complete with an overhead field tent.

While they were uncertain about this unconventional setup, they followed the knight and observed as Lord Lansius and his garrison of heavy arbalesters were cranking their latest cranequins - heavy crossbows that were loaded using metal gears and a lever.

“My Lord,” Callahan greeted, and the three merchants echoed his salutation.

However, Lord Lansius appeared indifferent. He kept aiming casually at a thin barrel target. As he loosed his heavy bolt, the rest of the garrison followed suit, resulting in a deafening cacophony of bolts launching and crossbow limbs snapping back.

The barrage of heavy bolts landed like rain on the wooden barrels, causing some of them to explode on impact. This display of force affected the three, who were taken aback by the powerful weaponry they rarely encountered live.

Without a pause, Lansius commanded, “Crossbowmen!” Instantly, twenty crossbowmen advanced, unleashing a thunderous barrage of bolts at the already ravaged barrels.

Once the resounding echoes diminished, Sir Callahan reiterated his message, “My Lord, the guests.”

“I heard you...” Lansius replied with a hint of impatience, tossing his cranequin to Sterling. “Load it up for me.” He then turned to the merchants, “What can I assist you with?”

The largest of the trio, dressed in crimson, stepped forward. “My Lord, we appreciate this opportunity. We’re here to discuss trade.”

“Trade? Do you have armor or better-ranged weaponry?” asked Lansius.

The three merchants exchanged glances before the same man replied, “We have horses, medicine, and grains.”

“Grains,” Lansius echoed. “How much for the grain?”

The merchants’ faces lit up at his question, their earlier worries seeming to evaporate instantly. They were well aware of the demand for grain - even a warlord like Lansius couldn’t ignore the need to feed his troops. “We can offer you good wheat at twelve copper per bushel,” they announced, brimming with newfound confidence.

 

***

 

Chapter 44

Pax Impera

 

Lansius, the acting Lord of Korelia.

The traders from Eastern Lowlandia began to pressure Lansius about the grain price, proposing twelve copper coins for a bushel of quality wheat. The standard price was typically a mere four to five copper coins per bushel.

Regardless of the hefty asking price, Lansius was in dire need of the grain. He needed it as a safety net against the potential siege or a poor harvest. While Midlandia offered cheaper grain, transportation cost was significant.

Moreover, the impending threat of war prevented him from committing his valuable cavalry for escort duties. Lansius sighed, recalling Sir Callahan’s advice - to project the image of a conqueror.

“My Lord, would you counter the merchants’ proposal?” Sir Callahan asked politely.

This is it... Time to go crazy.

“Absolutely! That isn’t a fair price. Raise it to fifteen and then we have an agreement,” Lansius countered wildly.

The traders were stunned, baffled as to why the Lord would demand a higher price. “My Lord, we are proposing twelve out of respect for you.”

“Proposing? You’re selling? But I’m not purchasing! I’m also selling,” Lansius feigned a laugh. It wasn’t convincing, but it was enough because the traders barely knew him.

The traders were perplexed, trying to question, but Lansius was faster.

“I’ve struck a deal with Midlandia to buy their grains. Now, I want to sell my grain while the price is high. Fifteen copper coins, a bushel. How does that sound?”

The traders were dumbfounded. They had wagered heavily on the assumption that the Lord of Korelia was desperate for grain, but now, their expectations were dashed. Now, not only Lord Robert was uninterested in their grain, but Lord Lansius also had a surplus he intended to sell.

“Well?” Sir Callahan prodded, adding to their mounting panic.

The merchants realized they had lost their position in the negotiations. They recognized that they couldn’t navigate this situation without a significant change of strategy. “My Lord, it seems we have made a slight miscalculation. We apologize and will return shortly with a more suitable proposal.”

“I hope so. Otherwise, I’ll send this grain to Robert,” Lansius retorted nonchalantly, retrieving his cranequin and instructing his arbalesters to release another volley.

As the merchants walked away. Lansius observed the traders’ evident discomfort as they withdrew, whispering and arguing among themselves. Sir Callahan followed them with a confident stride.

He had entrusted Sir Callahan with the merchants. The knight understood Lansius’ plan - he was a natural diplomat, intelligent, and respected.

Truthfully, Lansius was wary about not being able to negotiate directly. However, if he seemed too bold and too direct, then his deceptions might be exposed. After all, traders are inherently suspicious by trade.

Once they were gone, Lansius let out a long, profound sigh. He had just executed his biggest bluff of the year. His grain for horse deal with Midlandia wasn’t that lucrative, as the price they wanted was too low.

He had accepted Sir Justin’s proposition to sell horses in the black market around Midlandia, but it would need time to fruition. He also didn’t dare to ask about the buyers, who were likely brigands or slavers.

Regardless, his choices were limited. Korelia was undeniably poor. They barely had any grain to sell. What they did have in abundance was locally produced salted meat that needed to be offloaded. For this, he required the traders’ assistance. However, he first had to weaken their resolve; otherwise, he would appear desperate for supplies.

“Your command, My Lord?” a voice asked.

Lansius looked at Sterling and said, “Let’s fire another round and then stop. Bolts are pricey.”

“And so are those wooden barrels,” the squire remarked.

“The cost of diplomacy,” Lansius replied with a nervous chuckle.

 

***

 

Calub’s House

Morning dawned on Calub’s residence. Unlike most days, which were quiet, today the place was bustling with activity as they prepared to operate on little Tia’s ankle.

“Knocked out?” Hannei asked.

Calub gently lifted Tia’s eyelid to check her response, then confirmed, “Yup, she’s asleep.”

Hannei continued, “Tourniquet and hourglass?”

“Ready,” Margo, the page boy, responded.

“Maester, you may begin.” At Hannei’s command, the physician, a man in his forties with sharp eyes and a thin beard, nodded. He began by making an incision on little Tia’s right ankle. Fresh blood flowed as the knife, the town barber’s finest, cut into the little girl’s skin.

This story has been unlawfully obtained without the author's consent. Report any appearances on Amazon.

At Hannei’s insistence, the tools had been boiled to cleanse them of any taint.

Tia was laid face down on a makeshift bed. A bucket was positioned below for any bodily fluids. She had been given a small dose of poppy milk mixed with a quarter dose of Calub’s powerful painkillers.

“Margo, watch for Tia’s breathing. Notify us at once if there’s any change,” Hannei instructed.

“As suspected, the ankle bones are fused. We need to break them and return them to their proper place,” the maester announced calmly, picking up a wooden mallet and a small bronze chisel, both of which had been disinfected with alcohol.

Hannei and Calub held Tia’s leg and calf securely while the maester tapped the bone lightly several times. The sight and sound were unsettling. Margo and Timmy shuddered at each muffled noise.

Without hesitation, Hannei assisted with the dressing, using a clean linen cloth as gauze. Meanwhile, the physician diligently explained the deformations in the connecting sinew and muscle, likely resulting from the wolf attack.

As she listened, Hannei’s golden brown eyes flashed, betraying her nervousness, yet she nodded several times in affirmation.

Afterward, the physician, with precise movements, proceeded to stitch the skin back together. He used some linen to dress the ankle but left it without a bandage. “I’m done,” he announced.

“Gratitude, maester,” Calub said. “Margo, please assist the maester if--“

However, the man shook his head. “No, Master Calub. I must insist on staying here. You see, I’m curious.”Calub nodded gratefully. Timmy readily fetched another chair for the maester to sit on.

Now, Tia’s care was in Hannei’s hands. She observed that the ankle area started to swell.

“Start the hourglass,” she instructed Margo, her right hand hovering above Tia’s ankle. Then she began to chant in a language unknown to this world, “Gloire au Père, au Fils et au Saint-Esprit. Comme il était au commencement, maintenant et toujours, pour les siècles des siècles.”

There was no dramatic burst of light, only the calm repetition of the short verses. At first, there was no discernible change. However, after several recitations, the blood around the stitches began to clot more rapidly.

Hourly, Hannei recited the verses four times. From morning to midday, scabs began to form on the stitches, and bluish bruises appeared.

By afternoon, the swelling had significantly decreased and new skin started to grow around the afflicted area. Calub, accustomed to the lengthy procedure, periodically provided Hannei with drinks and snacks.

The physician patiently observed the recovery with satisfaction. In between Hannei’s sessions, he examined the bones gently with his fingers, ensuring they were properly positioned. He remained until sundown when Timmy escorted him home.

Lanterns now bathed the room in their soft glow, yet Hannei’s ritual remained unchanged. Every hour, she recited her verse, keeping her hand poised above the healing area, as if channeling energy into it.

By the time supper was served, more than twelve hours had elapsed since the process began. Exhaustion started to weigh on Hannei’s body. After each session, she retreated to her bed in the adjacent room for a brief rest.The flickering candlelight inside the lantern marked the passage of time, with wax melting and pooling as hours turned into evening and then night.

Calub, Margo, and Timmy took turns monitoring Tia’s breathing, vigilantly watching for signs of the poppy milk sedative effects wearing off.

Hannei’s ritual continued throughout the night and into the early hours of the new day. As dawn broke, morning light gently filtered into the room, marking the start of another day.

 

***

They had breakfast early, during which Calub administered Hannei some of his potions to rejuvenate her strength. Not only Calub, Margo also brought a spiced light ale that provided her some relief.

The physician arrived early, allowing Calub to catch some shut-eye. However, his rest was brief, as Tia soon woke up, prompting him to administer a dose of painkillers. Since Tia was too young for another dose of poppy milk, this was their only option.

Administering the dose proved challenging, as Tia vomited several times, leaving Calub concerned about whether she had ingested enough. Despite the effects of the poppy milk wearing off, she remained in a state of delirium.

Now Tia was resting on her back, making it easier for her to eat and drink. Nonetheless, she remained securely fastened to the bed as her leg wound was still fragile and could reopen accidentally.

Timmy attempted to coax Tia into eating, but she only managed a few spoonfuls and sips.

In the meantime, Hannei continued reciting her verses. Being the only woman present, she also helped with cleaning Tia as necessary. Thankfully, there was no trace of blood in Tia’s urine, which Hannei declared as a “good sign”.

Around midday, Margo brought meat pie from a well-known shop. Although it was delicious, Hannei managed only a few bites. The long, grueling day continued with its monotonous activity.

…

 

The physician stayed until supper time. By then, Calub had managed to catch a few hours of sleep, and Margo and Timmy also managed to rest a bit.

By evening, Tia had fully awakened. She spoke with Hannei during the breaks in treatments, and they even shared meals. Afterward, Calub administered another dose of painkillers as Tia was beginning to feel an excruciating pain in her leg.

Hannei observed that the wound was healing well, the swelling had subsided, and the skin around the wound had returned to a healthy color. Soon, Tia began to develop itchiness around her ankle and calf, which Hannei deemed as “another good sign”.

Despite her exhaustion, Hannei continued her treatment. Dark circles had formed under her eyes from getting only a few moments of sleep since the night before.

Suddenly, a commotion outside the house startled everyone inside. The sound of several people entering the premises so late at night was alarming. Hannei was alert, her golden brown eyes sharp with caution.

“My Lord!” Calub greeted in recognition.

“That’s not necessary, Calub. How is she?” another man’s voice rang out, filled with concern.

“Hannei is upstairs, but she’s tired,” Calub answered.

“May I see her?” the man asked.

Hannei had recognized the voice. “You may. Come up, Lans,” she called out from upstairs.

Ascending the ladder, Lansius emerged into the room. “You look like a panda,” he blurted out without any finesse.

Unimpressed, Hannei immediately stepped on his foot. Meanwhile, Tia was puzzled and almost ask what a panda was.

“Okay, that’s entirely my fault,” Lansius conceded, his face contorted in pain.

Hannei remained stoic, too fatigued to indulge in jesting.

“I brought some medicine, a blanket, and…” Lansius pulled a parcel wrapped in clean cloth from his coat. This was a common way to package food items. Carefully, he unveiled a golden, crescent-shaped pastry.

“No way, a croissant,” Hannei uttered in disbelief.

“Here, have a bite.” He offered.

A crunching sound resonated through the room as some flaky crust fell away.

“I know it won’t be as good without frigo—“ 

“No. Thank you, Lans. It’s been ages.”

The atmosphere between them softened.

Hannei approached Tia, offering her a piece of the croissant. Tia took a small bite and was taken aback by the unique texture.

Seeing Tia contentedly munching away, Hannei subtly signaled Lansius. Recognizing her cue, he moved away with her, putting some distance between them and Tia.

With a glance towards the stairs, Hannei confirmed the absence of Calub, Margo, and Timmy. Taking a moment to gather her thoughts, she leaned into Lansius, “Whispers are circulating.”

“About Midlandia?” Lansius queried, his interest piqued.

“No, something even bigger.”

His curiosity deepened. “Bigger than Midlandia’s succession?”

Hannei hesitated. The words were treasonous, yet she felt that Lansius needed to know. “The Emperor, the Ageless and Immortal one... he’s dead.”

 

***

 

Chapter 45

Hic Sunt Dracones

 

In the beginning, there were only the Ancients. The first sentient who roamed the boundless expanse of a world they later dubbed Aqua Terra. Birthed from the void, they maintained not one form but ever-changing ones as they devoured and consumed biomass.

As eras passed, they evolved in wisdom, and one among them was revered for her wisdom; she was called Mother.

Mother was the first to ascend into the boundless sky. Her form morphed into a creature resembling an incomplete, mutated, altered dragon. Towering as large as a small mountain, she bore multiple eyes, mouths, nostrils, wings, tails, and with limbs that morphed as necessary as it was closer to a monstrous abomination than a living entity.

The rest of the Ancients followed, and they embarked on a journey across the vast verdant world. They were virtually ageless, their lives stretching across eons.

They wandered the primal world alone or in small groups, resilient in the face of countless volcanic eruptions and ice ages, and adapting to a perpetually transforming world.

Despite their longevity, their number was small and finite, their presence merely leaving a faint imprint on their world. Their existence was a ceaseless odyssey of exploration, the hunt, challenges, and unending self-improvement.

Despite their intelligence and wisdom, the Ancients shied away from establishing a civilization. Given their staggering power and self-sustainability, they felt no need for such communal constructs.

Moreover, their inability to produce offspring inclined them towards solitude. This isolationist stance was also motivated by a desire to respect boundaries and avert conflicts, considering the immense power each wielded.

However, as time wore on, their numbers began to wane. After millions of years, the Ancients, in all their extraordinary vigor, were not truly immortal.

The death of the first Ancients marked the end of the First Age.

 

჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻

 

The Second Age began when Mother, the wisest, discovered a budding new race - the elves. Primitive woodland beings who were just beginning to use stone and sticks as tools.

So taken was she with these intelligent creatures that she shed her dragon form and adopted the refined shape of an elven goddess. In awe, the elves worshiped her and, to her surprise, she could bear offspring with them.

This joyful discovery led to the birth of a new lineage. From her womb, the high elves emerged, inheriting a fragment of her extraordinary longevity and achieving lifespans of up to 1200 years.

Under Mother’s guidance, the elves transitioned from the Stone Age to the Bronze Age. Some among them even unlocked the secrets of magic and erected a sprawling metropolis - the world’s first in the old Progentia Continent.

Several Ancients joined, dwelling in a grand city fittingly named the Everlasting Glade. It was the golden age of the elves’ civilization, filled with wonder and magic. Yet, the shadow of mortality began to creep in.

Despite all the magic and wisdom they acquired, the first generation of high elves succumbed to death’s inevitable call.

Their passing of her children reminded Mother of her own mortality, and her vigor started to fade in earnest. Her fall marked the end of the Second Age and the decline of the elves.

 

჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻

 

The dawn of the Third Age was heralded by an extraordinary discovery: nestled deep within the mountains, the elves uncovered a previously unseen race, the dwarves.

The Ancients found a new fascination and transformed themselves into perfect embodiments of dwarves. This new alliance stirred envy among the elves, who perceived it as a threat to their own standing.

With most surviving Ancients taking up residence under the mountains, a significant shift in power dynamics occurred.

Under the Ancients’ patronage, the dwarves constructed grand citadels within the mountain range and forged the Gallery Road - a vast network of tunnels that spanned nearly the entire Old Continent of Progentia.

Unlike the elves, the dwarves were innate artisans, crafting wondrous tools, divine relics, and even sentient golems. With the magical prowess of the Ancients, coupled with the inherent skills of the dwarves, they ushered in an era of unprecedented innovation.

After hundreds of generations, they achieved the Ancients’ greatest aspiration - a portal to another world.

Initially, only the shape-shifting Ancients could traverse this inter-dimensional gateway. But with time, they perfected the art, maintaining a portal that allowed all beings to pass through.

Almost all of the dwarves’ population and a great number of elves accompanied the last of the Ancients in the Great Exodus to the new world.

For a quarter of a millennium, the remaining dwarves maintained the portal with the greatest of care until they were no longer able to do so. The portal eventually broke down, severing all contact with the new world.

Shortly after this, the dwarves met their inevitable extinction. No longer numbering in the millions, the current population, now only numbering in the thousands, was unable to maintain their advanced civilization. Their grand underground tunnels and vast citadels began to fall into decay, an invitation to fell beasts that thrived in the dark, subterranean world.

The conflict with these creatures greatly accelerated the dwarves' demise.

With the passing of the last dwarf, the Third Age drew to a close.

 

჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻჻

 

The Fourth and current Age began amidst calamity. The magical amount required to maintain the dwarves’ ingenious creations and the high elves’ lavish lifestyle ultimately drained the continent of its magic.

Even the forest encircling the Everlasting Glade languished in a pitiful state. With the subterranean realms overrun by fell beasts and the forests in decay, many were compelled to venture forth into the plains, and a new race was born.

A case of content theft: this narrative is not rightfully on Amazon; if you spot it, report the violation.

Historical accounts from this period are scant, clouded by the elves’ unwillingness to share and the First Humans’ penchant for self-aggrandizement. It was during this time, however, that the Great Progenitors, the first-generation humans, came into existence.

They claimed lineage from the last Ancient’s womb, but a millennium had elapsed since the last Ancients tread on Aqua Terra.

Royal Historians from the First and Third Imperiums dared to speculate that the Great Progenitors might have been a hybrid of elves and first-ancient-born dwarves, a plausible occurrence given the coexistence of these races.

The Great Progenitors exhibited remarkable martial prowess. Each was a hero in their own right, vanquishing numerous fell beasts to validate their might. They established multiple city-state and kingdoms on the Progentia plains adjacent to its many rivers.

However, despite their formidable strength, they were helpless in the face of the continent’s slow death.

Guided by tales handed down from the Ancients about a larger, more fertile continent to the west, the Great Progenitors took to the sea, honing their skills as seafarers. Many perished while trying to tame the waves. Despite these adversities, they eventually learned to navigate the oceans and set sail westward.

As foretold by the Ancients, after enduring months on the endless sea, they chanced upon the land of promise: the continent of Promissia. The majority of the Great Progenitors, along with the elves, embarked upon this verdant, pristine land.

This was the second Great Exodus, a singular epoch when Elves and Humans collaborated and journeyed in unison. These two races traversed the lush and vast continent from east to west.

As the years rolled by, more and more Great Progenitors and their kin chose to settle, founding kingdoms in locations they deemed fertile. They domesticated the land and its beasts, populated the regions, and kindled civilization wherever their feet touched.

Finally, after centuries, only the elves reached the western shores, where they ceased their odyssey and erected their first city. This milestone marked the start of the Elven Calendar.

Four millennia, three Imperiums, or four generations of high elves later, a handful of the Great Progenitors still draw breath. These first humans seemed unnaturally immune to the natural passage of time.

Renowned as warriors, their lives typically ended on battlefields, fighting against fell beasts or locked in conflicts amongst themselves. This immortality became a source of deep envy among the elves.

However, their kin and offspring did not inherit this trait. The current Emperor of the Third Imperium is the last of the Great Progenitors. Legend has it that the Ageless One was already four-thousand years old when he ascended to the throne.

 

***

 

Calub's House, Lansius

Lansius was so taken aback when Hannei stated that the emperor was dead that he responded with a nervous smile, whispering, “You’re jesting! The Emperor is a Great Progenitor. He’s immortal.”

Hannei cast a glance at Tia, who was quietly savoring a croissant before turning her sight back to Lansius. “You believe that?”

Lansius knitted his brows.

The pale blonde, garbed in a squire-like attire of a blue doublet and a broken white surcoat, gave a patronizing stare. “Back then in Toruna, you said you read about the Imperium's History, try to remember when the Ageless One took the throne?”

When the Emperor took the throne..?

“The Ageless One was the third one, right?” Lansius tried to recall the history of the Third Imperium.

Hannei nodded and spoke, “The current Emperor was an advisor to the first Emperor and a tutor to the second.”

“And then he finally took the throne to avert a succession crisis because the second Emperor has no child,” Lansius recited. “That happened around 1300 years ago, or so I read. Why ask that?”

Hannei glanced at the room, almost using her magic to conceal, but deciding against it for the sake of not startling Tia. So she leaned in closer. “Remember, how old are the high elves supposed to live?”

Twelve-hundred years...

A realization dawned in Lansius’ eyes. He met her golden-brown eyes, shaking his head in disbelief. “No way...”

“Lans, it could be a lie. You of all people, should have suspected it."

Lansius had nothing to retort.

Hannei continued, "The last of the Great Progenitor probably died before the Elven Calendar even began. Their legend and immortality likely a myth perpetuated by the Ageless One himself so he could rule the Imperium.”

Lansius shook his head. He had suspected something was amiss, but not to this degree.

For an elf to masquerade as a Grand Progenitor and rule humans as the Emperor, what a devious scheme. But how could Hannei know about this, she barely read the common text?

Hannei continued, “This is why Midlandia has been preparing to take action for three generations.”

“You mean they suspected this?” asked Lansius.

“They’re not stupid,” she murmured. “This is also why Baldy Gottfried rallied the North, conquered four provinces, and invaded Arvena. Like Midlandia, he too must have suspected that the Emperor is an elf and is finally dead.”

Lansius had his doubts, but before he could voice them, a commotion from downstairs drew their attention. Two women's voices echoed, "We’re here!"

Like a whirlwind of trouble, two women emerged from the stairs. "Rest assured, Felis is here! Everything is going to be all right," declared the newly arrived blonde, while Audrey, grinning behind her, waved at Hannei.

Hannei waved back at Audrey. Lansius looked at the pair, still in disbelief that Audrey and Hannei had become fast friends despite starting on the wrong foot in Toruna. One was the captive, and the other was the captor's enabler. But their relationship transcended that.

It was Hannei who had suggested to Sir Stan to purchase Audrey during their incognito visit to the black market around Feodosia. Hannei was also the one who had tended to Audrey on her way back to Toruna until more treatment could be arranged.

Despite Audrey's obliviousness to the situation due to her severe head injury, her sharp instincts led her to trust Hannei. However, the same couldn't be said about the relationship between Lansius and Hannei.

Despite the one-in-a-million chance of them both sharing the same origins, Hannei was reluctant to help. She rarely divulged any information, and when she did, it seemed to be more out of pity than trust.

Among the secrets she held was the reason why she and Sir Stan had chosen to purchase Audrey. Her tight lips constantly reminded Lansius that Hannei's loyalty lay firmly with Sir Stan and Lord Bengrieve.

Now, Hannei was eying Felis, anger flaring in her golden eyes. "Where have you been?"

“In the castle. I told you I was going to the castle,” Felis replied innocently.

“No. You said you’re going to get some fruit you just heard of from a peddler. Then you disappeared. I was worried, you know,” Hannei said in frustration.

“Oh, that too, hehe~ Sorry.” Felis approached Hannei and tried to hug her. However, Hannei was still annoyed. This made Felis walk toward Tia instead.

The little girl’s eyes were wide open.

“What’s the matter, child?” Felis asked sweetly.

“Pardon, my lady, but am I in the afterlife?” Tia responded.

Felis erupted into giggles.

“Why do you ask that?” Hannei questioned, a concerned look crossing her face.

“Well, I’m surrounded by people with golden hair and the Lord of Korelia is present. Am I dreaming?”

Hannei snorted laughter, which seemed to break the ice, and the rest of the evening was filled with warmth and camaraderie.

This was a rare reunion of the Toruna band, with Hannei, Calub, Lansius, Audrey, and now even Felis was onboard.

With Felis soon to be married into nobility, they all sensed this might be their last gathering. Perhaps it was this subconscious awareness that made them savor the evening despite the ongoing healing process.

Felis readily helped Hannei as Tia needed a change of clothes, while Calub busied himself with brewing herbal concoctions for Lansius and Audrey.

They kept Hannei company during the final stage of the treatment. With just one healer, it was the hardest due to sleep deprivation. However, the grueling night was made lighter by friendly faces. Conversation filled the air and stories were exchanged, as Hannei couldn’t afford to rest just yet.

At Lansius' suggestion, they dragged a bed up and put it next to Tia’s, allowing Hannei to recite the healing verses while lying down. It was a measure to conserve her dwindling strength.

Upon Calub’s insistence, Audrey and Sterling escorted a reluctant Lansius back to the castle after midnight while Felis stayed behind to assist Hannei.

 

***

 

At first light, Audrey returned. She had let Lansius oversleep due to his below-average constitution. Together with Calub and the rest of the household, she witnessed Tia’s recovery.

Now unbound and attempting to move her once limp leg, Tia’s first movement in bed was shaky, but gradually, her ankle began to display a full range of motion.

The little girl wept with joy.

Finally, Hannei could rest. After a light breakfast, she instructed Calub not to let Tia move from her bed. Then she retired to Calub’s room, where she soon fell asleep. Her slender form curled up in the fetal position, appearing both beautiful and fragile.

Margo and Timmy vigilantly guarded the house that day, ensuring peace and quiet. The only sound they tolerated was the soft snoring coming from Felis in the next room. Meanwhile, Calub kept himself busy by reading some scrolls while periodically checking on Tia.

Feeling satisfied with what she had witnessed, Audrey returned to the castle. On her way back, she noticed that the wind was blowing harder than usual, sweeping from the south toward the north. The season was changing.

 

***

 

Chapter 46

Southern Wind

 

In the town of Korelia, whispers started to circulate overnight that a Saint Candidate was secretly visiting. The sight of blondes in the local inn and around town, combined with the lord’s late-night visit and the local physician’s tight-lipped demeanor, seemed to add weight to these rumors.

Despite initial doubts, curiosity won out, and a crowd gradually started to gather outside the Alchemist’s residence. In a world that lacked any form of religion, the closest thing to reverence was the respect shown towards the Ageless Emperor, followed closely by the Saint Candidates.

These extraordinary individuals, blessed with the innate ability to heal, were exceedingly rare. As a result, the Saint Candidates were usually kept cloistered, their abilities monopolized by the high nobility through the Healers Guild.

Among commoners, even a blessing from a Saint Candidate was considered to hold potent healing powers, although the truth was far more complicated. Upon hearing of the gathering crowds and to prevent unrest as well as possible property damage or injuries, the Lord of Korelia made the prudent decision to order the evacuation of the house.

As the Lord’s evacuation orders were carried peacefully, another change subtly started to manifest itself. The season was shifting, and with it, the wind’s direction was changing. It began to blow eagerly from the south, sweeping warm, dry air into the Great Plains of Lowlandia. The locals called it the Southern Wind, the harbinger of change.

With this shift, Korelia had entered the height of summer.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle

“This is the Great Chamber. We can have meals or snacks here. It’s probably the best place to hang out,” Audrey introduced the room to the recently arrived guest.

Hannei surveyed the room with visible awe. “I see. It’s spacious and seems to have good ventilation.”

The Great Chamber boasted a ceiling taller than most rooms in the castle. Despite being smaller than the Great Hall, it offered a less congested ambiance. The room’s centerpiece was a solitary elongated table, surrounded by matching chairs.

Fully plastered walls, painted in a serene pastel white, complemented the ceiling, which was of the same hue but adorned with an array of vibrant decorative plants and floral patterns.

The two of them walked across the chamber and proceeded toward the next place.

“And if you follow me, we’ll reach the Training Hall,” Audrey continued as tour guide.

As they approached the corridor connecting the two rooms, they heard the echoes of bowstrings being tensioned, released, and snapping back into place. Crossbow training for the castle’s occupants was also held indoors.

This arrangement had been initiated last winter to prevent damage to the components from ice and moisture buildup. Despite the limited space, the place saw regular usage.

“Oh, you’re here,” Lansius called as they caught sight of each other.

“Hey, Lord, I’m just taking Hannei on a short tour!” Audrey replied.

“Ah, I see.”

Ever since the guests arrived, Audrey’s formalities had been somewhat relaxed. The lord didn’t seem to mind, but the staff took notice.

“Are you doing crossbow training?” Hannei asked.

“Yeah, care to try?” Lansius offered his custom small-sized pistol-gripped crossbow.

More than a dozen people were training with him. The strawman targets in the corner already resembled a pincushion.

“Nah, I’ll pass. You should ask Felis, she’s good with a bow— “ Hannei began, then quickly added, “My Lord.” She was aware she wasn’t part of the nobility, unlike Felis, who was about to marry a high-ranking lord and thus was afforded some leniency. Here, she was required to adhere to the formalities.

“Uh, eh, yeah... How’s the room, is it too small?” Lansius asked, noting that it was the first time Hannei had addressed him as lord.

“No, it’s spacious. I’ve been told that it’s actually your room, My Lord?” her voice had a tinge of apology.

“Yeah… but Felis wanted it so...” Lansius shrugged.

Hannei let out a sigh. “You shouldn’t pamper that woman.”

Lansius chuckled. “Well, I owe a lot to her.”

“That’s just your perception. For example, My Lord won Korelia without her help.”

“Gratitude for the kind words, Master Hannei.”

“No, I should thank you for your hospitality, My Lord.”

Sharing a mutual smile, the two were observed by Audrey, who was grinning from ear to ear behind Hannei. She playfully remarked, “You two would make a great couple.”

“What?!”

“No, we’re not!”

Taken aback, Lansius and Hannei retorted in unison, sending Audrey into a ripple of laughter. She was well aware of the shared background between Hannei and Lansius, despite not knowing all the details.

With a resolute tone, Hannei declared, “Come on, there are so many other places I’m eager to explore,” as she gently nudged Audrey forward.

“See you, Lord. Oh, full armor training starts today, after midday,” Audrey said as she was being shoved away.

Lansius could only offer a smile in response to their antics. He hoped that things would be just this peaceful, but knowing the trio’s short tempers, he found it challenging to keep his expectations high.

“Fresh quiver, My Lord,” Sterling offered.

“Gratitude,” Lansius replied, accepting the quiver and reloading a mini crossbow. His aim was unusually off today. Despite attempting to clear his mind, the notion of the Emperor’s death was difficult to dismiss.

Considering the thousand years of rule, the impact of his demise would undoubtedly be colossal. If Hannei’s words were true, then it was clear that the Third Imperium would not stand. It would be a doomed entity.

Upon further reflection, Lansius felt that his preconception of elves as a wise and benevolent race was naïve. The lore actually suggested they were prone to jealousy, and their deviousness might not even be a stretch.

He realized that in a world filled with races that had much longer life expectancies than humans; it was almost absurd to think they wouldn’t take advantage or exploit the other races.

An ambitious elf could easily conceal his intentions, forge his way up, and through his talents, experience, and his gift of agelessness compared to humans, he could ascend the power ladder in a human Kingdom, or in this case, the Imperium.

Over the span of several generations, because humans, even kings, naturally die around a hundred years of age and heirs aren’t guaranteed, the said elf would only need a succession crisis, either natural or with his intervention, to lure a faction to his side.

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. Please report it.

When such a situation occurred, the elf, as their elder, a face of stability, could easily convince them that he was the logical and better choice to settle their dispute as a stand-in for their monarch or emperor. After all, he would outlast them and their great-grandchildren.

The more Lansius pondered, the clearer it became. He understood how the Third Imperium had maintained a level of stability that would put even the Romans to shame. Instead of organized religion, the Ageless taught to disregard superstitious aspects of life. Prayers for rain, good harvests, or the afterlife were forbidden, as was fear of weather phenomena, astrological events, or geological occurrences.

Lansius suppressed a sigh. The real question lingered: how long would the continent be haunted by strife before a new order could rise? This thought weighed heavily on Lansius’ mind.

If only she would tell me more...

For Lansius, Hannei remained an enigma. He suspected that the problem might lie deeper than just her loyalty to Sir Stan and Lord Bengrieve. Probably, there was another reason that Lansius had yet to discover.

Hannei was eerily secretive about her background, even going so far as not revealing her real name. Lansius only learned that she was French and, unlike him, she had all her memories intact. However, frustratingly, she wouldn’t divulge anything about her arrival in this world or how she could use magic.

She mostly kept her lips sealed and, when pressed, would resort to anger, much like Audrey. However, she did confide in him that her place was here and that she had no plans to return.

As per usual, Lansius had tried to consult Calub, her compatriot. However, Calub himself explained that he didn’t know much out of respect for another professional. He only said that he had known Hannei for almost ten years and that he trust her with his life.

Naturally, it never occurred to Calub to ask Hannei how or where she learned magic. In this world, a mage is a mage, and they were known to be a secretive bunch. The Mage Guild, like any other, kept their trade secrets. However, Calub had also said that Hannei wasn’t part of any guild.

Lansius shook his head. The last thing on his mind was to pry about this issue. The last time he did so, they got into a heated argument and she ended up refusing to see him again. She didn’t even appear when Lansius, Audrey, and Calub departed from Toruna to war against Lord Robert.

 

***

 

Cecile

Two weeks had passed since the Lord first brought the guest into the castle, unexpectedly it brought a newfound vitality to the Great Chamber. Usually, this room was often quiet, as the Lord had no family, thus its grandeur was appreciated sparingly.

Lord Lansius and his closest confidantes usually convened in the Council Chamber or the Great Hall for their affairs. Yet, the recent influx of guests, a charming assortment including a young girl from time to time, had infused the room with vibrant energy.

Today, however, the atmosphere was subtly different. The delightful presence of the little girl was missing, her usual spot vacant.

Similarly, the distinct personas of Marshal Sir Justin and Deputy Hugo were absent, their chairs empty. The two were currently engaged in an important assignment, their usual contributions to the room’s discussions noticeably absent.

Lord Lansius, Captain Audrey, Calub, and the two guests were currently engrossed in a private lunch.

Although the Lord and his retainers typically favored simple meals and weren’t overly particular about the quality of food, the presence of distinguished guests sparked a change. These guests, with their blond hair and an air of mystery, seemed to belong to a higher class.

Determined not to compromise Lord Lansius’ reputation in front of such esteemed company, the castle staff went the extra mile to ensure the quality of the meal was exceptional.

In a significant departure from their norm, considering the pride they took in their craft. They even reached out to chefs from outside the castle for guidance.

Tap- tap- tap!

The rhythmic echo of footsteps broke the ambient noise as Carla entered the Great Chamber. She breezed past Sterling, halting near a column.

Cecile discerned from Carla’s demeanor that she carried important news. Leaning over to the Lord, she discreetly mentioned Carla’s arrival.

“Ah, Carla, do you have something to share?” Lord Lansius paused, setting aside his plate.

“My Lord, a messenger carrying a letter from the Lord of White Lake,” Carla announced.

“From Lord Robert? Bring it here then.”

Carla approached Lord Lansius and presented the sealed letter.

“Do you mind?” The Lord inquired his guests.

“Not at all. Please proceed as you wish, Lord Lans,” Lady Felis responded, reaching for another slice of pudding from a silver plate.

Lady Felis was adorned in a striking violet tunic dress, a truly captivating sight. Just a few days prior, she had fortuitously uncovered a cache of dresses in storage. Luckily, Lady Felis’ stature suited the dresses perfectly, without the need for alterations.

She was indeed tall, matching the height of Lord Lansius and Calub. In contrast, Audrey and Hannei were of average height, and Cecile herself didn’t anticipate growing past her current stature.

While Cecile contemplated their differing heights, Lord Lansius broke the purple wax seal of the letter and perused its contents. After nodding in affirmation a few times, he passed the letter to Master Calub.

“Is it important?” Hannei asked, her eyes on Calub as he read the letter.

“Well, almost every letter carries importance. But this one isn’t urgent,” the Lord commented.

“Betrothal letters?” Hannei quipped.

The table erupted into a commotion. Audrey choked on her drink, Calub snorted with laughter, and the Lord coughed. Felis, attempting to stifle her giggles, covered her mouth with an embroidered cloth.

“You really should consider getting married, My Lord,” Calub suggested after taking a sip of water.

“I plan to,” the Lord retorted dryly after clearing his throat.

All eyes turned to Audrey.

“No, guys, don’t look at me like that...” Audrey’s usually bright expression turned into a frown.

Cecile was aware that this conversation was typically off-limits. Only the Lord’s closest confidants were privy to this information.

“Well, there’s no need to rush,” the Lord responded casually.

“Actually... it may become more challenging soon,” Calub interjected.

“Why do you say that, Calub?” asked the Lord.

“The letter mentioned a special envoy. I suspect this might be Lord Robert’s daughter,” Calub elaborated.

The chamber buzzed with conversation at the Lord’s expense.

“N-nonsense! Why would he do that?” The Lord voiced his objection, snatching the scroll back from his advisor.

“He’s being cautious,” Felis said with an assuredness that drew everyone’s attention. “Lord Robert is sending his daughter to meet you first, then gauging your reaction. If it goes well, he’ll propose a betrothal. If it went sour, he can cover it up. Even if rumors spread, there’s no evidence to back them.”

“That’s surprisingly sensible. You’ve learned well, Felis,” praised Hannei.

“Thank you. I gained much from my tutors in Midlandia.” Lady Felis seemed pleased.

“But why would a special envoy necessarily mean his daughter? Couldn’t it just be his advisor?” The Lord expressed his lingering skepticism.

“My Lord, the Viscount went to great lengths to hint at ‘someone’, not just a servant or follower. It would only make sense if it were a family member,” Calub reasoned.

“Alright, no further comment. Let’s just wait and see. It’s probably just a misunderstanding.” The Lord did not share in the others’ excitement.

Despite the excitement in the air, Cecile wasn’t entirely sure Lord Robert would risk such a play. Lord Lansius’ standing in Korelia was still precarious.

If she were in Robert’s position, she would wait for Lansius to solidify his victory against the Western lords before taking such a step. However, Robert was known for his strategic prowess, and the thought processes of strategists could be deeply intricate and unpredictable.

Now, one of the supposedly fearsome strategists was engaged in pleasant banter, casually discussing potential schools for the young girl, Tia, and Calub’s recently purchased house, which was now unusable due to the rumors about a Saint Candidate.

Cecile was more intrigued by Hannei’s abilities, yet the conversation did not touch on this. Hannei was rumored to be a Saint Candidate. Still, she didn’t fit the typical image of one.

Dressed in a doublet and surcoat similar to a squire, she projected a mixed impression. Her blonde hair, delicate beauty, and seemingly fragile demeanor suggested nobility. However, her lack of familiarity with formal etiquette and warlike attire contradicted this impression.

Just like Audrey’s well-worn belt and scabbard, Hannei’s gear hinted at her skills with a sword. This led Cecile to doubt the idea of Hannei being a Saint Candidate.

Saint Candidates were known to lead a cloistered life, guarded and shielded from outside threats. It made no sense for them to become adept with swords.

Yet, Cecile couldn’t completely ignore the whispers surrounding Hannei. One morning, a staff member reported that Hannei was in the courtyard when it started to drizzle. Oddly enough, Hannei’s clothes remained dry while everyone else’s got soaked.

Another mentioned that the main chamber where she resided remained cool as winter, even during the summer midday heat.

On reflection, Cecile acknowledged that sometimes she sensed something different when she was around Hannei. There was also Margo, Calub’s page boy, who had become Hannei’s assistant. His refusal to divulge what transpired in Calub’s house only fueled further speculation and mystery.

The echo of heavy boots, pacing hurriedly against the stone floors, alerted Sterling. The squire instinctively moved to block the corridor. His eyes flashed when he recognized the unexpected guest and stepped aside respectfully.

Without warning, Sir Justin burst onto the scene, his abrupt entrance alerted everyone. Before anyone could ask, the Marshal made a thunderous declaration, “War, war is coming!”

His proclamation, full of raw enthusiasm and unrestrained jubilation, crashed against the high vaulted ceilings. The usual calm and restrained ambiance of the chamber was gone in an instant. “Permission to chant!” Sir Justin continued, his tone as resolute as the walls around them.

“Granted!” Lord Lansius responded as he sprang from his seat.

To Cecile’s surprise, Sir Justin proceeded to bellow a war cry that filled the chamber. It was a war song he had learned from nomads during their mock battles months ago.

Sir Justin was a unique personality; he viewed war as a competition or a way of life. His infectious energy served as a vibrant counterpoint to Lansius’ doom and gloom attitude.

Audrey unexpectedly joined in chanting, followed by Lansius, Sterling, and Carla. Their voices built in a crescendo of high-pitched tones and rhythmic chants, filling the chamber with an intensity that Cecile had never witnessed before.

This was Cecile’s first experience with the news of impending war, but she was certain that nobles typically wouldn’t react this way.

Lansius and his retainers were far from normal, she knew, but she was still taken aback. The usually gentle Lord and his companions were now ablaze with a different kind of fervor in their eyes.

The Lord of Korelia, to whom she had pledged her loyalty, had revealed a new facet of his persona. He wasn’t just a skilled administrator; he was also a warlord.

 

***

 

Chapter 47

Dirty Gain

 

As the earlier high spirits of Lansius and his retainers waned over time, a sense of anxiety started to permeate the Council Chamber. First, there was concern over the safety of the guests. Second, the uncertainty surrounding the enemy's numbers and their time of arrival.

"Three Hills is a fifteen-day march away from Korelia," Sir Justin started. "The horseman who brought the news endured three days of riding, changing horses every half-day with minimal sleep at night. So, we likely have twelve days until they arrive."

Lansius responded with a nod while Calub stroked his chin, both of them bearing somber expressions.

"Is there anything we can do besides wait for Batu's messenger?" Audrey asked from her seat.

"Not much," replied Calub in a low voice. "Sir Justin and I have our informants, but they fall behind the tribal scouts in terms of speed."

Audrey frowned slightly but nodded her understanding.

The sudden knock at the door interrupted their deliberation.

“My Lord, Tribesman Batu is here to see you,” Sterling’s muffled voice informed them from the other side of the door.

Batu is here by himself?

Calub saw Lansius' reaction and commanded, "Let him in."

As Batu entered, it was evident that he had indeed ridden a long way; his long hair was slick with sweat. “Forgive my intrusion.”

“The honor is ours,” Lansius responded, rising to his feet along with his entourage as Batu approached.

Given Batu’s stature as a tribal leader, a seat had been arranged next to Lansius.

“So, what’s the tidings?” Lansius asked, pouring a pale ale into a silver goblet for Batu.

“A grim one. It seems you’ve managed to anger almost all the Western Lords.”

The statement hung in the air, and the tension in the room ratcheted up another notch.

“What makes you say such a thing?” Sir Justin asked, his brow furrowed.

Batu drained his goblet in a single gulp before replying, “Our scouts report thirty groups, each numbering two hundred.”

Thirty groups of two-hundred? That’s 6,000 men...? Fuck! That's equal to the entire population of Korelia.

 

***

 

Tribesman Batu

The Tribesman noticed that Lansius was unflinching but stunned, while his companions exchanged uneasy glances.

“Thirty groups of two hundred...? That’s a considerable force. Are you certain your scouts reported accurately?” Sir Justin queried, his voice just shy of skeptical.

“Our shepherds are the best at what they do. Counting that high is second nature to them,” Batu replied, not a hint of doubt in his tone.

“How many are we talking about, exactly?” Audrey pressed impatiently.

“Drey, we’re looking at six thousand,” Lansius replied, almost in a murmur.

The sheer enormity of the number left them dumbstruck. Audrey struggled to fathom such a figure. Only Calub and Sir Justin seemed to fully grasp the gravity of the situation.

“It’s three times the size of Lord Robert’s force last year,” Lansius clarified.

“How can there possibly be that many?” Audrey exclaimed, baffled.

Batu simply shook his head. “That, I don’t know.”

“Did I inadvertently incite anyone’s wrath?” Lansius wondered aloud, a frown creasing his brow.

Sir Justin shrugged his shoulders. “My understanding of the politics in western Lowlandia isn’t comprehensive, but it seems unlikely to be hated by all. Should I get Sir Callahan? He’s best suited for this discussion.”

Lansius shook his head. “Sir Callahan may hold deeper insights into this matter, but he’s currently supervising our merchants. War or not, we’re going to need grain supplies.”

“I think these Western Lords are largely opportunists,” Calub opined dismissively. “Like vultures circling an easy meal.”

Lansius exhaled a weary sigh. “I have paid a lot to station four-hundred men in Korelia, rallied the militia, even had crossbowmen drill in trenches in plain view of passing merchants, hoping to convey our might. But it doesn’t seem to deter anyone.”

Batu studied Lansius with respect, appreciating the Korelian Lord’s ingenuity. Although the ploy hadn’t succeeded today, it was a commendable effort to prevent wars and unnecessary bloodshed.

“Not all took part, mind you,” Batu informed Lansius. “The scouts only see the banner of the Three Hills, Korimor, and South Hill.”

“Korimor's participation was expected, but South Hill’s involvement is surprising,” Calub noted.

Sir Justin nodded in agreement. No one had anticipated that South Hill, having rebelled against Lord Jorge of Three Hills, would participate. “There must be a reason,” he mused.

“The reason doesn’t matter right now; what matters is that we’re facing six-thousand,” Lansius interjected, bringing the conversation back to the looming threat. “Do we stand a chance?”

“A slim one,” admitted Sir Justin.

“Should we prepare to leave?” Calub asked.

“Oh, fun, all the work for nothing,” Audrey commented, her voice bitter.

Their frank responses in front of their Lord surprised Batu, but he noticed that the trio was glancing at Lord Lansius as if expecting something. Despite their words, there was only urgency, not fear.

This story has been taken without authorization. Report any sightings.

Lansius sighed deeply. “We have a mere thousand at best. I could perhaps withstand an army of three-thousand, but six... That’s a tall order.”

“Perhaps, My Lord miscalculated our odds like last year?” Calub remarked.

“I don’t want to gamble with our lives again... Our victory last time was mostly due to luck, and I don’t anticipate a repeat of such fortune,” Lansius replied and then fixing his gaze on Calub. “There are times when things take a turn for the worse, and I fear this could be one of them.”

While Calub nodded, Sir Justin voiced his concern, "What’s our move then? Do we quit?”

Lansius’ lips twitched into a faint smirk, a mysterious glimmer in his eyes. “Let’s not rush into anything. First, let’s send a messenger to Lord Robert. Then I need to address our men.”

He rose up from his seat, followed by everyone. “You all should accompany me to the billets," declared Lansius, and then to his guest, “Brother Batu, I’ll arrange for a guest room for you.”

Considering the situation, the usually soft-spoken lord now exuded a level of confidence Batu had rarely witnessed before. “No need. My tribesmen have set up a yurt outside for the night.”

“Then please join us in the Great Hall for supper. Let me know if you require anything or reach out to one of my men.”

“It would be an honor, but I’d like to accompany you to the billets if you don’t mind. There’s a certain curiosity I wish to satisfy,” explained Batu.

 

***

 

Lansius

The billets were a pet project of Lansius and his staff. Originally, whenever a lord wanted to station troops in a city or town, he would require the residents to provide shelter for his men and officers.

This arrangement had two advantages. Firstly, it distributed the responsibility of housing and feeding the troops among the citizens. Secondly, it ensured the city's loyalty.

This was because, typically, only the wealthier citizens had extra room in their homes. As a result, having the lord's men stay with them turned a seemingly fair arrangement into a quasi-hostage situation.

Unsurprisingly, the populace never liked the idea. The lord simply passed the bill for his troops onto them, and having their families live next to an armed officer or footman they had never met before was rarely comfortable, if not altogether dangerous.

Lansius saw the benefits but believed the traditional billets risked creating social problems between the Korelians and his primarily Midlandian troops. Thus, his first administrative breakthrough the previous autumn was to centralize the billeting system by selecting sites with empty houses in the southern part of Korelia.

There, he established a permanent dormitory-style system, a field kitchen, a training hall, and an archery range. With the assistance of his staff, he laid the groundwork for a military police force, appointing senior guardsmen to maintain order.

In doing this, he effectively created a barracks complex to manage and organize his men. This also limited interactions between the troops and townsfolk, greatly coaxed discipline, and mitigate unnecessary risks.

Despite his attempts to instate a more rigid hierarchy, Lansius recognized that implementing a modern military structure or even a Roman-style system would cause too many problems. Thus, he relinquished any desire to micromanage, allowing them to govern themselves internally to a degree.

...

After a short ride, Lansius and his entourage arrived at the billets complex. The guard on the post saluted him readily and opened the gates for them.

As Lansius and his entourage dismounted, the air vibrated with anticipation. His presence made his men gather around. His friendly gaze swept across their faces, absorbing the subtle shifts of emotion. “At ease,” he said cheerfully, then asked, “Take me to the training hall.”

Hearing the Lord’s request, Sir Justin took over seamlessly, leading their party toward the heart of the complex. The men dutifully followed and created an escort for them.

The training hall, a brainchild of Lansius himself, was a hulking beast of a building. It could accommodate dozens of men, suffused with light and fresh air from meticulously placed windows and vents. The equipment within was rudimentary but effective.

As they stepped inside, the distinct smell of exertion and iron filled their nostrils. The men went alive, eyes turning towards their unexpected guests.

Sir Justin, ever the pragmatic commander, urged, “At ease, we’re just looking. Carry on.”

Lansius allowed his gaze to sweep over the battered surfaces of the grotesque iron dumbbells and wooden bench presses. Their scarred surface was a testament to their extensive use. But the true evidence of their usage was embodied in the men who stood before him.

As they lined up to greet him, Lansius couldn’t help but grin at their transformed physiques. The once scrawny group from the previous year had metamorphosed into a team of muscular individuals.

The inclusion of meals in Lansius’ contracts to his men-at-arms wasn’t a mere act of generosity, but a calculated move. Unlike Lansius, the Midlandians and Lowlandians did not suffer from lactose intolerance. Plus, Korelia had a surplus of goat's milk, cheese, and meat. Thus, it was an easy plan to do.

He had focused on bulking them up the previous winter. This served as a solution to several issues.

First, Lansius couldn’t march his troops for more than forty days per year. Moreover, despite the all-year-round payments, they had only agreed to one week of armed training per month.

However, he had convinced them to commit to three days of personal training weekly. This commitment translated to three full days of weightlifting and stamina-building runs when weather permitted.

Coupled with the competitive games he had initiated, offering protein-rich food and alcohol as prizes, he ensured a high participation rate, driving his men towards continual improvement.

By giving them a goal and rewards, he reduced their boredom and possibly prevented many issues usually faced in military facilities.

Now, his men had become warriors in spirit and form. Their presence radiated strength and confidence.

Catching Batu’s impressed gaze, Lansius asked, “What do you think of them?”

“Only one way to find out,” Batu replied, striding towards a table that was traditionally used for arm wrestling. “Come, I challenge your best.”

“I’m up next after Batu,” Sir Justin announced, encouraging his men as he took his place behind Batu.

Audrey, who had lined up behind the Marshal, shed her traveling coat and was stretching.

The unexpected situation drew a chuckle from Lansius. As he warmed up his arms, he took his place in line behind Audrey.

Despite his unassuming appearance, the Lord wasn’t to be underestimated - his training on horseback, along with wielding hefty lances against wooden targets and engaging in hand-to-hand combat, had honed his physical abilities.

Their collective participation sparked a spontaneous competition. News of a competition against the lord and his entourage spread like wildfire, attracting hundreds of onlookers outside.

Sir Justin and Batu displayed formidable strength. Audrey performed remarkably well. Even Lansius held his own, besting four out of a dozen plus competitors.

The contest was intense; these men were no pushovers. After a half-hour of sweat-soaked, adrenaline-fueled excitement, the contest finally came to an end.

Their arms ached, but feeling satisfied as they shared drinks and laughter. The Lord himself, despite losing a few silver coins, felt pride in his performance. His training had borne fruit. Now, noticing the crowd lingering outside the training hall, he decided it was time to execute his plan.

As he stood at the hall’s entrance, he was met with a sea of eager faces. “Men, I’m here today to check on you because we’ve received news about our enemy.”

Murmurs rippled through the crowd.

“Yes, the western Lords are marching toward Korelia. And their numbers are big,” Lansius announced, his tone casual and generally untroubled.

“My Lord, how many of them are coming?” Sigmund, the lieutenant, and skald asked from the porch-like section of the training hall.

“Our scouts report thirty groups of two-hundred,” Lansius responded, still casually. All his pent-up worries had unexpectedly found release in the arm wrestling bout.

His words triggered a wave of commotion. While many couldn’t grasp just how large they were, they sensed it was more than ten times their size. They were numbered only four-hundred.

Lansius glanced toward his nearest ally, who happened to be Audrey. Sensing his intention, she slammed her fist hard on the door, commanding attention. “Order,” she demanded in a threatening voice.

The men, familiar with her reputation, respected her authority.

“Men, this is why I kept you in the dark last year,” Lansius resumed his speech. “Last year, you were all innocent. You knew nothing about fighting and warfare. But now, you should have learned a thing or two. Our victory last year should teach you that it’s entirely possible to win against an enemy more numerous and better armed than us.”

His words had their full attention. Indeed, they couldn’t forget their miraculous victory last year against Lord Robert.

“I know how to, because I’ve trained for it, mastered it since my youth,” Lansius continued. “But I understand it may be useless to try to convince you of my wisdom. But please, listen well to what I am about to say.”

He paused for effect and declared, “Thirty groups of two-hundred... Six thousand is nothing. Don’t be fooled by the number!”

The crowd looked at him in disbelief.

A faint smirk formed on Lansius’ lips. “Let me explain.”

 

***

 

Chapter 48

The Breath Before the Plunge

 

Lansius’ assertion that six-thousand enemies were nothing captured everyone’s attention. They were intrigued, excited, and relieved that the situation seemed salvageable.

From his pocket, Lansius produced several wooden blocks the size of a thumb and proceeded to sit on the wooden porch. “Imagine each of these is a thousand of the enemy’s troops,” he said, lining them up on the porch.

The hundreds of his men focused their gaze on the tiny objects, hanging on his every word.

“Now, the first one,” Lansius began, lifting one of the wooden blocks and addressing his men like a teacher to his students.

“As you may know, a force of six thousand men marching through the Lowlandia Great Plains would require a massive amount of food and water. It’s a fifteen-day journey for heavy ox-drawn carts. I believe it’s reasonable to think that one-sixth of their number, or a thousand men, is dedicated solely to this task.”

Looking at their own experience, the men nodded in agreement.

Lansius continued, “So, you don’t have to worry about this one.” He put one block aside. “They’re merely levies, transporters, men who take care of fodder, grass for their oxen, mules, horses. Not first-rate combatants.”

From the blocks, the men could see that out of six, now there were only five left.

Lansius then picked up another block. “Next is the South Hills Barony… If you talk with the locals enough, any Korelians will tell you that the South Hills’ men despise the Three Hills. Enough that they rebelled two times in ten years.”

Almost all nodded. Ten years were considered recent and people in Korelia still gossiped about it. The reason was, they were once a united entity. Korelia, Korimor, and South Hills were once a viscountcy under Three Hills.

Lansius continued, “Despite what their leaders are thinking, they are reluctant participants. They just need to show up, but they don’t want to die in Korelia. They’re likely a token army, unmotivated, and unlikely to put their lives in danger.”

The men nodded their heads again as Lansius put aside another wooden block. Out of six, only four were left, and the men were curious about what their lord would say next.

Lansius picked another block. “Now, this one is dangerous. This one is the Korimor Barony. As you may know, they’re mostly made of Nicopolan mercenaries. They’re tough, brutal, and resilient. They’re going to be our worst enemy on the battlefield.”

Despite the warning, the men noticed how the lord said that with a faint smile.

“However... they’re mercenaries. Everybody despises them, even men from Three Hills and their own Korimor regiment. The Lowlandians have no love for the Nicopolans. Because of this, I believe they’ll be very cautious, not giving their all. They want money, not a tombstone. Thus, they represent only half of their strength, equal to five hundred.”

The men nodded as they watched the Lord place the wooden block on the right side.

Lansius then gathered all the remaining three blocks in his palm and asked, “These three represent the Three Hills’ troops. How many do you think are levied and how many are men-at-arms?”

The men breathe a sigh of relief. They understood the intention behind the question. Some even chuckled, though none dared to answer.

“Sterling,” Lansius called.

“Yes, My Lord.” The squire came to his side.

“Can you answer my question?”

“Out of three thousand, I think less than a thousand are cavalry and men-at-arms. The rest are levied troops,” Sterling answered.

The men agreed and were eager to see Lansius’ reaction.

As expected, Lansius removed two blocks, explaining, “These are villagers who have seen so many terrors of wars. Unlike you, Midlandians who’ve only seen war a few times in your lives, here, even boys as young as ten, have witnessed several.”

He paused for a moment. “Now, these men, so far from home, waging wars they neither like nor agree with. I doubt they’ll throw their lives away for nothing.”

Lansius then moved the last block to his right side, joining the only sole block. “Now, as you can see, we only have to deal with a thousand Three Hills men-at-arms and knights, along with five hundred of Korimor’s Nicopolan mercenaries.” He scanned his men and taunted, “It isn’t so bad, is it?”

The men readily nodded, some even grinned, as they found no fault in the Lord’s reasoning.

“Our number at four hundred men-at-arms. We have crossbowmen with heavy arbalests and six hundred brave Korelian militia. Our defensive position is entrenched, and we also have the assistance of Batu’s Nomadic Cavalry.”

Lansius drew a deep breath. “We’re not fighting a losing battle. We’re going to give them a bloody nose and take everything from them! What do you say about this?”

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

His men started making some noise in agreement.

Lansius pressed on. “They’re six thousand strong only in numbers, but the numbers lie. They’re a hodgepodge of an army. Half don’t even want to be in this war. Some just wanted to show up and do nothing more. Even in a siege, they won’t coordinate well. Each faction distrusts the others. What kind of army is that?”

His men were bought in whatever Lansius was selling, and the idea caught on.

“This won’t be easy, but give me a good fight. Don’t you dare run! Don’t you dare die on me! Believe in my plan, and you’ll find yourselves victorious. And by the Ageless One, I swear to employ you even when you’re crippled, and I swear to send money to your family if you fall. Will you yield or will you fight?” Lansius repeated his question from the previous year to his men.

Some of his men answered with laughter, while others with serious faces declared, “We’ll fight for you, My Lord!”

“My brother and I will not shame you!”

“Let them come!” And then their voices coalesced into an excited war cry.

Those watching from behind Lansius - from Sir Justin, Audrey, to Batu - were impressed by Lansius’ explanation. The lord might have omitted several aspects, but he had ingeniously steeled his men’s hearts, dispelling their fear of the upcoming battle.

With just a simple speech, not only had the lord calmed his men and thwarted any potential desertion, but he had also rallied them. Now, they wouldn’t shrink from war - they were clamoring for it.

 

***

 

Lansius returned to his castle and headed directly to the council room, which he had used as his personal quarters. He shut the door, shrugged off his coat, and took a seat on his bed, finally allowing his true emotions to surface.

His hands were slick with sweat from the summer heat, but the tremors coursing through his body were of his own making. The sheer number of lies he had spun was astonishing, even to himself.

Turning six-thousand enemies into a mere fifteen hundred, that’s some great bullshit...

He wore a manic grin, even as a wave of nausea threatened to overwhelm him.

The small window of the council room did little to mitigate the sweltering summer heat.

The door swung open, admitting Audrey, who promptly closed it behind her. “Are you okay?” she asked, concern evident in her approach.

“Yeah, I’m okay. Why do you ask?” Lansius responded, still seated on the bed.

“Because I know you.” A rare warmth filled her eyes. She reached for Lansius’ cup from the table as she advanced, drawing a small metallic flask from her pocket. “Mead,” she announced.

“Gratitude,” Lansius said.

“Do you need a bucket?”

“No, no, I’m fine, really.”

Exhaling, Audrey offered him the cup of mead.

Lansius took a sip, appreciating the sweet taste of honey.

“Get some rest. You’ve done plenty today,” she suggested, starting to unfasten his outer garment due to the heat.

He chuckled. “Will you let me off from full armor training tonight? The heat is unbearable,” Lansius pleaded.

Audrey clicked her tongue, refraining from voicing a response.

Lansius exhaled again, this time with more gravity in his tone. “We only have twelve days left. I must finalize my plan.”

“One step at a time, Lans. Just tell me who you need to summon to carry out your orders. You’re a Lord, act like one.”

Lansius nodded at her words. He contemplated summoning Batu, Sir Justin, and Sir Callahan, but they were likely dealing with their own issues. “Summon Calub and the guests. Also, ask Cecile for some cool water from the castle’s cellar.”

Audrey smiled. “We could certainly use that. Summer here is no joke.”

Lansius nodded as Audrey exited.

Korelia’s summer was quite harsh. The castle’s defensive design, with its minimal windows, only heightened the discomfort.

The ache in his arms brought to mind the training from the previous day. All his muscles were still sore.

They had received their sets of full armor around the same time that Felis arrived in Korelia. It turned out the merchant group that Felis had journeyed was one of Korelia’s suppliers.

The armor was also the reason why Audrey was in a relatively good mood.

To think she’s happy with armor of all things...

Lansius’ stint in Midlandia last year had taught him that ordering a complete set of plate armor, aside from costing a fortune, also could take up to a year. In order to navigate around this issue—since he needed armor for his men—Lansius opted for a radical half-armor design.

This style was not only cheaper but could also be sourced from old, incomplete designs or refurbished sets with minor adjustments. As a result, he had sufficient funds to acquire forty sets of plate armor for his best fighters.

Combined with the weapons, crossbow parts, and additional supplies, this expenditure consumed a significant portion of the money he had won from Robert the previous year, including the ransom Robert’s knights had paid. But Lansius believed it was a wise investment.

The half armor, protecting mainly the front side of the body, comprised of a breastplate, gorget, pauldron, and some hip protection. It didn’t offer all-around protection, but he needed quantity.

Though lacking in a few parts, they provide ample protection for vital areas. Ringmail and padded jacks would cover the rest.

For Lansius, Lord Bengrieve had commissioned his armorer to modify one of the unused collections that had a similar body size to him. While for Audrey, he commissioned a totally new piece.

Although Bengrieve called them unused, the style was avant-garde, the latest the Imperium could offer. This was high-tier plate armor.

Ever since the armor arrived two weeks ago and fitted for them, Audrey had subjected Lansius to rigorous training almost every day.

Whether in the midday summer heat, inside or outside the castle, mounted or on foot, Lansius was forced to master it all. Along with the other armor recipients, he weathered blow after blow from mock combat.

Occasionally, he felt as if she was simply venting her frustration on him. Now he understood how Sterling, Roger, and Carla must have felt.

So much dread...

His two-week-old suit of armor, stored at the castle’s armory, was marred by dents and scratches all over its metallic surface. The visor joints even needed repairing once, as Audrey had bashed it too many and too hard.

Every time Lansius protested after she had knocked him too hard, she would insist that his late start required crash courses for his survival on the battlefield.

Because of one of the impacts, Lansius had developed a persistent ringing in his ears.

Nevertheless, deep inside, he was grateful. He knew she wanted him to survive, but her method was close to madness.

As Lansius massaged his sore body, the upcoming battle weighed heavily on his mind. Instead of resting in bed, he rose and walked to his desk, drawing out his wooden blocks and attempting to arrange them on the chart he had prepared.

Six wooden blocks, three additional blocks inked with an ‘X’ to indicate cavalry, and four half-blocks representing his significantly smaller force. This consisted of the men-at-arms, the militia, the cavalry, and Batu’s tribesmen.

The idea of raiding their supplies was out of the question. Lowlandian armies, due to their geography, constantly placed their supply trains in the heart of their formations.

They wouldn’t make such a beginner mistake to separate their supply convoy to be raided easily. Worse still, Batu had personally informed him that the enemy likely had three-hundred cavalry at their disposal.

Even with their combined forces, Lansius and Batu’s cavalry wouldn’t be able to compete. The Three Hills, while possessing a large yet relatively weak group of levied troops, also boasted their elite Black Knights cavalry.

These knights posed a serious threat, even to the formidable Lion of Lowlandia at the height of his power.

How could I possibly win this?

 

***

 

Chapter 49

War Council

 

The door to the Council Chamber swung open, and Lansius stepped inside. He immediately noticed the buzz of activity as Audrey, Calub, and Felis were already present. “At ease,” he instructed nonchalantly.

“Where have you been?” Audrey inquired.

“Just relaying a message to Sterling,” he replied.

“Your speech at the Training Hall was quite impressive, My Lord,” Calub complimented, setting his doubts aside for the moment.

“Gratitude, Calub,” Lansius acknowledged, prompting a curious look from Felis.

“I’ll explain later,” Calub reassured Felis.

With only familiar faces in the room, Audrey shrugged off her black outer garment and hung it over the back of her chair. “Ahh...” she sighed, evidently affected by the oppressive heat. Her ivory-colored tunic clung to her skin, soaked with sweat.

“Isn’t the Great Chamber cooler?” Calub questioned, removing his off-white jacket in the process.

“Hannei mentioned she’d be willing to cool the room, but only if it’s just us present,” Felis remarked, settling into her chair.

Calub nodded in agreement, swiftly refocusing his attention on the scrolls spread out before him. On the surface, he maintained a calm demeanor, but internally, worry was gnawing at him.

The alchemist was among the few who hadn’t accepted Lansius’ explanation at face value in the billet’s training hall. Yet, he chose not to challenge Lansius, especially when he had no better alternatives to offer.

Lansius retreated behind a thick canvas screen that served as a divider for his makeshift quarters. “Yesterday wasn’t this hot,” he mumbled as he sat on his bed, his skin glistening with sweat.

“In Lowlandia, they say the height of summer arrives as unexpectedly as a winter blizzard,” said Calub.

“A blizzard sounds nice,” Lansius murmured before snapping back to reality. “Calub, we’re likely to face a siege soon. How are our food and grain supplies?”

“We’re prepared for short sieges,” Calub reported. “Korelians are hardy and experienced people. They’ve prepared for a siege and stockpiled what they could, mostly salted or smoked goods.”

“And for long sieges?” Audrey asked, her voice laced with concern.

“We don’t have to worry about long sieges,” Lansius replied candidly. “The walls of Korelia aren’t designed to withstand siege weapons, and our trenches don’t cover the entire town. We’d stand no chance in such a scenario.”

Feeling the need to balance the argument, Calub added, “Before the enemy arrives, reinforcements from Lord Robert should arrive with additional supplies.”

“Let’s not count on that aid,” Lansius cautioned. “It’d be great if they came, but we can’t rely on external help.”

Reluctantly, Calub nodded and said, “Our food will last. The city will start rationing today.”

“Start the evacuation plan tomorrow,” Lansius ordered.

Calub nodded again. They had agreed to evacuate non-combatants to several villages and baronets’ estates. Sir Callahan, Sir Justin, and several other knights had prepared for this eventuality.

“I’m sorry to burden you with this,” Lansius said.

“Well, we’re short on capable people. We have plenty of muscle, but not enough men trained with ink and papers.”

Lansius chuckled. “You should ask Hannei for help.”

Calub smiled. “She barely reads the common alphabet.”

“Oh, right. She’s only proficient in the old tongue,” Lansius remarked.

Suddenly, the door swung open again.

“Thank you for accompanying me,” said a woman before entering.

The people inside turned toward the door and saw Hannei enter. Outside, the page boy Margo gave a small bow before closing the door behind her.

“How’s Tia?” Calub asked as Hannei entered.

“She’s sleeping soundly after I cooled the room,” Hannei replied while looking around, and then she looked at Lansius in his bed.

“Heya,” Lansius waved his hand as their gazes met.

“Lans, do you really plan to sleep here continuously? It’s been how many days already,” said Hannei casually.

“Well, my study is too small. Besides, it’s comfortable and spacious in here,” he responded lightly.

“See, see! He likes it here,” Felis chimed in.

So Hannei has spoken about her disapproval.

“That’s okay Hannei. I don’t mind it at all,” Lansius said with a smile.

But that made Hannei let out a sigh. “Audrey, you should take better care of him. Otherwise, some girl would exploit him.”

“I hear you Hannei. Sometimes he’s so naïve,” Audrey replied so readily.

Stolen from its rightful author, this tale is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

“Wha-” Lansius was surprised. Of all people, he was hearing it from Audrey.

The room was chuckling at the Lord’s expense.

“This is so embarrassing...” Lansius conceded.

“This brings back memories of Toruna,” Calub chuckled, setting aside his scrolls and quill pen.

After a moment of reminiscence, Felis clapped her hands. “I’m glad that our bond remains unchanged.”

Lansius exhaled and offered a smile, believing the timing to be just right. “Felis,” he called out warmly. “War is on the horizon for Korelia. Would you be willing to lead the refugees to Sir Callahan’s baronet?”

“Why? Don’t you need my help?” Felis asked, slightly offended.

Lansius gave a genuine smile, aware that she was referring to her marksman skills, not her uncanny luck. There was an unspoken agreement among their circle of friends to never discuss her mysterious power openly, fearing it might estrange Felis. “I want you to meet Cecile’s little sister. I heard she’s adorable, and blonde too.”

Felis’ interest was instantly piqued at the mention of a younger Cecile, stirring her motherly instincts. However, she shook her head. “No, I’ll be staying here. You’ll need my help.”

Lansius glanced at Hannei and Calub. The pair shrugged but largely looked content.

“I’ll stay with her,” Hannei gave her words to ease Lansius’ worry.

Lansius nodded.

At least I tried. If she wanted to stay then, who am I to go against Fortuna’s favorite?

Afterward, Hannei seemed to notice the heat. Without being asked, she chanted a prayer in French. The air began to circulate faster, and then a whiff of fresh air breezed from the narrow window. There was no blinding light, just the sound of wind rustling inside.

The room gradually became cooler to the point where it almost felt like on top of a mountain. Everybody was looking much more relaxed.

“Gratitude,” Calub and Audrey thanked Hannei almost at the same time.

“You’re welcome,” Hannei replied. Then she sat next to Felis.

Using magic like this was an extravagance, but a well-known practice. The Imperium’s high nobles precisely employed their mages to do these things. Bodyguards and also walking air conditioners, even walking refrigerators. Rarely did they put their precious mages into harm’s way.

In retrospect, the mages in this world were fundamentally different. There was no casting fire or water out of nothing. No mana or magic circuits inside the body. And no hindrance to wearing heavy armor.

While mages couldn’t control the elements, they could infuse the surrounding air with magical properties and manipulate it to a degree.

However, in combat, mages used their magical properties to empower their own body, making them more resilient, powerful, and with greater stamina. Meanwhile, healing followed a radically different mechanism. A closely guarded secret of the Healers’ Guild.

“Anyway, Lans,” Hannei called.

“Aye?”

“I heard about the war, but I still need to tell you about Midlandia.”

Hannei’s words jolted Lansius. “Eh... I totally forgot about it.” He rose and reached out for a seat next to her.

“You look busy as the lord, so I don’t want to put more trouble. But it doesn’t seem like you’ll have a break anytime soon.”

“Well, a war is coming.”

Hannei could only nod. Concern flashed across her face.

“So, what happened in Midlandia?” Lansius asked, not wanting to be distracted again.

Hannei took a deep breath before announcing, “The current Lord of Midlandia intends to vacate his position.”

Lansius blanked when he heard those words. “What?”

The room immediately tensed. Even Calub appeared disturbed.

“It’s not official yet, but the word is from Lord Bengrieve.”

This is more than bad news...

“But why so suddenly? Is the Lord of Midlandia ill?” Calub asked, trying to comprehend the implications.

“I don’t believe so. I heard he’s relinquishing his claim. It appears to involve a Saint Candidate.”

Lansius glanced at Calub, who could only shake his head in response.

“Large guilds are naturally secretive. I’m unaware of another guild’s plans or design concerning Midlandia.”

“Then who’s the proposed new lord?” Lansius queried.

“That’s the problem. Lord Bengrieve hasn’t proposed a candidate yet.”

Lansius let out a sigh.

Even if we’re winning, no help or assistance will come from Midlandia.

“So, we’re on our own?” Calub asked Hannei cautiously.

She shook her head. “No, Bengrieve said that Lansius should do his utmost. The success in Korelia would reflect well on Bengrieve and his potential candidate.”

Lansius blinked, his mind racing with worries. “I’ll try, but this is going to be the damnedest nearest-run thing.”

His somber warning quieted the chamber. They all recognized the weight of the hopes pinned on Lansius, a man neither born nor prepared for such roles and responsibilities.

Hannei then turned to Felis and said, “Bengrieve also told me this: Til the matter is settled, Felis should stay in Korelia. He fears someone might capture her as a bargaining chip.”

A succession crisis is always a mess...

“Well, anyway, I’m surprised you got involved, considering your hermit lifestyle,” Lansius remarked to Hannei.

“Felis is like a sister to me,” Hannei responded, causing Felis to beam with delight.

Suddenly, there was a knock on the door.

“Who is it?” Audrey called, rising from her seat.

“The Lord has instructed me to summon Batu and Sir Justin. They have arrived and are waiting in the Great Chamber,” Sterling’s voice came from the outside.

“Welp, that’s my cue,” Lansius announced, standing to change his clothes.

 

***

 

Lansius entered the Great Chamber, Audrey, Calub, and Sterling in tow.

Batu and Sir Justin rose from their seats as they arrived.

“Please remain seated,” Lansius said, as he and his companions took their places.

“You summoned us, My Lord?” inquired Sir Justin.

“Yes, I wish to discuss our war plan,” Lansius responded.

Calub proceeded to unfurl a map of Western Lowlandia on the long table. It lacked a bird’s-eye perspective like Lansius’ map, but it would serve its purpose.

“Now, there are twelve days left. They should be around here,” Lansius indicated on the map.

“My brethren and I plan to raid their camp at night when they are exhausted or attempt an attack when they venture out to collect their water supply,” Batu stated resolutely.

“That’s a bold plan, but can you accomplish it without significant casualties to your clans?” Lansius questioned.

Batu offered a faint smile and shook his head. “Given their numbers and the size of their camp, my brethren and I are likely to be cut down after two attempts.”

His sobering honesty cast a pall over the group. With only two-hundred riders, Batu and his men would likely only have two chances. To pit them against a force of six-thousand, plus three hundred cavalry and expect a positive outcome was overly optimistic.

“The Nicopolan mercenaries are also renowned for their light cavalry. They are skilled trackers and hunters,” Lansius warned.

Batu nodded. “Our brethren near Korimor have alerted us. They have been retreating from Korimor due to such raids.”

“Do they take hostages?” asked Sir Justin.

“No, they enslave immediately, given our nomadic origin,” Batu replied, candid about the grim realities of war.

Lansius instinctively glanced at Audrey. She appeared composed, yet her eyes blazed with fury. Raising his hand to signal he was about to speak, he contemplated for a moment before finally announcing, “Batu, I want your people to steer clear of them.”

Eyebrows knitted in confusion were directed at Lansius, who continued, “While harassing their water supply and attempting to burn their supplies will damage them, I doubt it will inflict enough to deplete their forces. I’m not willing to trade your nomadic horsemen for that result.”

Batu gladly nodded. “Then what is your plan?”

“We’ll confront them on our turf. They want a siege, so we’ll give them one. Batu, you and your horsemen should only engage on my signal. Set up your camp further south of town and stay well hidden.”

“We’re facing them head-on, My Lord?” Sir Justin asked with excitement. His enthusiasm was contagious and lifted the mood of everyone present.

Lansius appeared less somber than usual. “Not quite, but let them think they’ve caught us off guard.”

“What role do you expect us, the nomads, to play in this battle?” Batu inquired.

Lansius leaned forward toward Batu. “The role of the hunter. When the time comes, give me your hardest battle and you will feast on their blood. Tell your brethren to stock up on their arrows, sharpen their blades, and steel their resolve. If need be, I will unleash something Lowlandia will never forget.”

 

***

 

Chapter 50

Master of the Mercenary

 

Three days after Lansius met with Batu, the nomadic tribesmen stealthily moved across the Great Plains, setting up camp far south of Korelia. There they waited for the inevitable battle, their numbers swelling as many heeded the call to avenge their enslaved brethren captured by the Nicopolan mercenaries.

As dawn arrived in Korelia, Sir Callahan continued training Lansius and Sterling in the art of jousting. This day was likely their last as the enemy forces were closing into Korelia.

As an experienced knight, Callahan would not risk injuring the riders or horses through over-training. The riders and the horses needed to recover ideally for a week before the battle.

Lansius sat astride his destrier, eagerly aimed his blunted lance at a wooden shield hanging on a rotating post firmly planted in the ground. Sometimes he struck a solid hit, but often he missed, failing to align his lance expertly. His arm muscles were sore, feeling as if they were burning, even with the lance rest on his breastplate.

Nothing came easy. Lansius had been practicing this skill since last year in Toruna, with only modest progress.

“Keep going!” Sir Callahan encouraged Lansius after his last missed attempt. “Mistakes happen; that’s why we train. Success is easy. How to survive from mistakes is what we trained for!”

Spurred by the encouragement, Lansius pressed on. Despite the aches, he tried again, spending the whole morning in training—practicing with lances, crossbows, and swords.

“That’s enough, My Lord,” Sir Callahan finally called off the training, stopping before rider and horse were thoroughly depleted. He motioned to Sterling, who had been resting as his horse lacked the stamina of a destrier.

Sterling helped Lansius dismount and escorted him to a nearby tent to seek shade. Lansius, with shaky hands, grabbed a jug of water and gulped it down.

As the squire, he removed Lansius’ training armor and noticed new bruises on the Lord’s shoulder, arm, and wrist, despite a layer of arming jack beneath the armor. “My Lord, you’ll need some salves.”

“Leave that for now,” he said breathlessly, lying down on a canvas bed.

Sterling nodded and left the Lord to recover.

After half an hour, Sir Callahan noticed Lansius had changed his clothes and looked refreshed.

“My Lord,” Sir Callahan greeted as Lansius approached him.

“Any news from Sir Justin and Hugo?” Lansius asked.

The knight smiled. “Not yet. Even with fast horse messengers, it will take more time.”

Lansius nodded, a mix of understanding and anxiety evident in his expression. Three days ago, he had sent them as envoys. The Imperium decorum dictated that a lord should extend courtesies if another lord was visiting their domain. It even suggested the types of gifts for the guest.

It was nothing but a political farce, considering most unannounced guests brought an invading force. Beyond the political theatrics, what he desired most was an accurate assessment of the enemy’s forces. He needed more information.

However, he was left with no option but to wait. Taking in his surroundings, Lansius noted the war preparations around Korelia were well underway. Sir Callahan and the squires had been invaluable in preparing the men and the trenches.

Lansius glanced towards the blond knight, his mentor, the best support he could ask for. He had never received a harsh word from him; instead, he had been taught with a gentle hand, receiving daily doses of inspiration and motivation.

More than just a mentor, Sir Callahan was also their most able diplomat. The knight alone successfully negotiated a trade deal with the Eastern Lowlandia merchants, securing their grain for the rest of the year. For that, Lansius was truly grateful.

“Sir Callahan, you may take the rest of the day off. Take this time to be with your daughters. We might need to mobilize either tonight or tomorrow.”

“Yes, My Lord. Does this apply to the rest of the knights and cavalry?”

“Indeed. Please inform them. We’ll feast in the Great Hall before sundown and await news from the Marshal.”

 

***

 

A week had passed. To the commoners of Korelia, the day started as any other—the sun slowly rising in the east under a blue, cloudless sky, heralding another sunny day in Korelia.

Unlike the hectic planting season of mid-spring, summer was a relatively calm period. It was a time when farmers and peasants saw their work start to bear fruit. Even with minimal tending, the crops on the farms grew taller, and the livestock fattened.

Summer also marked the time when the roads hardened enough for travel. After months of icy winter and muddy spring, merchants and peddlers resumed their travels and trade.

This should have been a good time of the year, but currently, things were looking bleak. On the western side, where there was typically nothing but empty plains, now stood more than a thousand tents. The invading army from the western Lowlandia had arrived.

Hundreds of flags and banners announced large contingents of knights. Their vibrant coats of arms contrasted with the predominantly green and yellow landscape. Many of the Houses were hundreds of years old and had played their roles in Lowlandia’s history.

Around a hundred horse-drawn carts were parked around the inner part of the camp, where the nobility resided. Fancy tents, some even lavishly adorned with bronze and gold embroidery, were evident.



If you come across this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen from Royal Road. Please report it.

Despite the early hour, the camp was already bustling with activity. Tens of bonfires were lit for cooking, and hundreds of servants fetched water or did laundry at the small stream outside the camp.

Squires attended to their masters’ horses and war gear, while patrols made their rounds to ensure security. The field was abundant with dried grass or hay, providing easy feed for the horses and bedding material.

After eleven grueling days of marching, the Coalition troops, as they named themselves, finally had some basic comfort.

On the eastern side facing Korelia, the scene was starkly different. The town and castle had barricaded themselves. No soul dared venture outside the surrounding ditches and gates.

This was the first morning of the invasion.

 

***

 

Coalition Side

Since the crack of dawn, Baron Omin had been engrossed in his duties. This campaign was his brainchild, and he had invested more than just resources into it.

He was the one who had incited Viscount Jorge to launch the attack, for unlike Omin, who was a relative nobody in Lowlandia, Jorge had a legitimate claim over Korelia.

Korelia was Jorge’s birthright. He was born and raised there as part of a branch family. As fate would have it, Jorge was summoned back to Three Hills City to succeed his dying uncle. However, he proved to be an inadequate leader. His vassals seceded, and Jorge waged unsuccessful wars to retake the lost lands.

While Jorge struggled, individuals like Omin thrived. Ironically, times of war often presented great opportunities.

Omin, originally a migrant knight family from Centuria, had risen through the ranks by outliving his counterparts in Korimor. Biding his time, Omin eventually orchestrated a coup in Korimor, then he astutely pledged his loyalty to Lord Jorge and became a trusted ally.

With Omin’s assistance and the Nicopolans mercenaries under him, Viscount Jorge began to reclaim the lost territories. In exchange for his help, Jorge backed Omin’s official nomination.

Last year, Omin finally received his royal patent and ascended to the status of Baron—a rare feat in the Imperium. In a sense, he was a rising star. He had gained enough acclaim to make Jorge wary, and Omin was aware of this. As such, he designed this campaign to maintain his overlord’s favor.

Goading Lord Jorge had been an easy task. The younger lord was known for his folly and thirst for glory. He also had a strong attachment to his birthplace, which fueled his desire to recapture Korelia.

With Jorge’s authority, Omin managed to manipulate the grain prices last year, putting additional pressure on Korelia’s troops and population, thus making them more vulnerable.

The invasion plan served to keep Omin close to Jorge, as the nascent Baron still needed Jorge’s protection until he could stand independently. After all, his domain, Korimor, was a small city, not even a tenth the size of Three Hills.

Despite its size, Omin’s barony had established an effective bureaucracy, enabling him to maintain a considerable force. Of the six-thousand troops brought for this campaign, a thousand were from Omin’s ranks, including over a hundred cavalry.

Even though they were smaller in numbers, the Korimors were better equipped, with Nicopollan mercenaries at their core. Meanwhile, the troops from Three Hills were primarily levied peasants, second sons, and freemen—many of them no more than unemployed artisans or laborers.

The contingent from South Hill was not much better. They were only there to fulfill their sixty-day obligations. Most were seasonal farmers who were anxious about their upcoming harvest.

In this regard, the Korimors were more than triple their value in combat. Aside from them, only Jorge’s Black Knights were superior in the field.

Now, Baron Omin and his lone entourage arrived at the section of the camp he sought. It was an open field workshop, cluttered with wooden structures, ropes, and pulleys.

“My Lord,” greeted the master smith.

“Let’s hear your reports.” Omin wasn’t one for idle chit-chat.

“The construction of the mangonels is underway, My Lord. As you can observe, the frame is now in place. We plan to stiffen and reinforce it today, and by tomorrow, we should have a solid base for installing the throwing arm,” elaborated the master smith.

Observing the scene, Omin could see three catapults in the making. A team of carpenters, smiths, and specially selected men were engrossed in the task. The robust wooden frame was roughly as tall as three men standing atop each other.

“When will they be operational?”

“Provided the weather cooperates, two will be ready in five days, My Lord.”

Upon hearing this, Omin deliberated momentarily before deeming it unwise to accelerate the process further.

“I’ll hold you to that promise, Maester,” Omin responded, admiring the progress before him.

Typically, it took several months to build a siege engine, but his were preassembled.

“Should you encounter any difficulties, come to me immediately. Your work is a top priority.” He told the grey-haired man, who resembled a scholar more than a carpenter or blacksmith.

“My deepest gratitude, My Lord.” The master smith bowed in acknowledgment.

Omin departed from the workshop, observing the sprawling encampment. To the unacquainted, the site appeared chaotic. Tents were haphazardly pitched with only narrow pathways in between.

This early in the morning, most of the infantry were still weary from their lengthy march, awakening slowly as sunlight filtered into their canvas dwellings. Some gathered near their tents, others headed straight to the nearby stream. Portions of the camp now reeked of human and horse waste.

“Is breakfast prepared?” Omin asked, his appetite unfazed by the stench.

“It should be, My Lord,” his towering Nicopolan bodyguard replied.

The two navigated toward the heart of the encampment.

“My Lord,” a woman clad in a blue surcoat with bronze accents called out to Omin. She had been waiting by the secured entrance to the nobles’ quarter.

Omin recognized her. Despite her youthfulness, she was the cavalry captain of the Nicopolans. “Lady Daniella, you presented your report this morning?”

“Walk with me, My Lord,” suggested Daniella, with a tone that hinted at urgency.

Omin followed her stride. Daniella’s background was more than just a mercenary, she was also a Nicopolan Baron’s daughter, albeit without inheritance. When she adopted such a demeanor, it indicated serious matters were at hand.

“What seems to be the issue?” asked Omin.

“The Korelians are mobilizing.”

“Are you certain?” Omin looked taken aback.

“I have already readied your horse and my riders,” she replied, guiding her employer towards the eastern edge of the camp.

Midway through the camp, a group of Korimors and Nicopolans brought forth their horses. Alongside twenty riders, they galloped eastward.

The terrain was flat, enabling them to spot distant silhouettes early on their journey. As they drew nearer, they could distinguish lines of soldiers standing between the castle and the town.

Omin pulled back on his horse’s reins, bringing the animal to a standstill.

What is the meaning of this?

He studied the Korelian formation contemplatively.

“Tally their numbers, but keep your distance,” Daniella directed her scout. Two scouts rode to estimate the size of the opposing force.

Meanwhile, Omin retreated into his thoughts. He hadn’t anticipated any skirmishes today. In fact, no one had.

Yesterday, upon their arrival, Lansius had dispatched a delegation, requesting a parley. It wasn’t a first-time occurrence either; several days prior, a group of horsemen had intercepted them en route to Korelia.

In both instances, Lord Jorge and Omin firmly declined any negotiation. They demanded that the delegation respect Lord Jorge’s claim and forfeit Korelia.

Lansius had yet to respond to Jorge’s invitation to battle. It was expected; strategically speaking, the Korelians lacked any incentive to venture into open battle. The Coalition’s overwhelming numerical superiority effectively ruled out that option.

While Lansius’ previous battle with Robert was shrouded in mystery, it was known that he favored mass crossbowmen tactics. This was why Omin had invested heavily in the construction of mangonels.

He anticipated that Lansius would adopt a defensive stance, waiting for the impending attack. After all, there was little a defending force, especially a smaller one, could do in such a predicament.

Omin surmised that the ditches encircling the town were meant to serve a similar function. Their purpose was likely to impede the Coalition’s advance, much like how Lansius had thwarted Robert.

So, why is Lansius marching out today? Is he looking for a battle? Or is this bait?

“Seven-hundred, possibly one-thousand, My Lord,” his scouts reported.

That’s almost all of Lansius’ troops.

He wasn’t sure what Lansius’ intentions were, but he knew how to react. “Fine, I’ll bring it to him.”

In war, flexibility is paramount. When there’s a change, there’s also an opportunity!

Omin intended to thwart and exploit Lansius’ tactics for his own gain. With his sight set, he rode back and prepared for battle.

 

***

 

Chapter 51

Warhorns

 

Korelians Side

The castle’s curtain wall wasn’t thick, and the overall construction was outdated. Against three fixed counterweight mangonels or early trebuchet, even the main keep was unlikely to survive more than a week of bombardment.

If the walls were targeted and breached, an uneven battle would ensue. Against six-thousand invaders, there was zero chance to win. If the castle fell, the town of Korelia would inevitably surrender, despite its trenches.

Understanding this, Lansius played the only hand available to him: initiative.

Eight-hundred men, consisting of three-hundred men-at-arms and five-hundred militia, had been readied since the previous night. They ate an early breakfast and marched out at first light.

Strategic positioning ensured the castle’s garrison of crossbowmen protected their right flank while the town’s nearby trenches covered the left. Sir Justin valiantly led the right wing, personally guarded by his band of hardened ex-mercenaries.

The center was under Hugo’s command, bolstered by Roger and a group of arbalester.

Lieutenant Sigmund, the skald, led the third company on the left wing. Despite their confident march, the troop strength wasn’t full, as Lansius had assigned a hundred of them to a separate mission.

However, these troops, originally no more than troublemakers from Midlandia, had matured. They had developed discipline and loyalty, driven by Lansius’ generous wages and fair treatment.

Lansius’ decision to employ them year-round had transformed them mentally and physically. The previous year, the majority of Midlandian troops were distrustful, malnourished, and scrawny. They would only fight for their own lives.

Now, the same troops were well disciplined, followed orders, and were physically tough, a result of their work in the trenches, which provided even more income and physical training.

In addition, the Lord provided meals and shelter, even in winter. With their basic needs covered, they could save money. Last year, thick ragged clothes as the poor man’s gambesons were their standard attire. Now, they wore proper gambesons, helmets, and even ringmails or brigandine.

Moreover, the vanguard as the crème de la crème had armor rivaling a knight. These small number of top performers, instead of gambling and drinking during winter, dedicated their time to training.

The billets, the training halls, and the training scheme provided sufficient motivation for them to hone their skills and physique.

To say that this year’s Korelian troops were an improvement would be a serious understatement. They had become a fit, fully functional military unit, no longer a motley crew of poor peasants and vagabonds.

The price of their improvement was their quantity. Lansius recruited sparingly. He stood firm on his decision not to engage in large-scale or seasonal recruitment. His approach was unconventional, but it seemed he was onto something innovative.

Well-fed and well-paid, the men of House Lansius were formidable, with high morale. The same happened with the militia. The Korelians were driven by gratitude and hope for a better life under their Lord.

The summer sun didn’t bother them; they were accustomed to laboring under it. They found standing in formation less taxing compared to digging the trenches.

Determinedly, the troops stood their ground while the vast Coalition army took to the field.

As the Coalition approached, Sir Justin, fully encased in plate armor, finalized his preparations. “Men,” he called for their attention as he read from a piece of paper on his gauntlet while his adjutant carried his halberd.

“Lord Lansius wishes to share a few words with you. Firstly, he wants you to know that he wished to stand with you, whom he regards as blood brothers.”

He then commented off-script, “Can you imagine that a Lord thinks of you, the scum of Midlandia, as his blood brothers?”

His off-the-cuff remark prompted chuckles from the men, easing their tension.

The Marshal returned to his script. “The Lord feels disgraced that he cannot fight alongside you, but he is needed elsewhere to ensure victory. In this matter, the Lord has assured me that today’s victory is as certain as death by old age.”

As expected, the mention of death sparked strong emotions in the men. The Marshal continued, "Men, do not fear death... Embrace it. Let it strengthen your resolve and drive you to fight your hardest," he said with compassion. "Blood and guts will be shed, but ultimately, victory will be ours. The sacrifices made will not be in vain. They will bring glory and riches to you, your family, and your descendants."

These words pumped up the men, steeling their resolve. The promise of wealth was always a good cause to die for.

Afterward, the knight solemnly asked, “Remember your upbringing and your life before today; it was a wretched life, wasn’t it?”

The men collectively nodded in agreement.

Sir Justin chuckled, gazed at the end part of the letter and found it a bit weak so he improvised. "Men, now is the chance to change your fate. Take it from the nobles, take it from their knights, be the master of your own fate!"

The men looked pumped but relaxed, almost meditative. There, in the field of Korelia with their sharpened polearms and swords in hand, they patiently waited for the enemy to come.

 

***

 

Tann- tann- taraaa! Taa- raaaa!!

The Coalition’s trumpets echoed across the plains of Korelia. Soon, waves of troops emerged from the encampment. There were no uniforms, each man donned a different style, pattern, or color of garment.

The narrative has been illicitly obtained; should you discover it on Amazon, report the violation.

Ahead of the colorful troops, captains and lieutenants wasted no time in establishing formation. Slowly, the disorganized bunch began to coalesce into larger, orderly columns.

Meanwhile, the nobles on their horses took the lead, guiding the newly assembled columns. They were flanked by two-hundred mounted knights and the rest of the cavalry. In total, the Coalition brought more than three-hundred cavalry.

Their brightly colored clothing, polished steel armor, and vibrant banners turned the scene into a spectacle. Indeed, for them, this was a necessary display of power. This was how they showcased their might on their subjects, peers, and adversaries.

Following the noblemen and cavalry was the main body of troops, consisting of six thousand men-at-arms and levied footmen. These were common men who had no part in political squabbles.

They were here to fulfill their contracts and obligations to their lord. Many were simple farmers, artisans, or tradesmen. Ironically, they were the ones who would bear the brunt of the fighting.

With another blast of the trumpet, the halt order was sounded. The entire army stopped while dispatches on horses galloped to relay orders from the top.

Captains in each column received the commands and passed them on to the lieutenants. A flurry of activity ensued as the troops began to form into a single formation.

Before long, the formation was complete. Four unbroken lines of men stretched out for more than a mile. It was an impressive and effective display of force.

The trumpets sounded again, and the formation advanced in unison. Hundreds of banners waved. Armor and helmets glistened under the bright summer sun.

As they neared the Korelians’ line, the scale of their disparity became increasingly evident. The Coalition’s six-thousand dwarfed the defenders’ eight-hundred. It was akin to comparing a mighty river to a mere pond.

The breadth of the Coalition’s formation covered such a wide swath of land that anyone observing from Korelia would see the plains teeming with invading troops.

The scale of the invasion was not lost on the observers. Korelia’s population totaled slightly more than six-thousand, including children and the elderly. The fact that the Coalition had brought this many troops was proof that they took Lansius’ reputation seriously.

The mile-long formation continued their advance until another sound from the trumpets rang out. The formation promptly halted. Now, more than six thousand men stood tall and menacing, all facing Korelia.

 

***

 

Coalition Side

“Mm... everything seems to be as expected, Baron?” Lord Jorge, mounted on his horse but still clad in his arming jack, queried nonchalantly. He was kept under the shade by a large umbrella held diligently by a team of squires.

“Indeed, My Lord. We shall proceed as planned,” Omin responded and began to relay his orders.

Earlier, the two had ruled out a full-scale attack. Both understood the inherent risks of open battles. Even a stroke of bad luck could jeopardize superior forces. Thus, they opted to launch a smaller-scale attack in response to Lansius’ invitation to battle.

A skirmish, not a pitched battle. This was to preserve the Coalition’s numerical superiority. After all, they merely needed to exercise patience and wait for the siege engines to do their work. No one wanted to risk the entire army against a potential trap.

Their decision was also influenced by the landscape. With a hill on one side and the town’s ditches on the other, there wasn’t enough space for their mile-long formation.

Earlier, a scout had reported that only a few hundred could march side by side. They deduced this to be the reason why Lansius had positioned his army there. The area essentially functioned as a natural bottleneck.

It acted as a barrier, preventing a larger army from deploying its full force against a smaller adversary. However, the two Lords were confident that they could outmaneuver it. A trap was only a trap if they weren’t aware of it.

As commanded by Lord Jorge and Omin, the Coalition force divided itself into three columns. Each contained two-thousand men.

Sir Arius, one of Lord Jorge’s cousins, had the honor of leading the attack. The young man was brave and experienced. His column stood in the center, preparing to attack eastward.

After Omin had concluded their planning with Lord Jorge, the Baron and his entourage rejoined their column and began to march toward the south, facing Korelia town.

Omin positioned his troops to guard against a potential surprise attack from the town’s direction or the south. This position also allowed him the opportunity to raid the town if the chance arose.

The Nicopolans under him were eager for action. The idea that the siege could be over before the end of the season was both thrilling and exciting to them.

However, Omin was cautious, not allowing himself to be swept up in the thought of an easy victory. He still couldn’t fathom what the enemy was thinking by offering a battle.

Lady Daniella shared his concern. Her experience in minor skirmishes as mercenaries informed her that something was amiss.

“The Korelians will try something. You’ll do well to keep an eye on Lord Jorge,” said Omin.

“Will do, My Lord.” Without a verbal command, Daniella led her Nicopolan cavalry to join Lord Jorge as a reserve.

Meanwhile, to the north, the last column, composed mostly of regiments from the South Hill, assumed formation. They positioned themselves against the hill and in the direction of the castle. They were there to counter any potential attack from the castle.

As planned, Lord Jorge and his knights remained with the cavalry, acting as a reserve and quick reaction force.

As the Coalition marched, the summer sun rose higher. Despite being far from midday, the heat was already unbearable. There were no tall trees for shelter, only plains of tall, yellowing grass.

 

***

 



 

In the vanguard, Sir Arius lined his fiercest warriors. His column formed into three-hundred men wide and a solid six deep. Its width was strategically narrowed to counter the crossbowmen that lurked within the shadows of the castle and the ditches.

On the opposing side, the Korelian mirrored their formation. Two-hundred men wide, four men deep, they stood ready for the onslaught.

Despite the looming shadow of Lansius’ notorious reputation, Sir Arius and his brethren brimmed with confidence. Their numbers more than doubled their opponents, and their seasoned scars bore the testament of numerous battles.

As expected, the trumpets cut through the anticipatory silence. Sir Arius nodded towards his Captain, who bellowed the next command, his voice echoing across the battlefield, “Proud warriors of Three Hills, advance!”

At his command, the column began their march eastward. “Shields at the ready!”

Heeding the command, soldiers hoisted shields of all sizes, their surfaces reflecting the bright sunlight.

“Steady! Steady,” the Captain barked as the two armies advanced, each side wary of an imminent volley of bolts from the castle and ditches.

As predicted, the Korelians began their rain of death. Bolts screeched through the air, embedding themselves into the Coalition’s formation. Despite being forewarned, panic flickered in the eyes of the less experienced.

Only the nobility, encased in their suits of armor, were fearless. A few hundred donned ringmails or brigandines, which offered some protection. However, the bulk of the men sported gambeson, which offered little protection against the lethal bolts. With every breath they drew, they clung to their wooden shields, praying for them to protect them from the barrage.

The sounds of deflected shots, near-misses, and shields punctured by crossbow bolts were a chilling symphony, disheartening even for the hardened veterans. The column stretched and contorted as the center was squeezed, taxing their strength and stamina as they advanced within the last hundred paces.

Fsszhhh! Clank!!

Shrieks of agony and desperation suddenly filled the air.

“F-Fuck!” A bolt had found its mark, striking Sir Arius’ neck gorget. The impact was cushioned by the hardened steel, but the force choked him.

All around him, men were struck, their bodies crumpling as they succumbed to their wounds, even though encased in full plate. The advance wavered.

Then, a movement caught their eye. The Korelian front line had knelt, unveiling a hidden group of arbalester. The morning sun, high in the east, had blinded Sir Arius’ men from the incoming rain of bolts.

“Charge! Give the order to charge,” Sir Arius wheezed, rallying his men through the slit of his visor. He knew the consequences of hesitation.

With the rain of crossbow bolts painting the air with a deadly dance, the Coalition charged headlong into the Korelian line, a tidal wave of steel and determination.

 

***

 

Chapter 52

Blood of the Innocent

 

Korelian Center

“Loose!” Hugo’s command echoed, launching hundreds of bolts into the enemy ranks. The arbalester and crossbowmen had just released their second volley.

The attack instantly caused mayhem, but the battle wouldn’t be won by just sneaky attacks.

“No heroics, no captives until we’ve triumphed. We’re outnumbered and there’s no speck of noble in your blood - expect no quarter!” the deputy delivered his final reminder to his men.

The enemy was nearly upon them.

“Crossbowmen to the rear! Spearmen to the front!” His voice rang out.

There was no time for the crossbowmen to loose a third volley as they swiftly retreated. The spearmen quickly filled their positions. They stood steadfast, bracing for the incoming onslaught.

“Hold your line!” Hugo’s voice thundered.

“Korelia is ours!” Roger, beside him, echoed. Then the lines clashed. Steel met steel; spears were no longer brandished but thrust in fury.

Young Coalition men-at-arms, brimming with bravado yet lacking experience, surged forward recklessly. Their armor deflected numerous glancing blows, but the sheer force of some strikes was enough to stagger them.

As pain and disorientation took hold, they faltered against the onslaught of spears and swords, their legs buckling beneath them. For many, their first taste of battle was their last.

Those who fell were remorselessly trampled as hundreds of men pushed forward. Locked in brutal combat, the battlefield offered no respite or room for evacuation. The fallen became mere obstacles under the trampling feet of their comrades.

Soldiers struggled to maintain footing, fighting desperately to stand their ground against the onslaught of sharp-tipped steel brought against them. The cacophony of battle cries and cries of pain was deafening.

In total, nearly three-thousand men fought tooth and nail, seeking any means to push back, stall, or strike down their adversaries. The sickly scent of blood, urine, and vomit hung heavy in the air.

The Coalition crossbowmen repositioned, taking aim from the sidelines. Their volleys were met with swift retaliation from Korelian crossbowmen defending their vulnerable flanks.

Against all odds, the Korelians held firm. Many had bore the scars of battle, but their resilience was unwavering. Despite their wounds, their ranks remained steady. As their line stabilized, they began to cycle out their wounded, maintaining their formation with commendable discipline.

As brutal as the battlefield might be, it wasn’t an all-out chaos. Most men were not suicidal and fought as trained in an orderly manner.

Among the sea of spears, shields, and polearms, specialized fighters armed with large two-handed swords carved out breaches in the enemy line. Every breach was an opportunity to exploit. One such breach erupted first on the Korelian left flank with deadly consequences.

 

***

 

Korelian Left Wing

The Coalition’s Doppelsoldner shattered the wall of spears of the Korelian left wing, forcefully creating a narrow gap in the enemy line. The nearest group of knights readily charged into the Korelian ranks.

Space was limited, but it was a fair three-on-three fight. A Coalition knight, clad in plate armor and a crimson red surcoat, held the center while his two comrades struggled to maintain the breach.

From the Korelian side, a tall man-at-arm accepted the challenge. The crimson knight squared off against the man, who hurled his broken bill hook at the knight, only to have it deflected by a gauntlet. Gambling on the knight’s momentary distraction, the tall man drew his sword, leaped forward, and launched a powerful overhead strike.

The red knight countered, gripping his sword on both ends in a half-swording style. As the man attempted to retract his weapon, the knight guided his blade and interlocked their swords.

They wrestled for control, but the knight held the upper hand due to his advantageous grip. Unexpectedly, the knight redirected both blades to his left and, in a simultaneous motion, swung his sword’s pommel into the adversary’s helmet.

Ka-thunk!

Far from decorative pieces, the pommel caused as much damage as a mace, even against an armored person. The tall man’s visor crumpled, and he fell to the ground.

This tale has been unlawfully obtained from Royal Road. If you discover it on Amazon, kindly report it.

The entire duel lasted only seconds, demonstrating the vast skill gap between a fully trained knight and a street swordsman, which couldn’t be bridged by short amount of training or a suit of armor.

Opting to leave the downed man alive for potential ransom, the knight in the red surcoat faced the next challenger.

“Oo-rraahhh!” Another Korelian charged forward, trying to save his comrade.

The red knight parried, using the deflected momentum to slash at the opponent’s arm. It wasn’t a powerful blow, and the sword’s blade wasn’t razor-sharp, yet the speed and weight were enough to cause injury.

The Korelian recoiled from the clean hit, groaning as he realized his left arm hung limp. Behind him, another Korelian in plate armor, seemingly their lieutenant, and another soldier, rushed forward.

The red knight stepped back, allowing his comrade to take his place. Even without verbal commands, they cooperate seamlessly, the result of years of training and fighting together.

Knights, squires, and men-at-arms rarely fought alone, but in a group called a lance fournies. They had spent countless hours learning the discipline of armed combat. Each had sustained numerous blows from mistakes and accidents, with each bruise represented an invaluable experience, and each cut honed their martial skills.

For them, their armor was akin to a second skin, the limited visibility from their visors and restricted breath from small helmet holes were part of their upbringing.

The knight in the crimson red surcoat and his comrades fought valiantly, eroding the Korelian's line.

 

***

 

Korelia Right Wing

In the right wing, after the initial contact, there was a second surge from the Coalition and the fight devolved into a ruthless melee. Combat became so savage that men were shoved from behind to the point where they couldn’t wield their spears or swords.

Soon, there wasn’t even enough room to draw their daggers. They were effectively squashed, resorting to brawling with just their fists and elbows.

Having lost his sword, which had become stuck in a previous opponent's armor gap, Sir Justin now resorted to wrestling. He landed a solid punch on his enemy’s gorget with his iron gauntlet, followed by a blow to the jaw so strong that it was held together by skin alone.

The lieutenant beside him fared no better, grappling with his foe and ultimately driving his thumbs into the unfortunate opponent’s eye sockets as they both struggled to remain standing. The fight had devolved into a cruel, personal brawl.

Despite giving their best, the Korelian line began to unravel. Knowing this, the Korelian side fought desperately to close the gap.

Barely catching his breath, Sir Justin grabbed a discarded sword and launched it at an oncoming knight who targeted his men.

The knight blocked the attack with his armored wrist. Protected by a layer of steel, no sword could slice through. Despite the recoil, the knight retaliated, swinging his mace into Sir Justin’s hips.

Groaning in agony, Sir Justin crumpled to the ground, the mace’s blow could be felt despite the plate armor.

Quickly, the knight knelt on Sir Justin’s chest, pinning him down, and tried to bash his helmet with his mace.

Sir Justin wrestled with the knight’s arm while drawing his dagger. His left wrist, having endured two blows, felt broken. Nevertheless, he managed to wield his dagger and drove it into the knight’s visor.

The knight’s hands frantically reached for his face as he gurgled out blood.

Hot blood rained into Sir Justin’s helmet from above. His eyes stinging from the blood, the Marshal managed to shove the knight aside. Enduring excruciating pain from his injured wrist, he forced himself to his feet. Staying on the ground would lead to him being mobbed or trampled.

The fallen knight beside him convulsed a few times. Leaving the man to his fate, Sir Justin picked up the discarded mace and sensed someone approaching from behind.

“Marshal,” his lieutenant called. The man’s gauntlets and lower arms were smeared with blood, yet he still held the banner high. Sir Justin grinned as more of his men rushed forward, brandishing their spears to close the gap.

He knew the Korelian side had almost lost it, but through sheer determination, his men managed to stabilize their right flank.

 

***

 

Korelian Center

In front of Hugo, one of his Arvenian fellows fought valiantly. Encased in plate armor, the man was nigh impenetrable. He delivered a feigned thrust followed by a swift foot sweep, and just like that, his halberd claimed another enemy.

But glory is fleeting on the battlefield - he was blindsided and tackled by three opponents. The three were merely skirmishers, trading prowess for agility.

Despite the Arvenian’s heroic struggle, the valiant man was soon pinned. An enemy slipped a dagger into the armor’s armpit gap, stabbing repeatedly. Even then, the man’s struggle persisted. He gave the trio the fight for their lives.

Attempting to immobilize him, one of the trio was abruptly tossed aside, falling face-first with a spear protruding from his back. Red blood pooled around his punctured gambeson in his final spasms.

Arriving late, Hugo and his men drove the two remaining skirmishers. Roger dashed to the fallen warrior’s side and opened up his visor, only to discover a face whiter than snow.

The man grinned, wanting to say something, but blood loss kicked in and then there was only silence.

“Leave him,” Hugo instructed, gripping the fallen man’s discarded halberd.

Before long, the Coalition side reformed and headed into them.

“Korelians to me!” Hugo bellowed, his voice hoarse with exertion. His brothers-in-arms rushed forward, weapons gleaming. Inch by inch, they re-established their front line and the two lines at the center rejoined again.

Regardless of the blistering heat, accumulated injuries, and dwindling stamina, both sides plunged back into the fray. They thrust, swung, and stabbed with savage desperation.

Helmet-less men wore expressions of exhaustion, thirst, and defiance, while those fully armored labored under their own heated metal confines.

As casualties mounted, each side endeavored to funnel fresh troops to the front lines. This resulted in a grim spectacle as green, untested men faced battle-hardened fighters.

Pushed to their limits, the Korelians deployed their last reserves – the militia. Despite their enthusiasm, they stood little chance, with many falling as swiftly as they entered the fray.

Inexperienced combatants futilely swung at torsos and heads while seasoned fighters smashed limbs with maces and axes, rendering their enemies out of action.

The grassy battlefield turned into a grimy, slick mess of blood and human fat. The fallen became trampled, their cries lost in the chaos.

Hugo saw desperation etched in his men’s eyes. Nobody to his left and right was without injury, despite their armor. They were past their limits. Brave as they were, they were outclassed. Frantically, his gaze swept across the chaotic scene, searching for the familiar sight of Sir Justin’s banner.

On the far right, amidst the harshest clash of steel and roar of men, Sir Justin finally noticed how his left flank and center were about to crumble under pressure. Seeking to salvage what remained of his force, he issued a commanding cry, “Fallback! Fallback!”

With a heavy heart, the Korelians began to give ground.

 

***

 

Chapter 53

Moving Pieces

 

Lansius

The dense forest canopy sheltered everything beneath it, allowing only small rays of sunlight to filter through. The scent of the earth was robust, arising from layers of dry leaves on the ground. Flanked by his command staff, Lansius sat upon a tree root with a large tree at his back.

They were already partially armored and eagerly waiting for developments from the battlefield outside the forest. The place was humid, but the lingering chill from the previous night kept them cool.

The knights with their custom-made armor had good weight distribution over their bodies and limbs, minimizing discomfort.

For the past four nights, nearly two-hundred had hidden in borrowed yurts on the far side of the forest. To ensure secrecy, they restricted movement and even only allowed bonfires inside the yurts for cooking and night heating.

Speaking of cooking, Lansius realized that Audrey was eyeing his bowl.

“Umm, you’re not going to finish that?” Audrey, clad in avant-garde black plate armor, finally asked.

“No, I’m feeling full. You can have it,” Lansius offered the bowl.

Audrey accepted it readily, pulling out the half-eaten bread that had sunk into the soup, and took a bite.

They heard someone approaching, and then a figure clad in a brown cloak appeared. They recognized the man as the scout, who quickly knelt. “My Lord, one Coalition column is marching toward Marshall Hugo’s position.”

The staff burst into lively discussions, while Sir Callahan calmly updated the earthen map on the ground.

Audrey shot Lansius a sharp glance, but Lansius merely noticed crumbs around her mouth and carefully wiped them away with his hand.

Afterward, Lansius spoke with unusual calmness, “It’s time. The diversion won’t hold for long. Return to Korelia and ride south.”

Audrey placed the unfinished bowl on the ground and stood up. Her movement drew the attention of the staff.

“Sir Callahan,” Audrey addressed the older knight, who stood in response.

“Captain,” the blond knight replied.

“I entrust my Lord to you. Keep him safe.”

“I shall put my life on the line,” Sir Callahan pledged.

Their exchange was brief. Next, Lansius rose, and all eyes were on him. “Ready the men,” he gave a short command.

The staff, in turn, relayed the order to the entire camp.

Stealing a moment for himself, Lansius called Audrey in a softer tone, “Come, let me walk you to your horse.”

Preparations for battle were well underway as they walked through their forest hideout.

Finally, they reached a quiet spot. “Audrey,” he called.

She slowed down. “I figured you wanted to talk.”

“Yes, I still have great doubts about this,” he admitted.

Her expression hardened. Other people would be deterred by this, but Lansius knew that this was just her natural demeanor. Confirming his thoughts, she let out a sigh.

“I sort of understand your feelings. Sending men into harm’s way is never easy. But it’s your duty as Lord. I have mine, they have theirs, you have yours.”

"Men are going to die…. for what reason?" he calmly argued. "Half our men aren't even Korelians, they have little reason to fight. If we just retreat to Midlandia, then even the townsfolk wouldn’t need to take up arms.”

Audrey clicked her tongue. “Retreat...? My oath is to protect you, but I’ll strike you if you utter such nonsense again.”

Lansius wasn’t surprised by her reaction. He knew he shouldn’t utter nonsense like that on the eve of battle, but his conscience begged him to. “Sorry, I’ve got so many things on my mind--”

“You’re overthinking this, Lans,” she cut in. “The men under you, me, and even the people in town are fighting, not because you told us to. It’s because we want to.”

Lansius was perplexed. “But why? I may have done some small good deeds here and there, some small help, but nothing worthy-”

Unauthorized use of content: if you find this story on Amazon, report the violation.

“To us, you are worthy,” Audrey declared, exhaling deeply. “Look, I can’t put this into words. How can I explain this? You’re the smart one, ugh, why give me a headache...” she complained, scratching her head in frustration.

Her expression triggered something within him. His worries and doubts swirled together, and something snapped. He let out a chuckle, his first in a few days.

Despite Audrey giving him a funny look, Lansius couldn’t suppress it. The laughter felt too good, too freeing. He was gasping for air afterward.

“You feel better now?” she asked.

“No, I’m not okay. I’m sending my men and my loved ones into battle,” he replied, but something within felt lighter. The brooding was gone.

Audrey came closer until their breastplates clashed with a dull thud.

“Wha-?”

“Just be still.” Her hands were on the sides of his head and their lips met in a brief, heated kiss, just like their first beside the stream. Not wanting to let go, Lansius wrapped his arms around her cuirass and pulled her close. This time, he kissed her.

All that lance training paid off, as she couldn’t resist as easily. Her breath, her lips, and her tongue overwhelmed his senses.

She finally pushed him off and wiped her lips with her palm. “That should do it,” she said with a mischievous gleam in her eye.

“Do what?” he asked with a reddened face.

“Grow you a pair,” she smirked.

“You rascal,” he retorted, but that didn’t erase the grin on her face.

“Don’t die,” Lansius said as she turned away from him.

“You too, Lans. I’ll see you after the battle.” Audrey waved her hand casually and headed alone to where they had left the horses.

Later, Lansius caught a glimpse of three riders through the forest. They must have been her and her escorts. They detoured eastward before returning to the town of Korelia via the east side. In town, twenty cavalrymen were waiting for her.

 

***

 

The vivid recollections still rang in Lansius’ mind as he walked back. He instinctively licked his lips as if savoring the aftertaste.

I should propose when this is over.

Lansius made a mental note, clearing his head as he returned to the command site. There, he noticed the scout who had remained behind. He addressed them, “Good report. Get something to drink or eat.”

He then handed a silver coin to the scout. Informants were paid well in his troops.

The scout bowed and then walked proudly to his post. The stump on his left arm dangled freely.

They employed many who had lost their limbs as scouts. They joked that losing a limb made them faster and stealthier. It was good that they took pride in their work. As for Lansius, he was just glad that he could provide income for his veterans.

As Lansius sat back, the map they drew on the ground was getting updated. Now, one of the rectangle drawings which represented the Coalition column was moving closer toward Korelian’s only rectangle.



“...”

Lansius recalled that no matter how many times he had simulated this battle, Korelia didn’t have any chance to stop the Coalition’s gargantuan force.

If he waited, the Coalition would complete their siege engines, and it would be over once the castle sustained severe damage. If he chose to strike out, the Coalition's six-thousand-strong force would counter-attack, targeting both Korelia town and castle.

Even with the aid of trenches, they could hold on for a day or perhaps more, but victory seemed a distant hope. Engaging the Coalition in a conventional way would be a losing battle. Thus, Lansius had opted for a more radical approach.

He planned to hit the Coalition’s weak spot. That in itself wasn’t new or radical. What was radical was just how far he would go to make certain that he could hit his mark.

More than just a half-hearted distraction, Lansius needed substantial bait. This required a column of men, so he had pulled his force, even leaving the castle practically undefended.

Now, only two guards remained in the castle, both crippled and serving as lookouts. If it weren't for Cecile, his castle staff, the cooks, and the page boys, the castle would have been abandoned.

They manned the walls, creating the illusion of a well-defended fortress. Many of them were competent with crossbows, enough for well-aimed shots, lending credibility to the castle’s defenses, at least from a distance.

For the same reasons, Lansius had pulled most of his men out of Korelia town. Apart from Sir Justin's column, the town was only lightly defended by a mixture of crossbowmen, militia, and Audrey’s twenty cavalrymen. Presently, the trenches were manned by hastily trained militias.

Considering the length of the ditches, Lansius earnestly hoped their presence would maintain the illusion of being fully manned. If the other Coalition column attacked the trenches then his charade would be exposed.

With the castle nearly empty and only a token defense in the town, the situation was daunting. The Coalition could potentially steamroll their defenses purely by chance. Yet, deep down, Lansius was prepared to sacrifice the town if it meant securing a victory.

He was resolved, however, to make the enemy pay a high price. He had instructed his defenders to switch to urban, door-to-door fighting once the enemy column breached the trenches.

What Lansius needed was time and a diversion to keep the enemy preoccupied. This was the role of Sir Justin’s column. His forces served as bait to keep the Coalition locked in place.

Now, this exact plan was in motion, which heightened his anxiety. He personally disliked this battle plan, but he couldn't devise a viable alternative. He was stuck. His opponents were simply too well-prepared.

Crackling sounds of crushed dry leaves alerted them. Two scouts appeared. “My Lord, the Coalition column has engaged Marshal Justin’s forces-“

Murmurs and comments cut the report short.

“Not yet. The man still has things to say,” Sir Callahan rebuked the rest and motioned for the scout to report.

The scout resumed, “We saw the Coalition cavalry moving more southward than before. My Lord, we think that the Lord of Three Hills is trying to get a better view of the battle.”

“Well done,” Lansius exclaimed while clenching his fist. It was better than expected. Sir Justin’s column not only baited and locked a Coalition column but also drew their reserve away.

Everybody was looking at Lansius tensely. They knew the time had come.

“Bring out the horses,” Lansius ordered.

The command made the men scramble from their spots.

“How’s the other columns’ position?” Lansius asked the scout as the rest were preparing to sortie.

“There are no changes, My Lord.”

“Good. What else do we know about his column?” The Lord pointed to the column nearest to them on the ground map.

“My Lord, I recognize their sigils. They’re men from South Hills,” the scout said with confidence.

The second scout chimed in, “They look weak, My Lord. Not many are wearing armor. Mostly peasants with only a shield, spear, and thick clothing.”

“Levied troops. My Lord, they can be bypassed,” Sir Callahan advised.

“How about the wind?” Lansius asked the two scouts.

“The wind still blows from the south, My Lord.”

The board is set, and the pieces are in motion...

 

***

 

Chapter 54

Blue and Bronze

 

With the battle situation unfolding before them, Lord Lansius finally made his decision. He pointed at the nearest column on the drawn map on the ground. “Sir Callahan, let’s hit this column.”

“The South Hill column? My Lord, may we learn the reason?” Callahan inquired. Even though the Lord had a victory against Lord Robert last year, his inexperience remained a concern among the knights.

Although, the Marshal, had assisted the Lord in proofing the plans and their variations, there were still lingering doubts. Thus, Callahan had made it his mission to guard against any potential problem.

“We don’t need to inflict a crippling blow, just enough to cause a rupture in their seams,” Lord Lansius explained.

“But even if we successfully charge this weak column, the Black Knights will arrive quickly,” warned Callahan, noting that despite the surprise factor, they were just eighty cavalry against two-thousand. Such a disparity meant it was unlikely for them to damage, break, or rout the column.

“If we do enough damage. When the time comes, they’ll break on their own,” Lord Lansius assured him.

Callahan looked at Lansius for a second or two before nodding in response. He wasn’t wholly buying what Lansius had said, but it was good enough of a reason. Back in his youth, he had charged a column for worse reasons.

The blond knight glanced at his fellow knights, his eyes brimming with determination. His brother in arms nodded and voiced no complaints. Their trust stemmed largely from the fact that Callahan vouched for this, and that the Lord was joining them in person.

More than thirty knights and dozens of horsemen were formerly Lord Robert’s vassals. Against such a large opponent, there were risk that they could become disheartened and flee. Thus, the reason why the Lord felt compelled to lead them personally.

Without any objections from the cavalry, Lord Lansius turned his attention to his trusted ally. "Calub," he called.

The alchemist, who had been waiting patiently in a corner, perked up.

“Yes, My Lord." Calub stepped forward. As a high-ranking but non-noble among the knights, Calub wisely downplayed his importance to avoid potential friction.

“Take command of the hundred men as planned. Spread them between the glade and the opening near the entrance. If things go as planned, we might bring a large prey, and you’ll be the snare. If not, then you’ll be our shield.”

“Understood, My Lord,” Calub responded firmly.

“Sir Callahan,” the Lord called.

The blond knight stood. Even nearing fifty, he retained a captivating presence.

“Let’s ride,” the Lord gave his command.

Subsequently, Sir Callahan rallied the cavalry with vigor, “The Lord is riding with us!” His declaration set things into motion. One man wiped the map from the ground, while the rest readily mounted their horses.

Sterling had Lord Lansius’ horse ready. He helped him mount and handed him the gauntlets.

“Sterling, last chance. Forget about courage and honor. This is war. You could be crippled for life,” the Lord warned from atop his destrier. Many knew that the Lord hadn’t asked Sterling to join, but the young squire insisted on coming.

The squire’s face remained adamant. “My Lord, I shall not be a burden.”

Lansius drew a deep breath and just rode after Sir Callahan.

Behind him, Sterling in half-armor dutifully carried their lances. Carrying a lance was burdensome and an unnecessary hazard within the forest, so they wouldn’t let a Lord to have it until they reached the open field.

Only knights were in plate armor, the rest were either in half-armor, brigandines, or ringmails. The horses were also protected by barding or horse armor. The head part and some of the horses’ bodies were covered by metal plates or hardened leather. There was no uniformity, each owner acquired and equipped their steed on their own. The result made them look like a circus with plenty of colors and unique designs.

Before long, the column of cavalry reached the forest outskirts and quickly fell into formation.

“My Lord, with your permission, Sir Harold and I will ride in front,” Callahan requested.

Lord Lansius looked at the tall man who saluted with an open visor. His polished plate armor was impeccable. Sir Harold and his small band of brothers were the unofficial Midlandian reinforcements. Despite the small number, they were highly enthusiastic warriors and war aficionados who volunteered for the sheer thrill of combat.

Lansius let out a grin, finding some similarities with Anci. “It would be an honor to ride with you, Sir Harold.”

“The pleasure is mutual, My Lord,” the tall knight replied with an honest smile.

Without time to lose and with the cavalry ready, the Lord gazed at Sir Callahan. In the direct sunlight, the blond knight’s armor displayed its intricate details. The black decorative gilding and ornaments gave it the appearance of ancient ceremonial armor. However, the buffed-out scrapes and dents betrayed its use in battles.

“Sir Callahan, lead the way,” Lansius instructed as he latched his own tried and tested helmet, and gazed upon the plains that would become their battlefield.

 

***

 

Coalition Side

This story has been taken without authorization. Report any sightings.

Beneath the shade of an umbrella, Viscount Jorge witnessed the battle unfold in front of him. His heart beat faster as the Coalition column slammed into the Korelian line. “Morton, you see that? You see that?” Jorge jumped from his folded chair as he remarked excitedly.

The Lord was so proud of Arius, his most trusted cousin who personally led the attack. Meanwhile, Sir Morton, the Black Knights’ captain, merely nodded his head. He wasn’t the type to talk much.

Somehow, this seemingly mismatched master and retainer actually had good chemistry. Both men deeply respected their differences. This was quite uncommon. In the Imperium, a servant who wouldn’t lick the master’s boots was usually discarded early.

But then again, Jorge was hardly normal. So abnormal that his peers mocked him as the ‘big fool of One Hill’ behind his back. Originally, Jorge’s Viscountcies held four regions: Korimor, South Hill, Korelia, and the capital in the center.

Each castle was built on a hill, thus the capital was aptly named Three Hills. Under Jorge’s nascent rule, a branch family and another old follower had seceded.

In response, Jorge launched wars multiple times without a victory. When he won, he installed an untrustworthy individual who eventually rebelled. In the end, he gained nothing and lost even more.

The young Lord was not entirely to blame. His only fault was being naïve and idealistic. Jorge idolized the school of meritocracy. An ideal governing system where people were promoted based on their ability, not by blood relation.

However, not even the best of the Imperium lords were able to implement such a radical system. Family ties and nepotism ran deep and were central to feudalism.

Traditionally, a House placed family members in powerful positions to secure their control. When a lord promoted non-family members into high positions, envy, and political intrigue often followed. This led to distrust and contempt among his House members. Ultimately, it usually ended in a purge, assassination, or open conflict.

That very problem still haunted Jorge, whose only hope now lay with Arius. The younger cousin was respected by various factions and might be the solution to the instability. Jorge didn’t mind sharing some of his power with Arius if that would resolve the crisis.

Contrary to the myths circulating about him, Jorge wasn’t overly ambitious; he merely sought to keep the legacy of his forefather intact. All he truly desired for himself was Korelia, his birthplace.

“We’ve beaten them! They’re pushed back,” Jorge clamored excitedly as he watched Arius’ column gaining ground.

The staff cheerfully congratulated Jorge. Only Morton kept silent.

Far to their right, in another cavalry column, the Nicopolan cavalry captain was also silent. Daniella had learned that the Lord of Korelia had a keen eye for battle. However, today’s battle today was too brash even for an overconfident nobleman.

“Something bothering you, my lady?” one of her mercenary lieutenants asked.

“It’s too quiet and too stupid,” Daniella replied, and then she felt the urge to act. “Tell the scout to move further. Leave no blind spot.”

“Will do.” The rider quickly relayed the order.

Her rider barely left when cheering erupted from Jorge’s position. Daniella felt the cheering was so contrasted with what happened on the battlefield. As she could clearly see, there was no glory in the mangled and beaten bodies that littered the field.

Many of the wounded, drenched in their blood, limped and even crawled for help.

However, as a part of the nobility, she understood that for the ruling class, this brutal sight was no different from a sporting event.

Tara- taraaa!!

A different trumpet signal from the South Hill column posted on the north side caught everybody off guard. Everybody who heard it looked northward with confused expressions.

Daniella was quick to action and rode north with a few riders to get a better look. Meanwhile, Jorge stood and squinted his eyes."What’s going on? It’s one of ours, right?"

One of his staff promptly sent a scout to ascertain the situation, but it would take time, and Jorge was impatient.

“It’s likely a cavalry attack. My lord, please let me have a hundred,” Morton calmly requested. By now, they could see an unknown cavalry heading toward the northern column.

“No, we’ll move as one,” Jorge declared, clenching his fist.

Jorge's declaration drew the attention of his entire command staff.

“My lord, do you wish to attack?” Morton asked on behalf of the staff.

“Certainly, now that we know what Lansius’ intention really is, let’s not hesitate. The chance has presented itself. Let’s move out,” the young Lord commanded.

The staff readily relayed the order, and everyone mounted their horses. The squires strapped Jorge’s cuirass back on and helped him mount his horse. Spurred by the lord’s urgency, a hundred knights rode north at full gallop.

Daniella hastily rallied her Nicopolan cavalry and gave the command to follow. She still found it suspicious, but the Lord of Korelia had shown his hand, and now she could play hers.

 

***

 



 

Korelian’s Knights

Lansius clenched his right arm against his side, feeling the weight of the lance under his armpit. Even when kept at an angle, it remained heavy. The breastplate's lance rest helped reduce the burden on his right arm and hand, and stabilize the shaft while the horse trotted.

After almost two years of training, Lansius was still very much struggling not to kill himself by dropping and plunging the lance into the ground. His arm and muscles felt on fire as he wrestled against the rocking motion. Minuscule adjustments were made to keep the lance at an angle, far off the ground.

Meanwhile, his destrier continued to run like a charging buffalo. The rocking motion was anything but gentle. Weighted by the armor, on every up and down, the saddle’s hard leather punished Lansius’ loins and battered his breath.

He wanted to say he was used to this, that he was trained for this, but he couldn’t. This wasn’t something someone could get used to in a mere year and a half.

Suddenly, the horse leaped.

Oof!

They landed gracefully. It wasn’t a big jump, but the saddle smacked his butt and gut from beneath. In a trained reflex, Lansius exerted all his might to control the lance as it wobbled.

He realized that to survive this would be one of the crowning achievements of his life. Yet, he held no regrets. This was a necessity — he simply couldn't afford to sit this one out.

Understanding Lansius' inexperience, Sir Callahan and Harold, who rode in front, made small adjustments here and there to ease their Lord’s burden. Instead of having Lansius follow them, they centered the whole formation around him.

The rest of the eighty cavalry spread evenly on his left and right. Sterling and the experienced standard bearer rode beside Lansius. The banner depicted a blue shield with a single bronze chevron.

The banner was new. It was Lansius’ own. Felis had designed and sewn the coat of arms just a few days ago. She boasted it would bring good luck, and now Lansius prayed fervently that it would.

Sir Callahan and Harold picked up more speed. Lansius kept up with them and soon realized they were at full gallop. The wind screamed through every open vent in his visor. His sight was a blur.

“Close ranks!” Sir Callahan shouted from the front.

“Close ranks!” the standard bearer beside Lansius relayed the order.

They rushed the last stretch of land between them and the opponent’s formation, forming an arrow-like formation. The standard bearer moved in front of Lansius, while Sterling remained at his side.

Sir Callahan had told them that he was expecting crossbow attacks, but only a few materialized. At this range, Lansius saw that the Coalition line now looked jagged and uneven. More importantly, there was no wall of spears or pikes.

This column was supposedly two-thousand strong, but what Lansius saw was just a group of men, scarred and frightened.

By the Holy, I’m going to trample them...

His conscience screamed, but his trained instinct kept him going.

This is my plan, and I’m responsible for this. Go haunt me if you must, but judge me fairly against your lords who led you here in the first place!

He steadied his mind as the distance closed in at a frightening speed.

Sir Callahan in front lowered his lance and the rest followed. Lansius felt the numbness in his arms as he lowered his lance into position.

By now, the opposing men was in full view. Lansius saw their faces and reactions as Callahan and Harold, along with the front riders, dove into their ranks.

The screams and the horses’ beastly noises immediately filled his ears. There was no time to observe, gripping his lance tightly, Lansius made his charge.

 

***

 

Chapter 55

Charge of the Korelian Knights

 

CRACKKK!!

The sharp crack of a wooden lance shattering battled with the screams of men. The air was punched painfully and abruptly from Lansius' lungs, overwhelming his senses. Dazed, he barely registered that this was nothing like mere exercise.

His right arm and shoulder recoiled from the lance’s impact. Through the slit in his helmet, a deafening chaos was unfolding before him.

The men from South Hill clustered to Lansius’ left and right, cowered as they frantically tried to escape the horror of being trampled.

The destrier’s loud neighing alerted him. Without hesitation, Lansius tightened his lower body to signal the destrier to continue the charge.

Amid all that chaos, Lansius barely keep up with the forward element who was doing the heavy lifting. Sir Callahan and Harold, along with the front-line knights, cleared a path and bore the brunt of the enemy’s resistance, facing spears, swords, and thrown stones.

However, despite their successful charge, the enemy formation was simply too large to be routed this easily.

Behind Lansius, the rest of the Korelian Knights charged into the poorly defended South Hill column. The column's front line had buckled, taking flight from the cavalry’s entry.

As for Lansius, the adrenaline masked the lightness of his right arm. He found himself still clutching the lance, the shaft of which was gone. He dropped it and was about to draw his blade when a spear struck his left arm.

Instinct kicked in. Lansius clenched his left arm into his chest, creating multiple layers of steel, just in time as the same spear slammed again. It was uncomfortable, and panic-inducing, but nothing more.

Sensing danger, the destrier broke into a short gallop, and more screams erupted as the beast barreled forward the disarrayed formation.

Screams were also heard from behind, as Korelian cavalry followed Lansius’ lead. One of them, Sterling, was desperately closing in on his Lord. Despite being in only half-armor, he was fearless. Sterling even managed to strike down the spearman who had attacked Lansius.

The ground was littered with discarded weapons, shields, and bodies. Suddenly, an open field enveloped Lansius’ view.

His horse snorted in delight while Lansius was dazzled by the sudden change of scenery.

... I actually survived that shit?!

The serene grassy plains felt surreal in the aftermath of what he had just witnessed. A smirk formed on his lips as he clenched his fist, slamming it into his breastplate in a primal expression of victory, a release after surviving tremendous physical exertion.

The knights in front began to slow down, making a wide turn. Sir Hugo and Callahan formed up on Lansius, followed by Sterling from behind.

“Are you injured, My Lord?” Sir Harold asked after opening his visor. The man barely broke a sweat.

Lansius’ right hand was still clutching the sword since he was too shaky to sheathe it. Using his left hand, he tapped the side of his helmet and found the small latch. It was hard with the gauntlet on, but he managed to open the visor.

Regaining full peripheral vision and the ability to breathe freely was an immense joy. “I’m good,” he declared after swallowing a breath of fresh air.

Then, situational awareness kicked in. “Are we clear for another pass?”

Sir Harold and Callahan looked at the horizon and both noticed that the Coalition’s entire reserve of two-hundred cavalry was bearing down on them. Lansius noticed it too.

“One pass only, My Lord,” Sir Callahan answered.

“How many did we lose?” Lansius asked the knights while glancing at Sterling. The squire nodded in response.

“A few or none,” Sir Harold responded, after taking a quick look at their forces, which seemed intact.

“Give the signal, we’re going for another,” Lansius ordered.

Callahan grabbed his silver horn-like apparatus and blew it. Unlike Anci’s loud and clear buccina, Callahan’s was richer and deeper.

Buuu- buuuuu!!

As they reformed, the standard bearer returned to Lansius’ side and proudly hoisted the blue and bronze chevron high.

Once again, the Korelians trotted into the enemy. Nobody retained their lance, so they were at a disadvantage. But the enemy had it worse.

The South Hill column was demoralized, many were dead or injured. Worse, a large portion was distraught. Now, they noticed that the cavalry had wheeled around toward their rear. The South Hill command rushed their strongest troops to the rear, trying to reform, but it was utter chaos.

If you come across this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen from Royal Road. Please report it.

The levied element refused to cooperate. Only at the last minute did they manage to reform into thicker ranks, seven or possibly eight men deep, trying to counter the cavalry charge without risking their exposed flanks.

The Korelian Knights did nothing. Sir Callahan refused to lose time or momentum. Like an arrow loosened by the bow, they flew straight.

Lansius drew a deep breath and latched back his visor. The sound of his breath echoing inside the helmet was triggering something.

Is this PTSD...?

Tens of hours of full armor combat against Audrey had made him into either a fighter or a patient eligible for disability benefits.

Fuck it!

He cleared his mind and braced for impact. The destrier neighed as she understood by instinct what was going to happen. Following Sir Callahan’s lead, Lansius allowed his warhorse to gallop as he was without lance.

His limited vision slowly turned into a blur. He breathed deeply as the knights in front gallantly dove right into the enemy line. Despite more spears being directed at them, it wasn’t a unified wall of spears.

The South Hill's front line broke for the second time, and mayhem ensued.

“EYAAH,” Lansius yelled, ready to swing his sword, but he entered the fray without any resistance.

The opposing men scattered to the left and right. Some even stood still as if frozen, their teeth chattering while their eyes locked onto the incoming knights. Their wills had been broken.

But then, men surged from the left side as they formation contracted. Their faces were drained of blood as their panicked column squeezed them into harm’s way.

Lansius swung his sword to deter the nearest group of men. He was preoccupied with them when a poleaxe landed on his greaves. It was no more than a glancing blow, but it startled him. Before he could react, a short, frightful shriek caught his attention.

His horse had mercilessly trampled a man who stood in her way. However, Lansius barely had time to react as another man was abruptly shoved into him.

The unfortunate man came so close that Lansius ended up whacking the man’s helmet with his pommel as the space was too tight for a blade swing. The person collapsed where he stood, narrowly dodging the horse’s deadly hooves.

There was no time to breathe as a bigger threat loomed ahead. A group of well-armed men had made their way to the rear of their formation, attempting to reach the Korelian knights. Seizing their opportunity, they brandished their polearms against the cavalry, who, now without their lances, had limited means to counter.

Sir Harold and Callahan swiftly maneuvered to confront the new threat, fighting off the brandished polearms and carving a broader path for their Lord.

Behind them, Lansius, on his way out, parried their attacks with his sword and jostled the rest away with his gauntlets.

Three times the sharp edges landed on his armor. Each time, the steel’s smooth contour deflected the thrust that grazed without biting. Lansius kept squeezing his knee on his horse, signaling her to keep going while planted his feet in the stirrup to avoid falling.

Now, he noticed that the destrier ran wilder than usual, as if were injured. Being only partially armored, a wound was always possibility. However, the beast remained aggressive and didn’t seem to falter.

Just a little bit more…

As Lansius parried the last polearm brandished against him, the rest of his knights followed behind and tore through the South Hill column.

The green grassy field was within their sight.

“GAAHH!” Lansius gasped. Something had struck his back. The hard blow rattled his gut and made his head feel light. He coughed, narrowly avoiding vomiting, all the while searching for his assailant.

He craned his neck and spotted a man with a bardiche, a big axe-like blade mounted on a pole.

The bardiche wielder charged, ready for another blow but was impeded by his own frightened comrades. With a face full of scorn, he taunted Lansius. However, his helmet flew off and fresh blood spurted from the side of his head.

Sterling had swooped in from behind, delivering a fatal blow after the standard bearer had driven off two men to clear a path.

Meanwhile, Lansius had reached the open field and savored the change of scenery. Even the destrier’s breathing had calmed.

Sir Harold and Callahan formed up around him as they slowed their trot. Fresh blood coated their armors and mounts. Suddenly, Lansius felt unwell.

“My Lord, are you hurt?” Callahan asked his visor already up.

Frantically, Lansius opened his visor. He took a deep breath, as if he were drowning.

This spurred the two knights into action. Sir Harold quickly moved to Lansius’ side and tried to find the problem. “My Lord, try to take a deep breath.”

“I-it’s hard,” Lansius gasped. “My back!”

“There’s a dent. You’ve been hit, My Lord,” shouted Sterling from behind.

“Get the backplate off,” Harold urged Callahan, as he took the destrier’s rein to steady the pace.

“Do it, do it,” Lansius gave the order.

Sterling could only watch as Callahan managed to undo the latches and remove the backplate after several tries. Instantly, Lansius felt better as he breathe freely again.

Unintentionally, the absence of the backplate provided a remarkably refreshing coolness, in spite of the drenched arming doublet underneath the armor.

“The dent looked shallow, but it bent the waist part inward,” Callahan reported as they rode further.

Only then, Lansius realized he had lost his sword. Likely, when the bardiche man had hit him.

Soon, they reached a safe distance and slowed their pace. Lansius noticed several streaks and marks on Callahan’s armor, including a bolt head embedded near his shoulder that had failed to penetrate. Red smears also coated Callahan’s legs and saddle.

Seeing Lansius' gaze on the stains, Callahan quickly reassured, “It’s not my blood, My Lord.”

“Sir Harold, how about you?” Lansius inquired.

“Lost an axe and my left arm is a bit numb, but I still have my sword. I can do another pass, My Lord.”

Sir Harold’s bravado sent Lansius into a chuckle. “How many did we lose?”

“Five, maybe fewer,” Callahan replied flatly.

Lansius couldn’t suppress a smile at that result, especially when Sterling looked unharmed.

Unbelievable… This is better than my wildest prediction.

“My Lord, the Black Knights,” the standard bearer called out from the rear.

At his warning, they turned to see riders clad in black armor galloping toward them. The South Hill column had split in two, providing the Black Knights with a clear path to approach.

Although Lansius’ charge had inflicted significant damage, it clearly wasn’t enough to rout the South Hill column. With the arrival of Lord Jorge and his Black Knights, the column quickly recovered.

As Sir Callahan had predicted, this minor charge had only a small impact on the overall battle.

“Sir Harold, want to have a go at them?” Lansius jested.

“For you, My Lord, I’ll do it,” the tall knight replied with a wide smirk.

Lansius chuckled and gently signaled his destrier to pick up the pace.

Just then, Sterling called out, “My Lord, smoke!” He pointed to the east, towards where Sir Justin’s column was fighting.

Lansius glanced in that direction, then turned to Callahan. “Aim for the forest. Get us out of here!”

 

***

 

Chapter 56

Nicopolan Pursuit

 

Coalition Side

The morning sun blazed upon the battlefield. North of the Korelia plains, two cavalry units made a beeline into the forest. The Coalition was hot on the heels of the Korelians, ready to punish them for their daring surprise attack. Every move made by the Korelian cavalry was quickly mirrored by the Coalition forces.

With their lords present, both sides gave their all in this chase. Even as they entered the outskirts of the forest, dense vegetation did little to slow them down. The sunny scenery of the open plains rapidly gave way to the brown and dark green foliage of the woods, with both sides navigating the increasingly narrow paths in single file.

The Korelians began to slow down as the terrain became harder to traverse. Their horses, already tired and some injured, struggled to maintain pace. It was then that the foremost riders of the Coalition finally caught up with the Korelians’ rear guard.

They weren’t the famed Black Knights, but the Nicopolan mercenaries. With their lighter cavalry, they began their attack.

The Korelian horseman tried to fend them off, but it was simply too hard. One rider, unable to keep his balance, tumbled from his horse and was quickly taken hostage. Another, already wounded, was grabbed from behind and captured without much resistance.

At this point, the Korelian cavalry seemed destined to be overrun. However, the mercenaries' hunger for ransom proved to be a double-edged sword. Each enemy they captured slowed down the entire pursuit.

This occurred with such impunity because their commanding officer and the Black Knights, burdened by heavier armor, lagged behind. Ironically, the mercenaries' success was inadvertently aiding the Korelians. After five enemy riders were captured, the Korelians managed to gain a considerable distance from their pursuers.

In the narrowness of the forest path, the pursuit began to bog down until Daniella arrived on the scene. Taking control, she ordered her most loyal group to continue the chase. Despite being a mercenary herself, Daniella often found herself frustrated with the lack of discipline among her ranks and their penchant for taking hostages or looting at any opportunity.

With Daniella at the helm, the Nicopolans returned to the chase. They were on the verge of catching up with the Korelians' rear guard when the Korelians suddenly led them into a large glade in the middle of the forest.

Daniella initially thought little of the clearing, but then the Korelians abruptly split in two directions. Tens of her riders blindly pursued them, but Daniella's instincts sensed a trap. “Halt, halt!” she commanded, her eyes darting between the glade and the two narrow paths.

Despite her command, several riders stubbornly chased after their targets. Many more would have followed if Sir Morton hadn’t arrived and blocked the path. He too had sensed that something was amiss.

Riding up to Sir Morton, Daniella said, “I don’t trust these narrow paths, not on horses. We should send men on foot.”

The knight captain silently agreed, though for a different reason: they were venturing too far from the battlefield, thereby putting their allies behind at risk.

Following Daniella, the rest of the ranking officers gathered around Sir Morton, deliberating whether to pursue or not. Meanwhile, behind them, the sudden halt of their advance caused a bottleneck in the clearing.

Though the glade was quite large, space quickly became limited. With barely enough room for thirty horses, the area soon became overcrowded as more cavalry flooded in. Friction ensued as the horsemen jostled against each other, struggling to turn or find a spot to stop.

The mercenaries, feeling deprived of ransom and loot – their main sources of income – started to grow increasingly agitated. “Why aren’t we giving chase?” they grumbled.

“Are the men from Three Hills afraid of the woods?” another taunted.

“You dare to mock us, sellsword?” The Three Hills knights shouted back angrily. And just like that, curses filled the air. Several men needed to be restrained before drawing blood.

Despite having been allies for several years, there was little love lost between the Three Hills knights and the Korimor’s Nicopolan mercenaries.

“What’s the meaning of this?” demanded Lord Jorge, addressing the situation as he arrived, flanked by his retinue. He unlatched his visor to fully reveal his handsome face.

Nobody dared utter a word. They all knew too well that a Viscount could throw anyone into a dungeon on a whim and forget about them indefinitely.

“Morton, why are we stopping-”

Fssshh!!

Jorge’s question was cut short by the sudden sound of crossbow bolts. They rained down on them with deadly accuracy.

“Crossbowmen!” several cried in panic.

“Ambush!” others shouted as a warning.

Horses collided as their riders scrambled to hide or evade the attack. Crossbow bolts landed indiscriminately, often shattering upon impact against plate armor. Each near miss drove the riders into a greater panic.

With no place to run, the riders frantically dismounted and scrambled for cover. Those attempting to ride back found themselves trapped in a bottleneck. The return path was still clogged with the incoming cavalry, who were also under attack.

Caught in a dire situation, unable to advance or retreat, they became easy targets. Each successive salvo injured more horses, sparking a deadly rampage. More and more wounded warhorses galloped wildly, without care for their riders.

Unauthorized use: this story is on Amazon without permission from the author. Report any sightings.

These once-proud mounts had become a menace, stampeding everything in their path. Under their mighty hooves, unlucky men were trampled into bloody pulp.

One large steed, with a bolt embedded in its neck, trampled a knight and then slipped on the fallen man’s cuirass. The warhorse tumbled onto two other men, crushing them to death.

Despite the carnage, the crossbow attack did not ebb. The dry leaves on the forest floor were stained red, and the smell of blood, along with other fouler stenches, permeated the air.

All those who stubbornly clung to their horses eventually met their deaths. The last one to persist was now being dragged deeper into the forest by his maddened horse. What remained of him was the dull, muffled sound of his plate armor being thrashed around.

Amid this madness, only Morton stood unfazed, with Daniella at his side holding a kite shield to protect them both. Another Black Knight had raised a shield in defense as well, but despite their efforts, several bolts struck Morton in various spots.

Fortunately, Lord Jorge had equipped Morton with high-tier plate armor. The Centuria Steel deflected the bolts, resulting in only superficial scratches on the armor.

Behind them, a dozen frightened men huddled, using trees for cover. Meanwhile, Morton continued to recite a verse corresponding to the wind barrier that surrounded Lord Jorge. However, the barrier, due to their distance, did not extend to protect Morton himself.

The forest finally turned quiet, as all who still drew breath had successfully hidden or found cover. The pause prompted everyone to look around, trying to make sense of the situation.

Morton ceased his recitation and withdrew the barrier over his Lord. He then turned to the Coalition men who had lost their nerve. “Where’re your balls? Cowards!” he roared.

“Regroup!” he commanded, before adding, "You’re wearing plate armor. Act like it!"

A few bolts stormed toward Morton’s location, but his scathing rebuke had reached its intended recipients. The Black Knights began to regroup on foot, with the other knights clustering behind them.

Morton grabbed Daniella by the arm and guided her to a safer spot. “You lead them out. I’ll hold the rear.”

“We can fight them back on foot,” protested Daniella.

“Not against an ambush like this.”

Daniella sighed, her face glistening with sweat, and her long, brown hair disheveled. “What’s your plan?”

“Wait for my signal,” Morton replied, then hurried off to his Lord’s hideout. Daniella whistled to call her lieutenant and signaled for them to approach.

As the Coalition forces began to reorganize, the Korelians unleashed their ranged attack again. Yet, this time, the Coalition knights remained resolute. They were not fearless, but they drew confidence from their experience and trust in their gear.

As trained knights, they knew that at such a distance, potshots were unlikely to penetrate their plate armor. While some areas were vulnerable, these were small and well-hidden.

After Morton reached Lord Jorge, they, with concerted effort, successfully escorted him to the safety of a large pile of fallen trees.

Just as things were nearly under control, two mercenary groups suddenly launched a sortie, determined to flank the attackers' position.

Daniella and her lieutenant dashed to Morton and Lord Jorge’s side. “Those fools wanted to die, but they’ll buy us some time. I suggest we make our move.”

Morton glanced at his Lord, who appeared still shocked by the turn of events. “My Lord, you need to return to the open field. The best of my Black Knights and Lady Daniella’s finest will escort you,” he outlined his plan.

Lord Jorge remained silent, his face etched with sourness from the failure.

Morton continued, “I’ll keep twenty men with me to act as your rear guard.”

“Do as you wish,” Jorge responded harshly.

Unperturbed by his Lord's tone, Morton chose his lieutenant to spearhead the escort duty.

Daniella then stood, raising her shield above her head. “Korimors, Nicopolans!” she shouted with authority. “Listen to me: follow my lead and fight your way back, or face death. There is no other way!' Her voice echoed throughout the woods.

Her urging ignited a spark in the broken-willed mercenaries, stirring them into action.

Under Morton’s watchful eye, the column, led by his lieutenant and Daniella, began to carefully navigate their way out.

 

***

 

Contrary to the Coalition's expectations, the returning column faced heavy opposition on its way out. As fate would have it, the Korelians had repositioned themselves. Morton, at the rear, was only dealing with light attacks, while the newly formed vanguard was braving a hailstorm of bolts.

Daniella led the Coalition men as they trudged through the dense underbrush, no one daring to venture onto the exposed path.

Even surrounded by bushes, they offered almost no protection from steel bolt heads. Just moments ago, a knight had been struck in the backplate. The bolt hadn’t penetrated but was deflected into the man behind him. With their visors raised due to exhaustion and heat, the unfortunate man’s upper lip and everything behind it was torn.

A similar fate loomed over everyone as they made their slow escape through the forest.

After enduring a series of relentless attacks, the mercenaries were blinded by anger. Daniella knew better than to hold them back, so she directed their anger towards the silhouettes of crossbowmen that had appeared. Just like that, the Nicopolans launched another assault.

The initial stages of the counterattack seemed promising, with the mercenaries’ rallying cries echoing through the forest. Some of the Three Hills knights and their squires even joined in.

However, within a few minutes, the counterattack bogged down. Soon, they were brutally crushed, leaving only cries of agony as the mercenaries writhed with bolts embedded deeply in their limbs and bodies.

For the Korelians, their windlass and cranequin proved to be worth their weight in gold. In combination with spears and polearms, they were a lethal force.

The devastating defeat finally drained the mercenaries of their appetite for battle, causing them to shy away from danger. The dwindling number of Three Hills knights followed suit. In a desperate move, the remaining nobles used their squires, clad only in ringmail, as body shields.

Many of these squires fell, struck by direct hits or stray shots, their tight groups providing an ideal target for the crossbowmen.

It was only through sheer tenacity that the Black Knights, together with Daniella’s elite, were finally able to lead the survivors through the thickest of the attacks. Eventually, they reached larger openings in the woods.

They had passed this spot before while chasing the Korelian cavalry. It was previously empty, but now the place had been barricaded. Dozens of wooden frames bristling with spikes were aimed toward the approaching Coalition forces.

The Korelian crossbowmen who had haunted them now revealed themselves. Scores poured from the forest, reinforcing the footmen from behind. They were completely protected by the barricade. Blue and Bronze Chevron banners marked their allegiance.

The blockade wasn’t just on the road. Men with polearms and swords were also spotted waiting in the woods.

Now, it was obvious to everyone there that the Korelians were well prepared. This wasn’t a half-hearted trap.

Fear was in everyone’s mind. Without knowing the opponent’s numbers, dismounted, and exhausted, the once-mighty Coalition knights hesitated. Their situation was dire. Many simply hid away, waiting for someone to take action.

Even the Black Knight’s lieutenant was having second thoughts. Only Daniella was smiling. She had just conceded defeat to the Lord of Korelia’s strategy.

Defeating this many knights and cavalry... Turning the famed Black Knights into target practice, how ridiculous...

With their superiors either dead or lost, the mercenaries wanted none of this and split up to find another escape route. Daniella was left behind with just her trusted retinues, but she couldn’t care less.

Fewer souls to save...

The battle in the forest came to a standstill. Defeated as they were, the Black Knights and Three Hills nobles still had their numbers and armor. If forced into a showdown, in a fight to the death, every man would readily show their mettle.

Lord Jorge understood this too. Outwitted but unafraid, he stood with a sword in hand. Known as the Big Fool of One Hill he now embraced his fate with calm grace, awaiting the slow coming of his fate.

 

***

 

Chapter 57

Mage Knight

 

Coalition Side

When the expected attack never materialized, the remaining Coalition knights trapped in the forest turned their eyes to Lord Jorge, who, in response, summoned Morton for counsel. A messenger was sent to hurriedly call back the Black Knight Captain from the rear.

Sir Morton and his rear guard quickly rejoined his master. As he knelt, one of the staff members briefed him on the situation: “The enemy crossbowmen are positioned to our right, and their men-at-arms are in front of us. That leaves only the route to our left open.”

Morton nodded in acknowledgment, remaining silent as he calmly surveyed the enemy’s barricade from behind the cover of the trees.

“I know a route exists. I used to hunt here,” Lord Jorge said. “Alas, the path is narrow and treacherous. We can’t possibly proceed in armor.”

Nobody gave an answer. To escape without their horses and armor wasn’t even an option. First, they would be hard-pressed to escape Lansius’ cavalry when they reached the plains. But more importantly, to do so would get them ridiculed and shamed for the rest of their lives.

Jorge was shivering, not from fear, but from rage. His earlier composure had gone. He couldn’t believe that he had been tricked this badly.

In less than an hour, more than one hundred knights and a similar number of cavalrymen had been reduced to a mere mob. The reputation of anyone involved in this was in ruins.

With a forced smile, Jorge turned to his captain and suggested, “Morton, why don’t we just storm the blockade?”

Morton pretended he didn’t hear it. Despite the jovial tone, he knew that the young Lord was looking for a heroic death at this point. The Black Knight Captain wanted to distract his Lord, but he was too preoccupied with looking for a way out.

Just as he was assessing the situation, a sudden warning echoed through the forest. Almost instantly, several spots were engulfed in blasts of green fog.

“A green fog,” one of the squires on the lookout warned.

And then screams began to echo inside the forest. Droves of men emerged from their hiding places in complete agony.

“Alchemist! They employed an alchemist,” one of the knights cried out as they abandoned their positions in panic.

“It’s just a fog. It’s a trick, it can’t harm you,” someone attempted to reassure, to no avail, in between intense coughing and sneezing.

Several knights and mercenaries panicked, running from fear of the unknown. The rest stayed put, either unable to make a decision or just adamant to stand their ground.

The green fog spread out, its hue faded as it covered more ground, but the hope of it being less lethal proved to be wrong. The fog seeped into armor and helmets, then caused excruciating pain almost instantly.

The eyes and nostrils felt burning, but the real agony was in the throat and lungs, which felt as if filled with molten metal upon breathing.

Everyone in the area of effect either collapsed from choking or was left shriveling and writhing uncontrollably. The forest was now filled with screams and wailing.

Morton had chanted his barrier, creating a blast of wind centered around Lord Jorge. He had tried to enlarge it to cover more people, but he could only protect no larger than the size of a small hut. Before long, everyone outside of Morton’s barrier was engulfed by the green miasma.

The Black Knights knew they were being flushed out from their hiding position. In desperation, fueled by the insane pain, the best of Jorge’s knights charged through the green mist. As expected, many were greeted by a hail of bolts.

Several stumbled in their advance, with a few falling to the ground, but some reached the Korelian lines and exacted vengeance upon their adversaries. Led by their lieutenant, they swung their weapons with relentless ferocity against the Korelians’ wall of spears.

The Korelian’s formation held firm initially, but more and more Black Knights arrived and went berserk. They attacked left and right without regard for themselves. The Korelians managed to take down three more knights, yet more knights quickly surged into the gaps their comrades had created with their blood.

Another two knights, followed by ten more, joined the fight. Despite injuries and losses, they pushed the Korelians hard, forcing their opponent to withdrew behind their barricades. The knights fought on and stormed the barricades, only to suddenly burst into flames.

“The alchemist!” the lieutenant warned his comrades.

Even from a distance, Morton took notice. The green fog had dissipated, and his Lord was safe. “With me, with me!” he roared, rallying the rest of his knights.

The last of his men gathered alongside Morton and launched a fresh assault on the Korelian barricade. Bolts rained down on them from the side, but this time those were deflected away by an unseen barrier.

The barrier lasted but a few seconds, as Morton needed to strengthen his muscles. Yet that brief moment of protection was enough. With a wide, sweeping swing, Morton deflected a wave of brandished pikes aimed at him and then leaped over the barricade. Every knight had been trained in this maneuver since their days as squires, but the way Morton executed it was so effortless as if he wasn’t weighted down by his armor and weapon at all.

Without missing a beat, the Knight Captain swung his sword vertically into a man’s shoulder. The shocked victim could only kneel, his shoulder gushing blood like a fountain. Just like that, the Knight Captain created a foothold beyond the barricade.

With hearts full of pride, the Black Knights closest to Morton leaped over and fought savagely. More and more Korelians fell under the relentless slash and thrust of their weapons.

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

As the center of attention, Morton deftly blocked attacks from several opponents. When unable to block or parry, he confidently took the sharp edges with his gauntlet and pauldron. Yet, he wasn’t rendered on the defensive. He stole an opening and swung his broadsword with both hands against two men.

The large broadsword flashed through the air, and red blood sprayed as one opponent screamed, losing an arm. The other was thrown back, his ringmail severed and ribs cracked.

Fearful but enraged, four Korelians thrust their polearms in unison at Morton, but he blocked and parried with strength and stamina that was beyond belief.

Out of the blue, an object flew towards Morton. With quick reflexes, he swatted it away using the flat edge of his sword. A distinct cracking sound echoed as it burst into flames in the air. The searing heat from the airborne fireball was palpable even through the visor, halting the fighting as many cowered from the sudden inferno.

The Alchemist stared at Morton in disbelief. The Mage-Knight was as terrifying as the ancient dwarven golem he once had encountered.

The remaining Coalition poured at the barricade with renewed fervor despite heavy resistance from the Korelian crossbowmen. With the famed Sir Morton on the offensive and the effect of the green miasma wearing off without a trace, they were riding the wave.

The Korelian line was quickly turning into shambles.

 

***

 

Calub

The small clearing inside the forest had turned into a battlefield. The Korelians were desperately using their wooden barricade for defense. Their crossbowmen now fired from point-blank range, and many resorted to hatchets to defend themselves.

But as hard as they tried, it was impossible to plug the breach.

I’ve made a mistake...

Calub clutched the composite cords of his slinger. The green miasma he had launched to break the enemy’s spirit had unintentionally galvanized their resolve instead. Now, the Coalition was out for blood.

Faced with the relentless advance of the Black Knights, the Korelian line had stretched, straining to contain the enemy.

“Maester, the men won’t hold!” his lieutenant warned.

Calub didn’t need anyone to tell him what he could see for himself. The bloodied Mage Knight was advancing straight toward them. “Get the windlass guys,” he commanded.

The lieutenant immediately ran to fetch the arbalesters, but the situation was deteriorating.

Calub had no knights because Lansius didn’t want anyone to disobey Calub’s order. Now, all he had was his men-at-arms. They tried their hardest but were no match for the Black Knights, especially not against the Mage Knight.

Calub had prepared well and even expected a Mage Knight or two to make an appearance. But this one in black armor was unstoppable. Not even a fire grenade was effective.

“Maester,” his men warned as the Mage Knight roared and battled his way into their position.

Clad in only his brigandine and jacket, Calub clenched his poleaxe. “No retreat,” he said sternly to his men, who nodded nervously.

His redeployed arbalesters finally had a clear line of sight and sniped at the Mage Knight from two locations. One shot barely missed, while the other glanced and struck another Black Knight.

The Mage Knight wasn’t harmed, but the attack had bought some breathing time for Calub’s men. As the Mage Knight redeployed his barrier, he reached out for a metal flask inside his jacket.

Fire grenades wouldn’t work against that barrier, but this...

Calub's gloved fingers could feel the coldness from the special alloy.

Suddenly, a commotion was heard from the Coalition’s side.

“The enemy cavalry—” a squire shouted. He was clearly out of breath from running. “Their cavalry is on our rear!”

His high-pitched warning was heard by everyone. Both sides paused as the situation became uncertain. Suddenly, the rhythmic sound of hooves echoed through the woods, confirming what the squire had said.

The Korelians’ cavalry had returned.

Calub drew his hand back from the metal flask and shouted, “The Lord has returned. Steadfast, men! Give it everything you’ve got!” He rallied his remaining troops.

The Korelians clamored. “For Korelia! Blood for blood!”

The barricade held on.

 

***

 

The Coalition

Morton was out of time. His small contingent couldn’t afford to get flanked, especially by heavy cavalry. Any advantage they had would be undone. “Fall back,” he commanded bitterly, stepping back while maintaining his barrier.

“Fall back, I said,” he bellowed, frustrated as his men disregarded the command.

The knights grumbled but started to disengage. At this range, without their Captain’s barrier, the enemy crossbows would surely kill.

However, they were too late. The sound of splintering wood heralded the arrival of Lansius’ cavalry. Two mercenaries, stragglers who had split from the main force, were unceremoniously hurled aside, never to see daylight again. The surviving Nicopolans dashed towards the forest, desperately trying to avoid the cavalry’s lances.

More than fifty Coalition knights were still locked in combat. For some, the sudden appearance of the cavalry and their failure to break through proved too much. They began to drop their weapons and bitterly surrender.

Yet, the remaining knights fought on, haunted by the fear that the new Lord of Korelia would slaughter them instead of taking them hostage, as the outcome of the battle was yet to be decided.

Morton’s lieutenant had caught up and asked in a ragged breath, “What should we do now?”

“There’s no other way. Gather everyone with polearms and try to block the cavalry,” ordered Morton, picking a spot to make a stand.

“There’s little chance we can hold out,” the lieutenant argued.

“If the cavalry cuts us off, then everything is doomed,” Morton remarked. They needed time for the rest of their forces to disengage and flee.

The lieutenant turned from Morton and gathered everyone within sight. Only eleven answered the order. Thirsty and exhausted, only honor kept them going.

Suddenly, Jorge’s squire appeared and handed Morton his crossbow.

“You shouldn’t be here, boy,” Morton warned him.

“Eh, nobody should be here, sir,” the squire retorted wittily. The answer drew nervous chuckles from the ranks as they assumed a wall of spear formation against the cavalry. Due to their inadequate size, it looked more like a hedgehog in the middle of a dirt road.

Morton loaded his bolt, took several steps forward, and picked a target with the best-looking armor. He fired at the incoming cavalry from sixty paces away.

His bolt deflected off the foremost rider’s pauldron, but now Morton had the rider’s attention. He calmly pulled his crossbow string with just one hand as if it was a small bow.

The cavalry approached their small formation. Now, it was clear that the entire Korelian cavalry was present. This demoralized the Coalition’s side. On foot, exhausted, and greatly outnumbered, one by one, they left the Black Knight’s Captain and ran toward the forest.

Not everyone had planned to die that day, and Morton’s wall of spears crumbled. But Morton had expected this to happen. Now, only he and a few of the bravest stood unperturbed. The ground shook from thundering hooves of the incoming warhorses.

It was less than twenty paces when Morton fired his second bolt.

Thuck!!

A dull sound resonated. Morton discarded his crossbow and leaped to the side. His small line behind either fought or ducked away as the first wave of four warhorses charged through them. It was unnerving even for a seasoned knight like Morton.

He coughed from the dust, looked back, and saw that the Korelian first wave that went past them seemed unharmed. He assumed the bolt hadn’t penetrated deep enough, but the rider with the gorgeous-looking armor started to wobble and eventually fell from his horse.

There was no time for celebration as the rest of the cavalry bore down on them. Unfazed, Morton drew his broadsword.

A glance to his right revealed his lieutenant, bloodied and limping, retreating from the scene. The man had traded blows with a rider and had come out defeated. Another lay mangled on the ground, likely lanced and trampled.

He counted only five remained standing. Raising his voice, he shouted, “Their sacrifice will not be in vain!”

“To the bitter end!” his comrades, both old and young, responded as the cavalry bore down on them. The horses’ nostrils flared like those of demonic beasts and their hooves shook the ground.

Morton clenched his broadsword. Magic had enhanced his lungs, heart, and muscles, staving off exhaustion, but he knew even that had a limit.

Morton shouted his war cry in defiance and dashed to intercept another rider with impressive-looking armor. From the start, his goal was to strike one of the Korelian’s leaders, or the Lord himself.

A moment later, his sword and the rider’s lance clashed.

 

***

 

Chapter 58

Laying a Trap

 

Morton shouted defiantly and dashed forward to intercept the charging horseman. The lance aimed straight at him, he parried it with all his strength. The mage knight’s amplified strength enabled him to deflect the force of the lance thrust, but he almost lost his footing.

He recoiled as his momentum wasn’t enough to counter the combined weight of the warhorse and its rider. The mounted knight, lance still unbroken, passed by just inches away. Their gaze met.

Morton had created an opening. He regained his stance, advanced one step forward, planted his foot firmly, and swung his broadsword. The rider was perched too high on the warhorse, so Morton directed his attack at the horse’s neck instead.

The horse’s barding protected the beast’s neck, but the impact was more than it could handle. The horse reared, panicking wildly, and luckily veered off instead of trampling Morton. He knew he had won this gamble and stepped away.

His arms and shoulder felt like they were about to burst, but that was only to be expected. Such an impact would’ve ripped muscle from bone and dislocated joints in a normal man. But the Mage Knight survived with only a nasty cramp.

The second pair of warhorse and rider rushed toward Morton. He readied himself once more. Behind him, his previous opponent had already crashed to the ground.

The incoming rider was without a lance but brandished a sword. Anticipating the rider’s move, Morton crouched low at the last moment and dashed forward, aiming his broadsword at the horse’s front leg.

Seeing Morton went low, the rider instinctively swung his sword toward Morton’s head. The blow landed squarely, causing the top of Morton’s helmet to cave in.

Reeling from the impact, Morton lost his balance and narrowly avoided the panicked horse. Dazed, he discarded his helmet and the padding within. Blood trickled down his face.

He glanced towards the rider who had struck him, only to find the person had crashed to the ground, his leg trapped beneath his own bloodied horse.

The mage knight took a step back and surveyed his surroundings. With blood streaming down his face, he observed the last of his comrades either falling or retreating. The situation was hopeless. He alone couldn’t hold off ten cavalrymen, let alone several dozen.

The next horseman had spotted him. Initially, they approached cautiously, having seen several riders fell, but now they were out for blood.

Morton knew he could do no more but to retreat. As the next riders charged and tried to trample him, Morton jumped, and rolled in the dirt. His hair became disheveled and covered in dirt and leaves.

Clutching his sword tightly, he ran toward the trees.

“You’re not going anywhere!” a cold voice came from behind.

Morton glanced back and immediately raised both of his arms to block the stones thrown at him. His gauntlets protected his hands, but dirt got into his eyes. A moment of carelessness had blinded him.

A knight charged at Morton and lashed out with a blindingly fast horizontal slash.

The Mage knight used magic to force his eyes open. He reacted just in time to block the sword aimed at him, but the force was so great that even with his enhanced strength, the blade slammed into his left elbow.

“Guh,” Morton groaned as he was thrown to the side. The tall knight gave him no time to breathe, relentlessly lashing out with consecutive slashes and thrusts.

The mage knight was hard-pressed; the man fought like a wounded bear and could almost match his strength. Almost. After parrying the last attack, Morton blasted a concentrated jet of wind into the knight’s helmet. As if anticipating the attack, the knight protected his face with his left hand while swinging his broadsword with the other.

“Hrrah!” Morton slammed his opponent’s blade hard, trying to create an opening, but the knight reacted by taking several steps back. Afterward, like a whirlwind, the knight charged again with a thrust.

Morton blocked the thrust, but the knight followed up with a left punch that grazed the mage knight’s cheek. Instead of keeping their distance, Morton used his enhanced physique and head-butted the knight’s helmet with his bare forehead.

The knight staggered but managed to let out a chuckle. “What a fun fight. Against a freak, that is.”

“You’re not doing too badly yourself, for a nameless Midlandian amateur,” Morton retorted viciously.

“It’s Harold, you piece of elven shit!” And just like that, the two ramped up their tempo. They traded blows, grappled, and landed heavy smashes on each other.

Harold landed a solid left-handed hammer fist against Morton’s jaw. But the mage knight smashed his pommel hard on Harold’s hip.

The knight staggered back. There was no penetration through the plate, but his entire left leg was numb.

For the first time, Morton could look at his surroundings, saw more Korelians closing in, and decided to flee.

“Oi, woman, I’m not finished!” Harold taunted.

“You’re too drunk, amateurs should drink in moderation,” Morton quipped as he trekked south. Soon, the dense trees shielded him from sight. He regretted pulling out his head’s padding, as he could have used the linen to bandage the wound on his head.

Watching the mage knight disappear from sight, Harold just dropped to the mossy ground, opened his visor, and took in a big breath of fresh air. He had just fought toe to toe with a mage knight and his entire body was exhausted. However, his heart was full of pride.

This tale has been unlawfully lifted without the author's consent. Report any appearances on Amazon.

To fight against a Mage Knight and survive was such a rare feat, and he had just added that accomplishment to his repertoire. All the mock training and the theories on how to fight against a mage knight had paid off.

As for the mage knight. he continued south and started to find some of his wounded comrades, including his lieutenant and the squire. Without saying a word, he helped carry the lieutenant, and they retreated deeper into the forest.

⠀

***

⠀

Lansius

The Korelian cavalry came to a halt as the last of the Coalition around the barricade surrendered. Unwilling to allow their enemy time to regroup, Lansius ordered his cavalry to dismount and quickly form a hunting net.

Lansius had started the day with a brilliant charge, but now his meticulously planned ambush was costing him dearly. So many were wounded, so many were lost.

The nature of war is unpredictable.

He lamented, but instead of hardening his heart, Lansius simply turned off his emotions. A mechanism he had subconsciously learned. Yet that didn’t numb the throbbing pain in his left wrist from the fall.

“The men are ready,” reported Sir Harold, kneeling as his Lord was sitting on the ground with his back against a tree. The knight had volunteered to lead the hunt, as no one else in command was in shape.

“Fan out, form a hunting net, but don’t spread too thin. Approach carefully,” Lansius emphasized the last part.

“Understood,” the knight responded, and then in a lower voice, “But what do you wish to do with the Lord of the Three Hills?”

“I’ll accompany you. We’ll play this by ear,” Lansius said as another knight’s squire brought him a piece of cloth for an arm sling.

Harold nodded while watching his Lord attempt to wear the arm sling.

“Do I need to wear this?” asked Lansius.

“You’ll have to, My Lord. The gauntlet will hold the bones, but it’ll get painful once you start moving around and riding.” Harold couldn’t suppress a smile.

His smile piqued Lansius’ interest, and he asked bluntly, “Have I done well as a leader?”

“You’ve fought bravely, My Lord. For someone with little experience, you’ve made us proud. Just a little unfortunate to stumble into a mage knight.”

Lansius nodded, trying to decipher if the praise was genuine or simply flattery.

“You asked for me, My Lord?” The standard bearer arrived.

“Indeed, I need a herald,” said Lansius.

“Of course. What will be your message?” the standard bearer asked.

 

***

 

The Coalition

Quietly, the remaining Coalition knights and squires watched and waited from afar as the Korelians fanned out and moved inside the forest.

Fate seemed to conspire against the Coalition, as their scouts couldn’t find any alternative route out. After all, it had been many years since Lord Jorge last hunted in this forest. His loyal retinue from that era had all perished in the ensuing power struggle.

At this moment, Lord Jorge was taking shelter deep within the forest, with Morton at his side, attempting to organize a final stand. Their numbers had dwindled to less than thirty as the rest of their forces had scattered. Meanwhile, the Korelians probably had a hundred.

They could see Lansius’ men drawing near, but oddly, there was no longer any hesitation. The Coalition patiently awaited the finale.

The upcoming fight was destined to be brutal, and everyone was determined to give their best. For many, their determination stemmed from a lack of trust in the new Lord of Korelia, an unknown foreigner. No knight would gamble on this man’s benevolence or mercy.

For others, it was a matter of logic. The Coalition still had six thousand men just outside the forest. If they survived this forest ambush, then the war was still within their grasp. Even without the cavalry, the Coalition only needed to wait for the catapults to be completed. This thought kept them spirited.

Time passed as the rustling noise approached. Everyone crouched to lower their silhouettes. The smell of decomposing leaves filled the air. Their clothing stuck to their skin as heat and humidity pervaded the environment.

By now, many knights clung to their daggers, having lost their primary and secondary weapons. Yet, fear was absent from their faces. As the old saying goes: a cornered beast is the most dangerous.

This time, the Coalition was prepared. Many even covered their noses and mouths with cloth against possible green fog attacks. However, just as they steeled their resolve, a shout came from the Korelians’ side.

“We’ve come to parley.” The Korelian herald repeated twice as their advance halted.

Immediately, the faces of the Coalition men softened. Even full of suspicion, the word ‘parley’ had its intended effect.

Morton looked at his Lord, whose brown eyes were lost in thought. Catching Morton’s glance, Jorge nodded approvingly.

The Black Knight captain donned a helmet his squire had found for him. It wasn’t a fit, but it would cover his bandaged head. He then stood up and shouted, “We will neither yield nor be taken hostage!”

Morton’s voice was clear and powerful, surprising both friends and foes.

“We do not intend to, Sir, unless forced,” came the reply.

“What’s your offer?” Morton asked.

“Cease fighting. My Lord declares that he has no quarrel with the Lord of Three Hills. He believes that Lord Jorge was provoked to attack Korelia... The two Houses can still make amends.”

“... There will be amends if you let us return to our camp unharmed,” Morton responded without consulting anyone. Politics be damned, he thought. This was a good opportunity to save his Lord’s skin.

“Swear an oath,” the herald retorted after a brief hesitation.

Morton glanced at his Lord, who took a deep breath. Without needing a signal, Morton chanted his verses and a barrier of air and water vapor took shape. It was transparent, akin to looking through solid glass.

Lord Jorge finally stepped forward, his squire ready with a shield in front, Morton by his side.

“I, Viscount Jorge of Three Hills, Protector of Korimor and South Hills, hereby pledge my neutrality in this conflict,” he announced formally with a voice amplified by magic. “Let there be amends between our Houses.”

Jorge had wanted to say more, but his staff was whispering to him that fewer promises were better to minimize political fallout.

A pause followed before the Korelians blew their horns. Then the Korelians slowly withdrew from the surrounding area.

Witnessing this, the remaining Coalition could finally exhale. They knew they almost had it. Although they didn’t like it, they owed their skin to the opponent’s mercy, or stupidity. For some reason, the Lord of Korelia had given them a free pass.

Despite the oath, Lord Jorge’s words could easily be disowned. Even if the Lord himself would honor it, he could simply sit in his tent and let Lord Omin win the siege for him. While the recapitulation would be messy, that was preferable to losing the campaign.

With that on their mind, the surviving knights regrouped and began their trek through the forest. They dared not use the main path, deeming the Lord of Korelia untrustworthy. After a thorough search, someone stumbled upon an old dried-up stream.

The rocky path was treacherous, but it was open, with fewer trees in the way. The Three Hills Knights and their remaining allies moved slowly in their heavy armor. Those who still had horses guided their mounts carefully.

Moss quickly became a problem. Unperturbed for decades, if not centuries, the thick layers of green carpets were tricky to traverse.

Tired men were bound to slip, and many fell unceremoniously. Thankfully, the thick padding under their armor provided a good cushion against impact.

As they navigated the terrain, the forest began to thin. For the first time, they could see the plains. The few horses they still possessed also seemed excited, their nostrils flaring at the sight of the open land.

Renewed in spirit, they traversed the final leg of their escape. However, as the first group exited the forest, their hope quickly vanished.

Gasps rang out as they saw what happened outside the forest.

“This, this cannot be!” one of the knights exclaimed.

Nobody had an answer. They only exchanged looks of disbelief.

 

***

 

Warning: Heavy Chapter!

Chapter 59

Waning Blood

 

Korelia Plains

The skirmish between Sir Arius’ column and Korelia had ended. The fight only lasted less than an hour, but it was hard fought. However, it ended inconclusively after the Korelia side resorted to fire tactics to disengage.

Against the dried summer grass, fire grenades worked wonders to create a fire barrier between them. With fire roaring, both columns withdrew to lick their wounds.

The inconclusive result didn’t prevent the Coalition from claiming it as their victory. Sir Arius was paraded by his knights in celebration as they returned to their main formation.

Sir Arius’ victory stabilized the South Hills column in the north, which had endured casualties from Lansius’ surprise cavalry attack. Now they stood in formation with renewed spirit.

They had beaten back the Korelian column and survived the surprise attack. There was nothing else their opponent could do.

Things had very much turned in the Coalition’s favor once again. Even the fire that the Korelian had started didn’t last. The blaze smoldered once the strong southern wind blew them into the foot of the hill.

With the fire settled, if they wanted, the Coalition could launch another assault, but that was probably what the enemy had wanted. So, Arius calmed his staff and simply waited for the enemy to make a wrong move.

The young leader knew he had won enough to boost their morale, and it was risky to ask for more.

Out here in the field, the result of Korelia’s ambush in the forest remained unknown. While it was decisive, the Korelian side had committed almost all their forces. What remained at their disposal was only Audrey’s twenty light cavalry and the questionable nomadic cavalry.

Meanwhile, the strength of the Coalition was still at 5,800 men. The Korelian charge had only dented their numbers.

On paper, with such a big disparity in numbers, Korelia’s light cavalry wouldn’t stand a chance. Especially against Korimor’s troops, which were still fresh, ready, and willing.

The birds of prey had arrived in droves, smelling meat on the battlefield. No longer circling in the sky, they had busied themselves engorging the abundance of carrion.

Propelled by this sorry sight, men from both sides had volunteered to retrieve their own dead. However, with both sides armed with crossbows, there was a real risk and danger involved.

Midday was yet to come, but hundreds had already paid the ultimate price. Once again, the southern wind blew fiercely toward the Korelia plains.

 

***

 

Lansius

Several men, including Sir Harold, helped Lansius mount his horse. The destrier was lucky to only be bruised and not injured. Her mood seemed to improve once Lansius was back in the saddle. “Easy girl, easy...”

She had thrown Lansius in panic, but could hardly be blamed. Who would’ve thought that a mage-knight would be blocking their way?

Some bad luck...

Stinging pain still lingered from Lansius’ nose and lips. Despite the thick padding on his helmet, both were bloodied from the fall. But they were considered cosmetic damage. The real pain came from his left wrist. Even in a sling, it throbbed.

Using his hips, Lansius gently spurred the destrier forward, and his cavalry, watching their Lord, also moved out, planning to return to the open fields.

There was no hurry in their movement. Lansius was using the sun to his advantage, keeping the enemy waiting under the direct summer sun in full armor, a tactic that was beneficial to his side. Thus, he purposely kept his pace slow.

This slow pace also allowed information to reach them; his scouts had reached out and reported the conditions outside the forest.

“How’s the battle between Sir Justin and the Coalition?” asked Lansius.

“The battle is over, My Lord. We saw fire, and both sides retreated,” replied the scouts as they walked.

Lansius nodded. “Any changes in the Coalition’s formation in the field?”

“Nothing changed, My Lord.”

“They’re quite stubborn,” commented Sir Harold, Lansius’ temporary cavalry commander.

Lansius gathered his thoughts for a moment before saying to the scout, “Get some rest, but tell your men to keep watch around Calub’s position and the hostages. I want no surprises.”

“Understood, My Lord.” The scout then ran toward the forest to inform his men.

The cavalry continued their march. After the mage knight debacle, Harold had put more men to protect their Lord.

“My Lord, not to be nosy, but may I ask you a question?” said Sir Harold as they had time to kill.

Lansius nodded, so the knight continued, “Why don’t you just capture Lord Jorge?”

Lansius drew a deep breath. Since Harold wasn’t a member of the council, he hadn't been briefed on the full plan. “There are several reasons, but mainly, if we captured Lord Jorge, then the rest of the Coalition would fall under Lord Omin. And I don’t want them to be united,” he explained.

“Could such things happen? Won’t the Three Hills and South Hill simply back down?”

“Normally, that should happen,” said Lansius. “However, Lord Jorge’s reputation is so bad that their own nobles might use this opportunity to replace him. And I don't want to give them the pretext to do it.”

Sir Harold nodded; he had never thought about it.

“There’s also another reason.” Lansius continued, “Whether we capture Lord Jorge or not, it won’t affect our victory. It’s just a secondary long-term goal.”

Harold’s sharp eyes squinted while his lips grinned, hearing such an absurd claim. “The Lord of Three Hills is a secondary goal?”

Lansius nodded without hesitation. “For Korelia, the perfect victory is not about just defeating the enemy, but also forging a new alliance. For that to happen, I need Lord Jorge’s trust. That’s why I let him go, for now.”

“For now?”

Lansius looked at Harold and said, “Before this day is over, I reckon we’ll meet with Lord Jorge again.”

“That’s a bold statement, My Lord.”

Lansius nodded but didn't give a comment.

The sunlight on the far end signaled that they were getting closer to the open plains. With a wave of his hand, Harold signaled two knights to move ahead as the vanguard.

 

***

The tale has been taken without authorization; if you see it on Amazon, report the incident.

 

Calub

The alchemist winced as he tended to his wounded right arm. Despite the protection of his ringmail sleeves, the axe attack had left a painful laceration. He loathed to admit it, but his insistence on joining the fight almost got him killed.

His days working as a treasurer had dulled his skills. No longer did he possess the sharp reactions and instincts of his past. Worse, his sword and spear play had rusted.

However, in retrospect, nobody was in the wrong. As planned, they had subjected the Coalition to a barrage of continuous crossbow attacks from the glade and into the barricade.

Thus, everybody expected the opponent to be weary and disorganized. Instead, the Black Knights fought like possessed monsters.

Calub let out a sigh.

Just like in the dwarven catacombs, things in battles are nigh unpredictable.

Despite serious setbacks, the fact that they could still complete the ambush proved just how solid Lansius’ plan truly was. For that, Calub was grateful.

Right now, he was leading a small detachment to act as rear guard. Meanwhile, the rest of his men, all with wounds of varying degrees, were preparing to return to their yurts.

With their original mission completed, the men were tasked with picking up the wounded and carrying them to their camp. There were also hostages to be attended to.

Earlier, Calub had met with Lord Lansius, who, despite his injuries, insisted on riding with the cavalry. During their exchange, Calub had kept his wound hidden. He didn’t want to add to Lansius’ worries - the Lord was already burdened with concerns, and the battle was far from over.

“Erggh...” Calub grimaced as he tightened the cloth he used as a makeshift bandage.

Nearby, his men were preparing makeshift stretchers for Sterling, whose leg had been crushed when his horse fell on him. Sterling fell unconscious not long after they freed him from the dying horse. The poor beast was in pain and shock until the standard bearer put him down as painlessly as he could.

As Lansius had instructed, Calub had done everything in his power to treat the squire. Now, it was up to Sterling’s own body.

“Remember, no bloodletting under any circumstances,” Calub instructed his men, who would carry the stretchers.

The men dutifully nodded and continued to work in silence.

“Master Calub,” someone called urgently from behind him.

“Yes, what do you need?” Calub turned to face the speaker. It was one of his lieutenants.

“Master, it’s Sir Callahan. He’s…”

From the lieutenant’s tone, Calub understood the situation. He patted the man’s shoulder and spoke, “Where is he? Show me the way.”

Calub followed the lieutenant to a place not far from the barricade. There, Sir Callahan was lying on the ground, his head resting upon a tree root. His discarded helmet was by his side. There were spots of red on the mossy ground. It was clear that the man had vomited blood.

Callahan’s eyes were bloodshot, but his face was as pale as snow. The cause was easy to find: a crossbow bolt was embedded deeply into his breastplate.

“Don’t worry, Sir Callahan. The alchemist is here. I’ll patch you up,” Calub knelt and said in an upbeat tone, but they both knew the situation was grave. There was no red potion or instant healing. Even magic would take hours, if not days, to regenerate tissue. A burst artery or punctured organ was a death sentence.

“Don’t give me false hope, Maester Calub,” Callahan answered in between pained grimaces. Each breath was a painful struggle. His face was strained, and his hands began to tremble.

Calub removed his gloves and then Callahan’s gauntlets before holding his hands firmly. The ex-explorer had parted with numerous colleagues and holding their hands felt natural.

As their hand touched, the man’s strained expression quickly softened. “Maester, I can feel it. It’s near...”

“Is there anything I can do? Perhaps a painkiller potion?” Calub asked gently.

“Save it for the wounded, Master. It’s useless for the dead.” Callahan managed a jest despite his pain. The joke must have strained him, as he vomited blood afterward.

Calub quickly assisted him, turning him to the side so as not to obstruct his airway. Afterward, the weakened Callahan half-whispered to Calub. “My daughters, Cecile and Claire are the last of my House... Promise me you’ll look after them.”

Those words surprised Calub. “Sir Callahan, what are you saying? I can’t do that. I’ll promise to help-”

“Maester… you must... I cannot trust anyone else-” Callahan’s voice was growing fainter.

Calub could only listen with mixed feelings.

“I had hoped… Lord Lansius, but… with so many noble ladies around... I fear even as a concubine, Cecile won’t—” He restrained a cough, but some blood escaped. “Calub, you’re my last hope.”

“Please, Callahan. There must be a better candidate. Can’t you see my dark skin? I’m of Tarracan descent,” Calub pleaded.

Callahan just smiled. He knew Calub was worried about bloodline and all. "Blond is just a color... it doesn’t make me a better husband,” Callahan’s breath was getting shorter, and he involuntarily tightened his grip on Calub’s hand.

Calub’s heart was in turmoil. He had barely known Callahan. Despite his friendship with Lord Lansius, he was a non-noble and an outsider. A tool or instrument to be used and then shipped back home.

But now Callahan wanted to entrust his daughter to him. The girl was so bright, so unique, that Calub felt unworthy.

“Take Cecile as a concubine if you wish… as the Lord’s confidant, you’ll ascend high—“ Callahan paused as he gasped for air. “... promise me, you’ll never cast her aside.“

Calub couldn’t react but tried his best to comfort Callahan. But the man’s eyes lost focus and wandered into the distance.

“... even if she’s not to your liking—“ Callahan’s body jerked slightly. He had things to say to Claire, his youngest, but his strength faded away.

“...do …not …” His word trailed off, unfinished.

“I promise, Callahan, I promise,” Calub said, tears welling in his eyes.

Under the shade from the tall costard tree, Callahan’s breathing finally stopped. There was no longer strength in his grip. Pain no longer troubled the blond knight, whose eyes were now fixed on the sky. A faint smile touched his lips.

The lieutenant and anyone in the vicinity wiped tears from their faces. All who passed the place knelt and touched the fallen knight’s armor in a final gesture of respect.

As the knight who had successfully led the merchant caravan from Midlandia, and organized a refugee in his estate, Sir Callahan was respected and well-liked.

Calub closed the knight’s eyes. With that, the long lineage of House Callahan that stretched back into the second millennium came to an end. The knight’s great-great-grandfather had been a King in the north. Now, the unbroken line from father to son finally ended.

Just as foretold, the northern blood would wane in the south.

 

***

 

Lansius

An abrupt, cool wind blew over Lansius, causing the surrounding trees to whisper soothingly. It was pleasant enough that for a moment, Lansius forgot about his pained wrist.

“If I may, another question, My Lord,” Sir Harold asked again.

Since conversation put Lansius’ mind at ease, he agreed. “Speak.”

“Many are curious. Why haven’t you deployed Batu and his brethren?” asked Harold.

Lansius mulled for a moment. “Just how far can I trust you, Sir Harold?”

The knight tapped his breastplate twice proudly and said, “I may not look the part, but I never spill anyone’s secret. Not even when I’m drunk, because, after a bottle, it’s all gibberish.”

Despite his throbbing pain, Lansius chuckled at Harold’s answer. “You’ll be the only one to hear about this. So if this leaks out, then it’s on your head.”

The knight grinned. “I feel a bit threatened, My Lord, but also honored.”

Lansius motioned him to get closer, so Harold leaned closer as they rode side by side.

"Since you wished to know,” he whispered. “Frankly, I don’t want the nomads to contribute greatly to this war."

Harold knitted his brows. “Knowing you, My Lord, I doubt this is about honor or glory. So why?"

"If the nomads were to contribute significantly, everyone in Lowlandia would crave their assistance. I trust Batu as our ally this year, but what about in several years' time? Can we guarantee their loyalty?"

Harold began to comprehend his Lord’s line of thought.

Lansius continued, "Sadly, anyone, even tribesmen, are easy to be manipulated. Meanwhile, Korelia is naturally poor... Do you think the nomads would turn down offers of supplies and riches from the other Lords?"

“No, My Lord, that would be naïve,” Harold responded.

Lansius nodded slightly. He recalled how the Great Jin dynasty's poor handling of the Mongol issue eventually led to the rise of Genghis Khan.

He had planned a role for the nomads, but nothing that would thrust them into the limelight.

Harold still had lingering doubts. “But, My Lord, we’re at war with an uncertain outcome. Is it wise to hold back?”

"Hold back?" Lansius smiled as if amused.

"Many even expected you to unleash the nomads to raid the western army on their march."

"That's foolish." Lansius shook his head. "Tell me, Sir Harold, do you show your cards before the showdown at the gambling table?"

The knight unconsciously rubbed his chin. "Are you implying that the nomads are your ace card, My Lord?"

"Indeed. They're our reserve, and I can't afford to employ them recklessly. They're also the only hand unknown to the enemy."

"But, wouldn't a raid be beneficial to us?"

"Such a strategy would gain us little. It might delay the Coalition's arrival by two or three days, but a full day of rest would easily remedy that... Moreover, it would make them more cautious, which could jeopardize our ambush."

Sir Harold nodded deeply. Only now did he truly grasp the reasoning behind his Lord's actions.

"Only an overconfident man rushes towards a trap. That's what we need," explained Lansius. "To achieve that, Korelia needs to appear weak, insignificant, and non-threatening. Deploying the nomads would shatter the western Lords' illusion."

Intrigued, the knight asked, "So, can we win without deploying the nomads?"

"They'll have their roles, but right now, I am certain that we can achieve decisive victory without relying on them."

The revelation sent Sir Harold into a grin. “Now, I got to see just how Captain Audrey can win against six thousand with just twenty cavalrymen.”

“You’ll see. Unless the Ancients hate me or something... The conditions are all set,” said Lansius as they rode toward the open plains.

“But why go to this length for the nomads, My Lord?”

Lansius momentarily pondered before admitting, “I want more... I want Batu and his tribe as my strength. I refuse to let them become Lowlandia’s newest mercenaries for hire.”

Harold's eyes narrowed in thought. The answer reminded him of his masters, who had taught him sword and fencing styles. They, too, often approached things differently, finding unexpected solutions from new perspectives.

He felt the same way about Lord Lansius. The manner in which he not only foresaw a future problem but also used it to empower himself served as a reminder that he was more than an ordinary noble.

While Lansius felt he was merely providing answers, Harold was deeply impressed. The responses had satisfied his hunger for perfection. Under such a lord, he felt he would have the opportunity to refine his skills as a knight and fighter.

As they left the forest area behind, the summer sun shone down upon them. The knights and the standard bearer rode up to Lord Lansius and Harold's side.

"Carry on," Lansius ordered, "let's show them some of our magic tricks."

 

***

 

Chapter 60

Coup de Grace

 

Drunken with Sir Arius’ recent victory on the fields of Korelia, the Coalition gave little thought to Viscount Jorge’s and the cavalry’s whereabouts. Many assumed that the news of another victory was just around the corner. Things were looking promising, and discipline was relaxed.

When dozens of cavalrymen emerged from the forest, the South Hill column cheered for them, believing this to be Lord Jorge’s triumphant return. But their hearts fell when they saw the dreadful Blue and Bronze Chevron heraldry on the battle standard.

Panic set in as the captains flocked to their commander, asking for instructions. Meanwhile, riders were dispatched to the other columns, warning them of the unsettling development.

As for the South Hill men, still shaken by the previous two charges, they could hardly stomach another round. In a flash of inspiration, one of the nobles shouted that the Korelian cavalry was simply evading pursuit, and the Black Knights were hot on their tails.

This gave them a semblance of hope and allowed the column to function. However, that illusion was shattered when the Korelians paraded black helmets and pieces of black armor atop their lances.

This was the Lord of Korelia's magic trick: to make two-hundred cavalrymen disappear after entering the forest.

Now, the parading Korelians threw fresh taunts and mockery at their opponents, further demoralizing the column.

Yet, the South Hill men persisted. Another charge was probably needed to break them, yet Lansius didn’t see the need to do so. A parade was all he had instructed his knights to do.

After all, what Lansius wanted now was the Coalition’s undivided attention to him. That way, Audrey in the south could roam free.

For Lansius, after the ambush and the elimination of the Coalition’s cavalry, the war was largely over. What was left was simply cleanup and tying up loose ends.

While close to six thousand men were still standing in the field, to him, the best they could do was make noise before their eventual defeat.

 

***

 

Audrey, Korelia Town, Southern Gate

Lady Felis knotted three strands of her golden hair into Audrey’s headband. “I wish you the greatest of luck,” said the lady as she completed the knot.

“Gratitude, Lady Felis,” Audrey replied with a smile. She then donned her helmet, looked at her men, and gave her command. “Open the gates!”

“OPEN THE GATES!” the men echoed her order and swung the sturdy southern gate open.

The two friends exchanged a glance, conveying much without words. They had only met several times before Korelia but had quickly become fast friends.

Felis’ naturally bubbly, happy-go-lucky, and largely carefree personality matched well with Audrey’s daredevil style. More than that, Audrey’s sharp instincts told her subconsciously that Felis was someone she could trust, even more so than Hannei who had saved her life.

“Be safe,” the blonde said.

“I’ll see you soon,” the brunette replied, and then gallantly rode her horse toward the southern gate.

Cheering erupted from the townsfolk as the twenty cavalrymen rode out.

Once outside the city, Audrey led her cavalry westward. This late in the fight, their presence and intentions were hidden from the enemy, and they aimed to capitalize on that aspect.

Even if someone spotted them, there was a little risk at this point. The Lord was holding a parade to the north to draw the attention of the Western Lords. It was also Audrey’s cue to sortie.

With only twenty riders, they certainly weren’t going to charge into a column of two-thousand men. Clad in only their brigandines, or ringmails, they couldn’t even come close to replicating what Lansius had done with his knights.

Among them, only Audrey was furnished in her black gothic plate armor. However, this arrangement wasn’t accidental. Speed was commanded to them.

Lord Lansius had purposely instructed them to ride light. Only two riders carried lances. Everyone else carried torches.

Led by an experienced scout with a dog in his lap, these twenty riders weren’t interested in charging a column.

Audrey and her riders slowed down as they reached the first spot, confirmed by the scout’s dog.

The lady in black smiled at the cute little creature before turning to her men, her expression turning serious. “Burn all the caches. Let’s make a big pyre for this wretched Western Lords’ army!”

Every battle is won before it is ever fought.

Even if Lansius' cavalry charge had failed, even if he hadn't been able to bait Lord Jorge, he would have won this battle through fire tactics alone. Failure would only have meant more casualties on the opposing side and not a complete victory for Korelia.

 

***

 

Baron Omin

Facing the city to the south, Baron Omin commanded a fresh column of two-thousand men. Because of the distances, he was unaware of Lansius’ parade to the north and thus content to play his part in the siege.

A veteran of several battles, Omin held command under a large umbrella, offering protection from the summer heat. From there, he periodically sent out scouts, rotated his troops, and listened to reports.

Nothing had piqued his interest until a scout reported movement to the south.

If you encounter this narrative on Amazon, note that it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

“Cavalry to the south, you say?” Baron Omin craned his neck in that direction, frowning when he saw nothing from his seat.

“Yes, My Lord. A small group, galloping without a banner or colors.”

“How the hell-“ one of his staff began, grimacing. No one had assumed that Lansius still had another cavalry at his disposal, and they were the closest to this new threat.

“Not now! Get the captains and form a square formation,” Omin ordered his staff, who sprang into action.

Omin, too, was surprised but concealed it well.

What are these Korelians thinking? They’ve launched reckless charges against the northern column. Surely, they put all their cavalry on that charge to even have a chance of success?

Despite pondering further, Omin couldn’t fathom why the Korelians had split their cavalry. He put that thought aside as he watched his troops assume a square formation.

Though this formation was naturally slower to move and lacked concentrated strength, it offered protection on all flanks.

“So, where are they?” Omin asked the returning scout from atop his horse.

“My Lord, the Korelian cavalry doesn’t seem to be heading here,” the scout reported, doubt evident on his face.

Omin sensed something was wrong. In a spur of the moment, he pulled on his horse’s reins and rode southward, willing to take more risks to learn the Korelians’ intentions.

Eleven riders followed Omin. They had no more horsemen available. They had barely traversed two hundred meters through the yellowing wild grass when Omin noticed something.

Smoke. White puffs billowed from multiple spots on the southern horizon.

Unsure if he was seeing things correctly, Omin reined in his horse and came to a stop.

His accompanying riders noticed it too and reported, “My Lord, look. Fires, the Korelians are burning the wild grass.”

Something bothered him, so Omin dismounted. Once on the ground, he found himself surrounded by grass taller than his knee, almost reaching his waist. He drew his knife and cut the closest bunch of grass.

The husks in his palm were yellowing from the summer sun. As he ripped it out, he found it was sturdier and thicker than usual, but not old enough to be harvested for hay. He discarded the grass and started looking around, noticing an odd uniformity in the grass.

“Scouts,” Omin suddenly yelled.

A man quickly dismounted and approached him.

“Haven’t the Korelians been grazing their livestock here? Why is all this grass full-grown?” His shock was apparent.

The scout looked perplexed but quickly knelt to inspect the roots of the grass. His wide eyes confirmed Omin’s suspicions.

“My lord, the fire is spreading,” one of the riders reported with some urgency.

With haste, Omin mounted his horse again. His gaze swept across the plains, now filled with smoke. A gust of dry wind swept past his face. The heavy scent of burning grass filled his nostrils, and in that moment, he realized something: The Southern Wind, the wind that blew from the south to the north.

“Lansius, Lansius, Lansius!” he cursed, full of rage, slamming his fist into his armored thigh three times. He had just realized that the opponent had outmaneuvered him, trapping him in a precarious position.

Perplexed by the Baron’s behavior, his captain queried, “My Lord, why is the small fire angering you? They tried it before against Sir Arius with little effect.”

Omin had no time to explain. Biting his lips, he calculated his next move.

“Should we move the column to the south and try to put out the flame?” his captain suggested.

“There’s no time,” Omin snapped. “Don’t you fools get it? The Korelians are trying to burn the whole plains!”

Omin’s outburst failed to sway his staff. The thought of someone attempting to burn the vast Korelia plains was easily dismissed as a joke. Even at the height of summer, it wasn’t easy to burn wild grasses. If it were, their attempt at cooking the previous night would’ve burnt down their entire campsite.

“Go now! Ride to the column and get them back to the encampment immediately. Sound a retreat if you have to,” Omin ordered.

His staff nodded, albeit with skepticism. They probably thought the fire was a distraction at best. However, they welcomed the chance for an early rest. Standing in armor under the summer sun was far from comfortable.

“My Lord, where are you going?” asked one of his staff as Omin steered his horse away from them.

“I’ll head to the encampment and alert them. We need to start packing before the fire reaches them,” Omin said as he rode away.

Accompanied by only his Nicopolan bodyguard and four horsemen, he raced westward toward the encampment.

 

***

 



Last winter, Lansius had consulted various records and eyewitnesses in Korelia. He learned that in summer, the wind consistently blew to the north. At the time, he gave it little thought, as nature was unpredictable.

Still, as early as spring, out of caution, Lansius began to stockpile flammable materials of mostly locally available animal fat, thinking they might prove useful. Furthermore, he persuaded local shepherds to graze only on the eastern side of town.

Even when he wasn’t certain that the plan would ever see the light of day, Lansius went so far as to prevent Batu’s tribesmen from grazing on the west side of Korelia town. Because of his orders, the western plains were left wild and untouched.

When news of the Western Lords’ invasion reached him, bringing with them a massive number of troops, Lansius knew his fire strategy was the only way out. However, he disliked the idea. Scorched earth was generally frowned upon by anyone, so he tried his best to mitigate the effects.

After all, his aim was not to create more enemies, but to strike a favorable deal. War isn’t just a matter of killing and spilling enough blood but also, ironically, a means to resolve issues. Thus, the plan underwent several changes and revisions.

When Lansius revealed his plan to the small council, many were surprised. Despite the Lord’s remarkably open and chatty attitude with his closest peers, he had managed to maintain a secretive side. Only Audrey and Calub suspected something.

The reason why Lansius had visited the forest many times since spring was to study its layout, memorize paths, and familiarize himself with the details. His seemingly casual forest excursions were, in fact, careful preparations for the upcoming ambush. Finding the costard fruit tree was just a bonus.

Despite Lansius’ clumsiness and unassuming looks, he was ready for war. His hesitation was merely coming from his fear of failure, and the fear that he may inflict too many casualties, practically burning the bridge to a favorable end.

As capable as he was as a warlord, he didn’t wish to wage war on the entire Lowlandia. Above all else, he yearned for peace. For that very reason, he needed a decisive victory.

Aside from bloodline, the Lowlandians respected might. Thus, Lansius aimed for a knockout punch so severe, a victory so complete, that the Lowlandians couldn’t ignore and would remember for a long time.

To achieve this, he devised a four-stage plan:

1. Sir Justin’s challenge, which was a distraction.

2. Lansius’ surprise charge, which turned out to be bait.

3. The forest ambush, which was his killing blow, neutralizing the Coalition cavalry and securing Lord Jorge’s neutrality.

4. The final strike: setting the plains ablaze, to rout the entire Coalition.

Right now, the plan had reached the final stage. This strike was kept hidden from everyone except his most trusted retainers. For this, Lansius trusted Audrey to carry it out.

For this reason, Audrey and her twenty horsemen rode with pride. This was their hour of glory. The sea of yellowing grass greeted them with open arms while the dry wind clamored for their success.

Accompanied by the scout and the dog, they dashed across the western plains, seeking and burning the caches of flammable materials they had hidden - mats of hay soaked in animal fat and covered with dried grass.

On their own, the cache wouldn’t be able to cause a significant fire. The real threat lay in the untouched, full-grown, ungrazed pastures of the western plains. The wild yellowing grass, almost completely dried from the summer heat, was perfect for a wildfire.

Lansius’ strategy required them to do more than just start a series of fires. They needed to turn the entire western plains into an inferno.

Audrey and her men set fire to every cache they found. The dried hay and animal fat flared up, blazing hot and brightly. Propelled by the dry wind, it grew so hot that the wild grass caught fire almost instantly. What started as hundreds of isolated fires rapidly transformed into an uncontrollable wildfire.

Like riders of hell, Audrey’s cavalry raced across the plains, leaving a blazing trail in their wake. They had no one to challenge them, as the Coalition cavalry was neutralized and Lansius’ parade in the north kept them in check. Even if they realized the intention, it was far too late by now.

Fanned by the strong southern wind, the fire spread across the entire western plains. The once serene fields of Korelia had transformed into a roiling inferno. The Coalition could only watch helplessly as the inferno advanced northward toward their formation and encampment.

 

***

 

Chapter 61

Fleeting

 

Upon Baron Omin’s orders, the Korimor column began its march back to camp. This movement alerted the other two columns, but the reason behind it soon became apparent: The plains were ablaze, with the fire rapidly intensifying.

As the column nearest to the fire, they were heavily subjected to billowing smoke and the steadily encroaching flames. Before long, there was no semblance of an organized march. Everyone rushed towards their encampments in a desperate attempt to save their lives and belongings.

Those who had most of their possessions with them, or who quickly realized that the battle was lost, bolted westward with all their might. They understood the consequences and had no desire to be taken captive.

Thus, the retreat of the two-thousand Korimor and Nicopolan devolved into a full-blown rout.

On the north side, watching this development with great interest, the Lord of Korelia stopped his parade, spread out his cavalry formation, and ordered his knights to lower their lances.

The billowing smoke from afar had created chaos within the South Hill ranks and now the sight of the incoming charge finally broke their morale. Without an ounce of bravery left, the remaining men fled in total panic, with total disregard for order or formation.

As the vast plains burned red and churned out thick black smoke, every footman ran and the commanders were helpless to stop them. They had good reason to desert. For levied troops like them, to be captured meant servitude.

Ironically, their best chance to escape from slavery was to outrun their comrades. A trail of body armor, weapons, and helmets littered the plains. Everyone lightened their load as much as possible to outrun anyone in front of them.

The last column that remained on the field was Sir Arius’. The encroaching fire, along with the sudden collapse of the southern and northern columns, demoralized his men.

While Sir Arius had wanted to march into the forest to regroup with Lord Jorge’s cavalry, his knights were against it.

Even the crimson knight, his most trusted champion, told him not to. Sir Arius eventually relented as the fire threatened to cut off their retreat.

Sir Arius’ retreat finally reduced the might of the Coalition to a shambling mess of an army. Just as he had feared, like the other two columns, his Three Hills column also suffered massive desertions.

Amid the chaos, Lansius’ cavalry made their presence felt, taking hostages, capturing knights, and terrorizing the fleeing Coalition. They goaded their opponent to escape far west or into the fire.

The western Korelia plains had turned into a spectacular show of wildfire, while the tragedy of the once mighty Coalition army was just beginning.

Things were only marginally better inside the encampment. In the vast, sprawling city of tents, guarded by the most loyal retainers, servants, and a small number of camp followers, there was still a semblance of order despite the panic.

Baron Omin rode to the heart of the encampment and tried to organize a retreat. His quick reaction to abandoning his column had paid off. The smoke and fire hadn’t yet reached the encampment, and he had enough time to prepare.

“Find your lieutenants. Tell them Baron Omin of Korimor has summoned them!” He rode around the inner encampment to establish a working chain of command.

With great effort under the heavy smoke, he organized a convoy of baggage trains. Each cart was full of war funds and valuables. He knew he could rebuild the army if he could secure the supplies. Through honeyed words and bribes, he also convinced Jorge’s baggage guards to join his rank.

Without the sighting of Lord Jorge’s banner or the rest of the nobles, even the most loyal were compelled to flee. Lastly, Omin gathered as many horsemen as he could find, and then, leading sixty carts, he fled westward.

His escort consisted of just ten cavalrymen. However, behind his convoy followed many nobles, some even traveling in horse-drawn carts accompanied by their servants and baggage. Amongst the chaos, their only consolation was that the spare and draft horses they managed to acquire were fresh and eager to run.

In total, close to one hundred carts were making a beeline to the west, leaving the rest of the Coalition army behind.

Earlier, the Baron had traded his horse for a fresh one. His Nicopolan bodyguard rode calmly beside him, giving Omin some necessary mental support.

Time passed and the Great Lowlandia plains loomed on the horizon.

“Split up! Split up,” Omin commanded.

The convoy split in three directions. This was his masterstroke to foil capture. With Jorge’s baggage train in his hand, even if he could only secure one of the three convoys, he would still come out way richer.

The battle of Korelia had ended in disaster. However, Omin could still turn this into a great opportunity.

 

***

 

Audrey

The front riders slowed to a stop, and the rest of the cavalry followed suit. Several spread out as lookouts. Audrey had led her cavalry to the far west, where the Korelia plains and the Great Lowlandia plains connected seamlessly.

Stolen from its rightful author, this tale is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

After ensuring the area was safe, Audrey dismounted. Soon, a group of thirty civilians arrived on their small horses or mules. They were either too old, too young, or unfit to join the militia and were certainly not part of the plan.

The leader of this group shared a horse, stopping next to Audrey. Margo, the page boy, dismounted first, then helped the rider with whom he had been sharing the horse.

“Are we sticking to the plan?” the second rider, a woman wearing a traveling cloak, asked.

“My plan,” Audrey replied, patting the head of her prized warhorse.

“Yeah, I meant that,” Hannei said, lowering her cloak to reveal sweat trickling down her forehead. “You knew I could proceed alone.”

“Nah, it’s too dangerous for you to go alone. You need at least four,” Audrey advised, glancing at the group of boys, elderly men, and a few individuals with missing limbs.

“Okay, so where are the men who’ll follow me?” Hannei asked, rummaging through the saddlebag for a water flask.

“Sigmund, Dietrich,” Audrey called out, turning to her men.

There was a ruckus, and then two men showed up with smiles on their faces. One even offered a handful of wildflowers and said, “For the good Captain!”

“You damn well know that I can’t eat them, Dietrich,” Audrey responded, sparking laughter from the men. Dietrich, one of their best horse riders, retracted the flowers, feigning heartbreak.

Meanwhile, Sigmund, the soldier-bard, showed a wide smile, already thinking about making a lyric.

“Sigmund, I appreciate your willingness to come. I need someone to look after them,” said Audrey, motioning to the group of thirty.

“Please, I’m always happy to help. This Sigmund is at your service, my ladies,” he replied, bowing graciously toward Audrey and Hannei.

Hannei smiled, while Audrey could only shrug.

“And I am also at your service, Captain,” said Dietrich, not to be outdone. He then turned serious. “But are you sure you can manage the chase on your own?”

Audrey nodded. “I think I can manage against slow-moving carts. Your part is even more demanding. Try to keep them safe, especially Lady Hannei.”

“Understood,” said Dietrich.

“Let the men rest a little before you reorganize them,” Audrey instructed.

Sigmund and Dietrich nodded their heads before returning to their group.

“They’re either the bravest I’ve got or the stupidest,” Audrey commented about their antics, prompting giggles from Hannei.

With no trees in sight, they sat in the shadows of their horses, quenching their thirst, discarding their helmets, and wiping off sweat.

“That Sigmund, shouldn’t he be responsible for some tens of men?” asked Hannei.

“Yup, he’s the leader of the third group,” confirmed Audrey.

“So, is taking him with us okay?”

“Heh, it should be,” said Audrey, with a hint of nervousness. Despite her closeness with Lansius and the fact that she had bashed him so many times in training, she didn’t want to overstep Lansius’ authority. He was the Lord, while she was barely a Captain.

Hannei noted her concern and said confidently, “Look, I’ll help cover for you when this is over. I think I can manage that much.”

“I’ll be counting on you then,” Audrey replied with a grin. Last year, they had a cordial but professional relationship. But now, after living together in a small castle and sharing a room, they were closer than ever.

Since spring, the two, along with Felis, had become as close as sisters and were the prime troublemakers in Korelia Castle. They dabbled in food experiments and even attempted to make uniforms for the castle staff.

Now, two of the “rascals” as Lansius referred to them behind their backs, had planned something risky. Lansius would never approve, but they know it was within their ability.

As they waited, only the breeze offered some respite against the scorching summer sun. To their east, they saw black smoke billowing into the sky.

A shout attracted their attention. They watched as the scout with the dog in his lap came galloping toward them.

“Carts on the horizon,” the scout reported as he reined in his horse.

“This is faster than predicted... No matter, I’ll give chase,” Audrey declared, and then to her friend, “I’ll depart first then.”

“Bon courage!” Hannei wished her.

“I hope it’s a good wish,” Audrey commented, drawing a giggle from Hannei.

Audrey then mounted her horse and quickly departed with sixteen horsemen.

“What should we do then, My Lady?” Margo asked. Behind him, Sigmund and Dietrich, along with two other riders, were ready with their horses.

“It’s time for us to leave as well,” Hannei replied.

Led by Sigmund and Dietrich, along with two other horsemen, Hannei, and thirty civilians, rode eastward.

 

***

 

Chase on the Plains

The vast Lowlandia plains were predominantly flat terrain, which made traversing them relatively easy, even without a road. While there was no place to hide, avoiding detection was possible, as there was no road to follow.

At this moment, Baron Omin’s convoy had built up a substantial distance, moving as fast as their carts and horses could manage. However, they were slowing down as the heat and exhaustion began to take their toll on the animals.

The convoy had just split up when things started to go awry. Hidden by the trail of dust kicked up in the wake of the carts, Korelian riders had caught up and were subjugating the carts in the convoy one by one.

“My Lord, the Korelians,” warned the Nicopolan bodyguard.

Omin was furious. The pursuers were so efficient that by the time they noticed, one of the split-up convoys had been completely captured.

“Damn it! Why are their horses so resilient?” Omin watched in dismay as the Korelians easily transitioned from the last convoy to his own. Their horses seemed as fresh as ever.

His lieutenant raced to Omin’s side and asked, “What should we do, My Lord? The convoy can’t keep up much longer.”

“You know what to do. Lead our escort to intercept! The Korelian horses should be as tired as ours,” Omin urged.

The lieutenant felt disheartened but obeyed the order as instructed. Soon, ten horsemen detached from the convoy. They turned around and awaited the arrival of the opponents. They were mostly officers, not expert cavalrymen.

Omin and the convoy pushed forward, but many carts lagged as their horses’ stamina was nearly spent. From afar, they witnessed their ten horsemen engaging in a brief but one-sided fight. Only five fought, the rest yielded.

The convoy’s morale plummeted. Their escort barely bought them time to run.

“We must escape,” urged the bodyguard gravely.

Accepting the inevitable, Omin gave up. Riding only their horses, they veered wide and abandoned their allies.

Watching their Lord escape was the last straw for the coachmen. They slowed their carts and accepted capture. However, a stubborn few continued to flee. They fired their crossbows haphazardly, splitting further to dissuade their pursuers.

Some put up a fierce fight before being subjugated, as their horses refused to run any further. Ironically, their struggle to escape bought precious time for their Lord to evade capture unnoticed.

Audrey’s cavalry remained unaware of Omin and the third convoy's existence until it was too late. It was only after they began rounding up and questioning people that the Korelians realized a third convoy even existed.



They had mistakenly assumed there were only two convoys and that Omin would likely be in one of them. Now, Audrey's force were exhausted, a few were wounded, and their horses were spent from chasing and fighting carts one by one. On top of that, they still had to secure the captured baggage train.

Simply put, they were in no condition to search for Baron Omin or the third convoy.

Furious, Audrey slammed her fist against one of the carts. "Erryaahh!" she vented, acknowledging her failure.

In her mind, she cursed the name that had twice crossed her. Like a bad joke from the past that continued to haunt her, another Omin, this time a Baron, the instigator of this war, had escaped.

If only Audrey hadn’t split her forces, if only she had another rider as capable and cautious as Dietrich, all of this might have been prevented.

 

***

 

Just a reminder: the dialogue between nobles in this story is deliberately stiff, using an older choice of words. This style is inspired by old manuscripts, and it goes beyond simply using “thou, thee, or art”. Furthermore, when these characters begin to speak in a more “normal” manner, it means there’s a shift in their relationship. They’re either dropping pretenses or they’re getting closer, thus more comfortable talking informally.

 

 

Chapter 62

The Blunt Stick

 

The Encampment

The camp for the six-thousand was swallowed by thick black smoke. Fire encroached from the southern side, growing stronger by the minute. Suddenly, thirty-four horsemen appeared. They had crossed a small stream, wetting their horses and attire in an effort to shield themselves from the heat.

Many donned wet scarves to protect their nostrils and mouths as they navigated the path of blackened, burnt grass. Despite the surrounding sea of fire and smoke, they were kept safe by an unseen barrier, warding off the heat, smoke, and fire.

No one fully understood what was happening, but they knew that Lady Hannei was responsible. She was chanting the same verse slowly in an unknown language, almost like singing.

She had created a large spherical barrier by controlling the wind to blow from above, causing it to swirl around them in a protective cyclone. Not just a gentle breeze but a strong current, enough to snuff out the flames trapped inside the sphere.

It was as if they had a dome of invisible walls for protection. While the raging winds couldn’t extinguish the flames completely, they kept the heavy smoke at bay and made it safe for them to press on.

Witnessing this, everyone in the group saw Lady Hannei with profound reverence. They mistook her for a Saint Candidate and felt blessed to see one in action.

Sigmund, Dietrich, and the others had moved beyond their initial skepticism about her plan. At first, they believed they would have plenty of time to loot, but their hearts sank when they saw the encampment already surrounded by fire. Nevertheless, Lady Hannei had shown the way.

As she advanced, the smoke cleared, and the flames died out. The men used sticks, other tools, and even their boots to stamp out the fire, ensuring that Lady Hannei’s horse could proceed unhindered.

The blonde Mage rode alone, while Margo guided her horse on foot, striving to make her as comfortable as possible. Under her protection, the group reached the outer layers of the encampment and increased their pace upon crossing the blackened, fiery terrain.

The Coalition had allowed their horses to graze and their footmen to collect hay for bedding, so the inner parts of the camp were yet to be burnt. However, the thick smoke had rendered it deserted, with no signs of life. Evidence of panic was everywhere, with gear and supplies littered everywhere.

There were carts ready to be used, but many more were still neatly tied.

“There’s no more fire. I will enlarge the barrier, but you must work quickly,” Hannei said to Sigmund at her side.

“You heard the Lady! Split up and ready the carts,” Sigmund commanded the group.

“Disregard the carts with water barrels! We don’t need them. Get the carts with the grain, the armor, and the weapons,” Dietrich added.

“What about salted meat, boss?” one of the riders jested.

“Fuck them!” answered Dietrich, sparking laughter among the group. Last winter, Korelia had produced a record amount of salted meat, it was no longer a luxury.

The enlarged barrier was sending more air downward, but it was far from perfect. Smoke and soot got mixed in, and everyone started to look blackened. Two riders braved the smoke to ensure the exit route was passable.

Despite their reddened eyes and coughs from the smoke, the men hastily prepared the carts and strapped their horses. One by one, even with just a single horse, the supply carts were set in motion.

 

***

 

Western Plains

Lansius had led his cavalry to capture and terrorize the remnants of the Coalition. His priority was to prevent them from regrouping, while simultaneously allowing his knights to collect ransoms and trophies – and they were raking it in.

Laden with spoils and captured nobles, the cavalry moved slowly. The once mighty western nobility were now bound by ropes, the other ends of which were tied to their captors’ horses. Forced to walk on foot, they were filled with shame and fear for their lives.

Fortunately, their fear of Lansius made them easy to control.

Far to the south, the fire was still raging, and thick, blackened smoke billowed high into the sky, enough to obscure the mighty summer sun.

The area which they rode would soon be engulfed in flames, too. Only the most northern plains near the outskirts of the forest would be spared, a remnant of the time when Lansius had welcomed nomads to graze their livestock there in the spring.

Now, there was only one more thing to do. Following their scouts, Lansius’ cavalry easily met up with Lord Jorge’s remnants. Their situation looked pitiful; many were injured and without steeds. Only about fifty remained, including some Nicopolan mercenaries.

The tale has been taken without authorization; if you see it on Amazon, report the incident.

The situation immediately grew tense, but Lansius raised his right hand to indicate parley. “I wish to talk. Tell them I guarantee no harm will befall them,” he told Harold, who flanked him closely.

Nodding at his Lord’s command, Sir Harold rode further and heralded, “My Lord wishes for a parley. He guarantees that no harm will befall the Lord of Three Hills and his retinue.”

While waiting for a response, Lansius instructed his knights not to surround or show aggression. Instead, they were to fan out and present themselves with discipline. His aim was for a visible show of force.

Speak softly and carry a big stick...

He gritted his teeth and slowly removed his arm sling. The throbbing was getting worse. It was possibly more than just a fracture.

A pair of horsemen approached. One of them looked regal with black and bronze-accented armor. Lansius spurred his destrier forward until he was next to Harold.

He finally met Lord Jorge in person. Despite all that had happened, Lansius oddly didn’t harbor hatred but pitied the man’s foolishness.

“That’s close enough,” Sir Harold said openly to both parties. The sight of Morton, who remained steadfast despite their overwhelming odds, put Harold on high alert.

“Lord Lansius,” Jorge began from atop his horse, his voice as alluring as he was charming. “Earlier you promised me a safe passage to return to my encampment, yet it’s all gone in flames. Now, I pray that you’ll allow us to return to Three Hills unharmed.”

“My Lord,” Lansius addressed humbly, the fate of many lives in Lowlandia depending on him. “The situation is unfortunate, but you’re my guest. I urge you to stay for a few nights. Your men and horses are exhausted and without provisions. If you insist on returning today, more disaster will befall the men from Three Hills.”

Jorge looked alarmed and mistook Lansius’ warning for a threat. “Lord Lansius, for what it’s worth, we have made amends. I have pledged neutrality.”

“My Lord, please understand my predicament. You brought a great host from Three Hills, Korimor, and South Hill to attack Korelia. As such, it was impossible for me to stand alone.”

Lansius paused to let his words sink in before continuing, “I had to rely on Lord Robert and the nomadic tribes. In return for their aid, I promised they could freely hunt the remnants of this war.” He returned the blame right back at Jorge.

Morton took a deep breath, gazed at his Lord, and nodded once. He knew his Lord wasn’t going to win a contest of wit. He also feared for his Lord’s well-being if they forced their way to Three Hills. It was twelve to fifteen days on foot, with nothing but grass on the horizon.

Meanwhile, Jorge found Lansius to be very different from what he had envisioned. Riding with part of his armor exposed, likely from a battle wound, the foreigner looked gallant. “It seems you have left me stuck between a rock and a hard place.”

“I wish to rectify that. That is why I beseech you to stay, so many of your men will be spared. Your banner will gather men from Three Hills to return, saving them from the nomads’ wrath.”

Jorge looked amused and boldly questioned, “Lord Lansius, I can’t help but wonder why you are so concerned for the welfare of my men, who, until this morning, were attempting to invade your land.”

Lansius held back a chuckle, realizing that his motives must seem suspicious, and also admired Jorge’s honesty. “I need Three Hills to survive as intact as possible in order to maintain peace.”

“What do you mean by that?” Jorge asked, discarding any pretense.

“I wish to end the conflict in this land. If My Lord, and Lord Robert, through me, could reconcile, then a new power balance could be established between east and west Lowlandia. Perhaps, that way, peace, and a beneficial relationship can be achieved.”

Jorge nodded thoughtfully, absorbing Lansius’ points. “I always wondered why you kept Lord Robert on the throne... Will you also allow my House to rule Three Hills then?”

“That is not even a question, My Lord. I have no claim over Three Hills.”

Lord Jorge seemed to regain some color in his pale cheeks at this reassurance. “Very well, as long as my House can continue to rule Three Hills, I shall heed your words. Then, what are your suggestions?”

Jorge’s positive answer calmed Lansius. Winning at diplomacy was as crucial as winning the battle. While as the victor, he could force his demands, but if the other party was deeply unsatisfied then it was just a prelude for another war. What Lansius needed was a mutual understanding.

Thus, with all the charisma he could muster, Lansius suggested, “I would like to offer you the best lodgings in Korelia, but it may seem like I’m holding you hostage. I think it’s best for My Lord to establish a new encampment. There's an abandoned village north of here. It has wells with clear spring water.”

Without being asked, Morton looked at his Lord and nodded to show that he wasn’t against the idea.

“I recall such a place," said Jorge. "Then we shall set camp there. Will you permit me to search for my men?”

“I’ll allow it, as long as they’re your subjects,” Lansius emphasized the last part.

Jorge seemed to catch the meaning and felt grateful for the opportunity.

Watching them, Morton coughed, and Jorge readily motioned his Captain to speak.

“My Lord, I hope you’ll forgive my blunt language,” the mage knight addressed Lansius. “You’re showing us significant leniency, for which we are grateful, but you haven’t stated your demands. This concerns us.”

Lansius chuckled. This mage knight had caused him so much pain, yet somehow he harbored no hatred. “Sir Knight, my demand remains the same. Uphold your oath of neutrality, respect my claim over Korelia, and allow my men’s rights to the spoils of war. In return, we’ll guarantee a safe haven. In a week time, I’ll also arrange a carriage so Lord Jorge can march home with the dignity befitting his station.”

Satisfied with the offer, Morton and Lord Jorge agreed to the terms. With this, the two Houses ceased all hostilities. The Lord of Korelia would assist with basic supplies, tents, and other materials. In return, Lord Jorge forfeited all gear and supplies left behind, to be seized as war reparations.

They exchanged liaisons and parted ways peacefully. Lord Jorge and his remnants marched northwest and started to gather the wounded and stragglers.

Midday had passed, but the summer sun was obscured by thick smoke from the burning plains, providing the men in armor with some much-needed shade.

“My Lord, won’t it be dangerous if they regroup and rally?” Harold asked as they prepared to ride again. He felt that the other knights would ask about this when they had the chance. Nobody wanted another fight so soon, and Lansius’ decision seemed unnecessarily risky.

“An army marches on its belly,” answered Lansius as a squire helped him with the arm sling. “Without daily supplies or weapons, what can they do? Now, they’re depending on us like children to their parents. If they bite the hand that feeds them, then it’ll be a slow and agonizing death for them.”

“I see...” remarked Harold, pleased that his Lord had thought this through. With this, he could easily calm his fellow knights.

“Besides, they fear Lord Robert’s cavalry and the nomads,” added Lansius.

“It’s funny that My Lord mentioned Lord Robert. I heard nothing about reinforcements from White Lake.”

“They’re going to be late, probably in a few days. I mentioned their name because Three Hills respects and fears Lord Robert’s cavalry more than the nameless Nomads.”

“Ah, that makes sense.” The knight rubbed his chin in satisfaction.

Continuing his earlier plan, Lansius sent two unburdened squires to inform Calub and Korelia of their newest agreement and situation. He also instructed his burdened main cavalry to head east to Korelia castle, where Sir Justin would be ready to assist.

Meanwhile, Lansius, his scout, and twenty knights rode west. While the battlefield was still filled with stragglers, he needed to connect and reinforce Audrey’s cavalry.

As they rode, the Korelia plains smoldered. Nearly a third of the plains was blackened, the ashes carried by the wind painting the landscape a ghostly grey.

 

***

 

Chapter 63

Settled

 

The scent of smoke and charred vegetation filled the air, while ash rained down like grim snowflakes, blanketing the ground with a layer of grey dust. The once verdant steppe had transformed into a smoldering wasteland.

Lansius and his knights had been searching for Audrey for quite some time. They had crossed paths with straggling groups several times, but nobody was in the mood to start a fight.

After riding across the western plains, the scout finally found traces of carts that led them to a small creek.

“They’ve crossed, My Lord,” reported the scout confidently.

Just as planned.

“Let’s give chase,” ordered Lansius. He was relieved to find no signs of fighting at the crossing, suggesting that Audrey’s cavalry were able to subdue the retreating convoy without resistance. And they were fast enough to evade the retreating forces.

Lansius and his knights crossed the small stream and headed south, following the cart tracks.

“My Lord, I see something,” one of the knights reported.

“Guide us in,” Lansius ordered. Things were going as planned, and he hoped everything would end well.

“Vanguard, ride ahead!” Morton shouted, and two knights sortied ahead.

As Lansius saw the outlines of the unmoving caravans and horses, he blurted out, “They’re stopping?”

“It seems that way, My Lord,” Sir Harold answered.

They rode straight, showing their banner high.

“Unbelievable… So many carts, there must be more than fifty!” Harold commented, his eyes wide with astonishment.

Indeed, the result exceeded even Lansius’ expectations. As they rode closer, Audrey’s men noticed their approach. They stood tall and straight as their Lord arrived.

“My Lord, the victory is yours!” The men began to clamor as they caught sight of Lansius.

Lansius wasn’t accustomed to such treatment. They hailed him as the Great Victor and showered him with praises. Using all his strength to maintain a stoic expression, a smile nonetheless formed on his lips. As he slowly rode past them, the men reached out, touching his gauntlet and greaves as if they were charms or amulets.

Their devotion-like attitude had Sir Harold grinning from ear to ear.

Among the cheering crowd, Lansius spotted Audrey standing near a laden cart; soot slightly blackened her face.

“What’s happened to your arm, and your backplate?” she blurted out as she approached, taking the destrier’s rein as if it was nothing more than a docile dog.

“Well, things happened, probably a fracture, but no blood,” Lansius commented about his left wrist which was in an arm sling.

“You shouldn’t be here. You should ride straight to Korelia--“

“I know, but,” Lansius gazed around the group. “I need to make sure that we’re winning.”

At the mention of winning, faces around them broke into smiles, eyes welled up with tears of joy and relief; their gratitude for the outcome of the war was showing. Nobody had expected Korelia to win the siege in just half a day. This victory was nothing short of a miracle.

“Umm, My Lord, may I speak to you about something?“ Audrey fidgeted.

Lansius sensed something was amiss. “Are you injured?”

But then somebody even more blackened than Audrey came forward. “My Lord, I can explain.”

A female voice. Her face and attire were blackened, but her blond hair still stood out.

Lansius furrowed his brows and asked with suspicion, “Hannei?”

“Yes, My Lord, I asked Captain Audrey to allow me to ride with her--“

“But you can’t ride,” Lansius retorted, interrupting her words.

“Ermm… Margo helped me a bit on that matter,” Hannei admitted.

“Oh, please no,” Lansius groaned. He never allowed the young pages into war.

“My Lord, please listen…” Hannei’s tone was polite, but her eyes were sharp as knives.

Lansius sighed. He might be a Lord, but the mage was wrathful and well-connected. Thus, he motioned for her to continue.

“We split our forces and I went to the encampment. Using my tricks, there’s little danger from the fire. And we successfully captured a few dozen supply carts.” Hannei ended her story briefly while clearly omitting the dangerous part.

She seemed pleased, and indeed it was a great achievement. However, they had broken military rule by disregarding Lansius’ command and could set a bad precedent.

Lansius took a sharp breath. He didn’t like to censure, but men would die and battles would be lost if they acted on their own just to fill their pockets. “Lady Hannei, I applaud your courage. However, military law and discipline are not to be trifled with,” he said sternly.

As expected, the one responsible, Audrey, put herself on the line, shielding Hannei. She stood with her back straight, helmet carried in hand at breast level. She silently waited for the punishment as Hannei was her charge.

Hannei gave Lansius a look, hinting at him to let this slide, but he couldn’t. Military law was where he drew the line. “Captain, were you able to capture Lord Omin?”

The crowd went silent.

“I’m unable to find him, My Lord,” Audrey replied.

Lansius closed his eyes for a moment. "Capturing Lord Omin, while vital, isn't the primary objective. So, I don't blame you. Especially when you only have so few horsemen, it's only natural to lose him in the chaos of war."

Unauthorized use: this story is on Amazon without permission from the author. Report any sightings.

"However," Lansius continued ominously, "you violated a direct order, endangered my guest, and put your men in unnecessary danger. Do you have anything to say?"

Audrey knelt. Her face was downcast as she spoke. “No, My Lord, I… humbly ask for your pardon.”

The men’s faces around them looked sour. Nobody was satisfied with this development.

“In deference to our victory and this bountiful result, I shall sentence a lighter punishment. Half pay for a year.” Lansius announced the punishment.

“My Lord, please, we beg your forgiveness! Have mercy,” the men cried, pleading for leniency on behalf of their beloved captain. Receiving half pay meant earning only half their wages, which would barely cover rent and food, let alone allow for any indulgences like spare clothes, or alcohol.

Hannei looked composed, but Lansius knew she too was wrathful.

“Order, order!” Sir Harold rode forward to assist. The knights behind him also assumed formation to show support. But it was unnecessary; there was never a threat to begin with, just discontent.

“Military laws are strict for a purpose,” Lansius shouted, using the pain in his left wrist to fuel his anger. His voice commanded attention and caused surprise. “Failure to follow a command may ruin an army. If that happens, we would all pay the blood price.”

He paused to gauge their attention before continuing, “You may have succeeded this time, but can you guarantee the same for the future? Are you willing to gamble all of our lives against death or, worse… servitude?”

His words eventually pacified the men. Even though they were uneducated and only understood a fraction of military law, they feared its consequences.

“Pageboy,” Lansius called.

“Y-yes, My Lord.” As he had expected, a blackened Margo appeared.

“Write the punishment for Captain Audrey. Half pay for the rest of this year.”

“At once, My Lord,” Margo replied, albeit weakly.

With the punishment dealt with, it was time for the reward. “Margo, while you’re here, let’s distribute the loot. How many carts are there?”

The words ‘loot’ and ‘distribution’ gathered everyone’s attention. The previous emotion and bad taste immediately cooled down.

“There are a total of seventy-three carts, My Lord. Comprised of--“

“Let’s do the ones that Lady Hannei specifically captured,” he told the squire.

Margo checked the piece of wood he used as notes as he was without parchment or ink. “There are thirty-three carts captured, My Lord. They are filled with grains, clothing, and weapons.”

Lansius pondered for a moment. “Eight carts should go to Sir Justin’s column for their sacrifices. Four for Calub’s men as they bled as much. Another four for the Knights as they have lost horses and gear. That’s sixteen, correct?”

“Indeed, My Lord,” Margo replied while jotting down on the wooden board with his knife.

“Another four should go for future military expenses to capture Baron Omin. And four should go to the city’s militia,” stated Lansius.

The men around Lansius grew weary. They had worked the hardest for this and hadn’t been mentioned. Furthermore, the Lord had yet to say how many he wanted. As was the rule, the Lord always took the lion’s share.

“Twenty-four recorded. There’s... nine carts left, My Lord,” Margo informed him after counting furiously with his fingers.

“Three should go to Lady Hannei for her skills. Three for the men who participated in this, and the rest should go to Captain Audrey,” Lansius concluded.

“Oooh, three carts!” the men shouted in pure joy. Each imagined getting three pieces of clothing and a bagful of expensive trinkets. For them, it was as good as a laborer’s pay for three harvests.

In front of Lansius, Audrey poked at Margo. “Hey, how many are my share?” she asked curiously. Mental math was uncommon in this world.

“Please, a moment,” Margo replied to Audrey while facing Lansius and spoke, “My Lord, there seems to be a slight mistake. You haven’t taken your share?”

The crowd went silent.

Lansius let out a faint smile. “No, this is purely the men’s hard work. They took the risk and endured my wrath. Besides, Captain Audrey has taken full responsibility. So, I shall claim none from the thirty carts.”

This evoked something primal amongst the men who shouted even harder, grateful for their Lord’s generosity.

Undisturbed by this, Audrey pressed Margo for an answer. “Well?”

“Three carts, Captain. You got three,” the Page grinned as he said it.

Audrey punched a fist into the air while the men rushed to congratulate her. She was well-loved.

Nearby, Hannei let out a smirk and nodded approvingly at Lansius, and he nodded back. They let Audrey and her men bask in the limelight.

When the commotion was over, Lansius rode closer. “Audrey.”

“Yes,” she replied with a wide smile.

“Sorry for the harsh words.”

“That’s okay. You also gave me three carts,” she grinned.

“I think it’s only fair,” Lansius replied.

And then Audrey smiled at him so innocently that it made his heart race.

I have to tell her...

His heart pounded hard as if he was about to charge the enemy’s line again. Worse, he only had cheap corny lines in his head. He had asked, but this was a different era. Here, if a man liked a woman, he would send his uncle to meet the woman’s father to discuss lineage and dowry.

“Audrey...” he called with a slight nervousness. Her eyes met his and Lansius continued. “Ever since I met you three years ago, I’ve met many ladies, but none as capable or as interesting as you. Lady Audrey, would you marry me?”

The Lord’s unorthodox and sudden declaration hushed the entire crowd. Eyes widened, and many faces broke into grins. Even the usually stoic knights were smirking.

Suddenly, the blackened Dietrich appeared out of nowhere. He approached Lansius, surprising him with a bouquet of colorful wildflowers. Meanwhile, the equally blackened Sigmund strummed a looted lyre, providing a melodious backdrop to the scene.

Amidst all the chaos, Audrey, the center of everyone’s attention, stood her ground but blushed red. Her lips parted, as if to speak, then closed again as she gathered her thoughts.

The crowd hung on every word, their faces showed a myriad of emotions. Smiles and anticipation were in the air.

Audrey finally smiled. Her answer was almost certain, but the words that came out from her lips were, “No, I can’t.”

A pang shot through Lansius’ heart at the rejection, reopening an old wound that could be felt despite his amnesia. His face remained stoic, but his mind went into overdrive to control the emotional turmoil.

Of course, she rejects it, dumbass! You just cut her pay and rebuked her openly!

Cold logic pounded reason into his senses. The chaos still whirled around him. Dietrich took back the wildflowers, while Sir Harold approached with an opened wineskin to ease the pain.

Before Lansius could take a drink, Audrey approached and the knight wisely gave them some space. She stepped on the destrier’s stirrup, grabbed the horse’s saddle with her hand, and pulled herself up.

Suddenly their faces were so close that Lansius could see the faint freckles on her nose, the beautiful hazelnut color of her eyes, and feel the heat radiating from her blushing cheeks.

“Wha—” Lansius’ word was left unfinished as their lips met. He was completely taken aback by the sweet surprise and instinctively wrapped his right arm around her.

Meanwhile, the crowds went crazy with wolf-whistling, clapping, and shouts of approval. Everybody went mad, their pent-up frustration from the war and their victory combined into one.

“But you said no?” Lansius said, still dazzled.

“Lans, I can’t marry you, but maybe a concubine is more fitting,” Audrey replied with a reddened face while avoiding direct eye contact.

Her explanation baffled Lansius. “W-who gave you the idea?”

“Mm, Hannei, but mostly Felis…” she answered.

“Well, can’t have you as that... How about as a consort?” Lansius proposed a more honorable status as a spouse with all the official recognition and standing.

Audrey shyly nodded her head.

“Then it’s settled,” the Lord exclaimed as he pulled her closer to share the saddle.

With hoarse voices from so many successive rounds of cheering, the crowd gave their loudest support for them. Sir Harold, Dietrich, and Margo readily removed the destrier’s armor and the saddlebag to lighten the horse’s load.

Lansius and Audrey also helped each other to remove parts of their armor to make their ride more comfortable. She was particularly careful with Lansius’ arm sling.

“Hail to the Lord and the Captain Consort,” Dietrich yelled and a burst of laughter followed. Lansius had to admit that was quite funny, while Audrey just took it in stride, looking embarrassed but happy.

“Lans, are you sure this is okay?” his soon-to-be consort asked.

Braving the cheering and merry laughter, Lansius cuddled her from behind, reassuring her. He gently pulled the destrier’s reins to the side. “Come, let’s head home. Korelia is waiting.”

Observing the Lord’s reaction, the men cheerfully obliged and promptly readied themselves. The cavalry group finally set off for home along with the captured convoy. For them, the battle of Korelia was finally over. But for others, it was only just beginning.

“Mm, Lans,” Audrey whispered as they rode home. “What about the Lord of Korimor?”

“Baron Omin? Don’t worry about him.” Lansius tightened his grip on her hands. “Remember when I told Batu to act once he sees a signal?” He gestured towards the smoldering western plains, a clear signal of their victory. “I doubt he’ll miss that.”

“Ah, the hunt?!” she exclaimed, her eyes sparkling with anticipation.

“Yup, I won’t allow anyone to escape. They have to pay the price,” Lansius stated firmly as they approached Korelia from the southern side, flanked by the knights and the slowly moving caravans trailing behind them.

 

***

 

Chapter 64

Five Fates

 

The room inside the guardhouse was bathed in the soft glow from a small chandelier. There Hugo sat in silence. He had emerged from the battle relatively unscathed, save for some minor lacerations that had since dried. He was alone, his only companions a humble jug of water and a smaller jug of wine that sat on the wooden table.

Despite the near-miraculous victory they had achieved, he was surprisingly restless. As a squire, Hugo had always compared himself to Lord Lansius, believing they were equals at least in skill if not in status. But now, it was clear just how wide the gulf between them was.

As if in an attempt to lift his spirits, bright stars twinkled in the night sky, visible through a small window. The sight was not lost on Hugo, who softly quoted, "Shine brightly like the stars in the night."

His lord's achievements were indeed bright, like the stars. Suddenly, a smirk appeared on his lips. He was envious, yet also proud. There was no malice in his feelings, only disappointment in himself as he lamented, "Why don't I possess even a quarter of his talent?"

Despite his mood, Hugo resisted the wine. He had volunteered for watch duty, as the Lord was worried about a possible night attack. More than just good faith, he wanted to think clearly. Today’s battle had been hard fought and he would be a fool if he didn’t try to learn from it.

There were many rising stars in Lansius’ household, and he felt that even his rank as Deputy Marshal wasn’t guaranteed. He sighed heavily and kept watch patiently, his gaze fixed on the darkened landscape below.

Outside, it was all quiet. Only the occasional wind carrying fine dust and the scent of burnt grass.

The door creaked open and Sir Justin entered. The Marshal was wearing a half-open, stained-white padded jack. What was interesting about his appearance was the wooden splint bandaged over his left hip. He had been experiencing pain in his hip and had worn them as a precaution against a possible fracture.

Hugo rose up. “Do you need help, sir?”

“Nah, the pain lessened after I bandaged it tightly.” Sir Justin limped towards the chair, carefully lowering himself into it, mindful of his bandaged hip.

“Are you sure you want to be here? I’ll allow you to celebrate in town. You’ve earned it,” the Marshal asked jovially.

“Gratitude, Sir, but I think the men deserve it more than me.”

The older knight grinned as he reached into his pocket and placed several trinkets on the table: gold rings, a silver medallion, and a rectangular golden belt buckle. "Say, here’s Korelia, and this is the Coalition’s encampment.”

He was explaining his makeshift map when someone knocked. “I’m looking for The Marshal.”

“Enter,” Sir Justin invited.

A tall figure with a well-defined jawline and flamboyant hair entered, dressed in a comfortable tunic. “You asked for me, Sir?”

“Sir Harold, welcome to the small council,” greeted Sir Justin.

Harold remained at the door. “But I’m not a member, just a temporary cavalry commander.”

Sir Justin motioned for the tall knight to enter. Sir Harold closed the door behind him and approached the two. The rectangular wooden table was positioned so that one of its long sides was flush against the wall, leaving just enough space for three people to sit around the remaining sides.

The tall knight rested his sword’s scabbard against the chair. As he sat down, his interest was piqued by the trinkets scattered about on the table’s surface.

Sir Justin motioned to his Deputy, who spoke, “Sir Harold, you might not know this, but Sir Callahan has passed away.”

The knight’s face turned stoic momentarily before looking downcast. “So the bolt penetrated deeply.” He sighed and recalled, “I was riding next to him. That could’ve happened to me.”

Sir Justin poured wine for the younger knight, who took a sip just for the sake of it.

“I only knew him for a season, but he seemed like a great man," Harold lamented. “He had the patience of a good mentor. And as a knight, he had the looks and skills to back it up. May he meet the Ancients and hunt for all eternity.”

The other two bowed their heads slightly as a sign of respect.

"So now, what do you need of me?" Harold asked, certain that they hadn't called him in just to inform him of Callahan's passing.

“We want to bring you up to speed,” explained Sir Justin. “House Lansius requires... delicate hands.”

"Lord Lansius may be strong for his size, but his health isn't as robust as we'd like," Hugo added. "There have been instances where he fell ill for weeks following a battle, even without sustaining any injuries."

Sir Harold seemed unfazed. “Well, he has his strengths and weaknesses. Do you have any plan about it?”

“The idea is to keep the Lord well-rested,” replied Hugo. “We want him to stay in the Eastern Mansion. Hopefully, he can recover without worrying too much about the aftermath.”

Harold rubbed his chin in understanding. It was a good suggestion. Right now, the castle was akin to a large hospice, with the injured and dying weeping, groaning, and even wailing until they either got well or died.

The same sad scene happened in other makeshift hospices throughout Korelia town. Despite the concerted efforts of the town’s physicians, castle staff, and volunteers, many wouldn’t see the light of day again.

“I’m all ears,” said Sir Harold.

Sir Justin smiled. “Since the Lord trusts you in command, I think he’ll be comfortable if you and your most trusted men bolstered the Eastern Mansion’s security. While they have fences, it’s not a castle.”

“I can do that. I’ll arrange a garrison and patrols.”

"Then, I'll put Lord Lansius in your care," said Sir Justin. "Now, with that out of the way. Care to tell us how the war unfolded on the cavalry side?”

The tall knight perked up. “Of course. Where should I begin?”

“Well, if this is Korelia,” Sir Justin pointed at the rectangular belt buckle first and then to the silver medallion. “And this is the western Lords’ encampment...”

If you spot this story on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

For the next half-hour, Korelia’s military commanders discussed the day’s battle, examining Lord Lansius' strategy and contrasting it with their own approaches. Although Lord Lansius had discussed the plan at length with Sir Justin—indeed, the Marshal had even finalized many parts of it— he was not aware of the variations the Lord had ultimately chosen.

Battle tactics weren't fixed; they evolved depending on the circumstances. There were several contingencies, including one where Sir Justin's column would need to leave town and assist with the fire strategy. However, Lord Lansius ultimately deemed this unnecessary.

This decision didn't come as a surprise. What did come as a surprise was his decision not to employ the nomadic cavalry in the main battle. There had been multiple opportunities to include them, but in the end, Lord Lansius used them only for the cleanup operation.

...

 

“Did the battle proceed so smoothly that the Lord didn’t even feel compelled to use his reserve?” Sir Justin queried as he returned the cavalry piece to its original spot on the table, concluding their simulation of the battle.

“It’s as if he hesitated to call them,” Hugo suspected.

In contemplative silence, the Marshal took a sip of water and reclined in his sturdy wooden chair. His injured hip started to ache in earnest after prolonged sitting. He hated to admit it, but he was probably going to need bed rest by tomorrow.

“The audacity to envision victory without the aid of Batu’s tribesmen is remarkable,” he commented nonchalantly.

Sir Harold massaged the back of his neck. He knew the answer, but couldn’t reveal it. “The Lord may not want the nomads to get too much attention,” he finally said, careful to keep his statement vague enough to not breach his oath.

Hugo furrowed his brows. “The Lord said that?”

“Something to that effect, yes. He didn’t want to show the nomadic tribes as potential mercenaries,” Sir Harold confirmed.

Sir Justin nodded approvingly. “True... Why didn’t I think of that? If I were still in the mercenary business, after that training last spring, I’d consider recruiting some of them.”

Hugo could only grin. The thought that the Lord had also fooled the two knights satisfied him.

Sir Justin pondered hard. “It’s wise to hide them, but don’t you think we could win the battle more easily by employing them?”

“Let’s simulate another one,” Hugo suggested, as he reset the pieces on the table.

“How about, after we’ve drawn out the column, the nomads simply attack the encampment with fire?” Sir Justin proposed, moving a gold ring with a black gemstone.

Harold looked at the silver medallion on the table and pointed out, “The scouts reported that the encampment was fortified with a ring of carts and had only two well-guarded exits. Even when they marched out onto the plains, they likely still had enough men for a garrison.”

Sir Justin mulled over it. “Given their numbers and ferocity, I think they could cause havoc...”

“Well, if they use fire, it would certainly cause some damage, but would it be significant? The cavalry of the Western Lords is nearby.” Harold picked up a gold ring and placed it near the silver medallion. “The Black Knights and the Nicopolans. Once they react, the nomads’ attack would amount to nothing.”

The Marshall crossed his arms. “I guess it would alert them of our use of fire... our only ace.”

Harold furrowed his brows. He wasn’t used to strategy meetings like this. “Pardon my language, but I think that’s the problem with a half-hearted attack like this. The nomads would cause damage, but they wouldn’t deliver a knockout blow. Worse, they would also reveal our hand.”

The other two refrained from commenting, allowing Harold to continue. “I believe the Lord made the right call by drawing the cavalry into an ambush. After that, he didn’t need a large number of nomads. Even our small light cavalry could do it,” he asserted.

Hugo nodded deeply. “We’re too focused on attacking the encampment.”

“Indeed. After Lord Jorge was gone with the cavalry, the northern column was routed, and the fire started to burn. Without even setting the encampment alight, the western men would be forced to flee.”

“Sir, what about the fire tactics? If it’s a secret, then why did the Lord instruct us to use fire grenades?” Hugo asked.

Sir Harold was equally piqued and eyed Sir Justin.

“Well, it’s because it would fail,” the Marshal, more familiar with the battle plan, explained. “The grass around the battleground and castle hill is shorter than on the plains. After all, we use it for training, horse grazing, and marching. A fire wouldn’t spread there.”

“To use, but expect it to fail. Is there a particular reason for this?” asked Sir Harold.

The Marshal shrugged. “The Lord only said that it would create a false sense of security. He feared Lord Omin might read that far, so he wanted to lure him into thinking he’s safe from fire tactics.”

The two nodded their heads despite not fully grasping the idea.

Amidst the silence, Hugo tried his best to think of something to prove that he still held a candle against the Lord, but he came up empty. “So, this is the only tactic to win? We don’t have any other solutions?”

Sir Justin exhaled deeply. He had battlefield experience, but nothing prepared him for this. “Someone in the past era did this kind of thing, digging trenches, and burning the field. But I always thought it was just a story. Most of the time, it’s simply unreasonable or even impossible to do such a thing.”

“Indeed...” Sir Harold looked at the chandelier and said, “I imagine burning the whole western plains requires a lot of preparation. Since when has the Lord been planning for this?”

The Marshall shook his head. “I didn’t ask, but I knew he forbade anyone - even the tribesmen - from grazing the western plains since early spring.”

“The wind.” Hugo realized something. “Before winter, the Lord asked for things like weather reports. He even met with several old people. I thought it was just his hobby or something.”

Sir Harold chuckled. “So he learned about the summer wind and planned all this? To think anyone was thinking that far ahead of time.”

Sir Justin chuckled happily. ”This is why I’m following him. I’m curious just how high he can climb. He’s the most interesting fellow I encountered in my life.”

He drank his cup of water and added, “Now, this is a good time to ask, are you guys with me, or do you have another plan?”

The tall knight chuckled. “I'm thinking of leaving after the war. Korelia is too far out. Surprisingly big population, but the town has little to offer.”

“You better reconsider," said Hugo. "The Lord... has quite an ambition. I doubt he’ll stay in Korelia.”

His words piqued Sir Justin. “Interesting. He never revealed as much.”

“When Lord Arte made Lord Lansius his squire... The young Lord questioned Lansius so hard that he revealed a different side of himself.” Hugo suddenly felt a thirst for wine, so he poured a little into his cup of water and drank it down.

“What kind of a man is he?” Sir Harold asked while helping Hugo with another pour of wine.

A squire like Hugo couldn’t refuse a knight, so he gratefully took the offer. “Lord Lansius, he cunningly fooled everyone... I was a fool to try to take his contribution after a battle. I was talking big, trying to boost my importance in battle and get Lord Arte to bestow a title upon me, then he appeared like a hero, bearing grand gifts.”

“What kind of gifts?” Sir Justin asked with a chuckle, surprised at his deputy’s honesty.

“Tens of highly educated freed slaves. Freed slaves! They even volunteered,” complained Hugo.

The absurdity of the story made the two knights burst into laughter. Even Hugo couldn’t resist a chuckle and added, “I was there with just bruises and honeyed words, and he appeared with gifts fit for a king.”

“But how?” Sir Harold asked with tears in his eyes.

Hugo shook his head. “To this day, I have no idea how he did that. Why the slaves didn’t just bolt home after being freed remains a mystery.”

“Drink up,” said Sir Justin, but Hugo shook his head with a sheepish smile. “I volunteered for the night watch, Sir.”

Sir Harold patted Hugo on the back. “Drink, the Lord did you dirty. I’ll do the night watch for you. You should have some merriment.”

Hugo sheepishly accepted the offer and drank some more. This was the first time he revealed his greatest shame to anyone else and apparently, nobody judged him harshly.

⠀

***

⠀

The night watch ended peacefully without incident, and a bright new day dawned in Korelia. Dew and morning air erased yesterday’s scent of smoke. The siege had ended in a day, an unprecedented event that everyone saw as nothing short of a miracle.

Despite the activity in the hospice and the graveyard, the mood in town was uplifting. The Lord of Korelia had prevailed against an army of six-thousand men in just a single day. Such an achievement was beyond anyone’s dreams.

Naturally, everywhere in town, over meals or drinks, people, militia, and men-at-arms praised their Lord, embellishing their deeds and elevating Korelia’s victory to greater heights. The heroic fights, the cavalry charge, the ambush, the burning plains, and even rumors about the Saint Candidate’s involvement all contributed to the fervor.

Rumors of the Lord’s impending marriage only added to the excitement. The town was alive with anticipation, yet the victory celebration was yet to be held due to the ongoing risk of another battle.

Even now, the cavalry was preparing for another sortie to guard against regrouping. Before they could sortie, however, a group of twelve riders, accompanied by a band of men, marched towards Korelia castle, crossing the scorched western plains.

The uninvited group carried a white flag but moved with composure. A woman in a white traveling cloak led them, her stature erect and her gaze steady, hinting at her uncanny confidence.

As the castle loomed large in front of them, she dispatched one of her riders as a herald to inform the castle of their intentions.

⠀

***

⠀

 

Chapter 65

Punitive Strike

 

Many things happened in Korelia after the war. Tending to the wounded was a top priority, followed by burial and mourning. On behalf of the Lord, his retinue had dedicated several places as hospices in town to treat the wounded.

Following yesterday’s battle, Three Hills and Korelia agreed to mend relations. Thus, they were technically at peace. The war had ended.

Despite the grand scale of the fire tactics that scorched the western plains, casualties were surprisingly limited. The majority of those who died directly from the fire were already wounded from the battle or had been injured during the chaotic retreat.

The low casualties were by design. The Lord of Korelia’s strategy was to incite panic and rout, not fire entrapment. From the start, the main goal was to capture or destroy the encampment, particularly its supplies and baggage train. No army could survive without them and would be forced to accept a truce.

As luck would have it, most of the high-ranking members of the Three Hills survived the battle. Many of their nobles and famed Black Knights were captured alive. This favorable situation undoubtedly would pave the way for the two Houses to improve relations.

In the midst of this, the arrival of Nicopolan mercenaries presented an unnecessary political twist to House Lansius.

 

***

 

Lansius

Sigmund stood in the hall of the Eastern Mansion, the sun still shining softly as he finished his report. “… They wish to present you three Korimor knights, five South Hill knights, and six squires, as a token of goodwill.”

Not surrendering but pledging allegiance...?

Lansius contemplated while massaging his left arm. His fractured wrist was covered in a wooden splint bandage.

Thirty Nicopolan mercenaries and fifteen horses, small but not insignificant.

While he could attack these Nicopolan and take their horses, chances were he could make better use of them. After all, information and knowledge were paramount.

And information from those who submitted tended to be more reliable, and since they were mercenaries, if Lansius captured them, nobody would pay their ransom.

Sitting at Lansius’ side, Audrey calmly watched her future husband pondering the matter. Only when he snapped out of it did she comment, “If they intend to switch sides, there shouldn’t be a problem.”

Lansius felt slightly at ease with her words. He had no qualms about former opponents joining him; in fact, the art of war suggested: ‘To capture the enemy’s entire army is better than to destroy it; to take intact a regiment, a company, or a squad is better than to destroy them.’

Thankfully, it seemed that even in this world, switching sides after a war wasn’t a big deal. “We need to be certain... Let’s entice them with supplies and the promise of freedom so we can gauge their reaction. After all, they’ve already given us the knights and squires,” Lansius remarked.

Sir Harold, sitting at the next table, chuckled upon hearing that. “Enticing mercenaries with supplies, I’d love to see that,” he said, shaking his head in amusement.

Lansius grinned at his knight’s comment. “It might be pointless, but I need to know just how much loyalty I can expect from them.”

“The loyalty of the Nicopolan free company is to their profit,” Sir Harold commented.

“Profit is something tangible and easy to measure. I can live with that. I doubt anyone here would stay if I couldn’t pay for your upkeep.”

Harold chuckled again. “It hurts my pride a little, but I guess that’s the truth. But, My Lord, don’t lump me in with those Nicopolans.”

“My apologies, I didn’t mean that,” said Lansius without hesitation.

Grinning at the Lord’s sincere reaction, the knight rose and bowed his head slightly. “Please, My Lord, it’s just me and my mouth. You don’t have to.”

Audrey just smiled, enjoying their banter. To her, Sir Harold was a welcome addition to House Lansius, although she wasn’t sure if he was going to stay.

Harold’s knightly values were clear: to perfect his swordsmanship through training and battles. As such, he traveled from one conflict to another, seeking Lords worthy of his service.

Turning her attention to Sigmund, the subordinate who had become an aide, as there were many still recovering from the battle, Audrey asked, “Sigmund, would that be all?”

Sigmund readily replied, “My Lord, the deputy wanted to know whether to let them all in, which he suggested not to, or just inviting a few.”

“Mm, the arrangement,” Lansius murmured. He had no intention of letting them in as it would pose an unnecessary risk. “Allow her in with a retinue. The rest can camp outside the wall. Give them some of our spare tents.”

“Arrange for some guards,” suggested Audrey to Lansius. “I recommend Carla. She had little role in the previous battle.”

Lansius nodded. He knew Carla had guarded Felicity and thus had not been credited much. “Yes, let’s task her.”

“Anything else? Audrey asked Sigmund.

“Just one more thing, My Lord, when do you plan to meet her?”

Audrey looked at Lansius, who decided, “Soon, but not today... What’s her name again?”

“Lady Daniella. The herald informed me that the Lady is the daughter of a nobleman in Nicopola.”

Lansius rubbed his chin. “A nobleman’s daughter turned mercenary?”

“There was a ballad written about a fierce woman mercenary,” Sigmund said, almost too happy to answer.

Lansius was amused. “Can you play that ballad at supper time?” he asked while glancing at his future wife.

“Only if it ends well," she warned as their eyes met.

Sigmund smiled and bowed his head. “Most certainly, My Lord and my lady,” he said and departed from the hall to relay the messages to the Marshal and deputy.

The hall returned to a temporary silence as they waited for lunch. Unlike during a campaign, members of the nobility only dine twice - at lunch and supper. They had a little breakfast in their room, usually leftover from yesterday’s meal.

A case of content theft: this narrative is not rightfully on Amazon; if you spot it, report the violation.

Thus, during court sessions, an assortment of white bread, meat, and cheese was served on small platters, accompanied by a selection of fruits and beverages. Contrasting with the Great Hall, the mansion’s hall bathed in warm sunlight streaming in through its numerous windows, creating an enjoyable ambiance.

“What do you think about this Lady Daniella?” Lansius asked his knight while in between eating a salty slice of meat with bread, Korelia’s specialty.

Sir Harold took his drink before replying, “Well, she might have been a bastard, disowned, or disinherited. It happens all the time. Also, the Nicopolans have such tendencies to make a free company to live like nobles.”

Lansius recalled the opulent manor of Sabina Rustica. His thoughts then returned to the issue at hand - whether to accept or reject the Nicopolan allegiance. Eager to discuss this matter with his most trusted advisors, he asked, “Have Calub and his men returned?”

“They should be here around midday since they need to finish a patrol and pack up the yurts,” answered Harold.

“Let me know when they arrive, I need to talk to him and Sir Callahan about this.”

Without missing a beat, Sir Harold answered, “Certainly, My Lord.”

They were still keeping the news of Sir Callahan’s death from Lansius. This was also why Cecile was missing from the Lord’s side. Fortunately, the Lord didn’t question her absence, as they were preoccupied with moving from the castle.

Even now, the staff was busy moving necessary goods and furniture to the Eastern Mansion. The reason was more than just to follow the Lord around. It was because the castle’s halls were being used for intensive care. With patients, physicians, and infirmarians running back and forth, the atmosphere was chaotic and gruesome.

Throughout the night, the castle echoed with painful cries, random screams, and sobs. Even with the help of Calub’s stock of painkillers, there wasn’t enough for everyone. Thus, Lansius had agreed to bring the younger staff with him.

However, since the move was abrupt and unplanned, the mansion was still being cleaned and furnished. They occupied a different section from the one occupied by Sir Justin and Hugo.

At this time, the Marshal and Deputy had established their headquarters in the Billet complex. They needed to keep a close eye on the captured men to prevent any issues.

Audrey was peeling a red costard fruit when she recalled an earlier conversation. “My Lord, earlier you wanted to ask about Lord Jorge,” she reminded him.

“Ah, that’s right. Sir Harold, have you met with Lord Jorge’s liaison officer?”

“Yes, I have. I assure you that he’s pleased we provided enough supplies for them to camp out. He also expressed gratitude for returning some of their belongings.”

“What belongings?” inquired Audrey.

“Nothing significant. Just blankets and spare clothes. I think we can treat them that much for the sake of diplomacy,” explained Lansius.

“I see... Well, it’s good to know that the carts I captured are truly useful.” Her voice was laced with sarcasm.

Lansius stifled a laugh. “A blessing in disguise,” he muttered.

Audrey pouted slightly. “Yet you still cut my pay.”

Lansius looked at her and gently said, “Rules are rules. Please don’t do that again.”

She sighed and smiled naughtily. “Only two carts for your dowry then.”

“Eh, but I gave you three?” he argued.

“One is for my savings.”

Lansius chuckled and applauded her. “That’s smart. Good for you.”

“Two baggage carts to marry a Baron,” Sir Harold chuckled. “The skald is going to write a ballad about this.”

“Technically, I’m not yet a Baron,” Lansius quipped, and then to Audrey, he joked, “Please say three and full of silver. Otherwise, you’ll ruin my reputation.”

However, Audrey was taking it seriously. “I told you, being a concubine is better. That way, I don’t have to pay a dowry.”

Sir Harold snorted, trying hard not to laugh. Their conversation was light, and the hall remained calm and serene. Beyond their banter, the only other sounds were the gentle wind and the chirping of birds from the garden outside. Slowly, the heavy memories of yesterday’s battle were fading from their minds.

 

***

 

In the Eastern Mansion, lunch was served without much fanfare, as House Lansius' retinues were preoccupied with managing the aftermath of the war. Only Lord Lansius, Audrey, Sir Justin, Margo, and a small team of young staff and servants were present.

The affair felt intimate, almost private. Neither Felicity nor Hannei were present, both were busy with their own business.

As they brought their own cook, the food tasted the same. The atmosphere remained pleasant, almost a bit dull, with only some light banter and discussion. Only after lunch was over, Dietrich, a cavalryman pressed into a temporary aide, entered.

His presence in the hall immediately sparked tension. The Lord gestured for him to approach, and he stepped forward, reporting, “My Lord, Batu’s tribesman has arrived with a report.”

“Bring him in.” Lansius straightened his back in anticipation.

The tribesman, clad in looted armor, jogged to the scene. He admired the hall but quickly reported with a wide smile. “O Great Noyan, overnight, we’ve caught over a thousand men! Right now we’re sending them back to Korelia as you ordered.”

Noyan?

The new title made Lansius chuckle. “I’m pleased with the result. But tell me, since when am I a Noyan?”

The tribesman flashed his teeth. “My Noyan, you commanded at least several thousand people, including us. To us, you are our Noyan.”

Lansius was pleased. More than just an empty title, it was also a bond of honor and loyalty.

Complete victory…

He pondered for a moment before a realization dawned on him. Lansius saw an opportunity to advance his plans. In truth, the war wasn't over for him, and he couldn't help but consider the possibilities.

Meanwhile, Audrey was craving to ask, but her new position made her unable to react as usual, especially not in front of a guest, so she tried to motion Sir Harold.

The knight, ever perceptive, cleared his throat. “Pardon me, but what’s a Noyan?”

“The leader of ten thousand people, our protector, our chief, our lord,” the tribesman proudly announced.

Lansius could only shake his head at the title, while Audrey was smiling proudly.

Taking the opportunity while there was a lull, Sir Harold asked, “Is the hunt continuing?”

“Of course, there are still many stragglers to capture. But... what do you wish to do to them?” the tribesman asked curiously.

Sir Harold looked at Lansius eagerly. He too wished to know. To him, aside from the nobles who could be ransomed, the rest were just extra mouths to feed.

“Free labor,” Lansius mused. “They have to earn their freedom back. I’ll have them work on my building project.”

The messenger chuckled and bowed his head slightly while putting his hand upon his heart. “O Great Noyan, may you and Korelia always be prosperous under the Lowlandia skies.”

Lansius bowed his head a little as a sign of respect.

Audrey chimed in, “Please join us later for dinner.”

“My lady, leader Batu ordered me to return. He needs all his warriors to herd the captured men.”

“Then I shall send you away with baskets of food and drink,” said Lansius.

“That’ll be most welcome. Then, My Noyan, I shall take my leave.”

“A moment,” said Lansius. “What about the northern corridor? How is the condition over there?”

The tribesman happily replied, “Thanks to your great victory over the Nicopolans, the tribes living there can live in peace.”

Lansius nodded. The question seemed out of curiosity for the tribesmen’s well-being, but he had a different idea in mind.

Is it overreaching? But they should be weak, and the path is open...

“Have you ever been to Korimor?” Lansius asked. The innocent question didn’t raise suspicion. Only Audrey seemed to gaze sharply.

“Yes, My Noyan, I’ve seen its castle wall and city.”

“With so many of them attacking Korelia, how many do you think are manning the castle?”

Now, people started to pay attention. Something was brewing. Even the tribesman felt it. “Likely, no more than a hundred warriors.”

“How many days on horse to Korelia using the northern corridor?”

“Fast horses, 4 days. With baggage, 6 days. Carts and carriages around 16 to 20 days.”

Lansius pondered deeply, calculating the state of his troops, their remaining supplies, and what would be needed for a swift campaign to Korimor. He also couldn’t neglect the defense and supplies of Korelia.

The grain trade is yet to happen… Is this logistically feasible?

Lansius was reluctant to accelerate his plans, but he understood that in war, opportunity was king. Whoever failed to seize it was doomed to fail.

Since Baron Omin had struck first, Lansius now had a pretext for war. Nothing prevented him from launching a counterattack, and it would be considered legitimate.

This wasn’t about greed; it was about survival. Two castles, and two baronies – this would make Korelia more resilient.

The two baronies might be separated by distance, but there was little outside challenge since Three Hills was there to shield it. Korimor’s closest neighbors were Three Hills and Orniteia, the barony brought down by Midlandia last year.

“Opportunities multiply as they are seized,” Lansius murmured to himself, reaching a decision. He turned to Sir Harold and asked, “If we were to launch an expeditionary force to Korimor, who do you think should lead it?”

The Lord’s question confirmed everyone’s thoughts. The knight replied without hesitation, “The Marshal is bedridden. Then it should be the Deputy.”

Lansius needed to make sure. “You won’t take command?”

“I can assist, but I’m not familiar with commanding large numbers of men.” Despite his station, Sir Harold was sensible enough to respect the hierarchy of command.

“Very well then. Since opportunity arises...” Lansius addressed the room, “Change of plan! Invite Lady Daniella for supper. Dietrich, please inform Hugo that I wish to see him now. Tribesman, I would ask you to sit and wait a little. We may have a race on our hands.”

“A race, My Noyan?” he asked excitedly.

“Yes, either brother Batu finds Lord Omin first, or Hugo wins the Barony of Korimor. Each would be an equally extraordinary prize.”

 

***

 

Chapter 66

Solidus

 

With lunch concluded, Sir Harold excused himself to attend to security matters. There were numerous concerns to be addressed, as the Eastern Mansion was only lightly defended. So, despite the newfound peace, he regularly sent out patrols and kept his men on the lookout.

It was rather hard to keep his men alert. Their motivation had largely waned as the war was largely over, but Sir Harold, with his tall upright posture and sharp fighter attitude, managed to keep them at their best. Even without his dashing armor, he was full of confidence.

Today, his requests for help had been answered. The Marshall had sent fifteen select crossbowmen from Korelia Castle to bolster the mansion’s security. The sight of them marching past the mansion gate brought relief to the knight. Without wasting time, he immediately briefed the newcomers on their assignments.

As for Lansius, after lunch, the staff urged their Lord to retreat to his room. With the main chamber still under renovation after several years of neglect, Lansius used one of the guest rooms. Audrey slept in a nearby guestroom, and they spent the day in the adjoining hall.

With Cecile busy at the castle, only Margo was available as their Page.

“How’s Sterling?” Lansius asked Margo. The boy was looking prettier, and it was hard to discern his gender without looking at his attire. He would be a good candidate for spying duties if Lansius ever needed one.

“He’s recovering, My Lord,” replied the Pageboy.

“Has his fever come down?” asked Audrey from her seat that overlooked a large glass window.

“Last time I heard, he has awakened. Lady Hannei has visited him.”

“Ah,” said Lansius while nodding. While he could order Hannei to heal his wrist, there were many lives at stake, and he trusted Hannei to do the right thing. “Drey, do you mind if I go inside? I’m going to write something.”

Audrey shifted her gaze from the scenery outside the window to meet Lansius’ eyes. “Please don’t let my presence bother you, My Lord,” she added at the end since Margo was present.

Lansius entered his room and welcomed the large open window that let in the breeze to fight against the summer heat. He sat at the recently cleaned chair and took a stack of parchment from the dark lacquered desk.

He took a deep breath and pondered for a while. On average, an annual barony income was around 300 gold. A barony was considered rich if it could gain 400 gold from the land.However, for Korelia, Lansius could only gain around 200 gold coins each year from taxes and harvest share.

Not all was in coins, a good percentage was in goods like grains, salted meat, local textile, and domestic horses.

Above the barony were the viscountcies. Lord Robert’s income from the White Lake Viscountcy had previously been 800 gold coins annually. However, since he lost Korelia, his income now stood at 600 gold coins.

From that 600, Lansius took another 300 as capitulation. Thus, Robert ended up with only 300. While it looked a lot less, it was still a Baron’s level of income. That income allowed Robert to slowly nurse back his House’s strength and continued to rule his domain.

The gentle breeze greeted Lansius as he prepared the ink and the quill pen. While he didn’t have his scrolls and records, he had memorized many of its numbers. So, he jotted them down to refresh his mind.

First was Lord Robert’s past capitulation that became House Lansius’ current wealth.

 

Lansius finished the first parchment detailing his House’s income from the past year. He set it aside to dry and began listing the current expenses on a second parchment.

He calculated the expenses for the six months since he had come into power. The largest expense was for the trench work, which he paid for in salt. Each worker received the equivalent of 5 copper per day for work that lasted effectively 90 days.

The combined cost of the trench work and the salt scheme was more than twice the upkeep of his army. However, he saw this as an investment and aid relief.

The second largest expense was the cost to maintain his military of 400 men-at-arms and crossbowmen. The standard rate for men-at-arms on a campaign was about 4 copper daily, including meals, while cavalrymen cost around 8 copper daily.

The previous year, Lansius and Sir Justin negotiated a standby rate that also included free lodgings and armament leases. This rate was half of the original campaign rate: 2 copper daily for each man-at-arms, including meals, and 4 copper daily for cavalrymen.

Considering that even master smiths, carpenters, and artisans only earned 4 copper daily, this was already a good living wage.

 

With 1.3 million copper in the coffers and 720,000 in expenses, Lansius’ current wealth was around 600,000 copper or slightly less than 2,500 gold coins.

While 2,500 gold might seem like a lot, Lansius and his treasurer, Calub, weren’t comfortable. The truth was, a small barony like Korelia could hardly afford hundreds of troops for the typical 40-day campaign.

In fact, the reason most campaigns only lasted around 40 or 60 days was mainly due to the financial burden.

Feeling the need for comparison, Lansius started to write on another parchment.

 

Unauthorized reproduction: this story has been taken without approval. Report sightings.

Just like his previous calculations stored in the castle cabinet, a poor barony like Korelia, with an annual income of only 200 gold coins, could only afford two-hundred men with twenty cavalry for 40 days. The total cost would be around 160 gold coins, not including other costs but factoring in food.

The costly nature of war led the nobility to draw from the populace to bolster their ranks. Compulsory military service or levied troops were basically free, with the nobility only required to feed them during the campaign.

Because of how inexpensive these levied troops were, they could outnumber the men-at-arms in any army by three to five times. However, as Lansius knew firsthand, there were serious issues with using them against well-trained and motivated soldiers.

Still, the high cost of war didn’t prevent the nobility from mustering large armies, especially in times of emergency or continuous wars. The nobles could simply refuse or delay cash payments.

As Calub had said, in reality, no nobles paid in full. The usual scheme was to offer land grants for farming, tax exemptions for several years, promises of employment as servants or guardsmen, special permits for trade, and so on. As long as the baron remained in power, he could offer special privileges in lieu of payment.

Lansius wasn’t unfamiliar with such tactics. After all, Cecile had been hired when Sir Callahan switched loyalties from Lord Robert.

However, Lansius drew the line at paying his soldiers. He didn’t want any discontent among the men he had painstakingly trained. Many would say he spoiled his troops, but there would be a time when things were hard and he would need to drive them hard.

Nothing had prepared Lansius for his role, but he had come to accept his responsibility.

Lansius looked at the numbers again and mulled them over. He wished that someday he could sustain his army without having to dip into his savings.

Piqued by this idea, he decided to calculate the cost of maintaining his current army for a full year.

 

Lansius calculated that the military expenses for his current posture exceeded 1,800 gold coins annually.

This was before other costs like servants, guardsmen, cooks, gifts for guests, additional purchases, guild projects, etc. Meanwhile, Korelia’s income was only 200 gold coins.

Seeing the absurd numbers, Lansius chuckled. He realized that he and Calub were rather mad to let this happen, but last year, they had only one shot at survival.

Driven by curiosity and a desire for a complete picture, Lansius carefully sharpened the quill pen and dipped it into the thick ink before writing down his House’s annual income.

 

Upon finishing, he compared the last two parchments and saw an income of 600 gold coins and expenses of 1,800 gold coins. He was clearly in the red.

And not just slightly - House Lansius’ expenses were three times its current income.

A standing army is really expensive.

He mused, leaning back in his chair and looking up at the ceiling. His left shoulder felt a bit sore from the arm sling, so he rested his left wrist on the table.

With his shoulders relaxed, Lansius mulled over his idea of a standing army. The cost alone of maintaining a professional army year-round was ridiculously high. This was the reason why such an arrangement did not become common in the medieval era - most feudal lords would simply disband their armies when they were no longer needed.

Even with his recent massive victory, Lansius was under no illusions about his future income. Though he could secure similar schemes with Three Hills and Korimor, he doubted he could maintain his current army solely from income.

But he understood that to limit his growth for financial reasons alone would be utterly foolish. He wasn’t a clerk trying to do a profitable business, he was a warlord trying to fight his way out of the turmoil era.

Only might, backed by sound logistics, is what truly matters...

With the upcoming war in Arvena and the Imperium on the brink of collapse, things would turn a lot worse for decades before even changing up for the better.

In the face of that, aside from food security, investing in troops and their loyalty seemed to be the correct choice.

This was where the ransom money and looted items played a role. They could amount to thousands and easily fill his coffers with gold and silver. Thus, House Lansius was still in a relatively good position for several years.

The issue was his Korelia building project.

Lansius wished to transform Korelia into a thriving city. He and Calub had read the records last winter and conducted experiments on the land. From what they gathered, the underdeveloped east side of Korelia held the potential for agricultural development.

Situated next to a river, the site was ideally suited for irrigation. Moreover, the area was prone to annual flooding in the spring following the harsh winter. The only issue was the lack of natural wind barriers. The steppe winds were fierce and strong, resulting in substantial water loss and significant temperature fluctuations between day and night.

They had observed firsthand that plants could initially thrive, but they would eventually wither and die due to the extreme wind conditions.

Therefore, quite ironically, what Korelia needed were walls and windbreak trees - not for defense, but for food production.

With 1,000 forced workers at his disposal, Lansius planned to restart the stone quarry. This wall project would be costly, but it could provide Korelia with a permanent defensive structure and potentially swathes of fertile land.

Perhaps he could even use a section of the wall to construct a large tower as a new living space, as Korelia Castle was too limited.

Maybe even a windmill and watermill...

He reflected on history. The reason why kings built castles was not merely for indulgence, but also to attract people from all social classes. The newcomers would sell their merchandise and offer their services to the workers, artisans, and smiths who labored there, as well as the growing noble class that moved to reside within the castle’s vicinity.

Shops and stalls would spring up, offering food, clothing, and medicine. Drinking establishments, taverns, barber shops, tailors, bathhouses, theaters, entertainment venues, and various workshops would also emerge to meet the demands of the city.

Over time, these transient merchants and artisans would settle and become part of the city’s population. Thus, what began as a castle-building project would transform into a thriving, bustling society.

Lansius wanted to emulate this tried-and-true method. He would likely have the funds after Lord Jorge’s capitulation, but he needed to be prudent to avoid squandering it.

To feed and house another thousand men....

Regardless of whether they were forced workers, Lansius had to meet their basic needs. Grain would be an issue, and he considered exclusively buying wheat from Lord Robert and the Eastern Merchants for another year or two.

His trade balance might look ugly at first, but his pashmina shawl project would likely be profitable once the guild had supplied Korelia with spinning wheels. Additionally, as Noyan, Lansius could expect a share of horses each year, which would boost his horse trading scheme.

Immersed in his work, Lansius delved into various calculations to ensure he wasn’t overlooking any factors. Planning and data sheets brought reminders of his past life—how to plan ahead, make preparations, and devise contingency plans. Only now the stakes were the lives of so many.

...

 

Lansius stopped his quill pen and put it aside. Tired, he leaned back in his chair. Even after his victory, he still had a lot on his mind. First and foremost, he couldn't resist thinking about his decision to punish Korimor.

On one side, with Omin in prison, his military knowledge urged him to seize this golden opportunity for expansion. After surviving two major battles, soft-hearted as he was, even Lansius had become desensitized. However, the notion of attacking and conquering other people still brought him a moral dilemma.

"What a lame warlord I'll make," Lansius mused, finding irony in his predicament.

Of all the battles he had fought, none were driven by ambition, but rather a desire to save as many lives as possible. He recalled Lord Bengrieve's words describing him as 'a selfless guardian.'

Probably just a polite way of calling me a useless pacifist.

With a chuckle, he closed his eyes momentarily, only for another concern to surface.

Marriage...

He was about to marry Audrey. In itself, marriage wasn't concerning. However, for Lansius, it was more than just building a family. It would ultimately decide his fate, anchoring him permanently as one of the Lords of Lowlandia. This went against his wish for a simpler life.

Despite his newfound status, Lansius still dreamed of sun-drenched meadows, the smell of baked bread in a village hearth, and the quiet joy of tending a humble garden. He yearned for an easy and carefree life, bloodless, and as normal as can be, without the heavy responsibility of life and death.

Sometimes the feeling was so strong that he fantasized about escaping from Korelia. If not for his strong sense of duty to those around him, Lansius might have packed his gear and sought a quiet life far from the burdens of leadership.

Naturally, the responsibility for so many lives was not something one could easily become accustomed to. Thus, he questioned himself, striving to find some peace. After mulling it over for a while, he realized his thoughts were just running in circles. His indecision about attacking, his reluctance to accept responsibility, all boiled down to one single question. "Is everyone important to me?"

Like it or not, everyone was tied to him. In his quest to save them, they had become a part of his House. Audrey, in particular, became the embodiment of them all.

After this realization, his decision became clear. He couldn't bear to see her suffer anymore and for that, he needed power and authority.

 

***

 

Korelia, Eastern Mansion

It was close to midday when the deputy arrived at the Eastern Mansion. He was hurried to the upper chamber where Lord Lansius and Sir Harold were standing, looking over an unfurled map of the province on the table. “My Lord, you wish to see me?”

“Hugo, what do you know about Korimor castle and the northern corridor?” asked Lansius as he gestured for him to come nearer.

Hugo looked surprised upon hearing it. “The Korimor Castle...? I heard its main keep and towers are bigger than Korelia,” he replied while approaching the table.

“And the northern corridor?” reminded Sir Harold.

The deputy mulled for a moment. “It’s a direct path to Korimor and even Midlandia, but it’s easy to get lost there. Water is also scarce and there are some rumors of banditry going on.”

“The banditry is by the Nicopolans raiders, the same ones we beat in the forest,” Lansius explained. “Also, the nomad tribesmen know the route with fresh water even in summer.”

Hugo began to sense where this was going, and fear grew within him. “My Lord, do you wish to attack Korimor?”

Lansius’ face remained stoic as he glanced at Hugo and spoke, “A good warlord expands.”

The Lord’s words made Hugo swallow dryly. His eyes couldn’t hold a gaze against Lansius. Meanwhile, Sir Harold mulled over the idea.

Lansius continued, “You know me. I’m neither a warmonger nor an opportunist by nature. Yet, I carry the weight of ten thousand souls on my shoulders... Hugo, we need every bit of leverage we can find. Because, at the end of the day, it’s just us. So, are you with me?”

 

***

 

Chapter 67

One-eyed Knight

 

Lord Lansius had made his intention clear to counterattack and seize Korimor, causing cold sweat to form on Hugo’s back.

“My Lord, I’m with you, but is this even possible?” asked the deputy.

Lansius looked him in the eye and asked, “Do you think we can’t make it?”

“We don’t even have two hundred men to spare. That’s hardly enough for a siege.” Hugo recalled the report on the troops they had left.

Out of 400 core troops, 150 were either dead, wounded, or too shaken to fight. To maintain order and keep hostages in Korelia, they needed at least another 150 men. This meant there were only 100 left for the campaign to take Korimor.

“Go on, let us know your full thoughts about this.” Lansius encouraged his deputy to speak.

Hugo took a deep breath to calm himself down. “With fewer than two hundred, I even doubt that I can take a small castle like Korelia. Korimor has a better defense. It survived siege attempts multiple times... Maybe if it’s only a raid.”

Ignoring his suggestion, Lansius asked, “So, you agreed that this is impossible?”

The Lord’s reaction paused Hugo; he mulled for a while before declaring, “Yes, it’s impossible with just a small force.”

Lord Lansius, straightened his posture and gazed at Sir Harold, who simply nodded and said, “I’ve never heard of someone bringing fewer than three-hundred men to siege a castle and winning.”

“The rule is to bring three to five times the size of the garrison,” added Hugo.

Lansius gave another look at the provincial map on the table. Its yellowing surface and fading ink couldn’t hide its artful nature; however, it held little credible information. Just the general placements and borders of baronies, viscountcies—some even outdated.

“I’ve sent Audrey to meet with the surrendering Nicopolans. We’ll have the defender numbers soon.”

Hugo was surprised that Lansius was adamant about besieging Korimor. “My Lord, even if they only have the smallest number of defenders, say a hundred, we need at least five-hundred.”

“Oh, we can’t do that,” Lansius dismissed. “We don’t have the food to support five-hundred in a siege.”

The mention of food led Hugo to a conclusion. “You want to starve Korimor out?”

Lansius shook his head. “No, we likely have less food than them.”

Hugo chuckled. None of this made sense. “Then, My Lord, how do you plan to win?”

Lansius smiled, “I still have the Nomad tribes’ assistance.”

“But they’re still hunting for the remnants, and at most, they probably can provide only fifty horsemen.”

“We also have reinforcements from Lord Robert,” replied Lansius lightly.

Hugo was stunned. “Repurposing a relief force to a siege? Would they even consent to that?”

“Well, if they don’t want to, then we’ll make do with what we’ve got,” the Lord said with a shrug.

Hugo furrowed his brows. He knew Lansius had a plan, but he couldn’t even guess a glimpse of it, which bothered him greatly. “Then, My Lord, please enlighten me if you wish for me to lead the siege.”

Lansius was amused. “Besieging a castle isn’t all about the number of men and how much food you have.”

His words sent Hugo and Sir Harold into deep thought.

Lansius continued, “We have the element of surprise. No one expects us in Korimor. We likely only need to be intimidating.”

“Intimidating?” Hugo mulled over the words.

“Indeed. We don’t need to assault the castle. We just need to appear large enough to intimidate,” Lansius explained.

The Lord’s brief and enigmatic words hardly instilled confidence, but that was intentional. From the start, Lansius realized he wasn’t all-knowing, and there was no guarantee that his plan was the best. Thus, he conditioned his retainers to think critically, hoping they might come up with a better strategy or pinpoint a weakness in his own.

The sound of hurried footsteps echoed from the stairs, and Margo, the pageboy, entered. “My Lord, I beg your pardon, but the guards report seeing cavalry to the east.”

“Ha!” exclaimed Sir Harold, who then bolted towards the stairs.

“They’re late,” remarked Lansius, exhaling in relief.

⠀

***

⠀

White Lake Viscountcy

Michael had been the favorite of the White Lake nobility since he was a boy. Through his family’s standing, perseverance, and intellectual prowess, he had won the hearts of influential men and women. However, his once-stellar reputation was no more.

Last year, as the Marshal, he lost the war against Lansius’ much smaller force. In the aftermath, he was captured and lost an eye. Despite having Lord Robert on his side, that alone couldn’t save him from the wrath of the other members of the court.

Many noble families were losing or ransoming their husbands, sons, or other relatives in the war. They blamed Michael, and Lord Robert was powerless to intervene at that time. Consequently, the ex-Marshal was removed from the court and disgraced.

As such, the promise of betrothal to Robert’s daughter was also called off. Many thought that was the end of him.

Since then, a year had passed.

While Lord Robert’s influence and power had waned after losing the war, his House was still influential with a functioning administration. Lansius’ generous capitulation terms allowed Robert to hold on to his seat of power.

The White Lake region had a yearly income of around 800 gold coins. As agreed upon his capitulation, Robert had agreed to send the requested goods and silver, equivalent to 500 gold coins, to Lansius.

Stolen story; please report.

That agreement still left him with a good 300 gold coins income, more than enough to live comfortably as a regional power. Moreover, of the 500 gold coins Lansius spent, Robert would recoup a sum from taxes and economic growth in his region. Thus, it wasn’t hard for him to nurse his forces back.

Nearing the height of summer, a messenger arrived in White Lake, bearing a message of impending war in Korelia.

As anyone could have guessed, Lansius’ ascent as the Lord of Korelia didn’t gain any acceptance. It only worsened the delicate balance of power in Lowlandia.

Behind closed doors, many were arguing not to send help. If Korelia were defeated, then White Lake could break free. However, Lord Robert wasn’t going to make the same mistake.

Many underestimated the Lord of Korelia simply because he didn’t exude the confidence of a strong noble. Lansius’ manner of speech and behavior showed little indication that he possessed the qualities of a leader. Yet, all of that didn’t matter.

Robert had long understood that power came in many forms and not every successful warlord was a charismatic leader. In fact, one of the most charismatic men in Lowlandia was Lord Jorge, who was the biggest fool in the region.

People who judged a man based solely on his physique and looks were due for a harsh reality check with Lansius. Although Robert wouldn’t speak of this to anyone, Lansius reminded him of his younger self.

Despite all their failings as noblemen, both Robert and Lansius were skilled war commanders. In conflict-prone Lowlandia, that one skill alone was a desirable trait for a leader. That was why Lord Robert stubbornly prepared his men for reinforcements.

This time he chose to trust his guts and mustered two-hundred men and forty cavalry, a respected force for a relief mission.

What was hard was to find a leader. Almost no one would take the role. They all feared that Korelia would certainly be lost, and they would be implicated for leading a relief force.

While this might have looked like a setback, in reality, all of this played into Lord Robert’s hands.

⠀

***

⠀

One-eyed Michael

Today, Michael met Astrid to say farewell. Their betrothal was no more, but Lord Robert allowed the meeting to take place. They met in a private garden to avoid prying eyes. Except for the usual lady-in-waiting and the old swordsman in the far corner, there was nobody else.

“Michael, what happened to your eye? Are you still in pain?”

Astrid rushed to her ex-fiancé as soon as she saw him entering the garden. She was worried about his left eye, which was bandaged and covered with an eyepatch.

Standing there with a smile, Michael replied, “It’s alright, my lady. I lost an eye, but I gained a much more valuable experience.”

“But... your eye, I should get someone to look after you!”

“There’s no need to bother, my lady,” he reassured her. “Your humble knight just wanted to say goodbye.”

Astrid cast her eyes downward. “Michael, I wish things could have ended differently for us.”

“It was nobody’s fault but mine. I blame nobody for my misfortune,” he said lightly without burden. He had learned to accept his defeat. Gone was his bloated sense of entitlement.

For a time, there was nothing said between them. Michael was looking longingly at Astrid and her beautiful, long hazelnut hair. This was probably the last time he would see her.

“I heard you are leading the relief force... It’s a long journey to Korelia. Can I get you anything, medicine or a fur coat?” she offered.

Michael thought about the offer and couldn’t help but say what he truly wanted. “My lady, if I could regain my honor, would you still accept my hand?”

Astrid blushed at hearing that so unexpectedly. She glanced elsewhere to regain her composure.

The garden was lackluster this summer, the Hyacinths and Daffodils having already bloomed in spring. But there was a small row in the corner where a type of flower dared to defy the rest.

The purplish pink Cyclamen flower was blooming boldly in the summer as if to give her encouragement. “Sir Michael, don’t take too long, or Mother will arrange another marriage.”

He didn’t flinch. It was only to be expected. “Another?”

“Yes, Lord Lansius had rejected my father’s proposal,” she said with a hint of relief.

“How outrageous! Surely there has been some mis--“

“Michael!” Astrid protested.

“P-pardon me, my lady.” He just couldn’t control himself upon hearing that the love of his life had been rejected by someone. It shocked him and made him vent without thinking.

Astrid shook her head a little. “You know, I heard that the Baron already has two other noblewomen with him. Both are blonde, and one even has the bluest of eyes.”

“High noble daughters?!” Michael couldn’t believe his ears.

Astrid nodded, and Michael’s jaw dropped faster than he could cover it with his hand.

I knew he was more than an ordinary noble, but I didn’t realize just how big the difference is between us...

This also meant that Astrid and Michael could still happen. This realization bolstered Michael’s spirit. “I will do my utmost best, my lady. Please wait for good news from me.”

“Michael, don’t throw yourself into danger. I’m not worth your life,” she warned, feeling bad that Michael needed to venture into a war just to be with her.

Michael bowed deeply and left. Within hours, he was leading the relief troops from White Lake. A few of his friends and longtime retinue were following him. Their fortunes were tied to him, just as Michael’s was now tied to the fate of Korelia.

⠀

***

⠀

White Lake Relief Force

“Riders ahead,” warned the scout who had just returned from the front.

“I see them,” Michael replied after squinting his eye. They had been fully armored since that morning, fearing that the Coalition might have subjugated Korelia town.

Their assumption seemed to be correct. Lansius was unlikely to send riders to intercept when his opponent was on the other side. Meaning, the riders approaching him were Lansius’ opponents.

“Draw them in, I want to trap them between cavalry and infantry,” Michael declared.

“Horsemen ready!” The lieutenant commanded.

Leaving their infantry to prepare their lines behind, Michael led the cavalry forward. He wasn’t disillusioned and aimed only to steal a small skirmish victory while hopefully capturing a man or two for interrogation.

Forty cavalry in shining armor galloped through the grassy plains. Michael counted twelve horsemen in armor from the opposing force.

Upon closer inspection, however, their opponent was raising a Blue and Bronze banner and rode calmly.

Intrigued by this, Michael slowed down his horse to a trot, and his cavalry followed.

“Blue and Bronze chevron, isn’t that the Lord of Korelia’s banner?” his lieutenant asked as they slowed down.

“It seems like it,” Michael commented.

“Impressive, they still have the town under control. Lord Lansius must’ve pulled out some incredible defense,” said another knight in his service.

“Let’s meet up and ask. If they still have the town, then it’ll be a blessing for our reinforcement.” Michael spurred his horse forward.

After trotting a distance under the Korelia summer sun, they met up with the opposing side. A knight rose his right palm and addressed them, “Hail, I am Harold, a knight of House Lansius. To whom am I speaking?”

Lifting his helmet visor, Michael replied, “I am Michael from White Lake; we’re bringing reinforcements.”

“Ah, welcome to Korelia. Let us set up a place so you and your men can rest for today.”

Harold’s calm words, without any hint of urgency, aroused suspicion. “Rest? What about the siege?” Michael blurted out.

The tall knight in dashing armor chuckled. “Don’t worry about it.”

The tone made Michael uneasy. “What do you mean?”

“You’re late by a day. The battle happened yesterday,” the knight explained.

Thinking that the sun was still up and there was a chance of another battle, Michael spoke, “Then we must hurry.”

Harold chuckled. “There’s no need. Korelia has already won.”

Michael’s eye opened wide while his knights looked at each other.

“The Lord of Korelia won the war?” asked Michael carefully.

“Indeed. We’ve won. Korelia is free; the siege has been lifted,” Sir Harold laughed as he spoke.

Harold’s confirmation stunned Robert’s Knights. They couldn’t believe what they had heard.

“Korelia won in just one day?” Michael asked again, this time fully amused by this absurdity.

“Against how many?” one of Michael’s knights asked.

“Six-thousand,” answered Harold proudly.

Michael and his men were astounded. They shook their heads and chuckled, unable to believe what they had heard.

“Come, you’ll see for yourself,” invited Sir Harold as he turned his horse around and trotted with his escorts towards Korelia town.

“What should we do? Do we trust him?” asked his lieutenant, still harboring doubts.

“Get me a runner,” Michael commanded. To prevent a possible elaborate trap, he sent a runner to warn his infantry. He feared a trap might be aimed at his supply train.

“What do we do if Korelia is already freed?” his lieutenant asked as they went.

“Aside from joining the celebration and feast?” quipped Michael.

The man chuckled. “I’ll be more than happy to entertain such a thought.”

“If this is really true, then Lord Lansius is truly a frightening man...” Michael looked left and right, for signs of trouble but found none. Instead, he saw shepherds and their flocks grazing lazily beside the northern riverbank.

Sensing no hostility at all, his lieutenant commented, “I see nothing suspicious. The shepherds acted calmly and there was no glittering of swords or armor from anywhere.”

"Then the Lord of Korelia is indeed a rising star," said Michael without hesitation. "To triumph over such numbers in a single day... I would be more than willing to pledge myself to his cause."

Little did he know that his support, stemming from a blend of respect and uncertainty about his future role after his current appointment, would be the final missing piece in the puzzle that would reshape the fate of Lowlandia.

⠀

***

⠀

Chapter 68

Two Paths

 

Eastern Mansion

One hundred troops, bolstered by the militia, were mobilized under Sir Justin’s command. Sir Harold to lead the column and greet the approaching relief force from White Lake. It was an unusual sight, as the siege had already been lifted, and Korelia had been freed.

Still, the townsfolk made merriment of it and greeted the forty knights like heroes for coming to their aid.

While the forty knights from White Lake entered Korelia, two hundred men, along with their supply carts and camp followers, headed north of Korelia and set up camp near the river.

Inside the Eastern Mansion, with confirmation that the incoming army was indeed reinforcement, Lansius breathed a sigh of relief and adjusted the arm sling for his wrist.

The anticipation for the news gave Hugo time to think, yet he couldn’t unravel how he was supposed to besiege Korimor with limited men and supplies. “My Lord,” Hugo began his case.

“Korimor isn’t like Korelia. Maybe Korelia could be intimidated with just three hundred, but Korimor, even with just a paltry amount of defense, could comfortably fend off a larger number of invaders for months.”

Lansius was content watching him speak, so Hugo continued, “We need more men, siege ladders, siege engines, and plentiful supplies if we plan to starve them out.”

“Too bad they’re burnt,” Lansius commented about the siege engine, regretting the loss of good quality wood and timber that he could reuse. “But we don’t need siege engines. They’re slow and heavy.”

Hugo was piqued. “Slow, My Lord?”

“Yes, we probably would lose the element of surprise if we marched with those siege engines. Even in parts, they are heavy.”

Something didn’t sound right, so Hugo argued, “But, even using the direct northern corridor, the men would still need to spend at least twenty days marching.”

“That’s too slow. I think we can do it in ten days.”

“Ten days?” the deputy blurted out. “That means, a cavalry-only force?”

“Cavalry transport,” Lansius corrected him.

Hugo rubbed his chin after hearing his Lord’s suggestion. While it was possible, it presented a dilemma on its own. “Does My Lord think that the nomads would assist?”

Instead of answering, Lord Lansius gestured for his pageboy to approach. Margo hurriedly presented himself in front of his master, who commanded, “Call the tribesman.”

⠀

***

⠀

The tribesman came to the upper floor of the mansion. It wasn’t as spacious as the hall below, but it was well-made and luxurious to his eyes. He saw the Lord of Korelia standing beside a table with a grand map on top of it.

Approaching with eyes on the ground, he bowed deeply and said, “My Noyan, how may I serve?”

Hugo was intrigued by the calling but didn’t ask, as they were in front of a guest.

“Tribesman, I need to transport men to Korimor using the northern corridor. Is it possible?” asked Lansius without mincing words.

The tribesman, fully aware of this race that Lansius had proposed earlier, replied, “If they can ride, we can provide the horses. If they can’t ride, we can borrow some of the tribes’ wagons they used for yurts.”

Lansius nodded happily, and the tribesman inquired, “How many men does My Noyan wish to move?”

“Two hundred,” he revealed.

The tribesman paused for a moment before commenting, “It would be quite a task.”

“Is it possible?” There was a slight concern in Lansius’ voice.

“Certainly. It can be arranged,” the nomad answered confidently.

Hugo was surprised by the nomad’s approval and asked, “With the hunt for remnants still ongoing, how could you provide more horsemen for this?”

The tribesman, still in his armor despite being indoors, grinned as he looked Hugo in the eye. “Not only our men but our women and children are also expert riders.”

And then he returned his gaze to Lord Lansius. “My Noyan, if you wish for this to happen quickly, then let me return before sundown.”

“One more thing,” said Lord Lansius. The tribesman bowed his head slightly, awaiting command.

The Lord took a deep breath and said, “I need to talk about the Tribes’ future.”

The tribesman didn’t question and simply nodded deeply.

“How many wives does a tribesman usually have?” the Lord asked.

“The prominent member usually has two or three.”

“And how many children does your father have from his wives?”

“Five from my mother and three from my other mother,” the tribesman replied without hesitation.

Lansius nodded, while Hugo was puzzled by where this discussion was going.

“Listen well, if the number of nomadic tribes right now is over one-thousand people, then in less than thirty years, you will probably reach ten times that number.”

The nomad was pleased and declared, “Then you shall be the Noyan of twenty thousand souls.”

Lansius laughed. He didn’t expect such an answer. Only after he took a deep breath did he find his composure. Rubbing his bandaged left wrist on his arm sling, he spoke, “What I’m trying to say is, you’ll find a hard time finding pasture to graze.”

This time, the tribesman was stunned with concern, his eyes widening momentarily.

“I heard some of your tribes ventured into Korimor’s exterior because of the lack of grass west of Korelia. Is that true?”

“Indeed, such is true, My Noyan.”

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. Please report it.

“It’ll be ten times harder in twenty years,” warned Lansius.

“... It cannot be helped, My Noyan. Every family needs their goats and horses, and they need good grass to grow and produce milk.”

“I understand. However, the number of folks will be so much that the grass around Korelia and Korimor alone won’t be enough. Meaning you’ll be moving closer to South Hill or Three Hills, which may cause problems. Worse, the tribes may even fight amongst themselves for water and grazing area.”

The tribesman furrowed his brows before gaining inspiration and asked, “My Noyan, you are telling me this now. Does it mean you have an answer?”

The Lord mulled momentarily, before replying, “I might have.”

Bowing deeply, the tribesman asked, “Pray that you tell us, O Great One.”

Lansius took a sharp breath. “Look at Korelia. The town is six thousand souls. Our people have a lot of shepherds and flocks, but we didn’t need to graze too far from town.”

Furrowing his brows, the tribesman jumped to a conclusion. “Do you wish for us to learn to live in a city?”

“No, it would be taking you out of your roots. That wouldn’t end well,” Lord Lansius said with such clarity as if he had seen it happen before. “What I want is for the nomadic community to make small market posts.”

“Market posts?” The tribesman was piqued.

“Indeed, between here and Midlandia, also here and Three Hills. It should be built within half a day’s journey by cart.”

Hugo started to understand what this was all about.

“I want to build a safe route between Korelia and other cities. With a place to rest, men to provide protection, also food, clean water, and spare horses.”

“So, My Noyan wished for the tribes to guard these market posts,” he started to pick up the idea.

“Since this is my idea, I’ll extend my protection to the family responsible for these market posts,” Lord Lansius smiled. “The area surrounding the post should belong to the family for grazing. I’ll also erect a small tower and assign men as lookouts and patrols.”

The tribesman began to really like this idea, and his genuine smile returned.

“There’s also another thing. Since merchants will come regularly, you can sell them many things, from cheese, meat, leather products, mare’s wine, and even good horses. You should make a decent profit just by keeping the merchants happy and well-protected.”

“It seems that My Noyan has thought this all through. I shall bring this matter to leader Batu and the elders,” he declared passionately.

Lansius took a step closer and tapped the tribesman’s shoulder firmly. “Please, convey my well wishes to them. Also, my gratitude for the horses and riders for two hundred men.”

The tribesman bowed deeply and left with a face even brighter than when he came. He had such worthy news for his elders. Lord Lansius was their Noyan for less than a year, but already thinking far ahead into the future.

In the tribesman’s eyes, Lansius was a leader unlike any other, someone to whom the Nomads could fully pledge their fate.

⠀

***

⠀

Korelia

Audrey sat at the finest table inside the best inn in Korelia, sipping spiced wine to quench her thirst. She had been riding from the Eastern Mansion under the hot summer sun.

In front of her sat Lady Daniella, clad in her blue intricate surcoat that completely hid her Centuria steel cuirass. With the camp burnt and her horse lost in the woods, she had no spare clothes to wear.

In contrast, Audrey was not wearing armor but a black gothic dress. Behind her stood Carla, fully armed and ready.

Outside, the city celebrated the arrival of forty knights from White Lake. The merriment could be heard from inside the inn which remained empty, as only one day had elapsed since the siege, and visitors from outside Korelia had yet to arrive.

Audrey put her silver goblet down, took a deep breath, and began, “So why the change of heart?”

Daniella bowed her head a little. “My Lady,” she addressed her host, as Carla had already informed her of Audrey’s status as the future consort of the Lord of Korelia. “We are merely a free company in search of work. Unfortunately, we stood on opposing sides, but the battle has ended.”

“Lord Lansius only made a pact with Lord Jorge,” Audrey reminded her guest. “We have yet to capture Lord Omin. I believe you Nicopolans are paid by him.”

“That is correct. However, we were contracted only to wage war on Korelia, and we have fulfilled our role.”

Audrey snorted, as a squire she had a different view of loyalty. “So you won’t even try to rescue your employer?”

“Regretfully, my employer has fled and left us with nothing. We’re now forced to fend for ourselves.”

Audrey looked to the side, aware that her gaze might cause discomfort. “I think all of this is pointless,” she said. “I doubt Lord Lansius would want allies who would abandon him as soon as he lost a battle.”

Daniella smiled. “I think this time it will be different.”

“Why?” asked Audrey.

“Unlike Lord Jorge or Lord Omin, the Lord of Korelia is more promising. No mercenary would abandon such a good Lord after just one or two setbacks.”

Audrey smiled, knowing it to be true. Loyal or not, the mercenaries weren’t foolish enough to squander a capable warlord. However, it was hard for her to trust Lady Daniella.

Like most people, Audrey was suspicious of the Nicopolans, especially one who looked as smart and capable as Daniella. "Tell me, are you or your men involved in enslaving the tribesmen?"

Daniella's eyes widened. "I would kill my men if they ever did so."

"You honor your upbringing," Audrey complemented. “We shall ride together sometimes." She finished up her conversation.

Daniella nodded politely. “It would be an honor, My Lady.”

Audrey almost rose but paused halfway, meeting the Nicopolan’s gaze. Her instinct flared up, so she sat down again.

Carla looked at her questioningly, while Daniella remained unmoved.

“The Lord wishes for me to ask you this: How many men defended Korimor castle? How are their defenses and garrison? Also, tell us about their leader.”

Daniella's eyes widened. She couldn't believe the implications of the question. Despite their miraculous victory, Korelia's forces were small and had suffered high numbers of wounded and dead. Thus, she hadn't expected swift reprisal. Yet, clearly, Lord Lansius had entertained the idea, making Daniella realize just how completely and swiftly the Korelians had turned the tables on the Western Lords.

⠀

***

⠀

Lansius

Inside his private chamber, the victor of this war, Lansius, sat comfortably on the bed. As he had expected, his retainers barred him from going outside. After Hugo and the tribesman had left the mansion, the servants brought Lansius a serving of warm broth with a duck egg and gruel.

It was okay, but he didn’t like the taste of the jumbo egg yolk. Nevertheless, his staff insisted it was good for bruises and bone healing.

With marriage planned for next week, Lansius wanted to be in good shape, so he consumed the broth despite the bad aftertaste. He found himself wishing he could have simply fried the egg or salted it.

With Audrey gone to meet with Daniella, the upper floor of the mansion was quiet. So quiet that Lansius could hear the ringing in his ears, a byproduct of training and taking too many hits on the helmet.

A small price to pay for victory...

All the tension from yesterday’s battle had been eroded, although as he had experienced before, the horrors of war would linger for many months to come. He had seen flashes of men getting trampled beneath his destrier, but he was neither disturbed nor afraid.

He was simply mesmerized by how vivid the recollection was. Lansius shook his head; he didn’t want to ponder about it. Afterward, he drew a deep breath.

If only they knew that leaving people with nothing to do can actually hurt more than it helps.

He wished he had something to work as a distraction, otherwise, his brain would play those charging and trampling memories on repeat.

He drew another sigh, realizing he had yet to visit Sterling. Lansius missed the squire’s company. The young squire possessed a good intellect and critical thinking that made him a valuable discussion partner.

Lansius considered calling Cecile, but he knew she had too much on her plate right now. Left with nothing else to do, he turned his attention to the parchments on the desk and rose from the bedside.

He approached the desk, pulled out the small wooden chair, and tried to get comfortable. With just one hand, he slowly put away the stacks of parchment to the side. He wanted a fresh parchment for this one.

There was a plan he had yet to put on paper. His favorite quotes came to mind:

Knowledge isn’t power; it’s merely potential. Power comes from applying that knowledge. Wisdom comes from learning when and why to apply that knowledge.

Lansius had been pondering for a long time about Lowlandia, ever since he realized he was going to be independent in this land.

The Great Lowlandia, with all its politics, blood feuds, and problems, was a province in a state of war. With the Imperium failing and chaos at the door, Lansius realized that a drastic measure was needed to rein in the province. A half-hearted attempt would backfire and lead to a bigger tragedy.

He saw only two options. The first historically occurred on the steppe plains near the Onon River, leading to the birth of the largest Empire humankind had ever seen. Its method was effective yet inhumane.

History tells the story of Temujin of the Onon River, who, during his wars, ordered all men taller than the wheels of an ox-cart to be killed. He spared only the women and young boys who wouldn’t remember their fathers or uncles. In this way, Temujin – who would be remembered as Genghis Khan – ended the tribal blood feuds and paved the way for the unification of Mongolia.

Lansius wanted no part in such a method. So, he was left with another, less direct but equally drastic solution.

Thus, he sharpened his quill pen carefully, prepared his ink, and wrote several words:

征 sei

夷 i

大 dai

将 shō

軍 gun

⠀

***

⠀

Chapter 69

Blooming

 

Sterling was recovering in the guest chamber inside the castle, one of the fortunate ones who survived the cold grip of death. The night before, many had succumbed to their injuries. Even among those who seemed to be recovering, a few were suddenly overcome by fever and died.

He was lucky that the Saint Candidate had treated him; otherwise, the pain and swelling in his crushed leg would have been unbearable. The afflicted limb was now wrapped tightly, supported by wooden planks to keep it immobile.

Since this morning, Sterling remained stable throughout the day. His fever had subsided, and he was restless, eager to do something. The physician, however, insisted that he rest.

Thus, he spent his day confined to bed, his only distractions being visits from comrades or castle staff. But as the sun dipped low on the horizon, people returned to their chores, leaving him alone.

The door to his chamber was intentionally left ajar to let in the fresh air and allow Sterling to call for help if needed. He was pleasantly surprised when a golden blonde girl entered. At first glance, she resembled Cecile, but her behavior quickly revealed that she was someone else.

"Who are you?" he asked.

The girl looked straight at him, her eyes narrowing as she examined his face. "Ah, you must be Sterling the squire." Her voice filled with recognition. "I'm Claire."

"Claire? Then you must be... I apologize. I'm so sorry for your loss."

Claire waved it off. "It's not your fault or anything. War is war. Father taught me to be ready."

Her words rejuvenated Sterling. He never thought that Sir Callahan's daughter was this courageous. "I applaud your bravery."

"Your praise is misplaced." The fifteen-year-old girl approached Sterling and pointed at the darkened area around her eyes, explaining, "I already cried a lot before coming here."

"It's still amazing." He was genuinely impressed by her composure.

Claire giggled, showing one missing tooth.

"What happened with your tooth?"

"Oh, I tried to ride the old warhorse. She didn't like me and threw me off. Bad lady!" she said happily with a grin.

Sterling nodded. Claire looked almost exactly like Cecile, just a tad shorter since she was younger; but that was where the similarities ended. While the older sister was calm and in control, the younger sister was bubbly and full of smiles.

"I hope it'll grow better than the old one," she commented about her tooth. "Otherwise, it's going to ruin my already slim chance of good marriage."

Sterling continued to nod at her story. He grew to enjoy her company.

"You know, without a father or mother, and being the second daughter with no estate, nobody is going to ask for me. Not that I care, but it still feels awful."

The squire chuckled, and Claire laughed too.

"I'm sure your sister will take care of you," Sterling reassured her.

"That I do not doubt. Actually, my father always said that if I were quiet, people might like me as much as they did my sister when she served as Lady in Waiting for Lady Astrid."

"No, stay true to yourself," Sterling disagreed, much to Claire's surprise.

"But why? Don't men like quiet and obedient women?"

"Not at all. There are also many who like brave and outspoken women," he spoke his mind.

"I see," she nodded with sparkles in her eyes. "What kind of men like a bratty and noisy girl like me then?"

He pondered for a moment. "Smart men who can match your intellect."

"Intellect?" she giggled. "I possess so little of it, unlike my sister."

Sterling pondered again and found the words. "Claire, you have your father's charisma."

"Charisma?" she blinked, her face turned serious like her sister.

"You have a charm and confidence that allows you to connect easily with people."

Claire listened intently; their gazes met, and it was Sterling who blushed as he realized just how pretty she looked with her golden eyes and long platinum-blonde hair.

He would never admit it, but he had a thing for blondes. With larger-than-life figures such as Felicity and Hannei around, the young squire was convinced that they were the golden fruit of this world.

Even amongst the staff and guards, there was never a lack of secret admirers—men who would gladly throw their lives away to protect them.

Oddly enough, while Sterling saw Cecile every day, he never felt anything toward her. Maybe even some slight jealousy since the Lord seemed to trust her better than him.

Watching Sterling turn quiet, Claire quickly used her palm to feel the man's forehead, fearing he may develop a sudden fever.

"It doesn't feel hot, but why are you turning red?" she asked, worried. "Are your legs in pain? Should I call for help?"

"No, no, I'm okay," Sterling assured her, his own heart beating fast.

Claire still looked worried, so he tried another approach: "I just told you that you have your father's charm, and I meant it. I barely know you, but I feel like I'm about to fall for you."

Most girls would laugh this off, dismissing it as a cheap and desperate line from a youngster. Even Sterling expected her to mock him. Yet, Claire smiled warmly.

"Gratitude for your kind words."

"You're not going to mock me?" he asked carefully.

"Why would I? You sound so sincere," Claire put her hand on Sterling's.

He smiled and hinted softly, "My feelings are genuine."

The girl looked happy, but this time there was some bitterness on her face. "You're the Lord's confidant... With the Lord, a rising star, you too will rise high. I doubt you'll have a lack of honored ladies seeking marriage."

He furrowed his brows and protested, "That's not true."

She hid her hands behind her back and breathe deeply. "I only have my father's hair and maybe a horse as a dowry. You'll have a bad life if you're going to ask for my hand."

Sterling saw that behind Claire's bubbly behavior lay a maturity beyond her years. She was a girl with a strong heart, able to face her father's tragic demise, and had a level-headed view of life. Unlike those who sought honeyed words and the promise of an easy life, she didn't seem afraid of hardship.

"Claire, keep talking. The more you talk, the more I like you."

She was stunned. "Do you mean it?"

"I do. Tell me about the old warhorse, or about your father. I'm keen to learn about them."

This time, Claire blushed, never before had someone wanted her to continue talking. Even her father usually just shrugged or shook his head after listening to her so much. "You don't have to. This is just because you feel sorry for my loss, right?"

"No, I like listening to people." Sterling looked to the door, saw nobody, and whispered, "Lord Lansius rarely talks, and neither does your sister. It's easy to get bored."

Unauthorized duplication: this narrative has been taken without consent. Report sightings.

"Ah, so the Lord of Korelia is also the quiet type." Claire covered her grinning mouth.

"They are," Sterling confirmed happily, and the two chuckled.

Afterward, there was an awkward silence until Claire broke the impasse. "I'll only be here for a number of days, but we should be friends."

Instead of answering, Sterling said gently, "Think about my offer. If you wish to know me better then you can ask your sister."

Claire let out a sigh. "Life is so unfair... An hour ago, I was worried about so many things, including my future marriage. Then, I checked a random room on a whim and was suddenly proposed marriage."

For daughters of low nobility like Claire, marriage was largely decided by their parents. She had heard many times that her mother had only talked to her father on the day they married. "But isn't this too fast? Or are you just playing with me?"

"Playing with you..? Claire, your sister is the Lord's cup-bearer. The same Lord that all of Lowlandia feared. He'll kill me if I try something stupid."

"Mmm, but even thinking to take my hand is indeed stupid. How will you argue against this if they asked you?"

Stifling a laugh, Sterling said, "I'll just tell him that I'm merely following his lead."

"His lead? Oh, you mean, how Lord Lansius will marry Captain Audrey?" Claire guessed.

Sterling looked smug. "I'm just emulating My Lord's greatness."

Claire giggled, her eyes shifting to Sterling and his wounded leg. "It's not fun if only I talk. You should tell me about yourself. I want to know more about you," she stammered.

"Sure, sure, there's a chair over there, please sit and let me tell you about my life or my battles," said the squire energetically forgetting about his pained leg.

...

 

Meanwhile, on the castle's upper floor.

"I can't find her," whispered Sigmund, who was temporarily overseeing the castle's security.

Nearby, the Saint Candidate was sleeping soundly, having healed many wounded throughout the night. Her clothes were stained with blood, and she likely lacked the stamina to clean herself, thus collapsed on a daybed. Now, Cecile was fanning her with giant duck feathers.

The cup-bearer wore a grey mourning robe and looked concerned, sad, and equally tired. Now, her sister was lost somewhere in the castle, adding more pressure to her mind.

"I'm so sorry. I should've guided her myself," Felis said, her brow furrowing in confusion as she wrapped the blood-stained apron. She had just finished administering care in the Great Hall's infirmary.

"Please don't be, My Lady. I'm sure you're also busy," said Cecile gently.

"I'll keep looking for her," Sigmund reassured the ladies and left the Great Chamber.

Felis approached Cecile and patted her shoulder. "Don't worry. I'm sure she'll be fine, maybe just chatting with some staff."

 

***

⠀Audrey, Eastern Mansion

Night fell, and Audrey returned to the mansion with half of her cavalry to bolster defenses. With the White Lake contingent camped north of the city, and Lord Jorge's Black Knights east of the forest, there was no lack of threats to Korelia.

Even within the city, in the billets, they had hundreds of captured knights and squires. With the passing of Sir Callahan, and Hugo preparing a campaign against Korimor, only Sir Justin and Calub were left to handle the situation.

As Lansius had commanded, they put enormous effort into avoiding problems. Handling captured men was a risky and delicate matter, especially when they were trained fighters.

Worse, Korelia was going to take in over a thousand captured men in the following days. The enormous amount kept Lansius' staff on edge. Thus, out of concern, Audrey took her light cavalry to the eastern mansion as a precaution. Sir Harold welcomed the additional men, as he too felt tense because of the situation.

When she arrived on the second floor, Margo greeted her with a bow.

"How's the Lord?" Audrey asked, slightly fatigued from all her dealings.

"My Lord had an early supper and fell asleep when the weather turned cold," Margo replied.

Audrey nodded and looked around the private hall, whose small chandelier had been lit. "May I bother you to ask the kitchen to get me some gruel?"

"Certainly, My Lady." Margo quickly left the hall, leaving Audrey alone.

She thought about the lack of security for Lansius and felt amused. With Sterling injured and Robert drawn to handle the matter of the army, the Lord had no squire for himself.

Audrey slowly walked toward the master chamber and took a peek; she saw the lantern was lit safely and Lansius was soundly asleep. The window wasn't opened too wide, and everything seemed calm.

Satisfied, Audrey closed the door back and stood in front of it. She felt the sword's hilt on her waist, took a deep breath, and silently guarded the chamber.

She was still a squire at heart and no amount of spoiling from Lansius or her new status as the Lord's consort could change her. In Audrey's mind, Lansius was her charge, and she would gladly sacrifice herself for him.

 

***

Lansius

The Lord of Korelia had been sleeping since sundown and awakened a few hours after midnight. He was covered in sweat and threw his thin linen blanket aside. His throat was parched and he slowly got out of bed and walked toward the table.

He poured water from a silver jar into his cup and drank it down.

"Ahh," he sighed, feeling the cool water hit the spot. He took a deep breath and gazed around his room, enjoying the satisfying cool breeze that came from the window. Soon, he forgot the strange dreams that had been plaguing him.

He drank another cup and felt refreshed. Feeling the sweat on his face, he approached the stone basin on the corner and washed his face using the clean water from a copper basin.

Lansius felt so alive and sharp and knew he likely wouldn't get sleepy until he saw the sunrise.

"You're awake?" a familiar voice called from the door's direction.

He saw her just outside the door. "Drey, why are you awake at this time?"

"May I come in?"

"Of course," said Lansius as he dried his face using a clean linen cloth.

"Are you hungry, do you need anything?" Audrey asked once she closed the door behind her.

"Eh?" he muttered and then remember the unpleasant giant egg yolk. "Please, don't let them bring me those duck egg broth again. I've had them for lunch, after lunch, and supper."

Audrey giggled hearing Lansius' complaint. "But it's good for you. You're getting livelier."

Her comment made him chuckle. "It's more because of a good sleep."

She responded only with a smile. Even under the dim light, her tanned skin looked gorgeous.

He remembered what time it was and furrowed his brows. "Drey, why are you not sleeping?"

"Oh, we have nobody to stand guard, so I volunteered for one."

"You what?" Lansius asked, fully surprised.

"I'm still a squire you know, I'm capable," she jumped into conclusion.

"No, I'm not questioning that. But you're..." Lansius hesitated, still finding it odd to call her wife. "I mean, I can't have my future wife to stand guard for me."

"Well, I can't have Margo to do it. He can't fight that well and he needed sleep so he can perform his duties tomorrow."

Lansius hung the linen cloth to dry and approached the brunette in a black gothic dress. "Have you eaten?" he asked, wrapping his arms around her.

She smiled at his gentle approach but said softly, "Watch your left wrist."

"It's not as hurt as yesterday, just itchy."

They finally embraced like a couple, feeling each other's warmth. It was long overdue.

"You smell nice," she commented.

"Must be the fresh hazel twig and clove toothpaste," he answered, caressing her hair.

Audrey tiptoed, and they shared several kisses until she giggled. "Lans, that's enough."

"A bit more?" asked Lansius passionately.

They ended up on the bed cuddling and enjoying each other's company. The only thing that barred them from going all in was the mourning period. They were fully aware that at sunrise they would need to attend the mass funeral.

Nobody spoke about it, but the thought always lingered in their heads. Thus, the couple simply lay together on the bed, finding comfort in idle chatter. She told him about her days, about Daniella, and how she had brought her cavalry to the mansion for added protection.

"Get some shut-eye, I can guard you," said Lansius.

She giggled at the thought. "No, I'll wait for Margo. He'll wake up in an hour, then I can get some shut-eye."

"Then I'll have you for another hour then."

"Hey, your wrist, be careful," she warned him as he maneuvered on top of her and kissed her passionately.

And then the door creaked open, followed by the sounds of female servants tumbling, groaning, giggling, and then running away from the scene.

"Oh, yeah, I didn't lock the door," said Audrey with a grin.

Lansius chuckled, got up from the bed, and went outside. He saw several maids still hurrying to escape. "Hey, be careful. Don't run, or you'll fall and bruise your knees," he warned.

"Excuse us, My Lord, excuse us," the last one stammered, running away with a reddened face. Meanwhile, Margo stood bewildered, a blanket still draped over his shoulder.

"I swear Lady Audrey convinced me she'd take guard duty," the pageboy reported.

"No, that's alright. She's with me," replied Lansius with a smile.

Margo looked around. "Where?"

"On the bed..." Lansius paused and regretted his choice of word. Margo's face now turned red.

"No, don't let your imagination go wild. She's sleepy, so I lent her the bed," explained Lansius.

"Ah," Margo muttered innocently.

"What seems to be the problem?" Audrey emerged from the chamber, exuding a threatening aura.

Margo stiffened his back and shook his head. "No, My Lady. Just some servants on fire watch getting-"

Lansius chuckled, dismissing the commotion with a wave of his hand. He knew the maids were easily frightened in new places and often patrolled in groups. "Let's not wake up the entire mansion," he said and then turned to Audrey. "You mentioned your cavalrymen are here?"

"Yes, stationed on the mansion's grounds," she replied.

"Good. Margo, get the guards on duty to wake Dietrich. I wish to see him."

"Why so early?" asked Audrey while Margo put his blanket away and walked to the stairs.

"Well, I'm awake, so better to work than to waste time. And with him around, he can guard me, so you can get some sleep."

"Ah," she nodded. "... So, what are you working on?"

"Just some plans, I needed someone to ask."

"You can ask me," she pouted.

Lansius shrugged. "I can't think clearly with you around."

"Why is that?" She became curious.

"I see two big reasons."

She didn't get it at first until she followed Lansius' gaze to her bosom. She felt annoyed and crossed her arms, quipping, "It seems you're healthy enough to continue training."

"Nope, my wrist is broken and I still need to do well on our honeymoon," he quipped back.

"My Lord, you're already so lusty, you don't need a month of sweet mead," Audrey replied, smugly hinting at the customary aphrodisiac drink.

"Ohoho, spicy," he laughed at their silly banter. "Just the way I like it."

Audrey sighed but refocused her eyes, and straightened her posture. "My Lord, as your Captain and future consort, I wished to learn of your plan." Her tone was polite but firm.

Lansius chuckled. "Since you asked so nicely... Tomorrow, after we visit the fields of glory, I'll attempt to bridge the divide between East and West."

Her eyes widened in disbelief. "To bridge? Are you aiming to unify the province?"

Lansius nodded, feeling the weight of responsibility settle heavily on his shoulders. "With Lord Jorge and the White Lake's commander in Korelia, we might manage to set Lowlandia on the right path. Pray that it happens, or else I fear that all this victory might be nothing but a bubble of happiness in the sea of tragedy."

 

***⠀

Chapter 70

The Empire of the Steppes

 

Lansius

The Lord of Korelia yawned and stretched out. He had just dictated a letter to Batu, officially informing him about the Market Post route and urging the nomadic tribes to produce more yurts. He also conveyed his wish to purchase or borrow more yurts to house the one-thousand captured men intended to work in the stone quarry.

The yurts alone wouldn’t be enough, but they would be a welcomed addition. Right now, all Korelia had was the shaft in the quarries that could be used as makeshift tunnel housing.

According to the staff, the shaft could house at least a hundred. For the unlucky rest, they probably had to resort to building mud houses or rammed earth hovels. It would suffice for summer and fall, but just like their tents counterpart, it would be inadequate for winter.

Without a good source of timber, Lansius felt stuck. He hadn’t expected that housing a thousand would be so problematic.

Should I just tell them to sleep in the trenches and put some cover over their heads...?

He pondered the problem but ultimately gave up on it for the moment. With two months left of summer, he felt he could return to solve this another time.

At least I have something as a last resort.

Outside, the sun was beginning to shine, coloring the dusk skies in glorious red against the dark of night.

“Umm, My Lord,” Dietrich asked from the desk, he just finished the letter. “I’m not a scribe so my writing isn’t good.”

“Not too bad, better than Hugo but less than Calub,” replied Lansius lightly as he read the finished letter. “This will do.”

“You’ll send it for real?” Dietrich sounded nervous.

“Yes, you’ll send it personally to Batu, and read it yourself, so it should be fine. Also, bring the two biggest duck eggs we have as gifts.”

Dietrich nodded, memorizing the command.

“That is all; you can leave now. The sun is rising soon.”

“Yes, My Lord.” Dietrich began to put the writing tools on the shelf.

“Bring fresh wildflowers when you return,” Lansius quipped.

The stalwart but comical man let out a chuckle, gave a polite bow, and left the chamber.

Now, Lansius was alone, readying his mind for the upcoming day.

To think, I‘ll negotiate the fate of Lowlandia after a mass funeral service...

The art of negotiation required him to be in prime psychological condition. While he could postpone, time was running out. This was the second day, and he needed to strike while the iron was hot.

Lansius knew he needed to shape this new balance of power, or else it would be filled with mistrust and prejudice. If such were to happen, then the tragedy of Lowlandia, a province in a perpetual warring state, would never end.

Thus, Lansius sat down, cross-legged, on the carpeted floor, and did something he had never done before. He sat still, emptied his mind, and meditated.

...

 

Time passed, yet the turmoil in his mind remained. He wasn't good at this, but now his thoughts were sharp. He could sense the points he needed to make and the arguments he should advance.

The door to his chamber opened, and Audrey walked in. She watched him on the floor and, instead of questioning, gave a sweet smile. “Morning, My Lord.”

Lansius jumped up to greet her.

Audrey extended her right hand toward Lansius. “Shall we have breakfast before the sun rises higher?”

This time, the somberness of her voice was evident. It was officially the start of the mourning day.

Lansius took her hand, and they walked together. After a light breakfast, it was time to pay their respects to the fallen in their last hour under the sun.

 

***

 

Audrey

Today was mourning day, the day they buried the dead and wept over them. After sunrise, they laid the brave militia and troops to rest. When the sun rose higher, they laid the men-at-arms and the knights to rest.

As people increased in status, they received better treatment, even in death. A wooden coffin was used, and a mound was raised.

Audrey watched when Calub broke the news of Sir Callahan’s demise. Lansius, as expected, was distraught. He hadn’t known Callahan had perished in battle. Everyone, even Audrey, had kept it from him.

The late Callahan was Lansius’ mentor and trusted diplomat, and also the father of the cup-bearer. Thus the loss was personal and tremendous.

Overcoming his grief, Lansius led the solemn procession and watched as his mentor’s coffin was lowered to its final resting place.

“The last hour under the sun,” the phrase was muttered by thousands who attended the mass funeral.



Beside Lansius, Cecile, covered in a grey cloak, tried to hold back her tears to no avail; she wept and cried her heart out. Surprisingly, Calub was there to comfort her.

Felicity was also present, wrapping her arms around Claire, Sir Callahan’s little daughter. She too wept with reddened eyes.

The Marshal, Sir Justin, sat at the back. Despite his injured hip, he directed the whole proceedings with the assistance of Sir Harold, Hugo, and the other squires.

A case of content theft: this narrative is not rightfully on Amazon; if you spot it, report the violation.

The Lord of Korelia observed the burial solemnly until a freshly made mound was raised. He then knelt in front of Sir Callahan’s mound.

The gravestone was yet to be engraved, so a simple wooden stake was placed. Lansius took summer wildflowers and a jug of good wine from Margo’s wicker basket, sipped it, and poured the rest into the earth. Those around him followed his example.

Audrey took the wooden cup, sipped the wine, found it good, and poured it into the rows of mounds.

Resting beside Sir Callahan were two other knights, one cavalryman, one squire, over thirty men-at-arms, and seventy militia. Despite Lansius’ miraculous victory, these men had paid the ultimate price.

Aside from this burial, there exists another mass burial, dug and prepared by captured non-nobles from the Coalition. Lansius had told her that he wished to visit, but Audrey persuaded him not to.

She didn’t wish for him to shoulder the guilt. His retinues would shoulder it for him.

As the last drink to honor the passing was over, there was no prayer but only a mention of hope for the deceased to meet the Ancients and accompany them on their great hunt.

Looking at how Lansius carried himself, Audrey was no longer worried. The Lord looked calm and only slightly saddened. It seemed that his battles had seasoned him; he was no longer the clueless clerk from Bellandia.

The sun was getting hotter, and as soon as the ceremony was over, at Sir Justin’s behest, Audrey and Sir Harold spirited Lansius back to town. Despite Lansius’ surprisingly stable condition, they didn’t want to risk him becoming lost in remorse.

The reason his top retainers were so protective was a general feeling that the Lord had brought them a great victory, and he deserved peace of mind, not guilt.

 

***

 

The Lord of Korelia

Lansius still couldn't fully process the death of his tutor. His mind registered the loss, but his heart had yet to feel the pain. He didn't even feel angry at his people for hiding Sir Callahan's death from him, and this realization bothered him.

Have I become cold and heartless?

He questioned whether he had grown so accustomed to death that even someone as important as Sir Callahan meant little to him. Yet he found no answer as there was so little time to process.

Lansius and his entourage rode back to Korelia. Just outside the town entrance, they were greeted by Roger. Behind the squire stood two knights in plain clothes, while another squire tended to their horses.

The Lord reined in his palfrey horse, bringing it to a gentle stop, and the rest of his entourage followed.

Roger bowed his head, a generous smile on his face, and heralded, “My Lord, the reinforcements from White Lake: Sir Michael and his lieutenant.”

Lansius studied the one-eyed Michael, a man he had never met despite having fought against him in last year's trenches. It was the same battle where Roger had nearly lost his life, saved only by Lansius' insistence on dragging him through the red, muddy trenches.

Meanwhile, Michael was prepared to hear scorn or censure. He had come late to Lord Lansius' defense. Thus, he bowed his head slightly, maintaining a straight but non-threatening posture as he waited for what would come next.

“Sir Michael,” Lansius greeted him kindly and said, “Ride with me.”

Sir Michael and his lieutenant complied, mounted their horses, and followed the Lord northwest.

The Lord of Korelia brought his guests, along with Audrey, Sir Harold, and Hugo, to an abandoned village near the forest. There, he found a scenic spot and ordered a field command tent to be erected and food to be brought from the castle.

When everything was ready, Lansius sent Hugo to invite Lord Jorge to a meeting.

The Lord of Three Hills arrived with Sir Arius and Sir Morton, wearing brigandines instead of their plate armor. Due to the mage knight’s presence, Sir Harold, Audrey, and Hugo stayed close to Lansius.

Despite some underlying tension, Lansius welcomed the two parties under the ivory tent, furnished with scissor-folding wooden chairs and tables. The table he prepared was U-shaped. Lansius sat at the center like a mediator while Lord Jorge, Sir Arius, and Sir Morton were seated on the right, and Sir Michael and his lieutenant were seated on the left.

Before anything serious was discussed, Lansius had arranged for hearty meals from Korelia castle to be brought forward. Plates of food and seasonal fruits were soon distributed, and lunch commenced.

Just like Lansius, Lord Jorge had also attended a mass funeral service that morning, so emotions were running high. But the meals seemed to keep everyone at ease.

They closed the meal by sharing a few jugs of ale between them. It wasn’t merry, but the atmosphere between ex-enemies and rivals was amicable and relaxed.

...

 

The lunch was over, and Sir Morton, wishing to prevent any issues between the three parties, addressed the host: “Lord Lansius, on behalf of my Lord, please accept my gratitude for your hospitality. If there’s nothing else, we don’t want to overstay our welcome.”

However, Lansius raised his hand to stop him. “Please, sit a while longer. Since the West and East have met here, I believe we could solve a problem or two.”

Lord Jorge felt there was nothing wrong with this, so he entertained the request and gave a nod of approval to his mage knight, who then relaxed his back and prepared to listen. Similarly, Sir Arius followed his cousin’s instruction without a fuss.

Meanwhile, across the table, Sir Michael’s eye narrowed, caught by surprise by the mention of East and West. He tried to guess what the Lord of Korelia was planning.

“I apologize for my brashness,” Lansius stated. “But I believe I might know how to solve Lowlandia’s problems.”

As he expected, the statement drew the attention of both parties and his own retinue.

He continued, “It’s not hard. The question is, do we have the will to do it?”

His words piqued everyone’s interest.

Feeling it to be cryptic, Sir Morton asked, “My Lord, just what do you mean by that?”

The Lord of Korelia gazed at the mage knight. “I mean, I know how to stop the war in Lowlandia.”

The tent fell into a stunned silence at the blunt answer. Only Lansius and Audrey kept their composure.

“Apology, Lord Lansius, but please enlighten me,” asked Jorge. “Do you have a way to bring peace to these war-blighted lands without killing half the barons, dividing their lands, and forcing their daughters to marry?”

“I do, in fact, have not one but two ways to bring peace to Lowlandia,” Lansius revealed.

“Then by all means, My Lord, please let us know,” for the first time, the one-eyed knight, Sir Michael, found his words.

Lansius gazed at the one-eyed knight and explained, “As I said before, it’s not hard... To solve the problem in Lowlandia, we simply need to house all the Lords in one place.”

A murmur of disbelief rippled through the room, but Lansius raised his voice and pushed through, saying, “I will build noble rows, a grand bazaar, gardens, guild halls, and a city granary, large enough to ward off years of bad harvest.”

His plan dispelled some of the gravest doubts, signaling that these were more than mere empty words. The fact that Lansius had thought this through was enough to warrant serious consideration.

Lord Jorge shifted in his seat and asked, “Do you propose that simply by putting the barons together, we will reach this lofty goal?”

“The noble rows in my plan aren’t just villas,” remarked Lansius. He knew that the high nobles had areas designated as noble rows in the Capital, where they could build their villas to stay while visiting.

Lord Jorge furrowed his brows. “Then what is it?”

“Permanent homes,” Lansius revealed to a chorus of murmurs and head shaking.

Nevertheless, he continued, “I want all the barons’ families to live in Korelia, and only the eldest son, younger brother, or cousin is to continue governing the land.”

“Pardon me, My Lord,” a question rose from the left side. “You said about only allowing the eldest son, brother, or cousin to govern the lands? What about the Barons themselves?” asked the one-eyed knight.

Lansius decided not to hide anything. “The Barons may return every two years to handle internal affairs. They should arrive in the Spring and leave before Winter. However, their families must remain in Korelia."

Michael knitted his brows. “Why is such an arrangement needed for the family?”

“If their family remains in Korelia together with the other Barons’ families, then everybody can be sure that nobody is planning anything seditious behind our backs.”

Michael was caught off guard by the frank answer, as were the others.

“The whole problem in Lowlandia is that nobody can trust their neighbors,” explained Lansius. “Distrust breeds suspicion, just as jealousy breeds hatred. The race to arm ourselves will eventually lead to endless strife.”

There was an uncomfortable air emanating from the two parties.

“My Lord and Sirs, I assure you, this is the best way to solve the main issue,” Lansius reiterated, his voice firm with conviction.

However, only doubt hung from the two sides.

Lord Jorge drew a heavy sigh and asked, “Lord Lansius, I truly admire your thoughts, but why do you put so much work into solving Lowlandia’s problems? I mean you’re not even born here.”

Lansius felt the stares from both sides. Their thoughts had been shaped by a world full of feuds and conflict. They knew that change was needed, but they were trapped in a mindset of conquer or be conquered. The only saving grace was that none that sat in there had any connection with slavery. Three Hills and White Lake had no part in the raids conducted by the Nicopolans mercenaries, or benefited from slave economy, otherwise it would be hard for him to conduct negotiation without addressing the elephant in the room.

The tension inside the tent ran high, and all eyes were on Lansius, waiting for his next move.

 

***

 

Chapter 71

Prepare for Peace

 

Outside the tent, servants and a pageboy loaded the dirty plates and trays to be returned to the castle. The wind breezed through, bringing relief from the hot summer sun. For them, despite being in mourning, today turned out to be a lovely day. However, inside the tent, the discussion concerning the fate of Lowlandia continued.

Facing stiff reactions, Lansius carefully reminded them, “This is why I told you all from the start: I know how to solve this problem, but the question is, do we have the will to do it?”

Like a tug of war, the discussion returned to where it started.

Right now, the two parties seemed neutral instead of disinterested in the idea. However, the idea that all the Lords of Lowlandia needed to live in the same place and that place would be Korelia was quite preposterous, if not uncomfortably absurd.

The White Lake’s knight, Sir Michael was especially worried about the nobles’ reaction in Lord Robert’s court. After all, they were the ones who banded together to oust and disgrace him last year. He didn’t want himself or worse, Lord Robert, to lose favor.

Thus, while he had high hope for Lord Lansius’ idea, he thought it was simply too risky. Not to mention, for either Michael or Lord Robert, the idea offered little to no foreseeable gain.

Lord Jorge of Three Hills was in a similar situation. He showed openness but had yet to see any real advantage in Lansius’ proposal. As a noble of his stature, he was the one who dictated peace or war. Thus, he seemed to have little to gain.

Meanwhile, Sir Morton had a different idea. The mage knight entertained the thought of peace. He had seen so much war and what it cost his brethren and the people around them.

For him, peace outweighed the discomfort made to the Barons. Still, he needed more than just promises or resolve before showing his support.

Lansius himself, without knowing either of the two parties personally and based only on the intel he had gathered, only counted their response as nothing more than feigned interest.

“My Lords, and Sirs, this isn’t hard,” he tried again from another angle. “Fighting a war is hard. Burying dead comrades is hard. Paying the ransom is hard.”

Lansius gained some nods and continued, “Rebuilding a destroyed city or managing a famine from a bad harvest is difficult. But relocating the Barons and their families to live in a newly constructed lavish complex may be complex, but not hard.”

Now, he received some contemplative looks, and he knew he needed to keep this momentum. “The people of Lowlandia are suffering. Harvests have steadily dwindled. The Imperium is facing a major crisis, and soon there may be more wars than we could ever imagine.”

Lord Jorge shot his gaze at Lansius momentarily. He was curious about something but wasn’t comfortable bringing the topic up.

Despite the lack of response, Lansius pressed on, “I believe we all share the same goal: to have a good life. Good houses for the men, fine mansions for the lords, and the means to keep our lands.” He directed the last part at Lord Jorge, who nodded in agreement.

Turning to Sir Michael, Lansius followed up, “To marry, to have children, to enjoy a good harvest, to raise fine horses, to live happily. We share a common goal.”

Lansius’ pitch for a common goal seemed to be his most effective.

Feeling more confident, Lansius gazed at his guests and spoke plainly, “We can all live in peace, no more blood feud, no more rivalry. We’re all young enough to start anew.”

The air of doubt lessened, but there wasn’t enough concrete benefit for either Three Hills or White Lake. Though the idea was promising, it failed to secure wholehearted support.

Sir Arius leaned forward. The dashing and lordly cousin of Jorge caught everyone’s attention by asking, “Lord Lansius, your plan seems meticulous and promising, but I doubt the barons will enjoy living under someone else’s roof.”

Lansius mulled over the issues of freedom of movement, security, and even the ability to defend themselves. He then answered, “Any noble can have a grand compound in Korelia, as ornate and large as they desire, complete with enough guards to ensure security.”

“Just how big will the security be?” Sir Arius asked again.

“I think we can agree on the number later, but say a hundred servants and a hundred guardsmen if they wish.”

Sir Arius’ expression indicated that he found the answer to be agreeable.

Finding his chance, Lansius further explained, “I have plans to maintain a ready force of a thousand men in Korelia. Four-hundred from my own force, six-hundred from all the nobles that join in.”

Sir Arius kept his gaze, and Lansius continued, “With only four hundred, you don’t have to fear that I can overpower the nobles. This new army will be a reaction force if something threatens us.”

Lansius’ elaborate plan and extraordinary confidence bothered Lord Jorge. When his cousin seemed satisfied, he cleared his throat and asked, “Lord Lansius, you seem so sure about this whole plan. Has this method ever been used?”

Lansius met the Lord of Three Hills’ gaze and clarified, “Indeed, this method is known in my birthplace.”

His answer led to murmurs.

“So it’s true that you’re not from this continent,” Lord Jorge muttered. “So what happened to the nobles who followed this plan? Were they successful, and what do you call this... method?”

“It’s called Shogunate; it means a command tent.” Lansius looked around the tent and added, “How befitting.”

The comment managed to amuse Lord Jorge. “So, has this Shogunate been successful?”

“In my birthplace, one of its aspect, the Sankin-kōtai the alternate attendance, has worked for hundreds of years, providing protection to its members without any immortal to lead them.”

His last explanation seemed to garner more interest. “Protection?” Sir Michael asked, his one good eye looking sharp.

Lansius realized he hadn’t touched on this one delicate issue. It was risky to offend them, but he needed everything in his arsenal to win this. “I assure you that this is not a one-sided hostage.”

The parties traded glances at each other.

“Entering the shogunate is protection,” claimed Lansius. “The shogunate exists to serve your interests and protect your family and your House’s legacy.”

There was no real response, but their eyes were fixed on Lansius.

Taken from Royal Road, this narrative should be reported if found on Amazon.

“All your lands, your inheritance, your will, and family succession, will gain protection.”

“What kind of protection?” Sir Michael asked.

“Everything, including from coups,” Lansius revealed. “The Shogun, as the leader, will form a combined army to punish unlawful land grabs or illegal succession, and return the land in question to its rightful owner.”

The look on the people’s faces began to change once they realized there was an unforeseen huge benefit.

“With all the Lords participating, we can guarantee that every realm is secure from coups. Any succession crisis will be dealt with by a joint force from all the members,” he added.

The assurance led to profound changes in how Sir Michael and Lord Jorge viewed these issues. Now, they had something that benefited them, not just the promise of peace.

For the nobles, the issue of succession and inheritance was at the core of their problems. To them, their Houses were everything. Lansius’ plan could potentially guarantee the survival of their Houses.

Lord Jorge met Michael’s gaze and nodded at him. The knight politely nodded back in return.

“What do you think about this? I bet Lord Robert would be interested,” asked Lord Jorge, studying Michael’s face closely, looking for signs of doubt or approval.

“I’m not in a position to answer for My Lord, but... this is promising,” revealed Sir Michael, much to the others’ delight.

Sir Arius smiled as Lord Jorge chuckled. Meanwhile, Lansius and his staff breathed a sigh of relief.

“Tell us more about this Shogun and its alternate attendance,” asked Lord Jorge, more interested than before.

Before Lansius could answer, Sir Morton leaned in, placing his lower arms on the table. “Apologies, My Lord.” His words intended for Lord Jorge, and then to Lansius. “My Lord, even if you convince us, how will you convince the other barons? Are you going to force them out?”

Lansius wore a thin smile on his lips. “Aside from Korimor and South Hill, if they don’t bother us, then we’ll not bother them. Eventually, they’ll see the benefit. Other than protection, every member who joins will enjoy a robust trade route.”

“Robust trade route?” Sir Morton asked on behalf of the rest of them.

"Indeed. Thankfully, none of us are involved with the Nicopolan mercenaries who raid and enslave the nomadic peoples." He kept his tone level so as not to offend anyone.

For high nobles, being accused of slaving would be a dishonor, thus they made an effort to distance themselves from it. Only people like Lord Omin, dared to dabble in it and even that only limited by turning a blind eye on his mercenaries raids.

Lansius continued, "I have forged a strong alliance with the nomadic people. I’ll have them maintain protected resting spots, half a day’s journey in horse-drawn carts between Midlandia and Korelia, and Korelia to Three Hills. The resting spots will provide security, food, fresh water, lodging, and spare horses.”

The additional trade benefit was a welcome addition. The two parties openly liked this idea.

“Moreover, when the two Viscounts begin to build residences in Korelia, there will be a boom of trade. We’ll need good timber and lacquer from Three Hills, grain, barley, and mortar from White Lake, as well as fine linen and artwork from Midlandia.”

“You did speak about making a bazaar, so this is what you mean by that,” Lord Jorge noted, unable to hide his excitement. Even he understood the amount of wealth gained from taxes and permits.

“Imagine rows of shops filled with peddlers selling wares, clothing, wool products, pottery, woodwork, medicine,” Lansius enticed. “Korelia will become big. It has every potential to be so. It wasn’t a coincidence that Korelia has a large population despite being in almost constant war.”

Lansius’ latest statement again garnered everyone’s interest.

“Most cities, even in Midlandia, only number four to five thousand. But Korelia has reached six thousand. Why? I believe it’s because of the lack of plague in Korelia. The dry climate, the abundance of sun, and the lack of rodents due to abundant living space make it an ideal location. It’ll serve as a great city.”

“Strategic location, population, resilience to pestilence, and a seat of power,” Sir Arius commented. As an educated man, he knew what these characteristics meant in city planning.

“Also, a good place for breeding and trading horses,” Sir Michael added.

Lansius was pleased with the reaction. Even Sir Harold beside him looked more relaxed. Naturally, it was easier to trust someone united by a common goal than an ally who simply submitted.

Audrey seized the opportunity to pour Lansius a cup of water. He drank it straight down, his throat parched from all the talking.

Noticing this, the others also took the opportunity to pour themselves drinks, engaging in quiet discussion amongst themselves.

...

 

“So, will White Lake support this plan?” Lord Jorge asked, his eyes locked with Michael’s, measuring the one-eyed knight’s reaction.

Keeping his eye sharp, Michael responded, “I’ll personally vouch for this plan to Lord Robert. While White Lake may be more beautiful, I'd rather sleep in the sand in peace than in a bed of roses amid war.”

Lord Jorge smiled and licked his lips before declaring, "Then, Three Hills will be the first to pledge support." As a defeated lord, threatened from all sides, he was willing to give it a try. If it worked, he would benefit greatly from the trade and protection that could ensure his House's survival. If it didn't work, he already netted a good relationship with a powerful warlord.

Lansius was taken aback by the declaration until a gentle touch from Audrey on his right arm reminded him to respond.

“Then Three Hills can pick the best spot to build your estate,” Lansius replied, ecstatically.

The Lord of Three Hills chuckled. “But first, let’s pick a name. I doubt the High Council will agree to something like ‘Shogun’.”

“How about ‘Lord Commander’?” suggested Sir Arius.

Lansius was about to answer when Hugo noticeably stared at him.

“My Lord,” Hugo hinted from his seat.

Lansius nodded to Hugo, aware of his hint, and then spoke, “The name can wait. Lord Jorge, it seems I’ll need to ask for your consent regarding Korimor.”

The words hung in the air. The tent fell into an uneasy silence as the men pondered about Korimor and the aftermath of yesterday’s battle.

Lord Jorge drew a deep breath, while the tent was battered by a strong wind. He then glanced at his cousin, who seemed prepared with a response. “We no longer have ties with the Lord of Korimor. He incited us to attack Korelia, looted our camp, and then got away with our baggage train.”

“Then you’ll have no qualms with me taking over Korimor?” asked Lansius, again to be certain.

It was an uneasy subject. Lord Omin was Lord Jorge’s main enabler. All eyes were on Lord Jorge, who finally stated calmly, “Three Hills will remain neutral. It is within Lord Lansius’ right to secure Korimor for Lord Omin’s transgressions.”

Another diplomatic victory for Lansius. While he didn’t need to ask, it was better to do so to prevent friction with his new allies.

“Then what about South Hill?” Sir Arius asked.

Lansius had been thinking about South Hill. Unlike Korimor, the area was less developed and far from Midlandia. He wasn’t interested, but he would be foolish not to punish them for their mistake.

“I’m going to send a messenger about our agreement to the Lord of South Hill. If he wishes to join, then I’ll welcome him. If he rejects, then I’ll wage war on him. His land will be split between our members,” explained Lansius.

⠀

***

⠀

After the promising negotiation, Lansius and his entourage returned to the mansion. He had other matters to attend to. The most important was another meeting with Sir Michael.

Without wasting time, he invited the White Lake knight into the mansion’s main hall. After they were seated, Lansius broached the subject of enlisting White Lake’s relief force for Korimor.

The one-eyed knight looked surprised, took his time to think, and then declared, “I’ll be honored to join in this campaign.”

Hearing that, it was Lansius and his staff’s turn to be surprised. They didn’t expect the knight from White Lake to be so agreeable.

Lansius uncharacteristically asked, “Sir Michael, are you sure about this?”

Michael chuckled. “I’m ready to fight a great war to redeem myself, and My Lord, you just gave me one.”

Lansius couldn’t help but grin. “I’ll personally reward you with a tract of land in Korimor for your assistance.”

“My Lord, with all your plans for Korelia, I’d rather take a smaller piece of land in this city.”

The response made Lansius chuckle. “A smaller piece of land in Korelia then. So, only one more thing to address.”

Michael bowed his head a little. “Please guide me, My Lord.”

“Can I ask you to write a letter to Lord Robert? Tell him that Korelia wants to buy all the grain he can spare.”

The one-eyed knight readily replied, "I’ll return to my camp and send my fastest messenger to White Lake."

Happy with the result, Lansius invited Michael to supper, and the guest took his leave, heading back to his encampment.

Audrey, who had kept silent, now commented, “This is progressing smoothly.”

Sir Harold chuckled, while Lansius and Hugo breathed sighs of relief.

"How's your wrist?" Audrey asked with concern.

"Not that bad," he reassured her.

"My Lord, I must admit that you have crafted a really interesting plan to unite Lowlandia," praised Hugo.

Despite harboring some resentment because his staff had kept Sir Callahan's death from him, Lansius chose to be magnanimous. He wouldn't let his wounded pride ruin this sweet victory. “For peace." He suddenly raised his cup.

The rest smiled and followed, “For peace.”

They drank their ales, and afterward, Hugo innocently mused, “We drank for peace, yet I must ask for My Lord’s guidance for war.”

Si vis pacem, para bellum...

If you want peace, prepare for war.

Prepare for war, prepare for peace...

Lansius drew a deep breath, unconsciously moving his injured left hand with care. He had concerns about the plan, but he couldn't show them to his subordinates.

“May I know what is your plan to subdue Korimor castle?” Hugo asked, looking expectantly at Lansius.

In front of Audrey, Harold, and Hugo, Lansius revealed, “Shock and awe.”

 

***

 

Chapter 72

False Saint

 

Battle fatigue had finally caught up to Lansius. After the meeting with Sir Michael and Hugo concluded, he fell asleep on the daybed. However, it was not a peaceful rest; he found himself suddenly thrust back onto the battlefield in a dream.

The scene was vivid, with blackened men running and trampling over each other as flames chased after them. Lansius was startled awake, his body covered in sweat.

“My Lord?” Margo came to look after Lansius, pouring a drink into a cup and offering it to him.

“It’s nothing, just the heat, that’s all,” said Lansius, taking the cup of water and drinking it.

The water felt refreshing and Lansius sat on the daybed. He looked out the window and saw the sun still shining bright. “Where is Audrey and the staff?”

"Lady Audrey is meeting with Lady Felicity, and Sir Harold is tending to his men and the patrols," reported the page.

"Ah, I see," Lansius murmured, taking a deep breath. He then slowly put on his arm sling, using it to support his bandaged wrist.

“Do I have a visitor today?” Lansius asked.

“Lady Hannei, Lady Daniella, and Sir Michael will join us for supper.”

The last two were expected, but the first one wasn’t. “Hannei will join us?”

“A messenger from the castle told me so, saying: the Lady will return to Midlandia tomorrow, so she wishes to see My Lord today.”

“Hannei is leaving Korelia?” Lansius was surprised and pondered about the reason.

“It seems so, My Lord.” Margo didn’t have any more information.

Lansius rubbed his chin and relaxed his shoulder, saying, “Send a runner to the castle, say that I’ll meet her at the mansion’s garden when the sun is cooler.”

“Yes, My Lord.”

While Margo left on his errand, Lansius, left alone on the upper floor of the mansion, let out a deep sigh.

Audrey was learning about lady-in-waiting stuff from Felicity to prepare her for marriage. Meanwhile, Sterling was still confined in bed.

The cup-bearer, Cecile was in mourning. Moreover, Calub had informed Lansius and Cecile about her late father’s wishes.

Lansius had seen the younger daughter, Claire, at the mass funeral, and felt saddened. He rested the back of his head on the couch-like daybed and just stared at the ceiling.

“Callahan, forgive me,” he uttered, despite knowing that Callahan would likely waved it off and smiled at him.

The thought lessened the pain, but the loss was still fresh.

He, of all people... one of the most capable people I know.

To Lansius, it was a terrible blow. And to think that he had just talked and discussed matters with the mage knight who had done it was nothing short of absurd.

However, he knew that Callahan would have advised him to put on his facade. A conqueror must put his goal above his emotions.

The man had taught Lansius so much and even put himself in harm's way to protect him.

Lansius felt the sting in his eyes and whispered, "I'll do my best to take care of your daughters. I'll find suitable husbands for Claire and Cecile if she doesn't want Calub."

However, the image of Callahan in his mind seemed to frown. "I guess Calub is a good candidate for a husband," Lansius then chuckled at his own words.

The realization that he shared this burden with Calub made it easier.

Slowly, the feeling of guilt ebbed away. Interestingly, only afterward did he realize that Claire reminded him of Tanya. Lansius had never noticed it with Cecile, but somehow Claire's expression invoked memories of his little sister, and a wave of memories from Bellandia flooded his consciousness.

He missed his family and wondered how they fared now in Midlandia.

Lansius let out a sigh, hoping that Bengrieve would honor his part of the bargain and rescue them. Remembering his benefactor, he rose and took another cup of water from the table. With a letter to write, he strode to his room, pushed the door open, leaving it ajar to help with air circulation, and sat down.

Taking his quill pen and ink, Lansius wrote a rough report about his victory. He inquired about the succession crisis in Midlandia and pleaded for information about his family’s whereabouts. In addition, he crafted a more official letter pertaining to grain and horse trade between Midlandia and Korelia.

Lansius finished his letters and sealed them with wax.

When the day grew cooler near evening, he met Hannei in the garden.

...

⠀

The Lord and his esteemed guest strolled through the garden, engaged in conversation. Although expansive and vibrant with greenery, the garden bore signs of neglect. The grass grew unevenly, and the shrubs sprouted haphazardly.

"Are you sure I can't convince you otherwise?" Lansius asked as they walked.

"Well, aside from the war, it's been fun in here, but I just want to go home," Hannei said while looking at the medicinal flowers in the garden. "Besides, I'm also accompanying Sterling."

Lansius nodded. He had heard from Dietrich that the squire's injury was serious, although not life-threatening. Thus, Lansius had agreed for him to recuperate in the Healer's Guild in Midlandia. "I really can't thank you enough... I hope he can recover fully."

A case of content theft: this narrative is not rightfully on Amazon; if you spot it, report the violation.

“I feel the same way too. Rest assured, I count Sterling as my acquaintance,” she replied as they reached the small gazebo.

“Hannei,” his voice tensed up. “I’m worried about the situation in Midlandia.”

She giggled as she sat on the wooden benches. “It’s the battle of the nobles. I’m just nobody. I’ll keep my head low and live in the shadows.”

“But you’re a mage, Hannei. People would—”

“A retired explorer, Lans. Grave digger they say. Nothing more,” she cut in.

Lansius exhaled deeply but eventually nodded his head. He respected her stance and wouldn’t push it further. He pulled an envelope from his pocket and gave it to her.

“What’s this?”

“A letter for Lord Bengrieve,” he explained. “Only give it to him if the situation is safe.”

She accepted it and kept it in her travel purse. Then Lansius handed her thirty silver coins.

“Lans, you shouldn’t have to”

“Please take it for snacks,” he insisted.

“Merci, merci bien.” Hannei put the coins in a different purse.

“So, what about Tia?” he asked about the little girl with the broken ankle that she had healed and cared for.

“Ah yes, there’s a school in Midlandia that I want her to attend. Oh, I’ll need your permission for that.”

Tia and her deceased parents were subjects of Korelia, bound by law, and she needed permission to leave town. Lansius had heard about the school for the commoners and landless gentry from when he was in Toruna. “The school for the commoners and landless gentry?”

“Yes, that one,” Hannei replied excitedly. It was one of the first non-noble schools in Imperium. Calub was one of its sponsors.

She continued, “This world is changing, Lans... There are a lot more landless gentries now than when I came to this world ten years ago. Intellectuals, guild members with bright ideas, entrepreneurs; they’re standing on their own without nobility or farmland to support them.”

Seeing her so spirited, Lansius smiled. Calub and Hannei identified with this burgeoning new social class. The term “landless” was a mockery from the nobility, but they wore it proudly.

“Well, permission granted, but you might want to make a letter so I can wax stamp it,” he said with a smile.

“Thank you,” she smiled brightly. “Oh, I want to hug you, but I don’t want people to misunderstand.”

Lansius chuckled. “Let’s not do that. I don’t want to make Audrey jealous.”

She giggled. “Good, be a responsible husband. Don’t just treat a wife like a baby-making machine.”

Lansius scoffed at the remark while Hannei grinned widely.

“Anyway, Lans, how’s your amnesia? Are you still not remembering even your name?” she asked, looking at him warmly.

Her question stunned Lansius for a moment. “I actually stopped trying. Too much going on, you know,” he admitted.

“I guess so with the war and others,” Hannei nodded while dangling her feet freely.

“How about your name?” he asked.

“What about mine?” she asked, puzzled.

“Hannei, you haven’t given me your real name,” he reminded her.

The blonde giggled with flushed cheeks. “Say what? If you remember your real name, then we’ll trade names. How about it?”

“I just remembered, my name is D’Artagnan,” Lansius declared with a gentlemanly pose.

“No, you’re not!” she snorted, trying but failing to stifle her laugh.

“No, seriously, that’s my real name,” he insisted, resisting laughter.

His antics made her laugh until she was gasping for breath.

The cool sunset breeze swept by them. Behind them, the mansion’s many windows were beginning to be illuminated by chandeliers and fires.

“Oh, Lans… You seem okay. Audrey is worried about you. Earlier, she said you eat so little and don’t get enough sleep.”

“She’s exaggerating things,” he said, shaking his head. “I’m doing fine.”

“Yeah, you look okay... Anyway, since you’re about to wed, let me tell you a few things about the females of this world.”

“What about them?” This piqued his interest.

As the wind breezed through, Hannei brushed her long hair from her face and said, “Do you know that a woman only bleeds once or twice each year?”

“Oh, now that you mention it, I did suspect something about it,” Lansius recalled. When he lived on the road with Stefi, she never seemed to experience one.

Hannei let out a small sigh. “It’s quite enviable, really.”

Lansius understood her plight. For a woman, getting a period in a world without disposable pads was problematic.

“Anyway, if you want to have babies fast, you need to ask her about it so you’ll know her fertility window,” she advised.

“Umm, okay…”

This started to feel like a visit to the pregnancy doctor.

“Or you can just give her a good fuck all year round,” the doctor just suggested something correct but inappropriate.

“Eww, this French girl is so vulgar,” he exclaimed, looking grossed out.

Hannei burst into laughter and only managed to speak after taking several deep breaths. “A-ah, and one last thing,” she said while still getting her breath back. “The pregnancy takes more time. I believe it’s a whole year.”

“Eh, not the usual nine months? Now, this is new...” Lansius pondered.

“Yup, it’s because the humans in this world at one time in their history intermingled freely with the elves. And also, they’re descendants of a shapeshifting dragon,” she reminded him.

“Ah, the Ancients who begot the Grand Progenitor,” he nodded, having read the lore.

“Yup, technically it’s them, the half-god half-dwarven who revitalized the failing elven bloodline. Humans are their offspring. So you’re familiar with the mythology?” she asked.

“Yes, I read the book,” he said without sounding smug, though he couldn’t help but ponder why what she said was somewhat different from what he had read.

Half-god half-dwarven...?

“I’m pleased to know that you’re well educated, my medieval baron,” Hannei quipped out of the blue.

Lansius wouldn’t let her get away with that and quipped back, “I heard Tia reads the alphabet better than you?”

Her mouth was agape, and her eyes were wide with surprise. She hadn’t expected such a sharp roast and couldn’t resist retaliating, “You black-haired imp, how dare you! I’m your senior here.”

Lansius started to chuckle at her reaction.

“I can read, just not the common text,” she said, still going at it, defending her wounded pride.

He held back his laugh until the mage laughed first. They shared a hearty, unrestrained laugh. Later, with cheeks reddened from laughter, they walked back to the mansion.

“So, when will you depart?” he asked.

“Tomorrow morning, I can’t let the wounded wait any longer. Sorry for leaving while in mourning.”

“That’s ok. I’m sure everybody understands. We put priority on the living over the dead.”

She exhaled deeply. “Look at you, Lans... So comfortably acting as lord, even about to get wed... Oh, so sorry that I can’t come to your wedding.”

“Well, it’s not like you can help it,” he said it lightly.

She smiled and looked up at the sky, finding it poetic. “Here we are, two from planet Earth who have made ourselves comfortable in this different world.”

“I hope our friends and families on Earth are doing fine,” Lansius remarked.

Hannei obviously found it funny because she giggled after hearing it. She stopped and turned to face Lansius. “Remember to take care of Felis for me.”

“Consider it done,” he replied with confidence.

“But don’t yield to temptation.”

“... Excuse me?” Lansius protested in a high voice.

The French girl laughed with tears in her eyes and ran away from Lansius, her blonde hair shimmering in the golden sunset. Their chat today had been unusually amusing; a contrast to their previous conversations, which were usually filled with doom and gloom.

Time also changes all of us, eh?

Lansius smiled at the thought and slowly walked to the mansion where a feast was waiting.

⠀

***

⠀

Ten days after the victory in Korelia.

After a long journey through the northern corridor with the assistance of the nomads, the punitive force finally arrived at Korimor. Deputy Hugo and Sir Michael were leading fifty cavalrymen and a two-hundred-strong newly formed dragoon regiment, along with the nomadic horsemen.

"The castle sits on top of a hill, approachable from the northern side," Lady Daniella informed them from atop her horse. She was also present as a guest and advisor.

Hugo nodded, pondering about where to make camp.

“Double the scouts, but try to look inconspicuous if possible,” Michael ordered his lieutenant, who in turn ordered his riders to fan out.

Hugo wiped the dust from his face and gazed at the one-eyed knight. “We need to block the castle and city gate, so we must camp at the northern side.”

“It’s a big hill, we’re going to be stretched thin,” warned Michael. Unlike Korelia, Korimor Hill was taller and denser with trees.

“Well, the nomads’ horses and numbers will hopefully make us appear bigger than we really are,” hoped Hugo.

“Then let's prepare for a siege,” declared Michael.

“The old-fashioned way,” quipped Hugo.

“Indeed,” Michael agreed. His lieutenant quickly arranged for their men to dismount and prepare to assume formation. They planned to approach with loud noises, flashy colors, and a grand march right up to the enemy’s front door.

With Lansius' plan in place, they felt confident about winning the siege. However, unbeknownst to them, they weren't the only ones making a move in Lowlandia.

⠀

***

⠀

Chapter 73

Chateau de Cascasonne

 

Eastern Mansion

The cold breeze around dawn awoke Cecile from slumber. She tried to rub her eyes but felt that it was prickly to the touch. That didn’t slow her down from her morning routine. She rose from her bed and approached the wooden table and basin, where she carefully washed her face with cold water.

Her roommates had awakened and lit another rushlight to illuminate their room. They took turns washing their faces and slowly changed into their work clothes.

The two were donning their brown-grayish russet robe and white head kerchief. Another was wearing a doublet with a belt and sword on her waist.

“Cecile, are you alright?” the one with the doublet asked.

“I’m fine, Carla. Just a bit sleepy, that’s all,” Cecile answered while finishing up with her attire.

“I see... Well then, please take care. Let us know if you need anything.” Carla and two other girls left the room.

Cecile breathed deeply and prepared her mind for the day.

Today marked the tenth day after the war. A lot had happened during these past nine days. The biggest shock was the launch of a new campaign against Korimor. At least two hundred men, half from Korelia, and half from White Lake, participated.

The Korelians had never expected to even win the siege, so it was a surprising development. For this campaign, they only picked those who were able to ride or, at the very least, stay in the saddle without falling.

Cecile heard that the nomads provided the horses and the horse guides, who could be a boy as little as twelve years old. Each rider was provided with four or five horses as spares.

After the departure of the troops, the Lord himself continued to be in intense discussion with Lord Jorge about the future of their new alliances. It became the talk of the town, how the Lord would spearhead a new hegemony in Lowlandia.

Messengers were also active. Many had been sent out bearing letters from the Lord of Korelia.

Cecile also heard about Sir Arius’ hasty departure from Korelia on an errand, likely at Lord Lansius’ behest.

Another recent development involved the rapid construction of a camp and a field kitchen to accommodate the 1,000 captured Coalition men. Under the guidance of Lord Lansius himself, dozens of yurts were erected, along with simple mud hovels, around a stone quarry.

Within the quarry, the old mine shaft was repaired, and general maintenance carried out by Korelia's newly-formed Building Bureau, the Korelia Mason Guild. The architect behind the guild was none other than Lord Lansius himself. The guild served as an outlet for captured nobles who had education or experience in construction.

As it turned out, many nobles, including some Nicopolan, volunteered in exchange for a reduction in their ransom. The arrangement proved beneficial for both parties. Lord Lansius gained access to experienced talents, thereby reducing the time and resources required for various construction projects.

Meanwhile, the captured nobles found a sense of purpose, making them less likely to rebel.

With the new alliance being the talk of the town, even inside the billets, there was gradual acceptance from the captured nobles. Many had already sought forgiveness, begged for leniency, or expressed willingness to switch sides.

As for Cecile herself, the most personal change was the absence of her co-worker, Sterling. The squire had gone with Lady Hannei to Midlandia to recuperate.

Sigh...

Cecile recalled when Claire admitted to her that Sterling had asked for her hand in marriage. Cecile was shocked but reluctantly agreed, as she could see it was not an irresponsible match since Sterling was on his way to becoming a knight.

However, as fate would have it, soon after, they were separated for good or ill.

The younger sister now stayed at Cecile’s quarters in the castle. Their estate was left running with the family’s old helper at the helm.

While taking a new cloth to wipe the goblet, Cecile noticed the grey hooded robe that she had cleaned, dried, and folded. She tucked it away at the bottom of her wooden chest, wishing never to wear it again.

Two days ago, the mourning period had ended, and all the relevant castle staff, servants, and guardsmen had moved to Eastern Mansion to follow the Lord. A semblance of normalcy followed after such a great war.

As for Cecile, Lord Lansius had given her a full month to mourn due to her circumstances, but she returned to work two days ago. The work kept her mind at ease, just as she had expected.

With her gear prepped and ready, she closed the door and headed to the cellar. Halfway there, Margo waited with another servant.

Together, they descended the flight of stairs and reached the mansion’s cellar. The place was wide, but there were only several wooden barrels inside.

As the cup-bearer, Cecile took a sip from a barrel and checked whether the drink had deteriorated or tasted different. This part of the job was easy. Only rarely did she ever find a rancid or questionable taste.

The hard part was to safeguard the drinks for the Lord at all times. She filled a jug of ale and a flaskful of wine. The flask was then kept in her shoulder bag along with a silver goblet. Meanwhile, the jug needed to be hand-carried because of the size.

For safety, the rule stated that the Lord would only drink ale or wine from the cup-bearer. This was obviously to avoid poison, as it was hard to detect when mixed with liquor or alcohol. Throughout the day, a cup-bearer also monitored his/ her health. If they suddenly felt sick or dizzy, then a poison expert would be summoned.

“Same as yesterday?” Margo asked with his patchy voice, a mark of adolescence. Yet, the boy still resembled a lass more than a lad.

“Yes, Margo, let’s keep these two for the Lord and guests. The other two should go for the rest,” she instructed.

Margo and the servant filled their earthen jugs as directed by Cecile. After finishing with that, they locked the cellar and went their separate ways.

Cecile would wait for the lord to wake up. As the cup-bearer, she was also the lord’s unofficial secretary. Almost all morning correspondence was done through her. Along with the drink, she was to entertain the lord with news, gossip, or other tidings in the realm.

This part of the job made the position powerful because she became privy to the lord’s ears. Cecile could select what news and in what light they should be presented.

The story has been illicitly taken; should you find it on Amazon, report the infringement.

In relation to this, usually, some staff were relaying information to her. But even today, there was only one. It seemed that everybody was giving her time to mourn. However, it only made it harder. Without anything to focus on, the heart-wrenching pain returned as she sat idle.

Cecile was now orphaned and must assume the position of the head of her House. The thought made her unwell. Not only was she shouldering her little sister Claire and the estate, but also her own fate. Now, a marriage was looming, something she dreaded as it would take her away from her family.

After Lord Lansius’ victory, more suitors sent letters to Cecile. Without an uncle or older relative, it was awkward for her to handle her own marriage proposal. It wasn’t the custom, but she felt fortunate. With her on the helm, nobody could dictate or force her into marriage.

As a knight’s daughter, estate owner, and cup-bearer of a powerful Lord, Cecile was currently the most desirable partner in Korelia. However, she felt that none of the suitors fit her situation.

Most suitors were second sons who didn’t inherit anything. They aimed to wed Cecile to be financially independent. The ones with land were usually from far away, meaning she would need to move out, leaving her roots behind.

She didn’t wish to leave her sister and abandon her father’s estate that they had worked so hard.

Her only solace was a certain proposal brokered by Lady Felis: a marriage proposal on behalf of Master Calub. The man had shown affection and seemed to indicate the seriousness of his proposal.

Cecile sat still, but blood rushed to her cheeks when she remembered the way Calub had hugged her during the funeral, despite her unsightly appearance and the noise from crying her heart out.

Customs dictated that it was proper for only parents and siblings to hug each other in public. So, it was a great show of affection in public.

With a mixed feeling, she exhaled deeply.

Calub had informed her about her father’s last wish. She had thought deeply about it. To think that even on his dying breath, her father was worried about her, broke her heart. Suddenly, her vision blurred.

She hurriedly wiped her tears with a piece of cloth. Nobody should see her like this again.

Cecile looked at the ceiling and tried to arrange her thoughts. Even from the start, the proposal started by her father was as good as being served on a silver platter. Calub was easily one of the most educated and courteous men in Korelia. He was also high in the Lord’s hierarchy despite not being highborn.

What was more surprising was his request to marry into Cecile’s family. Not the other way around.

Instead of using her father’s words as a pretext, Calub had chosen to formally propose, with no less than Lady Felis backing him.

The alchemist even stated that he didn’t mind the status as a male consort. He forfeited his rights to become the head of the household or to co-own the estate.

Cecile knew that no nobleman, not even a lesser one, would do this. Refusing the estate was refusing the income.

Thus, Calub’s stance alleviated Cecile’s biggest fear that her future husband would force her to split the income. Her estate wasn’t rich enough that she could split the income and survive, especially when she needed to look after Claire.

What Calub had offered was such a gentlemanly act that naturally Cecile fell head over heels for him.

Moreover, unlike with other suitors, she had known Calub on a personal level. Both were Lansius’ trusted confidantes and had watched each other’s backs and cared for each other’s well-being.

A gust of air pulled Cecile back from her thoughts. A servant was opening the windows to let in more air. The sun shone through and the corridor was getting warmer. Cecile rose from her seat and walked toward the lord’s chamber.

After a flight of stairs, she passed two guards who nodded to acknowledge her.

Cecile nodded back to the guards and stopped in front of a sturdy door. She exhaled to clear her head and knocked on the door softly. All the staff knew the lord had trouble sleeping and would let him sleep longer.

Carefully, Cecile peeked through the gap in the door and saw the lord was still sleeping peacefully. She smiled and closed the door back.

 

***

 

Chateau de Cascasonne

Midlandia faced the summer with relative ease. There was no drought, and the farmlands were growing to their full potential. Everywhere in cities and towns, there was work or building to be done.

The Chateau de Cascasonne also received its annual maintenance during this time. Its curtain walls and towers were being cleaned of vine-climbing plants, and its vast gardens were cleared of unwanted shrubs and grasses.

These plants were a threat to the stone structure and also a fire hazard as they dried in the summer sun.

Inside the chateau, it was a world apart from the outside. Not just in the lavish decoration and furniture, the inner part of the chateau was also kept cool either by mages or magic items, shielding the occupants from the summer heat.

Lord Bengrieve, the master of the chateau, had just returned after enjoying a morning ride through the woodlands. Aided by his pages and squires, he cleaned himself up and donned a comfortable black silk robe that draped over his toned physique before retreating to his study to work.

He was back to his old routine after having feigned an illness and retreated to his personal holdings. The Seneschal simply didn’t want to be bothered with the messy succession crisis.

Unlike other provinces, Midlandia was rather odd in that the holder of the title of Earl was actually a figurehead and shared much of his power with Bengrieve’s House. For generations, the House that controlled Cascasonne always became the Seneschal and held greater military, economic, and political power than the actual Lord.

Thus, despite the crisis, Bengrieve could stay away and still firmly hold power in Midlandia.

The master of the chateau faced the grand table and sat. The written reports were ready on the smooth elven wood surface. He glanced at the top one and read a report stating that Lord Arte had finished his business in the Capital and was returning to Midlandia. Joining him was a carriage of the Imperium’s officials and armed guards.

A waste of money.

The officials had been bribed to bestow peerage upon Lansius as a Baron. Bengrieve had used the peerage as a grand prize, dangling it in front of Lansius so he would try to defend Korelia. But as it turned out, Lansius’ position in Korelia had attracted too much attention.

Not even Bengrieve suspected that the Western Lowlandia Lords would be able to form a coalition against Lansius. It was an unexpected turn of events.

If it was only one Lord’s attack...

Against a Coalition of three, and with only one year of preparation, there was little that Lansius could do.

Despite losing money, Bengrieve wasn’t mad. To him, Lansius was a gamble, a curiosity to satisfy.

A general needed leadership, knowledge of strategy and tactics, and luck to win wars. Bengrieve was merely testing if Lansius had luck on his side, and based on the attack by the three Lords, he was found lacking.

Bengrieve shifted his attention to another parchment on the table. It was a list of people who sought an audience. More names were being added to the bottom of that list, but he didn’t feel like meeting any of them.

As a Seneschal, he didn’t hold court sessions, and as one on sick leave, he felt obliged to behave like one.

Despite not holding court sessions, there was no lack of people who sought an audience. They knew that Bengrieve held sway over Midlandia’s policy.

To prevent wounding these important guests’ pride without wasting his time, normally Bengrieve selected a few to entertain, but only at supper time. There, they would be preoccupied with the meal and strong ale, and he could distract them with music and dances.

However, with the succession issue in full swing, Bengrieve left the list as it was, signaling to his staff that he wished not to be bothered. He didn’t want to entertain anyone but his own cohort.

And one of his cohorts was standing haughtily in the center of the chamber, looking at the ancient golem.

“Can this thing really fight against monsters?” Sir Stan mused, looking at the blue-painted metallic giant.

Bengrieve disregarded his bastard cousin’s mutterings. Stan was often fascinated by the golem but never suggested anything about it. It was just his way of opening up a conversation after slipping through the door unannounced.

“What brings you here?” Bengrieve asked without looking up from his reading. He had one tome and several records to get through.

“My Lord, there are tidings from Lowlandia,” Stan reported smugly.

“You came this far just for that?” he asked, thinking it was about Lansius’ defeat and retreat.

Stan just shrugged, but his smile didn’t fade.

“So, where is Lady Audrey heading now? Orniteia or straight to Toruna?” asked Bengrieve.

The question only caused Stan to smile more widely, and he quipped, “So, the foreigner got you good too.”

The host paused from reading his tome and glanced at his rude guest. “What do you mean by that?”

“A lot. Enough to make your blood boil,” replied Stan.

“I doubt it.” Bengrieve pondered for a moment but concluded, “There’s no way Lansius is winning against the Western Lords Coalition.”

Sir Stan grinned and revealed, “He did. In just one day.”

Bengrieve slowly rose from his seat, placing his hands on his grand-looking elven wood table as if to brace himself. His face and lips gave nothing away, but his hands clenched into fists.

"Would you like details?" Stan taunted him.

"That can wait." Bengrieve pulled back the sleeve on his left wrist, revealing a plain-looking bracelet with three small colored gems. He momentarily touched one of the rectangular gems. At first, nothing happened, but then a squire opened the door and entered, his eyes looking downward.

"Get in touch with the Hunter Guild," Bengrieve ordered.

The squire bowed deeply and left the room. He didn’t need to ask which Hunter Guild representative to contact. Bengrieve only had business with the Assassins.

 

***

 

Chapter 74

Forgotten Tome

 

Audrey, Eastern Mansion

Two weeks after the battle, Lansius discovered he could exert force with his left wrist again. The physician was confident that the bone had mended, noting that the recovery was faster and better than they had hoped. Many, including Audrey, believed his quick recovery was due to the precious duck egg, a notion that humbled Lansius.

On the mansion’s upper floor, Audrey watched as Lansius tested his recovered hand, practicing with an ornamental halberd.

The thin tunic Lansius wore revealed lingering bruises from the last battle, reminding Audrey of how he looked atop his horse when he proposed to her after the battle.

Feeling her cheeks flush, she pushed the memory aside; otherwise, her face would turn completely red. Although she usually didn’t fret over small matters, the pressure from her upcoming marriage now felt very real.

Everyone she encountered, from servants and guards to peers and even supper guests, reminded her of how fortunate she was. And Audrey agreed with them.

Luck had led her to Lansius, an unassuming foreign man from Bellandia who had risen to fame by proving himself exceptional time and time again. His ability to command, lead his domain, and win wars even from disadvantaged positions seemed almost divine.

Thus, she understood that her time with Lansius was fleeting. As he continued to rise in power, he might engage in a politically advantageous marriage. Despite her status as his consort, Audrey knew she was merely low nobility.

Deep inside, Audrey was perplexed by Lansius' insistence on marrying her. She suspected it had something to do with his softhearted nature. After all, he did have a background as a teacher or scribe. However, reflecting on his accomplishments made her realize that no mere scribe could have achieved what Lansius had done. His strategic acumen in battle was almost surreal, as if he had been trained for war.

But how could one learn about this?

As a squire, Audrey had been taught how to fight, but few people were ever taught how to win wars. She had asked Lansius about this once, and he’d told her he learned it from books.

Heh, what an answer... But no matter. The origin of his abilities doesn’t bother me.

The results were as clear as the sun. After the Battle of Korelia, even the usually arrogant knights openly admired him. His knack for strategy and leading battles was gaining recognition—such fearsome abilities housed in a man who was, in person, so gentle and caring.

And to think I was going to wed him.

The thought made her nervous, and the flashes of adult conversation between Felis and Hannei that entered her mind only made her more uncomfortable.

“Audrey?”

Lansius’ voice startled her. Since Margo was out on an errand, they were alone on the upper floor. Lansius was scribbling something, while Audrey was peeling a costard fruit. “Y-yes?”

“Why are you looking at me that way?” Lansius squinted his eyes.

“Uh, oh… Nothing, I’m just wondering about… your hair, yeah,” Audrey made up excuses.

“Huh, what about it?” he asked.

“Well, there are a few strands of gray.” She had noticed them some time ago but never told him.

“Really?” He sounded mildly surprised.

“Yeah, let me pluck one for you—”

“No, no, let it be. I like grey better than this… black,” he said, trying to pull a hair strand into his line of sight.

“Mm... I actually find black to be great,” Audrey remarked.

He opened his mouth agape. “No way, you’re jesting?”

Audrey stifled her chuckle while putting the knife down and arranging the sliced fruit on a platter. “No, it’s the same color as my horse’s mane, and I love it.”

Lansius obviously thought differently because he suddenly came closer and hugged Audrey from behind.

“Euehh?!”

“Why are you comparing my hair to a horse’s mane?” he protested, tickling her waist.

Audrey burst into laughter, breaking free from his grip. As payback, she picked up a slice of costard from the table and shoved it into his mouth.

“A bit sour,” he muttered, chewing.

“Well, everything has its season, My Lord,” Audrey replied.

“Umm, how was your meeting with Lady Felis?”

“Urgh,” Audrey groaned.

“As I expected,” he sighed, well aware that Audrey had little interest in learning the duties of a lady-in-waiting.

“It should be better next time, I’m going with Cecile.”

“That’s the spirit,” Lansius commended.

Feeling a bit cheeky, Audrey said, “I’ll suggest to Felis that you join the class. Your manners seem to lack polish lately, My Lord.”

“Urgh,” Lansius groaned and changed the topic. “Anyway, speaking of Cecile, do you think she’s really interested in Calub?”

“Of course, it’s a good match. Cecile has status and land, while Calub has wealth and power.”

“But what about love?” he asked cautiously, as if the word were fragile.

“Mm... That should be fine. She’s pretty and blonde; he’s educated, courteous, and in his prime. Many people have introduced their daughters to Calub, you know?”

“Really? But nobody offered me—”

Unconsciously, Audrey stared at him. He looked startled and averted his gaze.

“Oh, sorry, I didn’t mean to,” she blurted out, quickly looking for an excuse. “You have two blondes wandering around the castle and sleeping in your bed. I doubt anyone would dare to compete.”

“I wish people knew that you three have taken over my bed and exiled me to the dog house,” he sighed.

“Dog house? Why do dogs need a house?” she asked.

He waved his hand. Sometimes Lansius used phrases that were completely foreign to her.

If you stumble upon this tale on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

“Well, at least I have you...” he flirted, grinning.

“Yes, My Lord, you have me. Just make sure to feed me properly,” Audrey quipped.

“Roast meat for tonight, my dear?” His tone was so refined it made her snort with laughter.

The soon-to-be-wed couple savored each moment, aware that peace had become a luxury commodity. They had yet to receive a report from the punitive force led by Hugo, Sir Michael, and Daniella to Korimor. Even with the speed granted by the newly-formed dragoon regiment, the campaign could still end in disaster.

Moreover, Sir Harold had conveyed unsettling news gathered by Sir Justin. Utilizing his emerging black market intelligence, the Marshal reported that the border war was turning against the Imperium. The number of refugees was growing, and the threat of a massive famine loomed larger than ever.

The Imperium had never seemed so fragile, and the unrest could soon reach Korelia. No place was truly safe.

 

***

 

Midlandia

A hawk descended onto a perch atop a tower in the estuary, its majestic wings fully extended for a moment before it landed gracefully. The birdkeeper swiftly offered food and water to the majestic creature while removing a small tube from its leg. The tube contained a brief letter from the Hunters Guild.

As the sun dipped low, it cast a reddish hue on the chateau’s curtain walls. For the inhabitants within, this signaled that the day’s training and studying had come to an end. Now, it was time for supper.

In the Great Hall, Lord Bengrieve addressed his two-hundred men-at-arms and almost an equal number of staff. Meals were first brought to him for selection; then they were offered to his guests, his second in command, and so forth down the chain of command. Any uneaten food was collected as alms for the poor.

For Bengrieve, supper was mainly a social event—a time to engage with his retainers and guests. Consequently, he ate sparingly, mainly partaking in simple snacks, fruits, and customary drinks.

Only as the evening deepened did Bengrieve have his dinner. Usually, he ate alone, disliking small talks and preferring the quietness of the night. Tonight, however, since Sir Stan was staying over, he invited him to join.

Besides Bengrieve’s family, who were currently out of town, only a select few were privy to this occasion.

“I heard a hawk arrived this afternoon,” Stan said, sipping his mead.

“It’s from the Guild. A representative will arrive tomorrow,” Bengrieve replied.

Stan nodded, swirling his goblet to aerate his mead. “We should send support to Korelia,” he said. “Otherwise, we may have a disgruntled agent on our hands.”

Bengrieve chose not to respond, focusing instead on carving his roasted veal with a fennel and rosemary sauce, accompanied by green beans and brown bread. The meal was simple but hearty, reflecting the lessons his father and grandfather had instilled in him: how to eat, how to maintain his physique, and how to choose a noble spouse for more than just her lineage.

Unperturbed by Bengrieve’s silence, his steward—an older-looking man in an impeccable wine-colored tunic—approached and interjected, “My Lord, a messenger from My Lady has arrived. She asks if you would like her to come to the chateau.”

“What do you think?" Bengrieve inquired of the steward.

“While a child’s education is paramount, I think a wife should be with her ailing husband.”

“Very well, invite her and arrange a suitable escort. We wouldn’t want anyone to take her hostage.”

“Certainly. Shall I also arrange for assistance from the Hunter’s Guild?” the steward asked. He was well aware that nobody would dare to hurt her, but capturing her would not only tarnish his master’s reputation but also destabilize the province.

“At your discretion,” Bengrieve replied. The steward nodded and left the table.

Stan shifted topics. “What are your plans regarding the succession fiasco? Eclipse Castle is in an uproar.”

Bengrieve’s face turned a bit sour. “Let them be. I care not who is the new Lord.”

“You sure?” Stan asked while lobbing roasted almonds into his mouth. “They may be powerless, but they can hinder your plan.”

Bengrieve exhaled deeply. He had much to ponder, particularly concerning the likely demise of the Emperor and the state of the Imperium. Secret letters from Lord Gottfried had even arrived, attempting to coax Midlandia into neutrality and promising beneficial support and coexistence when the Imperium fell.

As the crisis of the millennia loomed, Bengrieve’s colleagues were undermining efforts with their petty rivalries. “It’s painful to see people in power acting so foolishly.”

“That’s why you should take the lead,” Stan suggested while munching on a pudding.

The host clicked his tongue. He detested being paraded in front, losing his ability to observe from the sidelines. Behind the shadow of someone else, he could spot threats that would go unnoticed if he were bathed in the limelight.

“If you don’t want to, then you need a new figurehead. They have no other son, bastard, or cousin,” Stan commented, referring to how the easy life and decadence had destroyed the Earl House’s bloodline.

Bengrieve pondered his options before saying, “I’ll just accelerate my plan.”

Stan grew serious. “I hope it’s not the one that’ll thrust me up.”

“I trust no one else. Of course, this ideally occurs after several more merits. If only you had Lansius’ achievements.”

“Oi, oi,” Stan protested but turned into a chuckle. “The man’s a war genius. Me, I’m just a lazy bastard.”

“But you’re the correct bastard for my plan,” Bengrieve delivered the joke with a flat face.

Stan chuckled and later added, “How about the Healers Guild?”

Bengrieve munched a rather large slice and swallowed it. Without looking concerned, he answered, “I’m going to censure them for their involvement in the succession issue. That female is wrecking a high noble’s household.”

Stan was much more guarded. “Despite her looks, Saint Candidate Nay is quite popular and well-connected.”

“Bah! It’s me that funded and directed the guild into this state; it’s not for her to abuse.” Bengrieve exhaled deeply to calm himself down. “In the end, everything is just a small hurdle. It’ll only slow me down, but won’t stop me.”

Stan sniggered. “Not even the Imperium?”

“Not even the Imperium,” Bengrieve confirmed.

Stan had nothing else to say. Next time, he would beg Bengrieve not to choose him as a puppet. It was inconvenient for a man who valued his freedom, and he knew others were more suitable for the job.

Instead of finishing his malty mead, Stan opted for fresh water in the silver goblet and drank it down. He had always thought the water at the chateau tasted sweet.

Soon after, the guest excused himself and marched noisily down the corridor, likely flirting with the maids. Bengrieve didn’t mind; if Stan took a concubine from his staff, he would be supportive. The fertility rate amongst the nobility was concerning enough that he even welcomed such an idea.

With his bastard cousin gone and dinner concluded, Bengrieve returned to his study.

The soft white glow from transparent quartz lights filled the room. His indoor garden, separated by large glass windows, was lit by lanterns placed at its corners and around the gazebo.

Feeling satiated, he settled into his couch and picked up an old tome, Elven Genealogy, which he had been reading since yesterday. Although he had consulted another book on the subject, he felt compelled to cross-reference an older source for certainty.

Resuming from where he had left off, Bengrieve continued to read the forgotten tome.

...

 

The second watch had passed, marked by patrols moving through the corridor. As usual, a squire entered the chamber and politely asked if the master needed anything. The staff’s specialty was a fermented, dried, and roasted black cherry drink, but today he wasn’t in the mood.

“Any word from outside?” he inquired, despite not wanting to hear any bad news.

“We’ve received no news from the Capital or anything else of importance,” the squire responded.

“That will be all,” he said to the squire, who bowed and left.

His primary concerns were the latest developments from the western border wars, which had sapped the might of the Imperium, as well as the influx of refugees and the threat of famine. Equally significant were troop movements around the Capital and any city lockdowns, as these could signal a move either against or in support of the throne.

Bengrieve could only assume that several high-ranking nobles also suspected the Ageless One was, in fact, an elf and likely dead due to old age. However, he understood that many would turn a blind eye to maintain the status quo.

Yet with Lord Gottfried only a province away from the Capital, the dynamics had shifted. The High Council and the House of the Imperium, represented by the Grand Bureaucracy, would be forced to reveal their hands. And when they clashed, Midlandia would be well-positioned to pick up the pieces.

No vassal east of the Capital was content with two decades of continuous special taxes levied to fund the western border wars—especially when corruption ran high and many elites profited from the conflict.

Many were disgusted by the situation but dared not raise their voices. They were left to shoulder these onerous taxes, which slowly drained the lifeblood from their provinces. The tax was calculated based on the amount of productive land under their governance. Therefore, any land building would incur additional taxes even before the new land turned profitable.

The situation was frustrating, and many had sought ways to reduce, delay, or avoid these burdensome payments. Behind closed doors, many eastern Lords admitted they saw no future with the Imperium. They felt they were being milked for taxes with nothing in return but an aging, archaic bureaucracy that required bribes to function.

However, each was waiting for someone else to make the first move, to bear the blood cost. The rest would prefer to switch sides or declare independence when it was safe and convenient to do so. Thus, Bengrieve paid little heed to their expressions of support, knowing full well that they wanted Midlandia to shoulder the blame.

Bengrieve glanced at the silvery ornament on his right wrist, a gift from a mage as a pledge of loyalty. Noting the positions of the long and short hands, he muttered to himself, "Nine."

He continued reading. After dozens more pages, Bengrieve finally stumbled upon something intriguing. One of the yellowing, thick pages detailed the characteristics of a half-race from the Belopoeica commune that had gone extinct in the second millennium. Notable traits included human-like facial features, non-prominent ears, and black hair.

“Another of the halves,” Bengrieve muttered, concerned.

 

***

 

Chapter 75

Fates Entwined

 

Korelia Castle

As the aftermath of the war largely subsided, the Lord of Korelia resumed his court. For three days, the court and council focused on matters of war, hostages, the new masons’ guild, accommodations for a thousand laborers, and new alliances. However, today Lansius would address a lighter matter vying for his attention.

Hand in hand, Cecile and Calub stood before Lansius, seeking his approval for their marriage. Rather than make an immediate decision, he invited them for a walk in the adjacent garden. Once they were out of prying eyes, he asked them to make their case.

Although Audrey was present, she remained neutral, not wishing to influence Lansius’ judgment. Eventually, he invited Cecile aside for a private conversation.

Under the shade of a poplar tree, he inquired about her true feelings for the marriage, even assuring her that her late father's achievement was enough to secure the future of her House.

However, Cecile was adamant. The young woman’s confident and mature answer did not surprise Lansius. He knew that people in this world often married and started families at a young age.

With no further reservations, Lansius led everyone back to the Great Hall and contentedly granted his approval. As tradition dictated, he formally blessed the new couple before closing the court. Thus, Calub and Cecile were officially engaged.

When the possibility of a double wedding was raised, the new couple politely declined. It was a courteous decision, as no one wanted to overshadow the Lord’s upcoming marriage.

After the court was over, in a secluded corridor, Calub shared his deepest fear with Cecile. “I hope you’ll forgive me if our children aren’t blond or fair skinned, but dark-skinned like me.”

His comment, after such a weighty court session, sent Cecile into a fit of giggles. Amid all the pressing matters, the skin or hair color of their future children was the least of her concerns.

A wise man once said that having a partner who could make you laugh was a good omen. That day, the halls of Korelia Castle were filled with laughter once again.

 

***

 

Lord Omin

Omin was in high spirits as the city of Three Hills loomed on the horizon. Despite his anxieties, Lansius had failed to give chase.

What a moron! That Lansius must’ve been getting his hands full with the prisoners and disillusioned with the ransom.

He snickered against the imaginary opponent. This had become Omin’s favorite diversion to pass the time.

Although relentlessly pursued by the nomads, the Coalition’s sheer numbers protected them from being tracked. Omin had sacrificed several of his valuable carts as a diversion, buying himself the time he needed to escape.

He openly mocked Lansius for using the nomads' assistance to chase them down. The nomads were after all comprised of numerous tribes, many of which were undisciplined and too eager to collect trophies. Thus, Omin’s ragged convoy managed to escape and reached the Three Hills.

The Nicopolan bodyguard rode ahead to announce Lord Omin’s arrival. Unlike Korelia, Three Hills was a walled city. Despite the announcement, the soldiers at the gate asked Omin to wait.

Fifteen long minutes passed before a city official appeared above the gatehouse. “Under Lord Jorge’s command, the city gates of Three Hills are to remain closed until his return. No exceptions,” the official shouted.

Omin yelled back, “Please tell your Lord that Baron Omin is here and wishes to meet him.”

“Lord Jorge is not here. He’s in Korelia,” explained the official.

Confused, Omin said, “I’m not sure I follow. Explain yourself.”

“We received a message two days ago stating that Lord Jorge is being welcomed in Korelia.”

“T-that’s Korelians’ trickery!” Omin exclaimed, a cold sweat forming on his back as he realized that Jorge might have been captured.

That incompetent idiot! He got the Black Knights and my Nicopolan cavalry and still got captured?

“We checked the writing and the signet stamp; they’re authentic. Lord Omin, please leave. We can’t open the gate.”

Omin, now desperate, resorted to threats. “Open the gate, don't force my hand!”

His convoy looked on in disbelief. Even with lucky stragglers who had joined them, their numbers barely reached a hundred. They were in no condition to do anything.

“Lord Omin, I urge you to reconsider,” the city official replied indifferently.

“The Korimors are retreating in an orderly fashion; they’ll arrive in three days,” Omin countered, aiming to sound assertive.

However, his words had no impact. Troops atop the wall were already readying their crossbows.

“State your terms, then. Come down so we can discuss,” Omin said, softening his tone.

However, another figure appeared atop the gatehouse, and everyone instantly recognized his face.

"Sir Arius," the Nicopolan bodyguard whispered. Omin, along with everyone else, was shocked to see him standing there.

"Lord Omin, please leave for now. I’m sure you have other matters to attend to," Sir Arius replied coldly.

Omin's shock quickly turned to rage. The fact that Sir Arius was there instead of Lord Jorge strongly suggested that a deal had been struck between him and Lord Lansius. Although Arius and his escort could travel light and use spare horses to overtake Omin's slow-moving, horse-drawn carriage, they would still have had to evade the nomads.

This seemed unlikely unless Arius had been escorted by Lord Lansius' men and had taken a direct route to Three Hill.

Convinced his suspicions were correct yet powerless to retaliate, Omin clenched his fist. The city walls were tall and thick; the ramparts were deep. He turned away, his fist still clenched.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle

A man in grand and beautiful black armor, hastily fitted in just five days by an armorer, entered the chamber. Today was a special day and Lansius was flanked by his honored entourage in their best attire. The rich colors and their dashing attire exuded their charisma.

None other than the Marshal himself, Sir Justin, had accompanied Lord Lansius in this procession. Alongside Margo, he had collected Lansius from the Eastern Mansion that morning and escorted him through the town, finally arriving at the castle in a grand procession.

This narrative has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. If you see it on Amazon, please report it.

Tens of knights served as the honor guards, while thousands of townsmen followed and gathered patiently outside the castle.

Inside the castle, the bridegroom was finally allowed to meet his would-be wife after several days of separation. The maids in their best attire escorted Lansius into a chamber where a Lady in a fine ivory white dress was waiting.

The morning sun gently shone on the dress's silky surface, the small tiara, and the large golden ornaments, lending them a grand and majestic look.



Lansius was stunned, Audrey had never looked so beautiful. The stiffness in his face was mistakenly seen as nervousness, so the bride smiled, making the scene even more perfect.

“Well?” Audrey blushed and looked aside. Today, there was no pouting, just a genuine smile on her lips.

“May I take your hands, My Lady?” asked Lansius still bewitched.

Audrey nodded. “Certainly, My lord.”

The couple flanked by their smiling and grinning entourage continued the procession held at the Great Hall.

In Lowlandia, it was local custom for noblemen to wear armor at their weddings. Lansius wore richly decorated black ceremonial armor, a gift from the Black Knights.

The bride's ensemble was a combination of heirlooms from three different knight families: the dress from one, the tiara from another, and the golden accessories from a third. Lady Felicity had generously financed the arrangements to ensure everything went smoothly.

There in the decorated halls, filled with flowers that emitted a gentle, pleasing fragrance, Lord Robert, who had just arrived two days ago, and Lord Jorge, who was supposed to officiate the marriage, stood side by side on the elevated platform.

Lansius had made a mistake in thinking that Lord Robert wouldn’t trouble himself, but the old man was spirited. In reality, the two Viscounts wouldn’t let this honorable opportunity slip through their grasp, even going so far as to agree to officiate the marriage together. It was a situation never heard of before.

At the guest table sat representatives from Galdia and Salcesia, attending in place of their masters. Lansius had picked a later date for his marriage to accommodate possible guests, and his optimism paid off.

The Marshal, already healed from his hip injury, walked with a perfect gait as honor guard for his charge. The couple ascended a finely carpeted, decorated dais where two Viscounts awaited them, dressed in their regal attire.

Lord Lansius and Lady Audrey respectfully knelt, awaiting their blessings. The Viscounts then offered their most eloquent words of well-wishes, each trying to outdo the other.

Lord Jorge wished for the couple’s pursuit of happiness and harmony, while Lord Robert hoped for luck, wealth, peace, and a multitude of children to guarantee easy succession. Overwhelmed by the flood of well wishes, the couple could only blush.

For the two Viscounts, this moment was more than just ceremonial; it offered a chance to redefine their Houses' legacies, to redeem past defeats. From this day forward, if anyone dared question their honor by invoking past failures, they could proudly counter that they were the ones who blessed Lord Lansius' marriage.

Lansius' plans for Lowlandia made the event so enticing that representatives from the other two baronies attended once they learned of both the plans and the wedding.

Looking back, this turn of events was shocking for all of Lowlandia. The transformation of a major siege into a sudden triumph, the marriage of the victor to a commoner, and whispers of a new alliance—it was all simply unbelievable.

The fact that Lansius didn't marry Lord Robert's daughter or Lord Jorge's cousins only added to the mystique surrounding him. Politically, it cemented his role as a mediator between East and West Lowlandia. Meanwhile, the commoners rooted for Lansius as their champion.

When the brief but lively ceremony was over, music was played, and the couple shared a customary mead from a golden chalice to seal their marriage. The guests held their goblets and cheered to congratulate the Lord and his consort.

Afterward, the newlyweds descended the dais and greeted the guests on their way to the carriage. All of their peers in the Great Hall watched the couple with joy and hope. Lady Felicity, who had been given the top seat alongside the two representatives, was the first to rise and clap her hands to celebrate the couple.

Following her lead, the row of knights, led by Sir Harold, Dietrich, and Carla, began to clap their hands. Next, Calub and Cecile greeted the couple; behind them were the senior castle staff, lieutenants, and the top men-at-arms of the army.

Snacks and more drinks were finally served to the guests while the newlyweds were escorted to the carriage for the grand parade around town.

♡♡♡

 

Korelia Town

An old man with a rounded belly and dressed in richly colored clothing jogged into the center of the town’s plaza. His face was reddened from all the running, but he was happy.

Years had passed since the old man last represented Lord Jorge or any Lord. He had fallen into poverty, but last week, Lord Jorge recognized him during a visit and recommended him to Lord Lansius as his herald for this special occasion.

“Hear ye, hear ye!” the man joyfully exclaimed in a loud, yet charismatic and clear voice.

His voice brought smiles to the faces of the old Korelians. The herald was a reminder of happier years long gone, and his return was seen as a good omen.

The herald continued, “The Viscount of Three Hills and the Viscount of White Lake have decreed that the marriage between Lansius, the Lord of Korelia, and Lady Audrey is officially recognized. As such, it cannot be challenged or annulled. In honor of this joyous occasion, today is hereby declared a holiday.”

Some cheered at the declaration, but most held back, knowing the herald had more to say.

“The Lord wishes for the people of Korelia to begin the festivities and participate in the merriment immediately. Three cheers for the newlyweds! May peace and prosperity bless their union, their domains, and all the good people of Korelia,” the herald read aloud in the town’s plaza.

Upon hearing this, the crowd cheered emotionally. Sporadic music and dances started around the town’s plaza. Wildflowers adorned every street corner, either hung up or placed in vases. Townsfolk brought tables outside and began banquets with their neighbors.

The mood was joyous, especially when the newlyweds' carriage parade passed through. Parties erupted everywhere.

The wedding did not surprise anyone. Their Lord was young and single, and two blondes had come to live in the castle.

But everyone had been ecstatic since Audrey was announced as the partner. The brunette was the town’s champion. Her humble background and war exploits made her well-loved.

The townsfolk were also thrilled when Lord Jorge and Lord Robert agreed to officiate the marriage. Many of the older generations still remembered Lord Jorge’s father fondly. The Coalition attack had tarnished that sentiment, but the repaired relationship was welcomed with open arms.

As for Lord Robert, his just rule in Korelia and his actions in eradicating corrupt practices had earned him the trust of the community before Lord Lansius’ reign.

Today offered an opportunity to mend relations and forge stronger bonds anew. Now, for the first time, a Korelian could speak of a peaceful future in the region without anyone correcting them for their naivety.

 

***

 

Lord Omin

At least I still got that bastard‘s baggage train.

Omin convinced himself that the venture wasn’t a total loss. The amount of gold and precious trinkets was enough to rebuild his army. However, devoid of essential supplies from Three Hills, their situation grew increasingly dire.

Their only respite was the river that ran beside the city, where the convoy replenished their water supply. It was the first water source they had found in three days. With their thirst quenched but still hungry, the convoy trudged lifelessly toward Korimor.

In a desperate move, Omin ordered his men to scout for any nearby villages to raid for supplies. While they had carts filled with valuables, none were filled with consumables. Just yesterday, they had been forced to slaughter two horses for food.

The hot midday turned cooler, and they had yet to reach the place where they used to make camp. Then suddenly, an unknown cavalry unit appeared on the horizon.

“My lord, it’s the nomads,” his bodyguard called out.

Omin couldn’t believe what he saw. He had assumed the nomads wouldn’t dare pursue them this close to Three Hills City. Panic rippled through his convoy, plunging it into disarray.

With no other options, Omin quickly turned his horse and spurred it into a faster gallop.

I’m not going to be captured by this Lansius‘ dogs! I will never-

Omin chanted the mantra to himself, pushing his horse to its limits. Meanwhile, the last of his escorts, many of whom hadn’t even donned their armor, dispersed in the chaos.

He was reduced to only his bodyguard, having abandoned all others in the chaos.

“Lord Lansius invites you all for a drink,” taunted one of the riders in pursuit.

After a short but desperate chase, his bodyguard veered off, his horse too spent to continue. An arrow found its mark, striking the man’s back and sending him tumbling to the ground.

“Not that one! Get him, get him!” the remaining raiders shouted, redirecting their chase toward Omin.

Omin urged his horse to even greater speeds, but abruptly, his world flipped upside down. He lost sight of the horizon, glimpsing only the blue sky before falling from his mount. He screamed as he crashed into the ground, tumbling multiple times and kicking up a cloud of orange dust.

...

Batu, the leader of the nomads, pulled back the reins of his horse and dismounted. Despite limping from a duel that took place four days earlier, he approached Omin. His band had dwindled to fewer than a hundred members, all of whom were exhausted and tasked with guarding their numerous captives. However, after Lord Lansius' remarkable victory, Batu was able to persuade other tribes to join them, bolstering their manpower.

Finding Baron Omin had proved challenging due to the size of the Coalition. Batu had encountered too many groups of stragglers across the great plains. That was why he had decided to gamble on a different approach, setting up an ambush between Three Hills and Korimor.

As it turned out, his keen insight had paid off. Batu unsheathed his sword and kicked Omin’s body to flip him over. Recognizing the exquisite clothing and the golden signet ring, a broad smile spread across Batu’s face.

“We’ve got him,” Batu declared.

Upon hearing their leader’s words, hundreds of riders erupted in cheers of victory.

 

***

 

Just for precaution. This chapter contains a slight and toned-down explicit scene. 

I want no trouble. I understand that many have trouble with explicit scene. 

If you don't want to read it, don't open the Spoiler.

 

Chapter 76

Dancing Shadows

 

Fleeting memories of conversations with Hannei about women’s fertility came into Lansius’ mind uninvited. He began to realize that her concerns likely stemmed from the fear that it might be difficult for them to have children. Unlike Hannei, whom Lansius suspected had been transported into this world, body, and soul; his situation remained a mystery.

Is this my body or am I inside someone else‘s body...? But what are the chances that I ended up as a foreigner?

Everywhere he went, Lansius had never seen a man with black hair. Black hair wasn’t even mentioned in any documents. Sadly, Lansius couldn’t even recall his origin, even his own hair color.

The crux of the matter was that Lansius, and Audrey could belong to different species. Similar as they were, but they might not be compatible.

Mmm… cold?!

Things started to fade, and Lansius awoke abruptly.

...Was that a dream?




He was about to recall what the dream had been about when a sensation from his lower body drew his attention. It felt as if he had gone to sleep without a blanket or, more eerily, without pants. Fighting off the haziness, Lansius looked down.

The room was dim, lit only by a lantern on the table. Still, he could make out the silhouette of someone on top of him. Blinking, he recognized his newlywed wife. He was stunned by her actions, a single blanket draped over her shoulder serving as her only covering.

Audrey seemed to notice and spoke, “J-just lay still. Oh, and keep it erect.”

Lansius was rendered speechless by the absurdity, at the same time captivated by her lithe, yet toned body. Then she got it right. “Oh~,” he moaned, his hand flying to his mouth a moment too late.

Audrey looked thrilled. “See, see, I can do it! I was just too tired last time,” she said proudly while wincing from pain.

So this is what it‘s all about...

“S-slowly,” he warned her, not wanting her to get hurt.

Just a few hours ago, it had been their wedding night. After a feast that began at lunchtime and didn’t conclude until dinner, both were exhausted. They had been so weary and nervous that they couldn’t consummate their marriage. Lansius hadn’t given it much thought, but it seemed Audrey blamed herself and was trying to make amends.

As she began to move, awkward at first, the blanket slid away, illuminating her form under the dim light of the lantern. Her face flushed, she closed her eyes but persisted.

“Easy... let’s do it slowly,” he guided her as she gently turned his world upside down.

…

 

“What time is it?” Lansius asked as they cuddled afterward.

“Not long after the fourth watch,” Audrey replied, her eyelids feeling heavy and her mind so relaxed.

“Still far from dawn,” said Lansius as he rose from the bed, immediately conscious of the tightness in his thighs. He might have overdone it, but definitely had no regrets.

“Mm... Lans, where are you going?” Audrey asked from the bed.

“I’m thirsty. Aren’t you?”

She shook her sleepy head. “Just a bit.”

He walked over to a nearby table, poured himself a cup from a silver jug, and took a sip. "... Why is it spicy?"

She stifled a laugh and answered, “That must be the spiced wine.”

“Welp, we’re out of water,” he muttered after finding the other jugs empty.

“I think I emptied the last one before sleep,” she answered while sitting up on the bed.

“Ah, okay, that’s quite alright,” he said while taking another sip of the spiced wine.

“Hey, want to go out and grab some water and snacks?” Audrey turned lively and started to dress. “There should be plenty in the main hall.”

Lansius furrowed his brows. “Sneaking out? I’m not sure that’s a good idea.”

"Come on, Lans, it should be fun." She grinned and was about to take his hands, but halted after only a few steps.

“What’s the matter?” he asked with concern.

“Mm, it stings...”

Realizing what she was getting at, he quickly apologized, “Sorry.”

“Don’t be, you dummy... Hey, Lans, I can call you dummy again, right?”

Lansius chuckled. “Well, I’m feeling rather generous tonight.”

Audrey grinned happily like a little girl. “Oh, I almost forgot to fold the bedsheet,” she said rather urgently as if remembering something important.

“Why?” Lansius asked.

“It’s a tradition. The bride keeps the bedsheet as proof that the marriage has been consummated,” she explained without hesitation.

Lansius nodded and asked, “Did Felis teach you that?”

“Yep,” she said, looking smug.

He couldn't help but erase her smugness with another kiss. They concluded their wedding night by sneaking around the mansion to quietly secure a jug of water, roast meat, and puddings. Oddly enough, this clandestine adventure felt rather enjoyable. They had the chance to observe the aftermath of the celebration.

The hall was filled with servants, staff, and even guests, all sleeping off their drunkenness. Lansius was pleased to see that everyone had enjoyed themselves.



 

***

The story has been illicitly taken; should you find it on Amazon, report the infringement.

 

Midlandia

On top of the green hills, three days away from Eclipse Castle, there was a famous bathhouse. Since ages ago, its natural hot springs have been known to have healing properties. Two centuries ago, the Healers Guild bought the adjacent villa and opened their headquarters there.

People seeking treatment would come there as if on a pilgrimage. Several years ago, the late Sir Callahan had visited the place when he was an envoy in Midlandia.

However, Hannei bypassed the famed location and ordered her carriage to go straight to Cascasonne. She knew of a friendly, unlicensed healer connected to Bengrieve.

Sterling, who was under her care, was recovering. But as Hannei had feared, his leg was causing him all sorts of pain. Magic could only boost the body’s natural recovery abilities. A wound that would normally take a day to heal could be hastened to just a few hours through magical intervention. However, it was powerless to correct the position of broken bones, which could grow haphazardly.

That was why Hannei needed a healer, who typically was also a bone physician and had enough knowledge about anesthesia.

Upon arriving at a small rustic villa that grew grapevines, Hannei met with several people before Sterling was admitted to their private hospice.

“Thank you for your kind help, My Lady,” said Sterling as he settled into his new bed.

“Don’t mention it. Just understand that the treatment will tax both your mind and body. But don’t lose hope,” Hannei advised.

“Fight on!” little Tia also encouraged Sterling.

Their words made Sterling chuckle. “Will we meet again, My Lady?” His sharp instincts told him that Hannei lived in a different social class and could easily disappear.

“I’ll see what I can do. Just focus on your treatment,” Hannei reassured him.

Sterling exhaled deeply and turned his gaze to the little girl. “Tia, take care of Lady Hannei for me.”

The little girl grinned, “I’ll be with Master Hannei unless she orders me not to.”

The squire was pleased. Tia was the star of their journey; she cooked, cleaned, and took care of their needs without a single complaint.

...

 

With Sterling and several other men under the care of reliable hands, Hannei took the carriage to Chateau de Cascasonne. She had prepared for this journey, already changing into her usual brown servant attire. She had also wore a brown hair wig before departing.

Tia was surprised by the change, and Hannei concocted a story to convince her to keep her hair and magical abilities a secret. The little girl seemed to take Hannei’s explanation at face value and took it to heart.

Truthfully, Hannei had left her natural hair uncovered in Korelia because of Felis. She didn’t want Felis to stand out alone, so she willingly made herself another target to confuse any potential attack or kidnappers.

Without Felis around, she was more comfortable with the wig to blend in with other people. Just like Lansius, she hated to be on the spotlight.

Arriving at the chateau just before sundown, her carriage was stopped at the gatehouse. Hannei noticed the heightened security and found it unusual. Still, she merely attributed it to the ongoing succession crisis.

Like servants, Hannei and Tia approached the main courtyard on foot, under the watchful eyes of the guardsmen.

As they moved along and passed the inner curtain wall, something piqued Hannei’s interest. Beside the garden, on a plot of land used to grow vegetables and herbs, a girl with golden blonde hair stood up.

Tia looked at Hannei with a questioning eye, but Hannei shrugged. She had never seen her before and decided to approach.

The bubbly and energetic girl noticed them and asked, “Are you two guests at the chateau?”

“I work here but have just returned from an errand,” Hannei answered.

“Ah, nice to meet you. My name is Tanya; my mother and I arrived here several days ago,” she introduced herself happily.

Hannei nodded and couldn’t help but smile. She knew who they were and was pleased with their arrival. “Nice to meet you too. You can call me Hannei, I’m not a Lady.”

Hannei then glanced at Tia, gesturing that it was okay for her to speak. “I’m Tia, nice to meet you,” she said with a little bow.

Tanya was excited with the little girl. “I rarely see someone around my age.”

“What are you planting here? Is this your garden?” Tia matched her energy.

Tanya giggled watching Tia’s curiosity.

“Do you or your mother need anything?” asked Hannei.

“We’re pretty well-off here; maybe just some clothing for winter. But I heard the generous and benevolent Lord is going to provide for us,” Tanya said.

Hannei smiled at Tanya’s cheerful nature. “I’m sure the Lord of the chateau will take care of you.”

Tanya tilted her head a little. “Although, I am quite curious. Why is he so keen to help us? It’s not like we’re worthy of his attention.”

Tia nodded in agreement. Even she knew it was an uncanny situation.

Hannei was pleased with Tanya's critical thinking. “Smart girl. Would you like to go to school? Tia is only a few years younger. It’ll be fun to have friends at school.”

“Friends, school? I’d love to,” Tanya said ecstatically, while Tia’s eyes beamed with joy.

Hannei kept smiling, but inside she was concerned for Tanya and her mother. Lord Bengrieve didn’t usually do something like this. And certainly not without a good reason.

Bidding farewell to Tanya, Hannei and Tia proceeded to the main keep's entrance, where they found a staff member who recognized her. The man escorted them straight to the servants' quarters, where Hannei found a small waiting room

There, she left Tia with her bags, promising that she wouldn't be long. Still under escort, Hannei then navigated the keep's long and winding passageways, passing additional guards stationed seemingly at every door.

She finally reached the corridor where Lord Bengrieve’s study was located. Unlike anything she had ever seen in her years of service, the place was now a beehive of activity. Squires, messengers, and other staff waited in the corridors with reddened eyes and tired expressions. Cups of roasted cherry black drink that smelled like coffee were being refilled regularly. Incense was being burned to mask any smells.

Many saw Hannei and made gestures to acknowledge her presence. The Steward noticed the gestures, found the newcomer, and approached. “Maester Hannei, this is most unfortunate timing.”

“Master Steward, what happened?” Hannei quickly added, “I don’t wish to bother. I’m only here to report.”

“Many things happened while you were away,” the old man replied with a fatherly smile. “Please wait in your quarters; I’m sure the Lord will want to discuss something with you, but probably not tonight.”

“Gratitude. Then I’ll bother you no more,” Hannei bowed her head to the old man who had done much to help her over the years.

She left the busy corridor and headed to her quarters at the far end of the complex. Despite her servant attire, the maids knew perfectly well where Hannei stood in the hierarchy. They allowed her to enter the lavish compound in the chateau, a place reserved for high-ranking retainers.

...

 

Two days after Hannei's arrival, a summons arrived at her door. She prepared herself and told Tia to continue studying and to sleep if the meeting took too long.

Unescorted, Hannei entered one of the private chambers inside the chateau. The maids opened the door, revealing Bengrieve with reddened eyes and a tired expression.

As usual, Bengrieve was preoccupied with his dinner. It was the Steward who gestured for Hannei to take her seat. She pulled up a chair at the far end of the table and sat quietly.

A maid poured spiced wine and brought some snacks. Hannei pretended to sip her wine but didn't actually swallow, fearing it being laced with truth nectar. This was why she had hydrated sufficiently beforehand.

She waited patiently, rehearsing her reports in her mind in case Bengrieve asked for it.

"I hear you've brought a child. A servant or an adoption?" Bengrieve finally asked.

"I haven't thought that far ahead, My Lord, but I intend to protect her and provide for her," Hannei answered.

Bengrieve nodded and took a sip of his water.

"When will you return Lansius' family?" Hannei asked. She suspected that Bengrieve was aware of her visit to the garden. To avoid arousing suspicion, she decided to be upfront.

"I have yet to find the brother," Bengrieve said plainly.

The Lord turned silent, seemingly allowing Hannei to ask another question. She took the cue. "My Lord, if you don't mind, what is the status of the succession crisis?"

"Ask the Steward," Bengrieve replied. This small gesture allowed the Steward to brief Hannei on the latest developments. "But you'll be disappointed," he warned.

Hannei squinted, trying to discern his meaning.

Bengrieve had expected such reaction and spoke, "It's not the succession. It's outside of Midlandia." Despite using a napkin to cover his mouth, Hannei noticed that her host was smirking, as if unable to contain his excitement. "We finally have the opportunity we've been waiting for."

His words struck Hannei. She understood that the last seams of the Imperium had finally frayed.

 

***

 

Korimor, Lowlandia

The arrival of the joint forces from Korelia and White Lake sent shockwaves through Korimor. Panic ensued as the defenders barred the gates and manned their walls and towers. However, to their surprise, the joint forces did nothing more than set up camps and forage for firewood and timber for blockades.

For the next two days, the troops outside the walls refrained from setting up any siege engines or tunneling. They contented themselves with patrolling, keeping sentries, and observing the city from a safe distance.

The invaders didn't construct ladders or attempt other typical siege methods, unsettling the defenders. By the third day, not even a herald had approached the walls to announce the invading forces' intentions. The city finally raised a flag, signaling a request for parley.

Still, the joint forces made no response. Their camp showed little activity as if they were reluctant to even meet and make demands.

While the invader's action continued to baffle Korimor's defenders, the situation was well-received by the populace, who felt fortunate that there was no violence at their gates. They feared being drafted or expelled from the city to stave off hunger.

However, before midday on the fourth day, more troops arrived from the south, clearly a reinforcement for the joint forces. This turn of events disturbed the defenders' morale. Pushing them to risk sending an envoy to the enemy's camp.

The discussion between the two parties had barely concluded when, from the west, an even larger group arrived—men and carts marching toward the city, outnumbering even the invading force. The flags were unlike any ever seen in Lowlandia.

 

***

 

Chapter 77

Unexpected

 

Chateau de Cascasonne

"Tanya, help me with the cabbage," Mother Arryn called from the kitchen.

"I'm still fixing my gardening basket," Tanya replied.

"It can wait. We can't have a house without fermented cabbage," her mother said sternly.

Tanya groaned, set aside her work, and headed to the kitchen. "If only they'd let us carry our stuff."

"Don't be ridiculous. It's good enough that your husband managed to get us out of Arvena," said Arryn, as she placed finely sliced fresh cabbage into small earthen jars.

"Oh, my poor husband, always disappearing after finding us a home," said Tanya dramatically.

Arryn chuckled. "What luck for you to find a man like that. Still, I'm surprised you even agreed."

Tanya grinned. "With a face and body like that and that much coin, who wouldn't?"

"That's why I'm skeptical. He's too good to be interested in a simple farm girl like you."

"Mother!" Tanya complained, to which her mother laughed.

Despite their talks, Arryn knew well why Tanya had agreed. Despite Marc joining Lord Gottfried's military service, the family was still hard-pressed to pay special taxes to support the war. Their new overlord, Lord Gottfried, had let his men plunder if taxes weren't paid in full.

They would be in big debt, if not for a young traveling peddler who had just come to Bellandia. The man was looking for a wife and found Tanya attractive. Initially, Arryn disagreed because he intended to take Tanya out of the province, but the peddler convinced Arryn to move with him to Midlandia. He also didn't mind that the family couldn't afford a dowry.

Thus, they left a message for Marc at Connor, the butcher in case he came looking for them. They also left another message for Lansius, if he ever returned to Bellandia.

Lansius' story was a sad one. Tanya never mentioned the name anymore as it was a painful reminder of the grim news that Riverstead had fallen and that Lansius had likely perished alongside the Young Lord.

After two months on the road, the family finally arrived in Midlandia. There, Tanya's husband owned a house, a small farm, and even had a helper. He left them a sum of money without even staying a single night, departing hastily with the claim that he needed to sell his wares in the next town.

They didn't see him again until several days ago, when he returned to pick them up in a hurry and whisk them away to this chateau, claiming he had bagged an important deal with a noble.

"I can't believe that your husband is affiliated with the master of this big chateau. And the lord even allowed us to live here," said Arryn as she poured brine water into the earthen jar.

"The Lord of this chateau must've liked him enough," commented Tanya as she prepared another cabbage for the sauerkraut.

"If only you two are married for real," Arryn mused.

Tanya giggled. "But Mother, my marriage is real, at least on records."

"Well, married girl, time to learn to make good sauerkraut. Maybe then your husband will marry you for real," Arryn teased.

"Mother!" Tanya complained, her cheeks reddening, much to her mother's delight.

 

***

 

Korimor Region

Hugo and Michael had blockaded Korimor Castle and City, as instructed by Lord Lansius. The plan was simple, bordering on madness. They were to make no demands nor send envoys for discussion—only quietly occupy the area and block movements in and out of the city.

The troops were ordered merely to construct wooden fences, maintain their camps, organize patrols, and recuperate from the long journey. The nomads were allowed to graze far from camp and acted as eyes and ears around the area.

After three days of uncertainty, Korimor City finally signaled for talks with the joint force. However, Hugo and Michael feigned disinterest. Lord Lansius had instructed them to simply wait for the envoys to come knocking.

The city was baffled by the invaders’ continuous reluctance to negotiate or even make demands. Suspicion ran wild.

As if sensing the tension inside the city, Hugo and Michael sent a third of their troops southward under the cover of darkness. After several miles, the troops rested, ate breakfast at dawn, and then returned to their camp.

When they were within sight of Korimor City, the troops marched with great fanfare. It was a ruse, devised by Lord Lansius. The camp welcomed the fake reinforcements with trumpets, cavalry escorts, and formal greetings.

To complete the trick, they even had their men move and rebuild their camps to make it appear as if the camp was expanding due to the newcomers pitching their tents.

The Korelians and the White Lake forces found the affair amusing, but the Korimor defenders fell for it. The city risked opening its gates, sending three envoys with gifts, hoping for an opportunity to meet.

Seizing the opportunity, Hugo and Michael prepared their act.

The camp’s bustling activity helped maintain the illusion of a large army. It managed to impress the envoys as they were escorted into the command tent.

Hugo and Michael accepted the envoys, but instead of making demands, they acted more like guests trying to make acquaintances, rather than aggressors. Whenever the envoys sought demands or reasons for their presence, the Deputy and the one-eyed Knight showed reluctance to answer.

Finally, when it was clear that the conversation was going nowhere, Michael explained they were waiting for a transfer of power.

“Transfer of power?” asked one envoy in disbelief.

Michael nodded. “This is why we didn’t want to explain. It’s messy.”

Another envoy stepped forward. “Please enlighten us.”

Michael looked at Hugo, who nodded in agreement.

“Lord Lansius of Korelia has defeated and cornered Lord Omin. It’s only a matter of time before he is brought here,” the one-eyed Knight revealed.

This simple answer shocked the envoys. They finally understood why the invading force had not bothered with demands or a siege.

Not all the envoys were convinced. The Nicopolan mercenary envoy shook his head and spoke openly, “Do you have evidence for this claim?”

His combative tone made the other envoys nervous.

“What kind of proof would you like?” Hugo asked disinterestedly.

This tale has been unlawfully lifted from Royal Road; report any instances of this story if found elsewhere.

“We have the trinkets,” Michael reminded him.

Sighing as if troubled, Hugo gestured for his lieutenant to bring forward a large wooden box. Upon opening it, he pulled out an intricately embroidered pillow. “This was taken from Lord Omin’s camp,” he claimed.

The envoys were stunned. It seemed their lord’s baggage had been captured.

They cautiously examined the box’s contents. “Hey, be careful! This is my personal stash,” Hugo warned, adding pressure to the envoys. “Not everything here is from your lord. We also have items from Lord Jorge’s tents.”

While they didn’t recognize the silk, luxury items, or golden trinkets, they were convinced that such valuables were beyond the means of a mere Deputy from Korelia. Thus, it was clear these items had been spoils taken from the Coalition Lord’s baggage train.

Only the Nicopolan envoy remained skeptical. “We have six thousand men and siege engines. How could you possibly defeat them?”

Instead of answering, Deputy Hugo and Sir Michael merely looked at each other. At that moment, Daniella entered the tent to the envoys’ surprise.

Ignoring the envoys, she approached Hugo and Michael. “Deputy, Sir, my men among the reinforcements are accounted for.”

“Daniella, why are you with them?” demanded the Nicopolan envoy.

Daniella faced the mercenary squarely; he was one of the company leaders who had stayed behind. “What else can I do? I fulfilled my contract. Lord Omin was defeated and fled, leaving everyone to die.”

"That's utter nonsense!" The envoy was in denial.

Daniella simply shook her head, looking at him with contempt. It turned into a staring contest, but she didn't back down. Eventually, the Nicopolan envoy lowered his gaze and fell silent, realizing that no amount of bickering would change the fact that their side had lost the war.

While the details could wait, Daniella's presence on the opponent's side was the strongest evidence that Lord Omin's defeat was real.

Daniella turned to the other two envoys. "Lord Lansius is a better leader. He has grand plans for Lowlandia and is generous to those who support him."

Distraught that even Lady Daniella had switched sides, the envoys finally relented. The House they represented had only a young boy as a possible heir, not even old enough to be a squire. Meanwhile, there were mercenaries whose loyalty was questionable but who would happily switch sides if offered better terms.

The fact that Lady Daniella was on the opposing side clearly indicated where the mercenaries' loyalty stood.

Behind closed doors, the House had confided their worst-case scenario to their envoys. Now, as an extension of the House's hands, the envoys began offering terms to Hugo and Sir Michael. Their goal was to negotiate before the captured Lord Omin was paraded in front of the city, which would embarrass their master and the House for eternity. Another reason was to prevent an internal struggle between loyalists who wanted to free their master and those who wanted to defend their holdings at the cost of everyone else.

To resist meant to allow internal strife to consume the city while also facing external threats. The envoys didn't want that and understood that most Lowlandians would simply choose to accept a new Lord.

For the men-at-arms and commoners, Lord Omin and Lord Lansius were just another set of conquerors—the fourth to hold the city in less than ten years, from Jorge to his rebelling uncle, then to Omin who rebelled against his master, and now to Lord Lansius. In an internal struggle, they would not have the support of the populace, further risking conflict.

Therefore, the envoys hoped that negotiating now would yield better results, or at least some leniency in the terms.

...

After achieving a breakthrough, the envoys took their leave to discuss the matter with the reigning House and the rest of the city’s defenders.

Hugo, Michael, and Daniella stood in front of their command tent, watching the three envoys ride their horses back to the city gates.

“Nice work,” Michael congratulated Hugo.

“Couldn’t have done it without you, sir,” Hugo replied.

“Gentlemen,” Daniella interrupted, “I’ve received reports from our nomad friends.”

“Something happened?” Hugo inquired.

Daniella exhaled sharply. “Thousands are approaching the city from the west.”

Hugo’s smile faded. “Thousands? From the Three Hills area?”

“It’s the route Nicopolans like me used to take when traveling from our home province,” Daniella clarified.

Hugo studied her. “Are you implying they’re Nicopolan mercenaries?”

Daniella met his gaze. “The nomads believe they’re likely refugees.”

“Seeking refuge in Lowlandia? But why?” Sir Michael interjected, puzzled.

“A great famine,” Daniella replied, the words leaving a bad taste in her mouth.

 

***

 

Nicopola Province

For two years, bad harvests had plagued the Nicopola region. This was not uncommon; agriculture is inherently dependent on the whims of sun, rain, and weather. However, the province faced a plethora of additional problems that exacerbated the situation.

Decades of high population growth, a continuous decline in fertile land due to the nobility expansion, and a large influx of refugees from the western wars had all pushed the province to its breaking point. The land and its people simply couldn’t keep up with the increasing demands for food.

Now, they were on the brink of yet another bad harvest. The evidence was clear for all to see: even near the end of summer, the fields were a lifeless brown with no hint of green. There was no hope for improvement, only the prospect of another season of harrowing famine and a deadly winter.

Panic set in, and people began raiding merchants and small communities for food supplies. Tensions boiled over among the three feuding factions: Nicopolan commoners, war refugees from West Centuria, and migrants from Sarmatia. Each blamed the others for the crisis.

Each group had endured unbearable pain and losses over the past two winters. This year, their patience had worn thin, and all sides were prepared for armed conflict. What began as isolated incidents of raiding soon escalated into widespread unrest. That summer, with everyone suspicious and hurting, the conflict entered a bloody new stage.

In unprecedented chaos since the founding of the Imperium, Nicopola was swept up in a massive armed conflict. Unguarded villages, manors, and weakly defended towns were sacked indiscriminately.

The noblemen tried to marshal their forces to contain the unrest but failed spectacularly. Unexpectedly, they lost the support of the middle class. As famine ravaged every social stratum, men-at-arms chose sides to protect their families and communities, rendering the nobles powerless.

Without sufficient manpower, the nobles retreated to their castles and ramparts, effectively becoming hostages in their own domains.

The crisis reached its peak, and the land was plundered clean. Within a month, not a single granary in Nicopola remained standing.

The high percentage of mercenaries among Nicopola’s population made the conflict particularly deadly. Ironically, more food was lost to pillaging and arson than was gained.

Fall and winter were yet to come, but tens of thousands—primarily infants and the elderly—had already paid the ultimate price.

The Nicopolan crisis soon spilled over into neighboring provinces, many of which were already grappling with their problems and committed to different fronts. Suddenly, the situation in the Imperium’s heartland became dire.

Despite the urgency of the situation, no help arose. The Imperium failed to even send a detachment.

A grave mistake of such magnitude didn’t go unnoticed. For those in power with keen insights, it was as good as a revelation. Three lords saw through the chaos and found the evidence they were seeking.

Lord Gottfried, ever ambitious, was the first to act. He mustered his forces and spread rumors that the Emperor was ill and held hostage by the High Lords. This successfully sowed chaos among the populace and emboldened his followers in the north, who began to openly hail him as the King of Brigantes.

Fearing turmoil in the Capital, Lord Luis of Centuria began halting reinforcements to the western front. Although aware this could risk a total collapse against the nomadic incursion, he felt he had no other options.

Meanwhile, in Midlandia, Lord Bengrieve was clandestinely preparing his men for reasons that remained unclear.

While these lords pursued their agendas, their arrogance blinded them to the dagger at their jugular. Against all expectations, before the end of summer, massive groups of armed individuals emerged from Nicopola and invaded neighboring provinces. The crisis was in full swing and expanding exponentially.

The most devastating attack occurred in Elandia, sending its populace into panic. The region hadn’t seen a strong harvest for nearly a decade, and the conflict now threatened to make them abandon their fields just months before harvest time. Famine seemed almost certain to befall a region already strained by hosting a sizable garrison against potential attack from Lord Gottfried’s army in Arvena.

With Centuria occupied fighting against the nomadic incursions, Elandia served as the last lifeline for the Capital area. Its harvests and trade routes to Midlandia and Nicopola were vital for sustaining the Capital. Losing Elandia—especially after the loss of Arvena—would lead to total isolation from the rest of the Imperium.

Armed groups also threatened to breach Midlandia's borders, prompting Lord Bengrieve to put his plans on hold and mobilize his private army to reinforce defenses in western Midlandia. Amidst a succession crisis, this move risked weakening his grip over the region.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle

The news of the crisis in Nicopola and Elandia had yet to reach Korelia. There, the newlywed couple, still on their honeymoon, received a special visitor. Batu, the nomadic leader, had returned. Having heard about the Lord’s marriage, he came bearing lavish wedding gifts.

But first, another matter demanded attention. Sir Harold escorted a prisoner brought by Batu directly into the castle, where the Lord of Korelia was holding a special court session.

All parties had denied the prisoner’s request for a bath and change of clothes. With little sympathy, Sir Harold pushed the man onto the cold floor, disregarding his high status. No one was in the mood for leniency; they knew this man was responsible for last year’s spike in grain prices that had nearly starved them.

“My Noyan, I present to you the architect of the siege of Korelia,” Batu announced, proudly.

“So this is the man who orchestrated our near-starvation?” the Lord inquired coldly.

Suddenly, a manic laugh echoed through the Great Hall, catching everyone by surprise. It came from the Lady seated beside the Lord.

Confused glances were exchanged among those in attendance. There seemed to be no immediate reason for her outburst.

Without care, the Lady boldly approached the prisoner and locked eyes with him. The man abruptly looked away, shuddering uncontrollably.

“So it really was you, cousin,” she said, her voice dripping with contempt.

The hall fell into stunned silence.

 

***

 

Chapter 78

Korelia City

 

Korelia Castle

The court of Korelia was abuzz with a shocking revelation: Lady Audrey declared the captured man to be her cousin. Anticipating denial, the Lord of Korelia approached the man. A tall knight promptly pinned Lord Omin to the floor.

Lord Lansius glanced at Lady Audrey, who nodded to indicate her seriousness. He then knelt and seized Omin by the chin. "We've never met before. I'm Lansius. Should I call you Omin, or brother-in-law?"

Omin shuddered uncontrollably, his mouth almost foaming at the implication of that word. The bane of his existence and his childhood heroine, united in matrimony. However, the tall knight shoved a waterskin into Omin's mouth and forced him to drink.

It wasn't strictly necessary; Sir Harold was simply telling the guest to behave.

Sitting on the marble floor in sticky, dirty clothes, and feeling full from water, Omin gave up. He couldn't suffer the humiliation anymore and he was deathly afraid of being offered to the Nomads as slave. "Lord Lansius, what do you want with me?"

"First, is she your cousin?" Lansius asked.

"I have a cousin named Stephania," said Omin after some hesitation. "Indeed the Lady bears some resemblance to her."

Lansius was suspicious at how easily Omin admitted it. "But you've been separated for so long? Are you certain about this?"

"The eyes," Omin mumbled, then looked directly at Lansius. "You know it; she has the fell beast's eye."

Sir Harold heard the insult and was about to exact punishment, but Lansius signaled him to stop.

"I'll have my scribe prepare a letter of confession. Will you sign it?"

Omin was stunned. He knew it would seal everything for which he had fought so hard. However, memories of how his father had taken everything from Stephania and her mother surged forth. He had done many cruel things, but there was some guilt still left in him. For him, Stephania was family and a childhood friend. Moreover, she was the only blood relative he had left.

Against all his suspicions, the former rising star of Lowlandia nodded. He saw himself fortunate to meet Stephania. Better her than Lansius, he thought. In her hand, his House may survive. "I haven't lost my signet ring. I'll write the letter myself if you agree to transfer my House to her intact, provide leniency for my House and myself, and absolve me of all accusations."

"You can't escape the law," warned Lansius.

"This is Lowlandia." Omin stifled a laugh before raising his voice, "You are the law."

Lansius exhaled sharply at Omin's remark that the victor could do anything he wanted in this lawless region. He stood up and looked at Audrey. "My Lady, do you have anything to say to your cousin?"

"We'll chat about the good old times in Centuria after he's settled in the dungeon," she replied, eying Omin, who grew nervous. "Take care, cousin. And thank you for returning the House. I'll send some warm clothes later, just as Uncle gave me new warm clothes before he sold me as a servant."

...

 

The startling revelations continued to reverberate throughout the castle: Lord Omin was Lady Audrey's cousin. Furthermore, Omin had relinquished his House to Audrey to avoid being taken or confiscated by Lansius.

The story goes that a decade earlier young Audrey and her mother were evicted from their home following her father’s untimely death. The instigator had been her uncle, Omin’s father, who later sold the estate to purchase larger lands in faraway Lowlandia.

All this time, Audrey had been unaware that her House had left its roots and relocated, but now it was suddenly within her reach.

With Omin captured and facing punishment for his crimes, even without Omin's words, his House would naturally disinherit him to avoid political ramifications. Given Audrey’s birthright and her position as the victor’s consort, she was the obvious choice to become the new head of the House.

In a rare feat of justice, Audrey would reclaim everything Omin had achieved, including the entire fief of Korimor and the accompanying title. From that day on, she became the rightful claimant to the Barony of Korimor. Once merely the adopted daughter of a baronet, she was now a Baroness in her own right.

 

***

 

Korelia City

While the nobility kept the news of the crisis in Nicopola under wraps to prevent trouble, news of Lord Lansius' victory had spread like wildfire in Midlandia, attracting people of interest to travel to Korelia. Before, many had doubted Lord Lansius’ reign, but now he had the most promising future in all of Lowlandia.

First, the grain merchants arrived, fulfilling their grain trade deal, followed by guilds from Midlandia offering their services. They had only been in Korelia for a few days, waiting for an opportunity to meet with Lord Lansius, when they learned of his grand alliance plan—a breakthrough that could transform Lowlandia into a powerhouse like Midlandia.

They were excited about the plans, and then they learned that Lord Lansius’ consort had a claim over Korimor. The excitement reached a fever pitch. At this rate, they would do anything to fulfill the Lord’s whims so as not to be left behind in future projects.

Lord Lansius’ first project was a dormitory for disabled veterans and an orphanage. A straightforward project, he wanted the building to be equipped with beds, chairs, plumbing, heating, and indoor washrooms. He also planned to provide the occupants with shoes, socks, and warm clothes.

He had allocated a sizable plot of land for them so they could grow vegetables. Deep down, Lord Lansius never forgot his experience as a farmer and a lowly scribe-soldier in Arvena. He wanted to give the unlucky ones a fighting chance. Lady Audrey was the patron for this project due to her closeness to the veterans.

Next on his list was a public school. As he had expected, the guilds were quick to offer to build a branch of Midlandia’s famous school for the landless. Lady Felicity wanted to become the patron and styled herself as the first Headmaster.

Several other projects were slated for completion after the orphanage and school, including a bazaar, water mills, a guild hall, and a bathhouse.

In addition to these projects, Lord Lansius undertook two other major initiatives: the Korelia City Wall and the East Farmland. These were overseen by the Building Bureau, more commonly known as the Korelia Mason Guild.

The Lord planned to expand the city of Korelia eastward while fortifying it with a wall and rows of windbreak trees. The aim was to prevent topsoil from eroding due to the harsh steppe winds. Included in his plans was a Grand Keep to serve as his new residence.

The Lord chose to keep the project local, channeling resources from within his domain, but he also welcomed assistance from outside guilds. Guilds from across the Midlands eagerly offered timber, glass, marble, carpet, furniture, plumbing, and even decorative elements for the Grand Keep. However, the design was yet to be finalized.

By the end of summer, numerous proposals had been submitted and revised. Despite the rumors surrounding Lord Lansius, guildsmen found both the Lord and Lady to be agreeable and reasonable people.

Based on their informal meetings, what the Lord of Korelia wanted was a functional and cost-effective design for a castle. The lord particularly disliked ornamental pieces that served no function. While this would undoubtedly hurt the guilds’ profit margins, it sparked great interest among the master masons.

Normally, most nobles desired a castle to showcase grandeur, wealth, prestige, or power. That usually meant grand archways, alabaster marble, and fine sculptures. Such features were generally the work of artisans, not master masons.

Master masons’ passion was to create defensive structures. They found kinship with Lord Lansius, whose approach was more in line with their goals. Thus, the cooperation went smoothly. The master masons designed not only walls but also wells, cisterns, well-ventilated storage areas inside the Grand Keep, and even some anti-tunneling measures.

Rather than aiming for grandeur or breakthrough designs, they relied on tried-and-true plans that were robust and easy to maintain. When the blueprint was finally completed, everyone realized that the Lord of Korelia wasn’t just building a keep to live in; he was constructing a fortress.

If you stumble upon this narrative on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

 

***

 

The Quarry

Excluding the knights and nobility, over one thousand four hundred men were captured. For security reasons, they were separated and assigned to different tasks. A hundred were tasked with building the dormitory, another hundred at the school, and another hundred served as field kitchen staff.

Based on recommendations from his Mason Guild, Lansius evenly divided the remaining men: five hundred were assigned to the quarry, while the other five hundred joined the wall projects, which were primarily carried out by local laborers.

The last one hundred were the newly elected command staff and hospice facility workers.

From the start, Lord Lansius had instructed his men to use the ex-opponent’s existing chain of command. They secured the captains’ loyalty by offering them better treatment and a semblance of power.

The lieutenants enforced work and maintained productivity; Lansius had not set an overly high bar for production and gave them plenty of rest, especially those working in the harsh stone quarry.

The food was basic but edible: gruel, soups with hints of meat, and rye bread. More variation and rations were allocated to the quarry workers to offset their working conditions. They were also given ale every two days to keep them content.

The treatment they received actually exceeded their expectations. Most had feared being sold into slavery or working in mines under brutal conditions, but here they were given humane treatment. Their only grievance was that they could not go home to help with the harvest or send word to their families, which saddened them greatly.

Another day passed in Korelia. That night, a commotion erupted in the quarry. Word spread that a lieutenant from South Hill had been killed in a quarrel with his men.

The Lord’s guards swarmed the camp, led by a high-ranking officer. An investigation was launched, impressing the men with its speed and thoroughness. After all, they were mere prisoners; usually, no one would bother.

By the time the sun was just above the treetops, a large entourage approached the quarry. The men were rounded up in formation and were shocked to see the Blue and Bronze Chevron heraldry.

The Black Lord, a living legend, was there in person. The man who had defeated six-thousands with only a few hundred. He was also, the man who had survived a duel against a Mage Knight with merely a mark on his wrist.

Now he was there, and he seemed annoyed. The men quickly connected the dots, assuming it had something to do with the previous day’s murder. They feared facing his wrath again. Memories from past battle and rout flooded in.

“What kind of punishment awaits us? Flogging? Half rations? Sleeping in the open?” Many were scared and didn’t dare to look up as the Lord walked forward to address them. However, he said nothing. Instead, staff from the kitchen brought out ten fat sheep and slaughtered them in front of the formation.

The red blood was collected in a bronze cauldron, evoking a scene from ancient sacrificial rites. The sight unsettled the men, including the lieutenants and captains.

Nobody could predict the enigmatic Lord of Korelia. Even the Lion of Lowlandia had failed to do so, as had Lord Omin—once considered a rising star—who now languished in the dungeon.

Now, the bane of Lowlandia took several steps forward, flanked by his guards.

“Behold, you are in the presence of the Lord of Korelia,” announced his herald in a sweet voice that did little to ease the laborers’ tension.

“At ease,” said Lord Lansius calmly. It was their first time hearing his voice. He stood tall, clad in lordly attire, and his black hair was for all to see.

“Last night, a murder occurred here,” he began, his expression stoic. “My condolences to the family of the deceased.”

The crowd’s eyes darted around, finding a young man who looked visibly distraught. Many also felt grateful for the unexpected warm emphatic message.

“Our investigation has identified the culprits.” The Lord exhaled deeply and declared, “Let it be known that no crime will go unpunished here.”

The guards brought forward two bound men.

“These men held a grudge against the victim for catching them asleep in a hidden part of the quarry,” the Lord continued.

Many shook their heads; such a motive for murder was seen as cruel and barbaric.

“Do you have anything to say?” Lord Lansius asked the culprits, who remained silent, too ashamed to face their comrades.

The Lord faced the five hundred men standing in formation once more. "I know you’re here against your will, but consider this your atonement for attacking Korelia."

No one dared to challenge the statement.

“However, I have treated you fairly. You may not realize it, but I’ve ordered ten sheep to be slaughtered every two days solely to feed you. True, the soup is bland, but that’s because Korelia isn’t a land of plenty. We don’t have enough vegetables for everyone, and this year’s harvest is likely to suffer due to the war.”

The crowd murmured in surprise. Although they had found the food to be better than expected—superior, even, to what they had received while marching with the Coalition army—they hadn’t realized the lengths to which Lord Lansius had gone to feed them.

“Hasn’t it dawned on you that I’ve treated you as if you were my own army?” Lord Lansius asked, looking out over the crowd.

Again, murmurs of surprise rippled through the men, who exchanged glances as they considered the Lord’s words.

The Lord briefly turned his attention to the two perpetrators, a look of disappointment crossing his face. Returning his gaze to the crowd, he said, “You’ve had it as good as you could get here. Many have advised me to send half of you to Feodosia to be sold into the Eastern Kingdoms. Is that what you want?”

The men shuddered. Tales of the abuses faced by slaves in the Eastern Kingdoms were well known.

“The older one will be sent to Feodosia; half of the proceeds will go to the family of the deceased. The younger one will be set to the Great Plains for the nomads to hunt,” Lord Lansius decreed.

The guards dragged the perpetrators away. Their punishments had been meted out.

The crowd felt both pity and a sense of justice. However, they were left puzzled: why hadn’t both men been sold to Feodosia? And why was the younger one released into the Great Plains to be hunted by nomads?

Observing their puzzled expressions, Lansius threw a wild card, “Make no mistake, you’re not here because of me.”

His words puzzled the crowd. Some were skeptical, thinking it was just sophistry.

“These guards are to protect my people, not to prevent you from running,” Lansius challenged them.

The crowd immediately buzzed with murmurs.

“Do you remember who captured you and brought you here?” the Lord asked, his tone ominous.

The crowd’s suspicion changed into dread. Many shuddered or swallowed hard, remembering the nomads who had rounded them up.

“You’re only here because you’re under my protection, but it doesn’t extend beyond Korelia. Beyond these walls, you belong to the nomads. Anyone who isn't here is at the mercy of the nomads, to do as they please. Now, imagine what they would do to you if you were seen as Nicopolans?”

The crowd went silent thinking about their plight. Many South Hill and Korimor people were once migrants from Nicopola and feared being misidentified as mercenaries.

The Lord continued with a gentler voice, “I’ve promised my allied nomads that within three years, you will have made significant contributions to Korelia—from building markets and bathhouses to expanding farmlands and constructing city walls.”

He paused to look at the crowd. “Those are the works that the nomads and I would appreciate. Fulfill these tasks, and I will grant you safe passage home.”

A sense of loss clouded the faces of almost everyone in the crowd. As fearful as they were, three years seemed like a long time.

As if sensing their concerns, Lansius announced, “Starting next month and continuing through the fall and next summer, we’ll hold monthly dice contests. Ten winners will be allowed to return home early.”

This immediately piqued the interest of the men; their eyes widened, and conversations broke out among them.

“For the Korimors, after I acquire the castle. I’ll send my official with records of your names to your hometowns or villages. That way, your families will know you’re safe and can either wait for your return or visit you next year,” he continued.

Many were moved by this offer. The hard work was something they were used to; it was the separation from their families that was unbearable.

“As for those from South Hill—bad luck! I’ve sent a messenger, but your Lord is arrogant and unreasonable.”

“Siege the city and force him out! We’d gladly help!” someone shouted, and many from South Hill cheered. They had little love for their current Lord, whom they viewed as an untrustworthy usurper.

“Let’s not get ahead of ourselves,” Lansius warned, calming the crowd. “With your help, I’m sure we could take South Hill. But that would lead to more regions suffering from a bad harvest. And that would cause more people, including your families, to suffer. For now, focus on building Korelia. I’ll deal with the Lord of South Hill when the time comes.”

Lord Lansius’ keen insight and benevolence that day only added to his growing reputation. He became the topic of conversation. Many were warming to the idea of having him as their Lord, comparing him favorably to their leaders.

 

***

 

Lansius took a moment to rest between tasks and meetings. He had just addressed a murder case in the quarry—the first fatal case among the forced laborers. While he could have let the case slide into obscurity, he feared that morale would plummet, which could be dangerous to everyone involved.

Thus, he seized the opportunity and tackled the issue head-on. Adopting the role of a politician, Lansius used cunning words to move the captured men as he wished. It wasn't the question of correct or wrong. It was the issue that there would be anarchy and blood if he couldn't inspire them.

What he wanted to say, but couldn't convey, was: they were creating a path to a united Lowlandia by surrendering three years of their freedom.

Like it or not, peace wouldn't be achieved without a price. Everybody had to pay the price, and Lansius and his troops had paid their due.

On a lighter note, Lansius was also occupied with numerous projects, including the challenging Duck Breeding Project in the forest. He believed the forest would serve as a natural habitat for the ducks.

Historical records showed that the native ducks had originally been found in forested areas and were later bred in meadows, much like horses, but with only marginal success. So, he aimed to return them to their natural environment. Strategic fences, shelters, and designated feeding grounds were constructed to keep the ostrich-sized ducks in place.

The shelters also ensured that the breeders had a secure backdoor to easily gather eggs. It would still require courage, but it should be doable. Preliminary reports were promising; it seemed the forest was providing enough food that supplemental feeding was less necessary.

Knocks on the door interrupted Lansius as he rested on his cushioned bench.

Margo, the pageboy, opened the door a crack and nodded at the whispered words.

“What is it, Margo?” asked Lansius.

“An urgent missive from Deputy Hugo.”

Lansius stood up, alarmed. “What does it say?”

Margo took the missive from the messenger outside and handed it to Lansius.

He didn’t recognize the handwriting, but it was neat, likely belonging to Sir Michael or Lady Daniella.

We have captured Korimor but are now facing three-thousands armed refugees from Nicopola, possibly more. Reports indicate that a severe famine has occurred in the Nicopola region, and the thousands who have arrived seem intent on plundering the Korimor countryside.

We are currently in a standoff, as they fear our nomads, not realizing that our nomadic group consists only of children and the elderly. We request reinforcements and further instructions. Lady Daniella is attempting to broker peace.

Lansius was stunned but quickly moved to the table where he kept a large map of the Imperium.

“Arvena, Nicopola... Not good,” he muttered to himself. “If this has spread into Lowlandia, then Elandia is doomed, and along with it, the Capital.”

 

***

 

Chapter 79

Lull Before the Storm

 

Felicity

The blonde Lady, still occupying the Master Chamber in the castle, was disassembling a new crossbow. Her desk was cluttered with tools, various cords, and spare parts for the trigger.

She wanted a more comfortable grip, and Hannei had given her the idea for a pistol grip. The only problem lay in modifying the trigger, so she experimented to create some parts with the help of a smith.

Today, the parts arrived and she was about to reassemble the trigger when she felt a warm feeling reaching out to her.

Felis immediately touched her necklace and felt a warm sensation in her mind. She rushed to her bag and spilled its contents onto the bed. Rummaging through the items, she found the bracelet she was looking for.

It was a precious find from her days exploring the dwarven ruins. As far as she knew, there was only one in existence. She put it on and a burst of emotion surged forth.

"Love, are you safe? Where are you?" the voice from the other end whispered as their minds began to intertwine.

My Lord, how I've missed you. Does this mean you're back in Midlandia? I'm in Korelia; I'm safe, they're treating me well here.

"I'm so glad to hear that. Yes, love, I've returned. It's a shame I couldn't bring this wonderful item to the Capital, but the place was as dangerous as we suspected."

I’m thrilled to feel your thoughts again. How was the journey...?

"Rough. The road was incredibly dangerous, even with our armed escorts. Signs of trouble were everywhere. Anci even claimed he saw fell beasts lurking near the camp several times."

The Elandia forest is ancient. He could be speaking the truth.

“I believe him. Oh, before I forget, the mission is a success. I secured support and funds to retake Arvena.”

That’s most fortunate, My Lord. Congratulations!

“Naturally. How’s life there? I heard Lansius won a big victory. I was worried for you when I learned he was up against three Lords.”

Felis felt a wave of raw emotion from Arte.

Don’t worry, he kept me safe. Korelia troops won big.

“So the rumor was true after all... It’s good to know that Bengrieve's money wasn’t wasted. Mm, to think that my squire has grown powerful now.”

Yes, the unassuming man turned out to be special.

“I’m rather envious of him. But in a good way.”

Of course, My Lord. There’s also something else; we just found out that Audrey is a cousin to one of Lowlandia’s Barons.

“Audrey? Isn’t she the woman squire Lansius is looking for?”

She's the one! They've just gotten married. As it turns out, her House had relocated to Lowlandia and achieved incredible success. But since they lost the war to Lansius, all their possessions are now up for grabs.

"Married...? And to think he'd choose such an outlier, a shield maiden nonetheless. But, what a turn of luck!"

Indeed. Now they could potentially claim the barony.

Flashes of emotion emitted from Arte, almost akin to a hearty laugh. "So many surprises in Lowlandia. How fortunate those two are!"

Don't you also want to marry someone like her with a barony on her hand?

“No, love, you’re perfect. I doubt she’s as open-minded as you. Not even the ladies in the capital are as bold and daring.”

Felis blushed and her emotion carried to Arte.

"Besides, I'd definitely lose support if I married a Baroness with a history of being a shield-maiden. What is Lansius thinking? Is he always this bold, or is this normal in Lowlandia?"

Lansius is always bold. He's a beast in sheep's clothing. But really, even in Lowlandia, I've never seen another shield-maiden. I have seen a Nicopolan captain, but she's a noblewoman turned mercenary.

"It must be great to have that degree of freedom. Throwing caution to the wind like it's nothing. I suppose he can afford it, especially after a series of big victories."

Nobody is against the marriage. People seem to be fully supportive.

"Fascinating. Do you think he's planning something by marrying her?"

Felis chuckled. How could I fathom someone like him? They call him the bane of Lowlandia.

"A fitting name... Oh, don’t tell Lansius, but officials from the Capital should arrive in about three weeks. They’re resting in Midlandia right now. But I guess he doesn't need them as much anymore."

Which is perfect. He can save himself from having to offer bribes.

"Hah! Indeed, the officials will likely ask for bribes."

Felis smiled and decided to ask. Will you also send your carriage for me, My Lord?

"Of course, it's best if we're together. You wouldn't like to hear it but aside from Midlandia's succession issue, there are all sorts of problems brewing."

I'm aware. Even so far in Korelia, I heard all kinds of unsettling rumors...

“Love, there’s much I want to tell you, but the item’s power is fleeting.”

Indeed, I feel the voice getting farther and weaker. Felis felt the voice in her mind fading as the magical item’s power waned.

“Till the next opportunity, love.”

You too, My Lord.

Flushed with emotion, Felis removed her finger from the bracelet. Alongside mere thoughts, they also shared glimpses of their deepest desires, as minds are wild and uncontrollable by nature.

Felis couldn’t wait to be with Arte again, the man who was unafraid of her wild side and lifelong secrets.

Stolen story; please report.

 

***

 

Lansius

As night fell, instead of burning midnight candles, Lansius decided to adjourn the war council. He felt there was no need to exhaust his retinues over things beyond their capabilities.

In the case of Korimor, there was simply no easy way out. Thus, although the need to reinforce Hugo was pressing, Lansius chose to remain calm and only planned for a small advance party.

He was keenly aware that Korelia was already filled with captured men and understood the risks from sending out another hundred or so troops to Korimor.

Moreover, he needed to warn Lord Jorge and Lord Robert. While still contemplating his plans for Korimor, the powerful duo of Korelia retired to their bedchamber.

Lansius locked the door while Audrey went behind the folding screen to change her clothes. She still hadn’t selected a chambermaid to assist her. Fortunately, she didn’t fancy a fine gown, so dressing up wasn’t a big deal.

Since Audrey didn’t know much about gowns, it was Felis who had helped her find attire for formal occasions. However, most couldn’t fit her properly as she was too athletic compared to a regular woman.

With no reputable tailor in town, they had ordered several new dresses from White Lake. Lansius was eager to see her in well-fitted attire, believing that hand-me-downs didn’t do her justice.

Lansius placed a fresh log into the fireplace and then changed clothes. According to custom, while the lower classes often slept in their daily clothes, some in the upper class chose to sleep naked, enjoying the luxury of privacy and the comfort of good blankets.

However, having grown up as a squire, Audrey was more comfortable wearing simple clothes to sleep. Moreover, due to old habits from their time on the road, the couple kept gambesons, swords, and crossbows nearby. They were a rather spartan couple.

After changing into his simple shirt, Lansius went to the corner of his room where a stone washbasin with drainage was located. He took a freshly cut young twig from a clay platter and chewed one end. The bite easily produced a bristled tip, which he used as a toothbrush.

The twig felt refreshingly gingery, mixed with a paste of powdered clover and salt. After a quick gurgle, he was done. Next, he washed his face using clean water from the copper basin.

Finished with cleaning up, he stretched out in bed. It was probably not even 8 p.m., but he felt sleepy. Ever since getting married, he had come to cherish their private hours together. Only during these times could they simply be a normal couple.

He often contemplated how much he had been through to reach this point in life. Looking back, he realized there were many moments where he could have made a mistake and failed, or taken a wrong turn and ended up dead.

However, there was no shudder or fear from it.

Life is funny; it keeps knocking me down but also elevates me to greater heights.

His own thoughts gave him pause. “My Lady," he asked, "why didn’t you tell me about Omin?”

“What about... Lans, stop calling me that when we’re alone,” Audrey complained from behind the lacquered folding screen.

Lansius chuckled. He had teased her enough after the surprising reveal two days ago. “But really, you’re the Baroness now. I’m just an imposter. You should rule and I’ll be the consort. What do you think?”

Only groans came from behind the folding screen. Then Audrey appeared, wearing a deep blue linen nightgown, her face flushed and irritated. She walked briskly toward the bed and pouted in front of Lansius. “Let’s keep things as they were. Nothing has changed except my title.”

“Yes, My Lady.”

She jumped into the bed and tickled him, causing Lansius to burst into laughter. “Ok, Ok, I’m sorry, Ackk!”

Lansius, half-laughing, and half-gasping for air, asked again, “So, Omin...?”

“What about him?” she retorted moodily.

“Don’t you find his name suspicious?”

Audrey sighed. “I thought it was merely coincidental. Sometimes, identical names can happen, right?”

“Omin? What part of that name is normal?” he complained.

“I thought it was common.” She shrugged, got out of bed, and went to brush her teeth.

“Drey, since you’re a Baroness, could you knight several men for me?”

She turned her head around quickly and asked, “Eh, I can do that?”

“Of course, you can,” Lansius smiled. “Transferring power internally within the House doesn’t require the Imperium’s consent. So you’re a full-fledged Baroness now.”

“Then I should be the first,” she exclaimed, excitedly.

“First to do what?” Lansius knitted his brows.

“To knight myself!”

Watching her innocent face, Lansius burst out laughing, leaving Audrey red-faced and frowning.

“Drey, you’re already a Baroness.”

Realizing her foolishness, Audrey pouted.

“Come here,” he beckoned with open arms.

Feigning anger to hide her embarrassment, Audrey turned away to wash her face and brush her teeth.

Once she was done, Lansius said, “You know, we’ve come a long way from pitching tents by the roadside.”

“Mm, yeah… I still can’t believe we live in a mansion like this,” Audrey said, looking around at the painted ceilings and the bright, colorful tapestries.

“A lot still needs to be fixed, though,” said Lansius. The place looked old but was still better than most rooms in the castle.

“I’m looking forward to seeing an even better room than this,” she said with a small grin, then climbed into bed beside him.

Lansius took a deep breath, looking at Audrey beside him. How he wished their conversations could always be like this—just a normal couple. “Drey,” he said, his tone becoming serious.

“Hush,” she interrupted. “I know... Let’s just sleep like this and forget about the Lord stuff for now. It can wait.”

Lansius smiled and hugged her tightly. “This is why I can’t be happy with anyone but you.”

Audrey bit her lip, clearly pleased with the compliment.

“You know... I couldn’t say no if you needed to enter into a political marriage,” she said softly after a moment.

“As if I could. I’m merely the consort to the Baroness,” Lansius reassured her, treasuring the moment.

That earned him a solid kiss.

“Margo is still up,” Lansius warned.

“He’s old enough to be a squire,” Audrey replied, crawling on top of him. "Besides, I already told him to retire to the staff's quarter."

“What did you tell him?” asked Lansius.

"That I'm perfectly able to guard you," she giggled. Hearing that, with a swift but gentle motion, Lansius rolled, taking her with him as he shifted their positions. And so, the two fulfilled the ultimate duty of nobility—to produce an heir.

 

***

 

Nicopola

As summer drew to a close, the clashes across the region became the norm of the day. Driven by hysteria and starvation, people began attacking even those within their own factions.

Livestock and wildlife had been wiped out; even insects and birds had become scarce. After sundown, Nicopola fell into an eerie silence, broken only by the wind. As food sources dwindled, people resorted to eating tree bark and other desperate means for sustenance.

Half-eaten corpses littered the side roads and back alleys. In hidden markets, what was grimly referred to as gray flesh was being bartered as food.

Unable to endure the hardships in Nicopola any longer, tens of thousands set out for neighboring provinces. This second wave came fully armed, well aware that they would not be welcomed and expecting heavy resistance.

Their desperation was so dire that many also risked venturing into the conflict-prone region of Lowlandia. Now, thousands were converging toward the Korimor region and its almost ready to harvest fields. Their goal was not just to find food. Knowing that Nicopola would remain conflict-ridden for years to come, they came to settle and occupy.

 

***

 

Sir Harold

In record-breaking time, the preparations for reinforcement were completed. Normally, mobilizing a barony would take weeks—sending bannermen to invite knights, recruiting from towns and villages, and contracting men-at-arms.

The speedy preparation was due to the high readiness of the Korelia troops, who lived in billets within the city or in nearby villages. Additionally, the lord had ordered only a small advance guard, further expediting the process.

Tonight, Sir Harold was preparing his gear. He was to lead the advance guard to Korimor. Alongside him, his squire prepared their winter gear and other personal supplies, as Lord Lansius had instructed them to be ready for winter in Korimor.

“Squire,” Sir Harold called when they were halfway through their preparations.

The shy squire looked up. “Yes, sir, is there anything else?” he stuttered.

“You don’t have to accompany me on this campaign. It’s risky.”

“B-but what would I do without you, sir?”

Sir Harold smiled. “Your father gave me a warhorse so I accepted you as my squire. You’ve followed me long enough. Your training is complete. Take the horse back and return to your father.”

“That’s not necessary, sir. I will follow,” the squire said, bowing his head.

“Don’t be blinded by greed. This is Lowlandia; you’ll be closer to death than to knighthood. Return to Midlandia and start a life.”

“I will follow. You can take another, more capable squire, but I’ll still follow,” the squire proclaimed a sense of pride in his voice. Even though he was timid, he enjoyed the camaraderie of Harold’s war-crazed warband. He had found a sense of brotherhood, unlike anything he had ever felt before.

The tall knight smiled at his squire’s bravado and stubbornness. The timid young man displayed a level of guts and loyalty sometimes absent even in knights. In silence, they carried on with their preparations, fully aware that battle was likely on the menu.

At dawn the next morning, the advance guard—consisting of fifteen knights and an equal number of squires—was seen off by the Lord and Lady at the city gate. Then, guided by a nomadic tribesman, Sir Harold’s small warband and the pack animals headed northwest without much fanfare. All were volunteers, and all looked somber.

 

***

 

Chapter 80

Periculum In Mora

 

Despite the looming military crisis and Sir Harold’s departure, construction projects in Korelia continued to thrive. As Lord Lansius’ highest-ranking staff member, Sir Justin was naturally involved in overseeing the main projects. Along with Calub and their team.

On behalf of their Lord, they supervised a workforce comprising five hundred workers from Korelia and an additional one thousand five hundred, overseeing everything from labor allocation to raw material supplies and payments.

To sustain this extra workforce, they needed more than just a field kitchen. First, they set up a barber shop for basic hygiene and medical care. A clothing repair shop followed, along with a permanent blacksmith on-site to maintain tools. Guildsmen also supplied ropes, pulleys, and other basic amenities.

Korelia had never seen an operation of this scale before. Extensive digging was carried out to lay the foundation for the city wall, a delicate operation overseen by the master mason. Meanwhile, Calub was responsible for the Eastern Farming project, focusing on planting windbreak trees. Alongside his team, he carefully surveyed the land east of the Korelia river and mapped it out.

Lord Lansius wanted diverse types of trees for windbreaks, not just poplars. These trees would be planted in rows to shield the topsoil from the harsh winds of the steppe. Calub had consulted the relevant guilds, who supported such a method as they had seen it in their records.

Calub suggested to Lord Lansius that the Alchemist Guild could provide specialized fertilizers and growth-boosting concoctions. Naturally, the Lord was interested.

Internally, Calub found it amusing that his guild’s research on the beast-eating mandragora plant could be repurposed for something beneficial.

Aware that the mapping and planning would take considerable time, and knowing that there was a risk of him leading reinforcement to Korimor, the Lord confided his plans to Calub. His priority was the windbreak trees. If all went well, these trees would help retain enough topsoil to sustain taller grass, turning the field into a meadow suitable for grazing.

The manure from the livestock would further fertilize the soil. Furthermore, before winter, they would direct laborers to make minor modifications to the landscape, enabling the field to retain as much snow during the winter.

Lord Lansius also considered relocating some younger trees from the forest to expedite the planting of the initial windbreaks.

The general design called for rows of windbreak trees on both the eastern and western sides of the new farming zone. To guard against strong winds from the north and south, they planned to plant multiple rows of elms, poplars, and shrubs.

Lord Lansius believed that, in the long run, these windbreaks would either make the land suitable for agriculture or transform it into good pasture for horse breeding. Either outcome would prove beneficial to his fief.

 

***

 

Small Council

Yesterday, Lansius had consulted his council to discuss about Hugo’s request, but aside from writing one letter, and deploying Sir Harold as advanced guard, they did nothing else. For certain, nobody wanted to send more troops to Korimor. It was simply too risky for Korelia.

While Sir Harold only commanded fifteen knights and fifteen squires, Lansius entrusted a mission to them.

Korimor turned from being served on a silver plate into a pit hole of ambition. Lansius had pulled his chair to sit against the window. He needed time to think.

While Lansius was deep in thought, Audrey was engrossed in a book recommended by Felis. Though she appeared frustrated, she continued reading. Beside her, Cecile, the new chamberlain, was reading scrolls from various sources laid out on the table.

While it was more common for the nobles to accept verbal reports, Lansius chose to put his correspondence into letters, especially for dealings and negotiations. That way he had written documents as proof.

After her appointment, Cecile was taking over some of Calub’s role as he was overworked with the urgent Eastern Farming project.

As for her older role, Margo had stepped up to become the cup-bearer. Cecile had thought to recommend Claire, her sister to take the job, but Claire had ideas of her own. Right now, Claire was accompanying Lady Felicity as a lady in waiting.

An earth-scented breeze blew inside the chamber. The changing of seasons made Lansius exhale deeply.

Time is running out.

“Drey,” he called afterward.

Audrey glanced at him. “Yes?”

“I think I should go...” he replied ominously.

She let out a sigh. “Can’t the Marshal do it?”

“As much as I respect Sir Justin, this requires my presence. Besides, he has his job cut out for him. Looking after Korelia is a major thing in itself.”

Audrey rose and approached Lansius, lowering herself to meet his gaze before pleading, “I say we abandon Korimor. Even if it’s supposedly mine, it’s not worth risking another pitched battle.”

Lansius nodded. He knew she was speaking the truth. Even if the whole castle and town were raided, the walls and defensive structure, won’t go anywhere. They could simply wait for the Nicopolans to move away after eating up all the food and then reclaim the city. However, he had other concerns.

“I’m worried about the refugees,” revealed Lansius.

Audrey squinted her eyes. “The Nicopolans? My Lord, they’re not your people.”

“I know, but they’re also not our enemies. There must be something I could do.” Frustration filled his voice.

Audrey exhaled deeply. “I also wish they could be saved. But is it going to happen?”

“My Lord, Lady, if I may,” Cecile interrupted. “You can save select people. You need manpower to guard your realm, also educated men to help you as you’ll likely have two baronies to manage. I also heard that Nicopolans are excellent farmers and adept at their crafts.”

Lansius nodded and quoted, “A wise man once said, the enemy of my enemy, is my friend.”

“The problem is, we can’t save the rest. And how would they react?” asked Audrey.

"They'll continue to plunder every village and town they could find," said Lansius plainly. "And after Korimor, they will either take the long journey to cross the Great Plains into more prosperous Midlandia, or continue to Three Hills."

This tale has been unlawfully lifted from Royal Road. If you spot it on Amazon, please report it.

"Many will die," said Cecile with a sense of regret. "Lowlandians didn't have that much to begin with. The Nicopolans will attack people who barely have enough to survive winter."

Lansius' shoulder slumped. Nothing in his modern education prepared him to face such a dilemma. Worse, he believed that this wasn't the whole picture.

“Their deaths are in their own hands, not yours," said Audrey all of a sudden.

Her comment stunned him for a bit. “I know. I’m not worried about them. I’m worried about Umberland.”

Audrey was puzzled and looked at Cecile who stood up and took an incomplete map of Lowlandia along with two books to prevent the map from scrolling back.

Audrey returned to the table and studied the map.

“This is Umberland, situated between Nicopola, Elandia, and Three Hills,” explained Cecile.

“They’re mountainous terrain. The Lord of the heights they called him. It was almost impassable to Elandia, one book mentioned deep ravines and gorges. However, it had a well-known mountain route to Nicopola.”

Lansius’ nerdiness wowed the other two.

“Why can’t I get that kind of information from the books I’ve read?” Audrey complained.

“There are many kinds of books,” replied Lansius warmly.

“My Lord, so what about Umberland?” asked Cecile.

“If thousands of Nicopolans had reached Korimor, it means that Umberland is finished,” said Lansius gravely.

There was growing nervousness in Cecile’s face, but Lansius continued, “This is probably why Umberland didn’t join the Coalition in the first place. They read the writings on the wall and refrained from moving their men out of fear of trouble from Nicopola.”

“They were wise to do so,” commented Audrey.

“Umberland is why I need to go to Korimor and see the situation for myself. I can’t do it from Korelia,” said Lansius.

Audrey was confused. “But why? What do you want to do with them?”

“They’re akin to the Western Gates of Lowlandia. If they remain open, then we’ll see a greater flow of men from Nicopola. Maybe even in tens of thousands.”

The explanation made Cecile nervous. That amount would dwarf even the population of several cities in Lowlandia. It might be enough to destroy the new balance of power, Lansius had tried so hard to achieve.

"We can't inform the hungry Nicopolans that there's no food in Lowlandia. They wouldn't believe us, so we must close the gates." He looked at Audrey. "For this to happen, I need to secure Korimor before harvest."

 

***

 

Sir Morton

The Mage Knight was increasingly pleased with the progress made on the Grand Alliance. Meetings had taken place between the Lord of Korelia and the Lord of White Lake to formalize the concept. Now, despite their recent loss, there was assurance that Lord Jorge could pass his inherited lands on to his House without fear of external threats.

Morton remained optimistic that the elusive peace in Lowlandia was finally within reach despite learning about the new issues involving Nicopolan refugees in Korimor.

A few days earlier, the mage knight had requested an audience with the Lord of Korelia. Although he preferred to wait for a better time, he felt that time was running short and he might not get another chance. He also feared arousing suspicion if he kept this information to himself.

Fortunately, the day before his departure, an escort arrived to take him to the castle. His master, Lord Jorge, had not only granted permission for the meeting but also expressed enthusiasm about both the issue and the prospective bargain.

Morton, donned in a doublet sourced from donated supplies, rode through the scorched field where the Coalition army had been defeated.

Upon arriving at the castle’s courtyard, he realized it was his first time setting foot there. Unlike Lord Jorge’s older retinue, he had only joined the Lord’s service less than a decade ago. His eyes swept over the castle, where his Lord had been born.

“Sir Morton, welcome to the castle. My Lord and Lady are expecting you,” said a man with a melodious voice.

“Gratitude,” Morton replied as he dismounted. Handing his horse to a stable boy, he followed the escort inside. As requested, he was led to the Great Chamber for some privacy. Although he noticed several armed guards, he paid no heed. It was common for a mage knight like himself to be viewed as a threat.

 

***

 

Lansius

Still thinking about the aftermath of the council meeting and what to prepare for his departure to Korimor, Lansius noticed Sigmund enter the Great Chamber, followed by Morton.

“My Lord, My Lady,” Sigmund addressed his Master. “Sir Morton seeks an audience.”

"Please, come in," Lansius said, staying seated. He had approved this meeting because he was likely departing for Korimor the day after tomorrow.

Morton stepped forward. “My Lord, My Lady, please accept my gratitude for this audience.”

“Sir Morton, it’s good to see you. Would you like a seat and some refreshments?”

“Please don’t let my presence bother you, My Lord. I’ve only come to deliver good news.”

“Good news?” Audrey perked up. After the council meeting and what Lansius had revealed, she was desperate for some good words.

“It’s so fitting that you’re the one who asked that, My Lady. The good news concerns you.”

Audrey furrowed her brows and looked at Lansius, who said, “Do share this good news, Sir Morton.”

Instead of speaking, Morton produced a letter from his small bag. Sigmund, who was nearby, took it and handed it to Lord Lansius.

“This matter might best be discussed in the utmost privacy,” Morton suggested.

Breaking the wax seal, Lansius read the brief contents, his eyes widening. Without a word, he passed the letter to Audrey, who had a similar reaction.

Enough distance separated them from their guest for a whispered conversation, so Lansius leaned toward Audrey. “Does this make sense to you?”

“Lans, I can protect myself. You should leave. If he means ill, the others can charge in while I defend myself,” she whispered back.

“No, I’ll stay. It’s not as if I’m unarmed. If he attacks me, you can flank him.”

Audrey nodded. They had discussed this beforehand. Sir Justin, Roger, and Carla, along with select knights, were fully armed and waiting in the corridor. Although Lansius personally trusted Lord Jorge, he wasn’t foolish enough not to take precautions against a mage knight.

“Very well. Sigmund, leave us,” Lansius commanded, his voice stern enough that Sigmund didn’t question him.

Sigmund led the remaining guards away but left the door ajar.

“May I approach?” Sir Morton inquired.

Audrey gestured for him to come closer. Morton advanced cautiously and then knelt, possibly to demonstrate he meant no harm.

“Is this true?” Lansius asked regarding the content of the letter.

“I have no reason to lie,” the mage knight smiled. “Apart from you, My Lady, during the banquet held outside the city wall to celebrate your marriage, I also noticed your cup-bearer and her younger sister. Both possess the gifts.”

This revelation left Lansius stunned.

The rarest gift of them all. The gift of magic.

It was something even he did not possess.

“For three candidates to be found in a faraway town in Lowlandia—that’s not an insignificant boon. Perhaps it’s a blessing from the Ancients.”

Audrey shifted in her seat. “I have a Mage friend in Midlandia. She said I don’t have the gift of magic.”

Sir Morton furrowed his brows. “My Lady, that’s impossible. You exude a faint, but unmistakable energy. I’ve seen it clearly since we first met in that tent outside the forest. Plus, you have the Hunter’s eyes.”

“Explain what ‘the eyes’ mean. People seem to refer to it by many names,” Lansius interrupted.

Morton pondered for a bit, trying to come up with a condensed answer. “People say that a good Hunter acquires the eyes through hard training, but it’s the other way around. Good Hunters are born with the eyes. Without them, one couldn’t survive the gaze of a fell beast.”

Audrey trembled at the revelation.

Morton continued, "While they would blatantly refute this, Mage and Hunter skills are overlapped. We draw from the same power, but manifested differently."

“Does every Hunter have eyes like mine?”

“Only the top ones, those who are assigned to hunt fell beasts.”

“But the one I met said otherwise. He implied it’s just a skill,” said Audrey, frustrated.

Sir Morton scoffed. “They would never divulge their secret. This information is my gift to you,” he said with pride. “Now you know the secret. My Lady, you’re born a Hunter and Mage.”

Audrey mumbled something inaudible and looked upset over something.

Lansius was wary but asked, “Does this mean she can wield magic?”

"For My Lady's case, becoming a fully-fledged Mage may be out of reach. However, there should be a way for her to learn an ability or two. I won't be the one to teach her, but if you permit me, I'll write to my guild. They'll likely be interested and can send someone more discreet."

Lansius took a deep breath and looked at Audrey. The news, coming just a day before they were leaving Korelia, had stunned them both. Sir Stan and Hannei had always said Audrey's abilities were nothing more than Hunter's skill. Now it seemed she was more than that. This made them question their trust in Lord Bengrieve, Sir Stan, Hannei, and maybe even Calub.

Is this the reason why Bengrieve saved and treated her so well..? But for a man like him, who probably has a dozen mages or so, why is Audrey so special?

Sensing his attention, Audrey snapped out of her thoughts, took a deep breath, and relaxed her stance.

Then Lansius recalled something and shifted his gaze back to Morton. "You said for her case?"

“Unfortunately, your cup-bearer’s gift has faded. It’s likely that she never had much to begin with. Training her would be impossible. But her sister is another matter,” Morton paused to gauge the Lord’s response.

Seeing no reaction, he continued, “I’d like to take her as my apprentice and keep it discreet. I’ll even marry her if need be to avoid gossip. I shall return her a Mage within several years. In exchange, I ask that you forgo the ransom for several Black Knights close to me.”

Audrey bit her lip while Lansius felt torn, not over the ransom, but for another, graver reason. "Sir Morton, I appreciate the offer, but there are several problems... First of all, their father was one of the knights you killed."

 

***

 

Chapter 81

The Whispers in the Wind

 

Audrey

After the meeting with Sir Morton, Audrey finally understood why Isolte, her Knight Master, had chosen her—a scrawny little servant from the outskirts of Elandia. She had assumed it was because she was born Centurian.

Located where the old capital of the first Imperium used to be, Centuria was worlds apart from the eastern part of the Imperium. Its people considered themselves more cultured than the rest of the human realm. The Centurians were reserved in attitude, never expressed disapproval directly, and were considered more courteous.

Little Stephania was anything but that. So, for her first year with Isolte, she held back from being herself. She tried to become the perfect Centurian girl: reserved, diligent, and unquestioning. Until one day, Isolte told her she was too stuck up.

Hearing that, Stefi dropped her facade, surprising Isolte with her brash and daring attitude. It was a fond memory that still warmed her heart. However, she now understood that Isolte had chosen her solely for her inborn power.

She had thought their special relationship, her hard work, and trust had led Isolte to make her an esquire. But now, knowing that Isolte could see her gifts, their relationship felt superficial and hollow.

“Talk to me, Drey,” Lansius said as Margo closed the door, leaving them alone in the small hall next to their bedchamber.

“It’s Isolte,” Audrey replied, sitting on the daybed. “I thought she chose me not for something I was born with.”

Lansius sat beside her. “But your eyes are part of you.”

“I didn’t want them. I hate them. Every kid hated me. My uncle hated me. And the various masters I’ve served never let me work in the main house, only in the barn,” she said bitterly.

"Drey, that doesn't make what your Knight Master did for you any less valuable. She simply never had the opportunity to explain her reasons."

Audrey took a deep breath and rose, walking to the window to let the breeze calm her. After a moment, she glanced at Lansius. “You’re right. It’s foolish to linger on or blame her for this. She met an untimely end. That’s all.”

Her eyes narrowed as another thought crossed her mind. “But what about Hannei, or that Hunter Sir Stan invited?”

Her question led Lansius to massage his temples. The loss of trust was clearly bothering him.

“There are always layers of secrecy in Toruna,” Lansius replied after a while.

Audrey sighed, anger and frustration welling inside. "Too bad we can't confront them," she muttered.

“We don’t need to,” Lansius responded. “It’s fortunate that Sir Morton exercised such caution. We can keep this matter under wraps. They have their secrets. Now we have ours."

...

 

Lansius - Council Chamber

“No, I’m coming and that’s final,” said Audrey, placing her hands on the table.

“Somebody needs to lead Korelia,” Lansius argued.

Audrey looked at the other three council members and insisted, “Sir Justin, Calub, or Cecile can handle that.”

The trio shifted uncomfortably in their seats. Trying to keep the atmosphere from growing more tense, Lansius spoke in a half-pleading tone, “They’re not the Lord of the castle. But you are the Baroness.”

“I’m sure the Marshal holds high enough a rank,” said Audrey.

Sir Justin shook his head. “I’d rather go with My Lord. Though I may not possess your war acumen, I believe I’m competent enough to execute whatever plan you may have.”

Lansius drew a sharp breath. "The problem is, there's no plan. I must go and see for myself. At best, I've only got a diversion. Besides, Korelia is at even greater risk. I need capable people here, and you three are the best I've got to prevent riots."

Lansius noted how the weight of responsibility made the three slump in their seats.

Calub cleared his throat. “Sir Justin, I believe you have something to say about your mercenary friend?”

"Oh, right," Sir Justin said, his enthusiasm returning. "My Lord, I was thinking of inviting more of my Arvenian allies into Korelia. Men-at-arms and cavalry."

“As long as they’re loyal. But won’t that put us in competition with Lord Arte?”

Sir Justin paused for a moment before answering. “My Lord, not all Arvenians wish to return to Arvena. Given the current situation, many are looking to start anew, even in far-off places like Lowlandia.” Breaking a smile, he added, “Many are inspired by you, who made a name for yourself.”

Lansius was rather stunned. “Inspired by me?”

“That is correct. You’re a rising star, and everyone wants to align themselves with you,” Sir Justin replied.

Calub added, “I believe this is also why Lord Jorge and Lord Robert are competing to gain your trust, as are the guildsmen I’ve worked with. Even Tribesman Batu understands that.”

Nodding, Lansius slowly realized how his rising fame was starting to make a difference.

“That’s why you can’t afford to lose, My Lord,” warned Cecile cautiously. “A loss would undo all of this. Please reconsider your strategy for Korimor.”

“She’s right,” said Audrey. “In the end, Nicopola and Umberland are not your responsibility.”

Lansius sat there in silence, reevaluating his choices. Only afterward did he shift in his seat and lean back in his chair. “There’s no other way. I fear that more Nicopolans will move through Umberland, and while Korelia may remain safe, the entire east of Lowlandia might destabilize. It’ll invite new power and ruin our chance of peace.”

His words put his top retinue in check, but the Baroness wasn’t backing down. “So be it,” she said firmly. “Cecile, please tell Dietrich to prepare the light cavalry.”

Cecile rose and headed for the door.

Lansius opened his mouth to speak, but Audrey cut him off. “You promised.”

This story has been unlawfully obtained without the author's consent. Report any appearances on Amazon.

Fighting off his guilt, Lansius tried to reason, “Please, be reas—”

Audrey cut him off again. “I’m pregnant!”

“What—WHAT?” Lansius shot up from his seat, his knee hitting the table. The pain was only eclipsed by his shock.

Cecile stopped at the door and turned around, her expression one of surprise. Lansius glanced at her, and she shook her head, signaling she had not been aware of this news.

Calub and Sir Justin sat awkwardly; normally they would offer congratulations, but the situation was far from normal.

"I don't want to raise my child alone," Audrey said awkwardly with cheeks flushed.

“But how? You haven’t even had your period this year,” Lansius asked, wincing from the pain but still in disbelief.

“Tsk--” Audrey clicked her tongue again.

Cecile snorted, Calub coughed awkwardly, and Sir Justin turned to look out the window, suppressing a laugh.

Eh...?

Lansius looked back at Audrey, who was avoiding his gaze and whistling nervously.

“Youuu!” he growled after realizing the lie. He felt drained and sank back into his padded chair.

I give up…

There was nothing that could restrain Audrey from exercising her authority in Korelia. As a Baroness and Captain, she could easily assemble her forces and follow him to Korimor. “Fine, if you’re that stubborn, you can come,” he relented.

“Alright!” Audrey slapped the table as if sealing a deal.

Lansius rubbed his temples and said, “Promise me never to do that again.”

“I promise,” Audrey softened, grinning broadly. “The next time you hear it, it will be real.”

The mood in the chamber improved drastically, and Calub seized the opportunity to excuse himself. "If you'll excuse me, My Lord, Lady, and Sir, I need to double check the supplies for the campaign."

"Gratitude, for the efforts," Lansius responded.

Calub looked at Lansius with a hint of worry but said nothing. Turning to Cecile, his fiancée, he offered a warm smile. "You should stay. I'll pass the word to Dietrich."

"Gratitude. Wear your hat out there; it's hot," Cecile replied, holding the door open for him.

“Will do,” said Calub, exiting the chamber.

Turning back to business, Lansius continued, “Cecile, since I’ll be away, could you write a letter for me?”

“Yes, My Lord.” Cecile retrieved a quill pen, ink, and parchment.

Lansius had promoted Cecile to Chamberlain due to her growing competence and his trust in her. Like her father, she had a knack for reading people, catching subtle gestures and unspoken cues.

Although Calub never officially held the position of Chamberlain, Cecile was taking over the bulk of his job. What remained was the treasurer role. The transition had been smooth, possibly due to their abilities or their close relationship.

While it wasn't good practice to employ husband and wife, Lansius was so out of talent that he had no other option. Only now he understood why nepotism was so prevalent in medieval times.

When Cecile was ready with the ink, quill pen, and parchment, Lansius dictated a letter to a guild in Midlandia, outlining his purchase order for the first two prototypes of spinning wheels.

Despite the crisis, he couldn't abandon his project. Developing, improving, and maturing a design requires a significant time. When peace ever arrived, he wanted this to be ready.

Soon, the letter was completed. Lansius promptly placed his hands on the table and addressed the room. "May I have your attention," he began. "Tomorrow, after meeting with the two lords, I will lead the remaining cavalry to Korimor. I'll rendezvous with Sir Harold to try and secure the area. Stay vigilant for trouble, both external and internal."

Lansius looked at each of them and saw nods of agreement. “Sir Justin, while I’m away, your priority is to maintain peace among the captured men and the forced laborers. To ease your burden, I’ll take a dozen of them who have shown a willingness to switch sides.”

He then turned to Cecile, adopting a more solemn tone. “If food becomes an issue—as we’re unlikely to have a good harvest—feel free to order more grain. Lastly, please look after Lady Felicity.”

After concluding the council meeting, Lansius noticed Audrey conversing with Cecile and Calub. He realized she wasn’t usually this obstinate.

Is it a wife’s intuition?

He felt the urge to intensify his preparations. Korimor could be far worse than he had imagined.

 

***

 

As Lansius had expected, his plan to lead a small reinforcement to Korimor came as no surprise. Furthermore, the two Lords had been in Korelia for an extended period and were quite ready to return home.

Soon, Lansius receive word that the two Lords had decided to return the following day, likely to avoid the appearance of trying to occupy Korelia in his absence.

What he hadn't expected was a request from Lord Jorge. The Lord of Three Hills expressed his desire to tour the castle before departing from Korelia, and Lansius was happy to oblige.

He instructed Cecile to gather the old staff, many of whom still held fond memories of Lord Jorge and his family. With time running short, he then sent a rider to invite Lord Jorge to visit.

Accompanied by several horsemen, Lord Jorge rode to the castle. Upon arrival, only one knight, one squire, and a servant followed him inside. “It is very gracious of you to let me walk around the castle,” the dashing guest in full regalia remarked.

“Please, the castle is yours, My Lord,” Lansius replied as they strolled through the century-old corridors.

“Don’t address me so formally; I consider myself your peer,” Jorge said, clearly amused.

“I can’t do that, My Lord. I’m merely a vagabond borrowing your castle,” quipped Lansius.

Jorge chuckled at the jest and paused at an old stone column. “The castle feels larger in my memory. Now, even the corridors seem narrow, and the courtyard small,” he commented nostalgically.

Lansius could only nod in agreement.

“You would do well to enlarge this castle or perhaps build a bigger one,” Jorge suggested.

“I have plans for to build a Keep on the east side,” Lansius revealed. “When it’s finished, perhaps I should return this one to its rightful master.”

Jorge grinned at the offer. “This castle used to be my cradle, so I have some fond memories, but I won’t let my whimsical wish cause trouble.” Grabbing Lansius by the hand, he led him through the castle in a role reversal. With help from the old staff, they even found some hidden keepsakes from Jorge’s childhood.

Lansius felt a camaraderie with Jorge. Both were young leaders, burdened with immense responsibilities, striving to bring order and prosperity to their respective realms. There were matters only they, as lords of men, could discuss.

In this regard, Jorge treated Lansius as if he were a cousin, and Lansius hoped that this could serve as a solid foundation for their alliances.

As they were winding down in the Great Chamber, a messenger arrived, escorted by Sigmund. The messenger handed over a sealed letter in a cylindrical wood container.

A squire in Lord Jorge’s entourage accepted the letter and handed it to him.

“What’s this?” Jorge inquired, reading the letter from Three Hills and quickly dismissing it. “Ah, this nonsense again.”

“May I know what the tidings are?” Lansius asked.

“It’s silly, bordering on seditious,” said Jorge. “It’s unbelievable how even my family in the Capital was spouting unfounded rumors from the streets.”

Lansius listened seriously and Jorge took notice.

“It’s not worth your time, but if you’re interested...” He offered the letter to Lansius.

Lansius took the coarse paper and read the first part: The ageless one is dead, followed by other events that supposedly served as evidence. Some of the details were more convincing than Hannei’s last warning. He folded the letter and gave it back to Jorge. “It’s disturbing if true...”

“Indeed, but there might be some truth to it,” Jorge’s tone changed, now certain that Lansius was already aware of the issue.

“How so?” asked Lansius.

“In his previous letter, my nephew mentioned some unsettling changes in the capital. Ranking people went missing without a trace. Some even spoke of assassins.”

“It seems we’re living in dangerous times,” Lansius sighed at the grim news.

“Even for Lowlandians like me, this is starting to reek of the end of the Imperium,” said Jorge with a hint of frustration in his voice.

Lansius leaned back in his seat. "We don't have the power to intervene in the conflict. Not even Midlandia is that powerful. However, we can make Lowlandia a haven for our people."

Jorge nodded and raised his goblet without saying anything. Lansius followed and both drank their goblet.

“When will you depart?” Jorge asked.

“Tomorrow, as soon as my preparations are done.”

Jorge mulled and promised, “After I've reached Three Hills I’ll send my men to Umberland to see the situation. I’ll also post a messenger to link up with you in Korimor. While my troops are exhausted, I could still muster several hundred men-at-arms if you wish to use them.”

“Gratitude, but don’t let your guard down. Keep Sir Morton close at all times,” Lansius advised.

Jorge nodded, and the two lords continued their conversation. As the sun began to wane, Jorge declined the invitation for supper in the castle, preferring the company of his men.

As Jorge rode back to his camp with his entourage, Lansius couldn’t help but think about the weight of the rumors that had possibly spread to Elandia and Tiberia. Now, with threats at the border, feuding nobles, famine, and the death of the Emperor, the continuation of the Imperium seemed unlikely.

Lansius shuddered as the red sunset cast its glow over the entire western plains of Korelia. His entourage formed around him, shielding their lord and champion who would leave them the next day.

Without Lansius, many were worried about the fate of Korelia. So much was at stake, and pessimism grew that the glory days were already fleeting and an age of strife was returning.

 

***

 

Chapter 82

Tarracan Man

 

The day had yet to grow hot when a formation of men assembled just outside Korelia. Lord Jorge led the formation, flanked by a modest number of cavalry. The horses had been either ransomed or loaned from Korelia, all backed by Lord Jorge’s guarantee.

Lord Robert was also present, leading his smaller cavalry at some distance. The sight was impressive if not grand. The last time these forces had assembled here, they had been enemies. Now, they were allies.

“My Lords, the success of our grand plan rests with your return in spring,” Lansius said as they met in front of their armies.

“I shall return,” Robert declared firmly. “Even if I have to drag my wife with me, I will be back next spring.”

“Same as the Lion. I’ll bring my family here—no dragging necessary,” Jorge added, matching Robert’s enthusiasm.

Both chuckled at their shared jest.

“I’ll arrange for the city inns to accommodate your families,” Lansius offered, grateful for their support. “I’ll even look into renovating the castle and the Eastern Mansion in case the inns aren’t sufficient.”

Robert nodded, pleased with the offered hospitality. “Lord Lansius, I don’t have anyone to spare but a few knights, but you may take Sir Michael and his men under your command.”

“Gratitude, for your support,” replied Lansius.

“Well, then,” Robert said, addressing the two younger men. “Until we meet again next year. May fortune favor you both.”

“And may good health and fortune accompany you as well, Lord Robert,” Lansius returned.

“Stay strong, Old Lion. This alliance needs to happen,” urged Jorge.

“Aye, I have no plans to die just yet. In fact, I feel rejuvenated,” the older lord quipped, delighting the other two. He then summoned his escort and mounted his horse. “If Korelia faces trouble, send word to White Lake. I’ll organize a relief somehow.”

“Your concern is much appreciated, Lord Robert.” Lansius bowed his head a little.

Without another word, Robert and his cavalry rode towards Korelia City, intending to pass through its main streets, cross the bridge, and move through the developing eastern region before heading east toward their own territory.

“I should make haste,” Jorge told Lansius.

“Indeed, the sun grows hotter.”

Jorge signaled his squire, who in turn called the coachman. The carriage, a gift promised by Lansius, approached.

“Lord Lansius, I’ll hold up my end of the bargain for Umberland. And remember, you can count on Three Hills if you ever need a place for refuge.”

“I will keep that in mind,” Lansius assured him.

Jorge entered the carriage, and his entourage assumed their positions. “Please send my regards to the Baroness of Korimor,” he said with a polite smile. The carriage then departed, and Jorge rejoined his army, marching westward through the Great Plains.

The Three Hill forces had recovered many of their men by staying in Korelia and flying their banner high. A large number of captured men from Three Hills had also been freed, although their weapons and armor were confiscated.

Evading capture, more than a dozen knights and squires from South Hill bent the knee to Lord Jorge, bolstering his ranks. Now, at least a thousand men marched under his banner.

While the number was substantial, unfortunately, only two dozen had their horses, and Jorge needed them as escorts. Meanwhile, Lansius required speed and couldn’t afford to take slow-moving footmen with him to Korimor, especially with the harvest season closing in fast. Thus, despite the potential aid available, Lansius couldn’t utilize it.

The sky had clouded over when Lansius and his escorts returned to the castle to finalize their preparations.

...

 

As the sky began its vibrant descent into hues of orange and pink, Lansius stood at the edge of the castle battlements, his eyes set upon the vast expanse of the Great Plains of Lowlandia. The wind blew in from the west due to the sudden temperature change, but he remained quiet, his mind focused on the impending journey and battle that lay ahead.

Beside him, his wife Audrey leaned against the stone wall, her gaze firmly fixed on the fading beauty of the sun.

“That’s our guide,” she commented, just before the guards on the lookout made a small commotion while pointing to the west.

Lansius didn’t respond but watched as ten horsemen leading fifty horses approached Korelia. Tapping the stone wall and feeling its sturdiness despite its age, Lansius drew a deep breath. “Shall we go then?” he asked her, offering his arm.

Audrey smiled, took his arm, and squeezed it gently. The two descended, and their staff flocked toward them. Solemnity, fear, and nervousness were evident on their faces, but Lansius stood firm and unburdened.

“If only you would let me ride in a carriage to Korimor,” said Felis to Lansius.

Lansius smiled. "Unfortunately, haste is necessary this time. Please take care, Lady Felis."

She nodded, then whispered, "Be good to your wife, or I'll send Hannei to ruin your life."

Lansius coughed at the unexpected threat, while Audrey sported a nervous smirk.

Next, Lansius met with Sir Justin and Calub. "I’ll send word when I’m able, and we'll reconvene in the fall or spring."

"I'll also send reports periodically, but be warned—I've never commanded a city before," said the Marshal.

"Governed," corrected Calub, and the three chuckled. One by one, they clasped hands, offering Lansius good wishes and some advice for the journey ahead. Similarly, Felis and Cecile hugged Audrey as if they were sisters. This concluded their farewells to the staff.

Outside, the city's people flocked to catch a glimpse of the stars of Korelia. As the sun waned, so too did Korelia lose a part of its brilliance, as its twin stars prepare to embark on a perilous journey.

Accompanied by Dietrich, Sigmund, Carla, and the captured Omin, along with just thirty cavalrymen and squires, Lord Lansius and Audrey departed from Korelia. While there were risks involved, they needed to bring the captured Baron to guarantee transfer of power and to avoid resistance from his House. The Lord needed Korimor's submission before they could redirect their efforts against the threat from the Nicopolans.

To cover the greatest distance, they chose to travel at night, hoping to cover double the distance without fear of the summer sun. They were prepared to eat lightly and sleep at noon. With only the supplies and gear in their saddlebags, they followed their guide and rode northwest.

Each rider brought five spare horses and rotated them periodically to maintain the horses’ stamina for the marathon run.

The lanterns the guides carried would be their guidance, and the stars in the sky their only illumination.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Armed Group

Sergio the Tarracan visited the tent where he had secured a cage from a slaver compound he had pillaged. Inside the small cage sat a lady in grey, ragged clothes—a disguise. As Sergio entered, she opened her eyes, giving him a look that seemed both to judge him and remonstrate against his presence.

This narrative has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. If you see it on Amazon, please report it.

This woman had nearly incited fighting among the Nicopolan group Sergio had brought from Nicopola. Fortunately, one of Sergio’s lieutenants caught wind of her schemes.

“Lady Daniella,” Sergio addressed her while she stared at him. “You’ll be pleased to know that the group you’ve been talking to are rotting in the sun as we speak. A human body can only endure so much.”

“It’s a shame, but many more will take their place. Next time, we won’t be caught,” Daniella replied fearlessly, despite clearly being parched. She had been given only a bowl of watered-down gruel once a day.

Sergio chuckled at her audacity and knelt. “I’ve heard you haven’t begged for food, but I think in a few days, you will...” His words trailed off as he rose with a smile.

As he was about to leave, she warned him, “Your plan will not work. You’ll only lead everyone to their deaths.”

Sergio turned around and mocked her. “Foolish woman! I have led them through the raging South Nicopola, across the steep mountain paths of Umberland, and into this fertile land, all the while ensuring everyone had enough to eat. Who else can do that?”

“Obviously, any brigand with an army of hungry men could. You simply took food away from towns and villages along your path and left them with nothing to eat. What’s so surprising about that?”

“High words from mercenaries like you!” He raised his voice. “I challenge any man or woman, nobles even, to do better than me. But where are they?” he asked with open arms. “None are here. Why? A noble wouldn’t waste time on thousands of hungry peasants, just like your new lord. He’ll bide his time until we move on. But we won’t!”

“You don’t even understand the logistics of feeding this many people. Your faith is misplaced; there’s not enough food in Korimor even if you harvest everything,” she retorted.

“You’ll learn that I’m not only as competent but also more benevolent than any noble. In time, you’ll come to respect my authority over these Nicopolans and even try to convince your friends in that castle to leave the city.”

Daniella offered no response, and Sergio left in frustration.

He was barely ten feet from the tent when his men approached him. One whispered, “Sergio, it’s getting harder to raid for food. By tomorrow, we’ll have nothing for the refugees.”

“Mix some grey meat with horse meat for tomorrow’s soup, but do it out of sight,” Sergio replied. He needed the refugees to pressure the city into surrendering.

“But what about us?” another asked. “We haven’t had bread for days, just watery gruel. Can't we take more from the stockpile?”

“Patience, men,” Sergio said, placing his hand on the man’s shoulder. “Haven’t you smelled the sweet fragrance of the bakery from the city in the morning? We shall have them soon enough.”

Sergio noticed the doubt lingering on his men’s faces, so he added, “Kill the thought that there’s a better solution. Korimor is our best bet. Three Hills will be well-defended. Korelia and South Hill are too distant, and they don’t have a good harvest.”

His men began to nod.

“Let’s stick to the plan and hold for another month so we can let the refugees harvest the farm for us. I’m sure whoever is inside won’t be able to hold out much longer, especially once they see us harvesting. Then we can move in, secure the city and the castle for the winter, and assume our roles as overlords. Don’t you want to become a squire or a knight?”

Sergio’s words began to inspire his men.

“Don’t you want a land of your own and laborers to call you master? I can give you all of that if you have the courage to hold out. Things will improve after the harvest.” As usual, Sergio’s charisma and persuasion won them over.

Sergio had always dreamed of joining a mercenary company. Unable to join due to multiple rejections based on his background, he aimed to start his own company instead and succeeded amidst the outbreak of the Nicopolan crisis. While for many these were times of great sadness and tragedy, for Sergio it was a time of opportunity.

Korimor would be the crowning jewel of his achievements. Convinced that all he needed was to wait for the harvest season, he was sure the crops from the fields around Korimor would be enough for his men. When that time came, the city would probably give up, since they couldn’t last without the harvest.

When that happened, Sergio would offer them a fair deal, something he would stick to until enough of his men and refugees had entered the town. While he had no qualms with the Korimors, he had to reduce the number of mouths to feed, and he chose his own followers.

Sergio planned to push the Korimors to attack another barony for food and shelter. Even if it failed, it wouldn’t matter to him. Moreover, it would even assert his power as Lowlandia’s newest powerhouse.

 

***

 

Michael

After finishing with his administrative duties, the one-eyed knight sat on the battlement. Despite the heat, he insisted on sitting there, a wicker hat his only protection against the sun. He was there to signal his small reaction force should he spot any signs of an escape attempt by Daniella and her group.

Michael kept blaming himself for letting her to infiltrate the Nicopolans with just a handful of her men. Now she was captured, and he had no means of rescuing her.

The enemy was more cunning and able than they appeared. The Nicopolans held their ground despite several harassing attacks from Hugo and Michael’s cavalry. The Nicopolan strategy relied on concealing their troops behind refugees and using the elderly and children to impede any attacks on their formation.

The Korelian small cavalry was both exhausted and horrified, forced to trample and kill innocents before even engaging the enemy’s main force. Worse, by now they couldn’t risk another attack, as the Nicopolan numbers had swelled. Initially numbering three thousand, their ranks had grown to an estimated six or seven thousand.

Now, their cavalry, bolstered by the nomads, was sufficient only to deter the Nicopolans from attacking the rest of the nearby settlements, which had become an increasingly reliable source of food and medicine.

“The odds are not looking good at all,” he mumbled to himself.

Today the sun was almost set, and things seemed eerily peaceful. There was no turmoil in the enemy camp, no ruckus, meaning no escape attempt from Daniella.

Michael sighed. It had been a week since her capture. He knew Daniella was alive; the enemy kept pestering them for a meeting. A meeting they couldn’t entertain, for the Nicopolan demands required the Korelian forces to abandon the city.

Such demands filled the Korimor people with suspicion. Even inside the city walls, the situation remained precarious.

Food rationing had soured everyone's mood. The populace was lethargic, anxious about the fate of their harvest, now in the hands of the Nicopolans. Harvest time was just a month away, and if plundered, many would perish in the upcoming winter.

As a precaution against internal strife, Hugo and Michael had barricaded many entrances to the castle, leaving only the main one open. They prepared for the possibility of fighting enemies from without and within and had stockpiled all their supplies within the castle.

Michael knew that despite their surrender, the Korimor people had little trust in them. The only thing binding them together now was a common enemy and the belief that the Korelians were the lesser of two evils.

Fortunately, both sides feared the nomads who still roamed freely outside, leading to a stalemate. The Nicopolans couldn’t lay siege, fearing a rear attack by the nomads if they committed.

The Korimor people, along with the Korelian force, were trapped inside, unable to face the massive force outside. Meanwhile, the nomads, mainly comprised of children and the elderly, could do little but keep their distance.

The rhythmic footsteps on the stones prompted Michael to turn his head.

“Anything new, Sir Michael?” inquired Hugo, the Deputy.

"Only several public floggings over something. Couldn't make out the details; too distant," Michael replied.

“I see...” Hugo remarked, gazing into the distance at the enemy’s camp. “Should we send a scout to investigate?”

“Already done. They’ll be back after dark, though I doubt they’ll learn anything useful.”

Hugo nodded and commented, "These Nicopolans... It’s remarkable how they manage to maintain order with so many untrained people.”

“Their trust to that Tarracan Man is enviable," Michael mused.

"The one who feeds his followers with bread as sweet as nectar and honey," Hugo recited, echoing stories from captured men from earlier skirmishes. "Sir Michael, what is your take on such a man?"

"If that is true, then he is indeed a living legend and ought to be enshrined. Perhaps it would be best to confine him in a tower so he can continue producing that remarkable bread in peace, ensuring all of Lowlandia does not go hungry this winter."

Michael's jest elicited a chuckle from Hugo, though it too quickly faded. The atmosphere was too sour, too heavy, even for veterans like him.

As Hugo’s gaze returned to the sweeping plains, Michael stood. "It's time to rotate the cavalry."

“Take a drink or two and some rest. I’ll keep an eye out for Lady Daniella," offered Hugo.

“Gratitude, Deputy.”

“No need, I share the blame for allowing her...” Hints of bitterness apparent in Hugo's voice.

Taking a deep breath, Michael headed toward the gatehouse, where he found cool shade and a squire who readily offered him a drink. He was about to descend the circular stone stairwell when Hugo's shout from the battlements halted him.

The one-eyed knight hurried back and saw Hugo pointing southward. Others hastened to the battlements for a better view.

Michael followed Hugo's gaze and beheld a towering cloud of dust rising from the south. "From the south?" he whispered to himself, more a statement than a question. An experienced cavalryman from White Lake, like him, knew such a cloud was raised by hundreds, perhaps thousands of horsemen.

The swirling dust continued to obscure the finer details, yet the vastness of the disturbance unmistakably heralded the coming of a massive cavalry force.

Excitement rippled through the ranks as men beckoned their comrades to witness the sight. Along Korimor’s southern wall, eyes were fixed on the emerging spectacle.

“Look, our nomads have noticed and are reacting,” a squire blurted out excitedly.

The advancing force appeared as a mirage beneath the blazing sun.

Michael continued to ponder. He had no clue who in Lowlandia could muster such power, or why were they in Korimor at this time. Meanwhile, among the Korelians, speculation pointed to one name alone.

"It’s only been ten days since I sent the letter. This is impossible," Hugo said, shaking his head.

Michael shared his skepticism, but as if to mock their doubts, the unmistakable blue and bronze banner appeared proudly on the horizon. Its bold and striking colors finally cut through the dust clouds as the galloping horsemen trod upon the green pasture of Korimor.

“The Lord’s personal banner!” erupted from many throats at once.

Confirming it with his own eye, Michael clenched his fist, pounding the wall in a burst of excitement. Meanwhile, Hugo and his men shouted war cries, jubilant beyond measure.

Almost instantaneously, the news spread like wildfire, galvanizing every member of the Korelian force and drawing the gaze of all within the city.

Initially, people thought the Korelians had gone mad, but soon the excitement spread like wildfire. Before long, everyone in Korimor heard of what was happening outside the walls. Faster than anyone could have predicted and ever unpredictable, the Lord of Korelia had arrived.

 

***

 

Chapter 83

Sinews of War

 

Daniella

The Nicopolan-born lady huddled in her cloak to keep warm. After days of subsisting on watery gruel, Daniella felt weak. Even water was hard to come by, and her dry lips bled easily.

She had several pieces of dark brown beads on her belt. They looked like poorly lacquered wooden beads but were actually made of highly valued sucrose mixed with hard biscuits and coated with wax.

The small hard candies could give her a burst of stamina if needed. While they wouldn't cure her hunger, they could prove invaluable. Just like another item she had hidden up her sleeve for defense. Both might prove useful if an opportunity arose.

But for now, escape seemed impossible. The wooden cage was built to last, sturdy enough even to contain a beastman. Observing the situation calmly, she stilled her thoughts and conserved her stamina.

Despite days of isolation in the cage, she remained sharp. Many would be depressed, knowing their mission had almost succeeded only to be thwarted in the final stage and thrown into a cage with no hope of rescue. But Daniella remained steadfast.

Her upbringing as a noble had ironically prepared her for this kind of treatment. She remembered the days when she had been confined to her chamber due to disagreements with her family. In that solitude, she found strength and mental resilience.

In fact, the silence empowered her. Since yesterday, she had been replaying her last two battles in her mind: one against Lord Lansius, and the other at his side. On both occasions, she caught a glimpse of her new master’s ingenuity.

She realized what made Lansius unique: his ability to understand the battle as a whole, to see the big picture.

That led her to the conviction that help would arrive because Lord Lansius wouldn’t allow Korimor to fall. Not because the city itself was important, but because sooner or later, he needed to solve the Nicopolan problem before it wreaked havoc on west Lowlandia—a region where he had a stake through the construction of the Grand Alliance.

And it was only in Korimor that he had the advantages of a castle, city walls, and a population that would ally themselves with his cause.

A smile momentarily bloomed on Daniella's lips. If her assessment was true, then she would have her justice against this Tarracan man—the charlatan who had fooled people with his rhetoric and false hope. He had led innocents to live and die as brigands, using them as mere stepping stones in his rise to power.

Her stomach groaned again. She clutched her knee, as though trying to stave off both cold and hunger. She carefully tore a small piece from her leather belt and chewed it. She had learned in her youth that the less fortunate resorted to such measures to fend off hunger, but she had never thought she would have to do it herself.

The taste was earthy and bitter, with a strong pungent smell released upon chewing. Yet, somehow, it provided some relief to her stomach.

Just as she was about to mentally shut off and save her alertness for the night, something happened outside. Hurried footsteps, calls, and shouting broke the silence. The noise didn’t fade. Instead, it escalated into a full commotion.

 

***

 

The Nicopolan Side

What appeared to be thousands of horses emerged on the southern horizon, casting shock into the Nicopolans who hadn’t expected any large military intervention from outside the region. Smaller groups were also seen reconnoitering the area.

The men keeping watch shouted and clamored for everyone in the camp to take up arms. In a hurry, the Nicopolans haphazardly formed their battle lines.

Tension filled the air as the numerous cavalry from the opposing side advanced, kicking up clouds of dust.

“The attack is coming! The attack is coming!” one man shouted in fear.

Refugees had heard tales from Nicopolan mercenaries—survivors who had escaped the Coalition’s doomed siege in Korelia—and these mercenaries had spread their tragic stories to all.

Now, upon recognizing the familiar Blue and Bronze banner, cries erupted. “It’s him! That’s the banner! The Black Lord is here!”

Many trembled at the sight. Some were so distraught that they left the camp, fleeing toward a distant forest.

Amid the chaos, Sergio led his detachment of men onto the field. “A blue and bronze banner?” he asked the men flanking him.

“There are rumors of a powerful new Lord in Korelia. They call him the Black Lord,” one of them answered.

“Why is he here, so far from Korelia?” another inquired nervously, eyeing the large cavalry force amassing near their flank.

Sergio took a sharp breath. “Isn’t it obvious? He wants the city.” He then spun around to face his men. “Fear not these Lowlandian dogs. I knew they were going to interfere. Luckily, we’re prepared for anti-cavalry warfare.”

His men sported nervous smiles as Sergio instructed, “Move the crossbowmen and the long pikes closer to the front. We’re going to teach these outdated brutes some state-of-the-art warfare.”

Out of eight thousand souls, four thousand men armed with spears, swords, sickles, or spades formed the Nicopolan battle line. Sergio also put enough men in reserve and positioned plenty to cover his other flanks.

With many experienced mercenaries under his command and a cavalry unit ready as a quick reactionary force, he felt well-prepared, confident that the odds were in their favor.

 

***

 

Korelia Side

After having rendezvoused with Sir Harold and Batu, who had completed their preparations, the relief force led by Lansius had undertaken a grueling three-day marathon ride to Korimor, traveling from the waning sun until the morning sun.

In record-breaking time, Lansius and his riders, along with hundreds of tribesmen, arrived on the outskirts of Korimor. Even when joined with the elderly and children already stationed around Korimor, their numbers didn’t exceed five hundred.

If you spot this story on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

Their numbers appeared larger due to the way they tied their sleeping carpets, armor, and other baggage upward on the saddle, making them resemble riders atop their thousands of spare horses. The nomads aptly named this creation the mirage warriors.

They saw Korimor city and its castle situated on a verdant hill, beside a flowing river. A large but crude encampment was also visible not far from the river.

Lansius removed his cloak and mouth covering, shaking the dust from his hair and face. "Is that the encampment?"

"Yes, My Lord, the scout confirmed it," said Sir Harold.

"I need to see it closer," Lansius stated.

"My Lord, we're not in armor," the knight reminded him. Most of them were wearing padded jacks.

"Just a bit closer," Lansius replied.

"Riders, prepare for escort," Sir Harold shouted, readying them for contact.

Batu rode closer and suggested, "Noyan, let me take my riders closer. I want our presence to be felt."

Lansius quickly agreed. "Don't engage, and make sure not to get caught."

Batu smirked. “I’ll be sure to maintain the illusion. This is the most fun I’ve had in a while. I still can’t believe you’re familiar with nomadic tactics like this.”

Lansius grinned at the compliment and saw Batu gallop off to lead his brethren toward the enemy camp’s right side. “Dietrich,” he called.

“Yes, My Lord,” an equally dusty man with a covered head and mouth rode forward.

“Get twenty riders and participate. Do not engage, but try to provoke the Nicopolans and see how many cavalry they’ve got,” Lansius instructed.

“At once,” Dietrich prepared his group and sallied forth.

Without saying a word, Lansius spurred his horse forward for closer reconnaissance. Audrey and the rest of the retinue followed.

Stopping at a safe distance, they observed the large Nicopolan encampment. Although they had no wooden fence or palisade, they used the river and carts of fallen trees as makeshift obstacles.

There were a series of large tents in the center, heavily guarded. “That’s where they keep the supplies. Not bad,” mumbled Lansius.

Audrey chimed in, “These aren’t refugees. Better not to underestimate them.”

“The lady is correct. A simple cavalry assault wouldn’t work, not with our real numbers,” advised Sir Harold.

Not a moment too soon, the enemy reacted to the Korelian and nomadic presence by sending thousands of men to form a circular battle line. The waning sun reflected off their metal weapons—spears, swords, and scythes—as if challenging the newcomers to attack.

Lansius also noticed a group of crossbowmen taking positions behind men armored with pikes. “They’re competent, alright.”

“Look, the city gate is open,” Audrey pointed out.

“Our banner and White Lake. Must be Hugo and Sir Michael,” said Sir Harold.

“Be on guard. No matter what the scouts say, don’t get complacent,” warned Lansius. Before he could say more, he coughed and tasted iron. Dizziness overcame him, and he saw red on his hand as he tried to cover his mouth. Before he understood what had happened, Audrey and Harold rushed toward him.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Side

The sun finally went down, and despite some cavalry activity, no follow-up action occurred. Nervousness and anticipation ran high, but for many, burdened by hunger and fatigue, they clamored to return to their camp.

By now, even Sergio’s closest aide was certain there would be no battle that day. In contrast, Sergio, recently briefed about the Black Lord by the survivors of the Siege of Korelia, remained concerned and insisted that his men stay on the lines despite the falling light.

It was only after complete darkness had settled that Sergio allowed a majority of his force to break formation. The thousands of men returned to their families and began to cook whatever meager food they had.

Anticipating a night attack, Sergio worked hard to convince his men to allocate as many soldiers as possible for the night watch. Many were skeptical, believing that the fear of a night attack was unfounded.

“The enemy just arrived after a long journey; they should be wary of an attack from us, not the other way around,” said one outspoken captain among his ranks.

“We’re not only facing the newcomers. Don’t forget the garrison in Korimor city,” Sergio retorted.

“The commoners are already starving on the few rations they have. Asking them to perform under these conditions might incite rebellion,” another captain warned.

“We’ll give extra rations this morning to those who take the night watch,” Sergio conceded.

Finally, they agreed to assign a third of their force to night watch. To maintain discipline, Sergio and his staff made random patrols along the lines.

Both he and his inner circle understood that the risk was too high; they would rather exhaust their men than risk defeat. The more they conversed with the survivors of the doomed campaign to Korelia, the more they came to understand that the Black Lord was cunning and unorthodox in battle.

That night, the Nicopolans were restless, gossiping about the new threat and growing fearful of the Black Lord. Every distant neighing horse and every unusual nocturnal animal sound spooked them. Sergio himself couldn’t sleep and chose to keep watch, accompanied by a guard with a loaded crossbow at his side.

 

***

 

Fortified Camp outside Korimor's Gate

Lansius awakened around the third watch. He saw unfamiliar ceilings and surroundings and woke up abruptly. A damp piece of cloth dropped onto his lap once he managed to sit on the bed.

“A fever?” he muttered to himself.

He checked his forehead but found it normal. Then the slight headache returned.

There was no door in the wooden cabin, only a heavy canvas, which was pushed aside as someone entered. “My Lord, you’re awake.”

“Sigmund?” Lansius asked, recognizing the skald’s clear voice.

Sigmund scrambled for something before returning with a jug of water and a cup. He approached and knelt before the bed, offering a cup of water. “Please, have some water, O Lord. Shall I furnish you with anything or anyone?”

Lansius took the cup but didn’t drink. “Where are we?”

“We’re inside a camp just outside Korimor city. The place was built by Hugo when he arrived in Korimor. It’s fortified, and Sir Harold has arranged his men on defense.”

Lansius breathed a sigh of relief. “How’s Batu and his tribes?”

“He has pulled out and is camping further away from the city.”

“And the castle?”

“The city is ours, My Lord. The House didn’t even demand to see Lord Omin.”

Lansius furrowed his brows. “So, where is Omin now?”

“Sir Harold has kept him in a separate cabin. He seems calm and hasn’t caused trouble.”

Lansius nodded approvingly and drank from his cup. The water felt good on his parched throat, although hints of a strong metallic smell still lingered in his nostrils.

“My Lord, try to get more rest. The night is still long, and I’ll remain at your side,” urged Sigmund.

Acting on his suggestion, Lansius lay down again. Indeed, his head felt light. “What happened to me? Last I remember, I was reconnoitering the Nicopolan encampment.”

“You either coughed up blood or had a nosebleed and almost fell from the horse.”

“Ah...” Lansius remembered feeling dizzy and coughing. “Must be the heat.”

“That’s what the physician told us.”

“I hope he didn’t recommend a duck egg as a remedy,” he mused.

The skald smiled. “Just some cold water and vinegar.”

“That is surprisingly mild.”

Sigmund chuckled at Lansius’ comment. “Fear not, My Lord, as I will keep you from the duck egg broth. Let music be the cure for your malady.”

Lansius smiled, amused at the archaic words he used. Unexpectedly, drowsiness came easily. “Where’s Lady Audrey?”

“The Baroness is sleeping with Carla next door. She insisted on being at your side, but we convinced her not to.”

“Excellent work, Sigmund.”

The skald bowed his head graciously. “Put more trust in us, O Lord. Let us take some of your burden.”

“I shall if I can give it to you,” Lansius drew a deep breath. “Prepare your shoulders. By tomorrow, I think we’ll have an act to play.”

“Then I’ll gladly play my part to the fullest.”

Lansius was impressed. “Then lend me your ears before the dream takes them away from me.”

Sigmund’s eyes turned sharp, his face serious.

“Tomorrow morning, the Nicopolans will likely send an envoy. They’ll either try to curry favor, offer a deal, or intimidate us. When that happens, I want you to prepare everyone in my vicinity to play along with my act. If I say: let’s make a party, then let’s make one.”

The skald nodded his head, and Lansius continued, “If I say: let’s bring a big cauldron and boil a person..."

Sigmund raised an eyebrow but refrained from commenting.

“I want you and the rest to not hesitate at my command. We can’t afford to be seen making empty threats. If they try to intimidate us, then we will counter with an equal measure.”

Sigmund quickly understood the intention.

Lansius drew a sharp breath and reflected, “When we are weak, we cannot afford to appear so.”

The words piqued Sigmund. “Sir Michael said similar things when I met him. He feared that after the famine, hunger, and conflicts the Nicopolans have endured, right now, the only language they truly understand is strong action and violence.”

“He’s wise to come to that conclusion,” Lansius said with renewed interest. “Sigmund, please arrange a meeting with Sir Michael and Hugo at dawn. I need all the intel I can get.”

“Certainly, My Lord.”

"Unsavory as it must be, we must try to talk it out, because the only other option is the ultima ratio," said Lansius grimly, thinking about just how many lives would perish from both sides if they resorted to battle.

 

***

 

Chapter 84

White Pieces

 

Dawn had just broken when Sir Michael and Hugo slipped through the city gate and arrived outside the cabin. The cool wind was blowing, and the grass was wet with morning dew.

Sir Harold finally emerged from inside and invited them in. “The Lord wishes to see you.”

“Am I allowed to bring my sword?” Michael asked as he was not part of Lord Lansius’ House.

“Is there any reason not to?” Harold countered with a grin.

Michael chuckled, pleased with the implied trust.

“Don’t worry. He’s perfectly capable of killing us both,” Hugo jested and entered first.

Michael entered and saw Lansius sitting on a folding chair behind a small table. Audrey sat beside him.

“My Lord,” Hugo and Michael greeted him. The latter added, “We welcome you to Korimor.”

“Deputy, Sir Michael,” Lord Lansius replied. "How are Korimor and its people? Do they oppose you?"

“No, at least not openly. But the issue of food rations is ongoing,” admitted Hugo.

“How about House Omin?”

“The House consists only of Lady Hilda and her young son. They pose little threat. It’s no surprise. With the Baroness as their new head of House, they’re essentially an extension of your own House,” Hugo explained.

“I suppose they’re open to the idea of becoming part of the most powerful House in Lowlandia,” Harold commented from behind, eliciting a few smirks and smiles.

Lansius was amused and glanced at Audrey, who responded, “I’ll meet with them today and secure their support.”

“Don’t promise them anything except safety, good land, and a monthly allowance. Take their son as a squire when he’s of age,” Lansius instructed. Then he turned to the two commanders. “What’s the situation with the city’s supplies?”

Hugo looked at Sir Michael, who explained, “The city is fortunate that the previous Lord maintained a large cache of food. The records show that he consistently bought from and used Three Hill’s reserves during his campaigns. However, even with last year’s harvest and the current rations, the granary won’t last through the winter.”

“He is indeed cunning,” Lansius commented.

“Perhaps we can use him instead of sending him back to the dungeon,” Audrey suggested.

Lansius mulled over the idea. “If he’s not too proud, I could place him under someone. But he needs to earn our trust first.” Realizing the conversation had strayed, he added, “Let’s set this issue aside for now. What are your thoughts on the Nicopolans situation?”

“My Lord, first of all, I need to inform you that Lady Daniella was captured,” reported Hugo.

Lansius drew a deep breath but only signaled Hugo to continue. He knew from the last message that she had attempted to broker peace, and it was indeed risky.

Hugo continued, “The enemy is keeping her alive and wants to use her as a hostage.”

“Bargaining tools,” muttered Lansius. “Any reason why she attempted to talk?”

“She said the Nicopolans are fractured. It’s unlikely that everyone agrees on besieging a walled city like Korimor.”

Lansius understood her intention, but alas, it had failed. “How do you think we should solve these Nicopolan problems?”

Hugo looked at Sir Michael and spoke first. “I think we should levy the populace. That way, we’ll have the numbers required to meet them on the field. I believe that our cavalry should suffice to flank them.”

“It’ll be a good battle,” admitted Lansius. “High casualties from both sides, but a victory nevertheless.” Then Lansius gazed at the one-eyed knight.

“My Lord, how about subterfuge?” Michael suggested.

Lansius was piqued. “What do you have in mind?”

“Before Lady Daniella was captured, she reported that her attempt almost worked. The Nicopolans aren’t under one leadership. While in general, they follow this Tarracan Man, there are mercenary companies that have joined in but have different loyalties. And not everyone likes the Tarracan Man.”

“So, she went there not to broker peace but to instigate a mutiny?” asked Lansius.

Michael nodded, “She found out that peace isn’t possible if the Tarracan Man is in the lead. The man simply wants to rule.”

Almost everyone murmured, and Lansius allowed them to vent their disgust.

Audrey sighed. “To use hungry people as a stepping stone.”

“It’s a bloody path, none should ever take,” said Sir Harold.

Lansius closed his eyes, comparing himself with the Tarracan Man. Despite the contrast, he saw some similarities. He had battled Robert and gained Korelia for his own personal gain. He then stubbornly defended it also for his own personal gain.

As if noticing his troubled mind, Audrey placed her hand on his wrist. Lansius glanced at her and nodded in appreciation.

“I hope I’m a better man than he is,” said Lansius.

“My Lord, you surely jest,” said Hugo, surprised. The rest also looked concerned, which pleased Lansius.

“The Lord of Korelia is still recovering; please forgive his tactless jest,” said Audrey. “Perhaps, a duck egg broth could cure this ailment.”

“No, wait--“

“There should be a stockpile in the city. I’ll put up a petition right away,” said Hugo.

“There’s an apothecary in the city. They should have potent medicines,” Sir Michael suggested.

Lansius chuckled and waved it all off. “No duck egg for me, on the pain of no pay,” he threatened. Only then did they realize just how much the Lord hated the broth. Even the Baroness looked the other way, for fear of incurring his wrath.

Unlawfully taken from Royal Road, this story should be reported if seen on Amazon.

With his retinue in line, the Lord crossed his arms and asked Michael, “From your words, it seems possible to divide or turn them against themselves.”

“Indeed, My Lord, but it will require some finesse.”

“Do you think you have it?” Lansius asked.

“In commanding battles, I might be worthless, but in courtly matters, I believe I can hold my own,” said Michael confidently.

Lansius sat in silence for a moment, and nobody bothered him, knowing he was deciding on a plan. The shadows from five lanterns hung around the cabin danced as the morning wind began to breeze.

He finally shifted in his seat and spoke, “Hugo, you’re more suited for this task. At the first light, levy a thousand militia from the populace. Double their rations for the duration of the training. Make sure to only take the fit and people with arms, helmets, and at least gambeson.”

“Yes, My Lord,” replied Hugo.

“Sir Harold, pick a hundred of the best from the existing troops from Korimor, their guardsmen, and their mercenaries. Meld them with your men. I want you to prepare them as crack troops in combination with our dragoon regiment.”

“May I ask, what’s their purpose?” asked the tall knight.

“Possibly, hostage rescue,” revealed Lansius. “If we want to divide them successfully, then chances are we’ll need to rescue some families.”

“That’ll be hard to do,” Harold said without mincing words.

“The result may be bleak, but as long as they see us commit,” said Lansius, seemingly out of breath.

Audrey reached out to Lansius. “You’re exerting yourself. Better finish this quickly and get some rest.”

Lansius nodded, watching his men look concerned. “At ease. Just fatigue. Let me outline that I wanted to try to avoid bloodshed, there’s still time before harvest. I have discussed my plans with Sigmund; he’ll be able to give you some pointers about what to do. The Nicopolans should send their envoy today or tomorrow.”

“What if they don’t send one?” asked Audrey.

“Then I’ll make them,” replied Lansius firmly.

 

***

 

Korimor

Within an hour, morning arrived in Korimor, and the fall season could be felt everywhere. The wind carried a strong earthen scent, and there were more clouds overhead.

At first light, as ordered, Hugo and his men marched toward the city plaza and announced the recruitment of a thousand men. This announcement, with the promise of double rations, excited everyone. Word spread like wildfire, and soon many flocked to the plaza with helmets, swords, and gambesons.

While this was expected, there was also another movement of people. Propelled by the Lord of Korelia’s presence outside, and the large allied tribesmen, the Korimors dared to venture outside to collect hay and firewood for the winter.

At first, the guardsmen allowed a small number of them, but before long, a large number began to amass at the city gates, and there was concern that this could turn serious. Sir Michael thus sent a message to Lord Lansius.

When the messenger arrived, the Lord and the Baroness were eating a light breakfast.

“If it’s hundreds of people with carts, it could be a hazard if we need to defend against an attack,” said Audrey.

“What do you think, Sir Harold?” asked Lansius after sipping a bitter herb-infused concoction.

“Well, I say there’s little harm, and if this baits the Nicopolans to move, then perhaps it’s something My Lord can exploit.”

Lansius stifled a laugh at the knight’s cunning answer. “Make some arrangements then.”

“At once, My Lord,” said Sir Harold and left the cabin, taking the messenger with him.

After they left, Audrey asked, “You seem unconcerned with this. Is this within your prediction?”

“No. I didn’t expect this, but it sort of aligns with my plan,” he admitted.

Audrey offered him some sweet bread, and Lansius took a bite.

“Which part is aligned?” she asked after they finished with the bread.

“Well, I insist on staying here and not entering the city to try to provoke a response from the Nicopolans.”

Audrey tried to fathom the reason.

“I want to break the sense of the city being under siege. It’s hard on morale. I want to encourage people to venture outside to gather food, hay, wild berries, or even to go fishing. Those activities will ultimately help the city,” he explained.

“This is exactly what happened,” praised Audrey.

“No, I expected a dozen or tens of people, not hundreds. The Korimors are either bold or desperate,” he said rather worriedly. The situation inside the city might be worse than he expected.

 

***

 

Arriving at the city gate, Sir Harold personally ordered it opened, and hundreds of people armed with scythes marched out. They hurried to the meadows just beyond the city wall, working quickly to gather hay. Horse-drawn carts filled up and shuttled into the city almost non-stop.

The livelihood of their livestock depended on it. Without good hay, the animals would neither fatten up for the winter nor produce milk.

Despite the bustling activity outside the walls, the Nicopolans did nothing. Frustration seemed to build up in their camp, yet they launched no sorties.

After confirming the situation with his scout and Sir Harold, Lansius summoned House Omin. He was determined to use this opportunity to further his plan and solve as many issues as possible.

The issue of the transfer of power was particularly high on his priority list.

Despite his position, Lansius played little role except to witness Audrey take over her House’s leadership from her nephew, a boy younger than Margo. The boy was only assisted by Hilda, his mother. Omin’s wife was native to Lowlandia but was not born in Korimor.

With the symbolic transfer of the patent of Baron of Korimor and the key to the undercroft vault, Audrey officially became a Baroness, styled The Lady of Korimor.

Audrey seemed stoic, emotionless as she took the items and gave them to Carla for safekeeping. Lansius at her side looked proud. Meanwhile, Hilda and her son seemed fearful and nervous until the Lady guaranteed their safety and promised good land.

“We have moved from the castle and have transferred command of the guards to Deputy Hugo. But please allow me to retain some of my older retinue,” asked Hilda.

“As long as you can afford it,” said Audrey. “I’ll give you a monthly allowance, but it won’t be much since we’re at war. Do try to make it work.”

Hilda then asked, “We learned that my husband is here. Can we see him?”

Audrey almost allowed them, but Lansius cleared his throat and advised, “It’ll be hard for him to be seen all dirty and dusty after a long journey. It’s best to prepare him a bath and good clothes, as well as his personal barber and servant. Give them one day, and then tomorrow you can meet him.”

"That is a kind suggestion, My Lord. I shall do as you say," Hilda responded openly.

"A favor, if you could," asked Lord Lansius.

"Please, if it's within my power."

"When you meet your husband tomorrow, please ask about his contingency plan in this situation. I might learn something beneficial to aid our situation. Rest assured, I would consider this a meritorious service."

Hilda understood his intention, expressed her gratitude, and left the premises. Not long after she returned to the city, a host of workers with carts carried three wooden bathtubs. The two largest were for Lord Lansius and the Baroness, complete with hot water, flowers, and clean clothes.

The smallest of the three was intended for Omin, a sign of humility on their part.

Lord Lansius gratefully accepted the gift and cleaned himself. After so many days without baths, the first time always felt good. His skin became supple, and his muscles felt relaxed.

Carla, as the Baroness’s squire, politely confiscated the flowers, replacing them with herbal leaves she had gathered from the tribesmen. She had been taught by Cecile and Calub not to trust anyone too easily. Even insignificant things could contain poison that might harm her charge.

After cleaning himself, Lansius sat in his cabin-turned-command-center and received updates regarding the situation. He confirmed that the Nicopolans had done nothing but dig some pitfalls as measures against a cavalry attack. Next, Hugo sent a report.

“More than enough have joined. Selection and training are ongoing. The anticipation is high,” Roger, the squire, reported on behalf of Hugo.

Lansius nodded. From the window, he could watch Sir Harold condition his men to move speedily under his command and to retreat in an orderly fashion after achieving their objectives.

The new dragoon regiment, the fast-moving footmen riding horses, would also participate. Lansius had yet to give them a role, but they would be vital.

Nearing midday, Lansius was about to survey the location, but Audrey and his staff urged him to get some rest to avoid a relapse.

...

Lansius lay down to rest, but a sense of restlessness kept him alert. Whatever had happened to him yesterday and this morning felt distant. Feeling better, he taught Roger how to make bird’s-eye maps instead of sleeping.

Audrey entered the sleeping chamber. “Ah, you’re awake.”

Roger stood straight and bowed his head to the Lady of Korimor, surprising Audrey with the formality.

“Any new developments?” asked Lansius while putting down his quill pen.

“You’re going to like this. We have an envoy,” said Audrey.

Lansius couldn’t help but smirk. “Who’s waiting outside?”

“Harold and Dietrich. They’re giving them the silent treatment,” she replied.

Lansius nodded while feeling the weight of responsibility creeping on his shoulder. It didn't bend his tempered will, merely steeled his resolve.

Here we are, fighting to survive, in a world with the darkest powers...

He recalled a catchy lyric and gazed at Audrey. He felt her trust in him. "Summon Michael and Sigmund. Let the Tragedy of Nicopolans begin."

 

***

 

Chapter 85

The Sons of Nicopola

 

The three envoys had been waiting in the midday sun. They had asked to find some shade, but the guards and knights gave only a lukewarm response. Thus, they settled to wait in an awkward and heavy atmosphere.

Suddenly, a young man exited, looked around fiercely at the three envoys, and spoke to one of the knights. “The Lord is willing to entertain the envoys.”

The tall and imposing knight grumbled, spat on the grass, and said to the envoys, “Well, you got your chance. Don’t say I didn’t treat you right.”

The envoys hurriedly moved inside, welcoming the cool shade and sweet floral fragrance.

“Behold, the Lord of Korelia, the Protector of Korimor, the Leader of the Grand Alliance, and the Noyan of the Lowlandia Tribesmen,” a squire heralded.

The envoys bowed their heads in unison toward a man in brightly colored clothing slouched on a padded chair. Indeed, he had black hair.

“My Lord, we Nicopolans bid our welcome to this area,” said one of the envoys, a stout-looking soldier.

Another followed up, “What happened between the city and our people is unfortunate, but we’re willing to make amends.”

“Amends?” Lord Lansius laughed.

Seizing the moment, the third envoy brought forward a lacquered jewelry coffer. “Please accept a gift from our leader.”

Two of the envoys looked excited, but the soldier appeared anxious.

The Lord’s knight intercepted the intricate wooden box and broke the wax seal in front of them. When he opened it, a pungent odor emanated from the box. The knight’s eyes widened, while two of the envoys panicked. One gasped while the other shrieked in fear and nearly lost his footing.

The squires reacted by drawing their swords, but the Lord waved them off. “Let me see,” he commanded.

“Don’t let them near the Lord,” the knight barked at the squires. Then, more politely to his Lord, “My Lord, it’s an insult.”

The Lord rose from his seat to take a look at the jewelry box. Meanwhile, the two envoys cowered in fear, while the stout man visibly fumed.

“Ah, what a gift,” the Lord said, his tone surprisingly fascinated by the grotesque object. “Signet rings complete with the cut-off fingers. So, intimidating.”

“This is a preposterous insult. They should all be flogged,” suggested the knight.

“Oh, they’ll have their flogs, but after I’m done with them,” said the Lord. “I wonder what embalming he used to remove the stench.” He then gazed at the envoys and asked, “Should I return the favor?”

Realizing the hinted intention, the two envoys dropped to the ground, their faces pale, and they began to beg.

“My Lord, please listen. I don’t know about the content. I’m just a tradesman who dealt with Nicopolan nobles. Sergio told me to talk sweet and present you this gift.”

“My Lord, we didn’t know. Sergio set us up. He must’ve wanted us to die,” said another one.

"And I intend to deliver," replied the Lord with bizarre enthusiasm. "This is a game I can't lose. He aimed to intimidate me, and I shall retaliate in kind."

The envoys were paralyzed with fear. The one who had offered the jewelry coffer began to weep, while even the stout man dropped to his knees as if pleading for mercy. But the Lord was far from finished. "My scouts found human remains in a cauldron in the forest. Perhaps I should boil you three alive."

Madness flickered in his eyes, unnerving the envoys, who could only beg for their lives.

"No, wait," the Lord suddenly exclaimed. "That wouldn't work. That would only feed him." He then erupted into laughter, joined by his staff and knights.

The Lord finally added, "I bet this Sergio will gladly chug a soup made from you three. He must truly despise you to have sent you here."

In desperation, one of the envoys threw themselves at the Lord’s feet. “My Lord truly knows. This Sergio, he didn’t like us. He wanted us to die so he could control our families and followers.”

Lansius coughed several times and returned to his seat. His squire readily offered a goblet of water, which Lansius took and drank.

“Gentlemen, I understand your plight. But to me, you’re all already dead.”

“My Lord, please...” the envoy begged.

"You're mistaken," the Lord corrected them. "If I let you return unharmed, Sergio would likely become suspicious. He might conduct a sham trial, accuse you of colluding with me, and then execute you and your family."

Hearing the Lord’s explanation, the three envoys started to feel angry at Sergio’s treachery.

The Lord ignored their reaction and talked to his knight. “It’s not a bad strategy, using my hand to kill them and gain their followers’ loyalty. A dishonorable method, but who are we to judge?”

“My Lord, my name is Servius,” the stout-looking envoy exclaimed, his strong voice gathering attention. “I’m loyal only to my legion, and I have influence over two hundred fighters.”

“Oh, that must be the reason why he wants you to die,” quipped the Lord.

The author's narrative has been misappropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

“He suspected me of having contact with one of your agents,” Servius tried to explain.

“Lady Daniella?” asked the one-eyed knight who just arrived.

Servius looked at the newcomer and sighed in regret. “Unfortunately, I never met her. But the ones working with her have been rounded up and killed. Many were people who I have shared battles with.”

The Lord sized up Servius and asked, "Why don't you and your men stand up to him?"

“It’s because I don’t trust my own men," he said with regret. "This Sergio has a reputation as a savior. Time and time again, he has proven capable of bringing food to the table as long as they do exactly as they’re told. This is why your agent’s plan failed. Somebody must’ve talked.”

Servius' explanation made both envoys cower. Sergio, the Tarracan Man, was a figure they both feared and revered.

The Lord let out a sigh. “I lost interest. Guards, take them out.”

The envoys panicked and were about to beg, but the knight stood tall, threatening them. “My Lord, how about their escorts?”

The Lord rolled his eyes and replied grimly. “Let them watch.”

The knights and squires drew their swords, leaving the envoys with no choice but to accept their fate. The squires then tied them and covered their heads before sending them outside.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Camp

People flocked to the east side of the camp where they could watch from a distance how the three envoys were paraded on top of carts. They were subsequently tied and flogged mercilessly until they all fainted.

Despite pleas from multiple people, Sergio refused to send help, saying, "This is what the enemy wants. They must have a force ready to ambush us. While it pains me to see my trusted fellow Nicopolans being treated like this, we must endure."

As the crowd grew larger and more restless, he rallied them, "Sons of Nicopola, hear me out! This Lord of Korelia is an evil man. I offered him gifts worthy of high nobles, and yet he tortured our cherished envoys. What kind of Lord harms a messenger? He is brutal, no doubt, and any attempt to resolve this amicably would be futile. But now is not the time to act. To move now would be to fall into their trap!"

The situation put heavy pressure on the group that wanted to resolve the issue peacefully. Now, they had no counter-argument against Sergio’s insistence on offering battle.

Meanwhile, the three victims of Sergio’s power play were kicked off the cart and left to fend for themselves. Only afterward did their escorts finally muster the courage to help them.

The rest of the Nicopolans also rushed to their rescue.

Sergio wore a face of regret and a pained expression, but deep down he was happy. The only better outcome would have been for all three to die, but even this would prevent anyone from voicing support for a diplomatic solution. He felt he had won the first battle of wits.

Tonight, he would gather the council of Nicopolan leaders and ask for their total support for a pitched battle. This new Lord of Korelia threat had to be dealt with before they could prepare a defense.

Sergio had enough crossbow bolts, long pikes, and heavy armor to execute a fairly recent strategy: the pike and shot. It would be something that a Lowlandian like Lord Lansius would never expect.

He planned to bait the Korelian cavalry and spring a trap, annihilating them in one go. This was why they didn’t evacuate to the wooded area and stayed in the plains despite the disadvantage and the opponent’s large cavalry presence.

This seemingly massive tactical mistake from the Nicopolan side was in reality a trap. The same one that had worked against the knights of southern Nicopolis and the Umberland cavalry. And now, the Nicopolans under Sergio had become experts at it.

 

***

 

Servius

With battered bodies, the envoys were brought back to the Nicopolan camp to a heroes’ welcome. Sergio met them, pressuring them not to divulge his gift to Lansius, lest their beloved family members suffer a horrible death. Afterward, the three were led to their respective tents to receive treatment.

Servius lay face down on a bed of hay. His clothes were torn and stained brown with dried blood, as was his skin. His cousin ground medicinal herbs into a paste, while his son provided him with wine to dull the pain.

Even without a whip, using just a straight wooden stick, the flogging had been painful and hard on the body. He couldn’t even sit and simply tried to shake off the pain from his back.

After applying a thin layer of medicinal paste as an ointment, there was little else they could do but let the patient rest. Servius fell asleep only to awaken during sundown.

He drew a deep breath and smelled a strong iron scent inside his tent. His family was boiling their rations of watery gruel. Despite his claims about how heroic the trio had been, Sergio refused to give his family more unless they participated in the night watch.

They were bitter about Sergio but felt powerless against him. Worse, they knew that Sergio had planted spies to watch them.

Hearing his family talk about Sergio, Servius recalled the events of that midday. He remembered sitting on the cart, his hands and legs tied, under a cloudy sky. Amid the creaking of cart wheels over uneven terrain and the sporadic neighing of horses, he’d had an unexpected conversation.

Unbeknownst to most, Lord Lansius, in disguise, rode beside Servius’ cart as the envoys were escorted to the field where they would be flogged.

Lansius’ words still echoed in Servius’ ears: “Do you know why I ordered this?”

Servius recalled that he’d wanted to spit but fear had made him shake his head.

“It’s to save you from Sergio.”

The words prompted Servius to do a double-take.

“Why did Sergio send you with that box of fingers? I think it’s because he fears you. He needs you to die.”

Servius could only exhale bitterly.

“You hesitated. You fear him.”

“I do not,” Servius shook his head. “I fear for my family and my men.”

“Then endure the pain. It’s ironic, but this is the only way to keep you alive; otherwise, this Tarracan Man will become suspicious and kill you outright.”

“Why are you doing this?” Servius asked.

“Do you want to save your family?” Lord Lansius replied, dodging the question.

Jumping to conclusions, Servius warned, “You want me to assassinate Sergio? That’s impossible. After your agent’s failure, it’s difficult to even get close to him. He’s surrounded at all times.”

However, the Lord seemed to have another idea. “How many did you say are under your influence?”

“Two hundred, but if I make my move, another three hundred will join, along with possibly five hundred unarmed people.”

“That’ll do,” said Lord Lansius, surprising Servius.

“I can’t rush at Sergio, not even in the middle of your attack. He’ll place me far away and put his men in my path.”

“You don’t have to. Instead of fighting, run to the woods.”

“Run...?”

“Spread the word that you have a backup plan in the woods if Sergio fails in the war.”

“But that still requires victory,” Servius warned. “At least a decisive win to break the morale of Sergio’s men. A rout won’t happen if he’s still alive.”

“Then I shall defeat him,” declared Lord Lansius.

Even Servius was astounded by the man’s conviction and couldn’t help but warn him, “How can you beat him? He has the numbers and the supplies. Don’t be fooled by the location of the camp; it’s well-fortified. The men are well-armed and equipped against cavalry attack.”

“It’s true that he has greater numbers and probably better fighters, also equipped to handle cavalry attack. However, that will amount to nothing. Just a tragedy waiting to happen.”

The calmness stemming from sheer conviction moved Servius, who had long sought to split ways with Sergio and his diabolical rise to power. “What will you do with the people under me if you win this?”

“Nothing but grant them the freedom to find a job and feed their families.”

“My Lord, we’re not farmers.”

"Then your men shall fight for me. Food in exchange for bravery in battle. This is Lowlandia; you won't find easy living here."

Servius heaved a long sigh but nodded his head.

"I suppose Sergio wouldn't plan for a general attack, given that his strong point is the camp. Fortunately, this will give you time to think. Remember this well: three days from now, when the night is burning, you must provide me with an answer," warned the Lord sternly. "Fail to do so, and all your men and their families will not survive this war."

 

***

 

Chapter 86

Testing the Waters

 

Korimor Castle

Inside the stone-walled chamber of Korimor Castle, a place that had witnessed countless strife, regime changes, and treachery, Lord Lansius sat alone facing a stone table. A silver platter glistened in the midday sun streaming through the narrow windows. Despite the food situation, the staff had done their best to provide a savory menu for their new Lord.

Carla stood guard. In Margo’s absence, she had become the de facto food and wine tester. Living with the staff of a former opponent involved many risks.

Today marked the second day since Lansius’ arrival in Korimor. Yesterday, he had met with envoys, which had resulted in a public flogging. He disliked the punishment but understood its necessity.

His opponent, Sergio, was cunning and adept at scheming. Yesterday, he proved that he could force Lansius to react. Yet, that did not overly concern him. In war, cold calculation was paramount, and Lansius still felt he had the upper hand.

He carefully read the missive just delivered to him. It was from Omin, outlining his contingency plans against a siege. From this letter, Lansius learned a great deal. He had to admit that the man was a capable administrator.

Misguided, but capable.

However, he still harbored reservations about employing Omin. He felt the need for consultations with other Lords in his alliance and his top retainers like Sir Justin.

Putting those thoughts aside, he shifted his attention to another report concerning grain rationing and the new militia. Sir Michael had been invaluable in assessing the storage conditions and providing estimates, which helped Lansius greatly in understanding his real inventory.

The knight also reported on the condition of the grain and storage. The risk of mold was ever-present, and preventative measures were as important as rationing.

Time passed. Lansius yawned and stretched, feeling a deep ache in his bones from the exhausting marathon riding and nights spent sleeping rough. His buttocks and hips were still raw from the journey.

For days his only bed had been layers of rugs laid out in the open air. This harsh arrangement had led to a persistent shortness of breath, as well as a mild cough and a sore throat.

Reflecting on it, the journey had been extraordinarily spartan. After departing from Korelia, they had spent several nights as guests in the yurts of nomadic tribesmen they encountered. Eventually, they rendezvoused with Sir Harold and Batu after days of traversing the northern corridor.

Batu was already prepared with his warriors and celebrated Lansius’ arrival with a grand feast. However, beyond that point, there were no villages or yurts where they could seek shelter. Often this meant sleeping wherever they could find a water source, following eight- to ten-hour rides with frequent horse changes.

The journey was excruciating. The only thing that gave Lansius solace was Audrey’s resilience. As the more experienced traveler, she stepped in to care for him when he was at his lowest—prone to rants and easily irritated by everything around him.

Lansius glanced at Carla. “Tell me, do you still feel pain from riding?”

“Just a bit, My Lord,” replied the squire.

“Ah, you’re a tough one,” Lansius complimented.

“Not at all, My Lord. The Baroness is even tougher. She resumed sword training this morning.”

Lansius shook his head in disbelief.

Watching him, Carla continued, “It’s as if the Lady is pushing herself.”

“Pushing herself?”

“Indeed, My Lord. It seems she truly wishes to live up to your expectations.”

“My expectations...? Tell me, Carla, what are my expectations of her?”

Carla pressed her lips tightly together.

“Why do you hesitate?” Lansius asked, approaching the squire, who wore an embarrassed expression.

“It seems I’ve spoken too much, My Lord.”

Lansius chuckled and moved to a red-cushioned daybed in the corner. No longer concerned about the staff gossip, he started to relish the bliss of ignorance. He had barely taken a deep breath when the door burst open.

Audrey entered, gulping from a water skin, clad in training armor she had found in the castle armory.

“My Lady,” Carla greeted.

Audrey waved her off and turned to Lansius. “I heard you’ve changed the plan?”

“Yes, I have a better understanding of the Nicopolan mindset. Our initial assumptions won’t work,” he explained, gesturing for her to sit beside him.

Audrey moved closer but remained standing. Lansius grabbed the water skin from her hand and drank slowly. The water burned, a sign that he needed more rest and some honey.

“How’s training?” he asked.

“Good. So, what’s the new plan? I also heard you made some changes to the militia?”

“No, I’ve just removed the carpenters from the militia. I need to form a separate command for them. I’ve placed them under Sir Michael.”

“Mm, it seems you’ve given our friend from White Lake a lot of responsibilities.”

“He’s capable.”

“Wish I could be of use.”

Lansius was surprised by the notion and gazed at her, expecting a pout. However, Audrey simply looked back at him with furrowed brows. “Why are you looking at me like that?” she asked.

To alleviate the awkwardness, Lansius coughed and then noticed something. “Drey, why are you still standing?” He motioned for her to sit next to him once again.

“I just trained,” she replied, dismissing him.

“So, we often sit together after training?”

“It’s not as airy in here, and I don’t want to trouble you with the smell.”

“It can’t be that bad,” he argued.

“I also took care of the horses this morning, so I probably smell more than you think,” she stated firmly.

Lansius chuckled. “I thought you hated me or something.”

“Why would you say something like that?” she blurted out.

Sensing the atmosphere, Carla quietly moved toward the door.

After she left, Lansius whispered, “Why are you training so hard?”

Audrey hesitated before saying, “I’m revisiting my training from my master. I think she hid something in it.”

“You mean she secretly trained you in magic?”

She shrugged. “I’m not sure, but some of her training methods are odd.”

“Like what?”

Taken from Royal Road, this narrative should be reported if found on Amazon.

“Like... Oh, like this one.” She sat on the ground, crossed her legs, and closed her eyes.

“I know what that is,” Lansius said, recognizing the meditation sitting pose.

Audrey opened one eye. “Really?”

He nodded. “Does it have a name?”

“Not really,” she mumbled and asked in return, “Does it lead to magic?”

Lansius rubbed his chin. “Not to my knowledge. Did your master tell you anything?”

“She said to focus, empty the mind, and feel the flows within you as you breathe.”

Lansius recognized the similarity. “Tell you what, let me join you. Maybe we’ll learn something from it.”

 

***

 

While the Lord and Lady were winding down in the castle, the city bustled with activity. One thousand strong recruits were being trained. There wasn’t enough space to gather them all, so training was conducted in several locations. Hugo even had some of them marching on the battlements around the city to ensure their readiness.

Aside from the militia, the Lord also commanded his retinue to gather all the able carpenters in the city and commissioned them to work on wooden structures. Although not complex, the sheer volume of the project was staggering. Two hundred carpenters and craftsmen labored intensely, depleting the city’s timber stock in the process.

The woodcutters had also joined in, venturing beyond the walls to gather more timber. In the surrounding fields, people continued to collect hay. As work progressed further from the walls, concerns about risks emerged. However, emboldened by yesterday’s success, the people grew more daring.

There was a sense that the siege would soon be lifted and salvation was near.

In this regard, the carpenter took the Lord’s words to heart. The Lord had emphasized that the better the structures, the more assured they could be of victory. Thus, they gave it their all. Luckily, the Lord had requested simple but sturdy structures that were easy to construct and transport.

Finished parts were quickly loaded onto carts and readied for deployment. In addition, the Lord had assembled a special team of a hundred people qualified for unique roles. Sir Michael was entrusted with their training, preparation, and instruction.

While work was underway, the Nicopolans unexpectedly marched out of their camp, steel glistening in the sunlight as it reflected off their spears, helmets, and armor.

Men on watch promptly sounded the alarm, and riders were dispatched to warn those working in the fields to return immediately.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Camp

Truthfully, many mercenaries among the Nicopolans were reluctant to attack a walled city like Korimor. They lacked siege capabilities and had no desire to make the ultimate sacrifice.

Moreover, after the arrival of the Lord of Korelia, it seemed unlikely that the city would surrender. Many believed it would make more sense to negotiate for a portion of the harvest and depart peacefully. Even with their baggage train slowing them down on the mountain road, they could reach Nicopola safely before winter.

The journey was risky, but they had no alternatives. Camping in the open or in a hostile region like Lowlandia was out of the question. However, just that morning, Sergio had urged everyone again to seize the region by force.

In a fiery speech, he warned them to abandon the foolish hope that the city’s Lord would let them leave with his harvest. Sergio also stressed that even if they survived the journey home, they would face years of hardship and famine in Nicopola.

In the end, Sergio urged them to capture the city and claim the fertile lands around the hills. The Nicopolans, still fearful of facing another famine and allured by the prospect of finding an easy wintering spot, began to gather around his cause.

Without anyone daring to argue, Sergio swayed enough people that the rest had little choice but to follow. Thus, the Nicopolans prepared their weapons and donned their armor.

Under the midday sun, a four-thousand-strong Nicopolan force marched out. They assumed a wide formation and moved across the plains toward the city on the hill.

Their spirits were high, buoyed by the presence of Sergio and his elite, who were prepared for an assault.

 

***

 

Korimor

Trumpets on the walls rang clear, alarming everyone in the city.

“An attack?” Audrey said, rising to her feet.

“Likely,” Lansius replied, slowly getting up.

“You’re expecting this?” she asked, suspicious of his lack of hastiness.

“Expecting?” He mulled over the words. “Well, it’s within my expectations that they’ll try to provoke us.” Lansius walked to the heavy wooden table and shelved his notes as he spoke. “The Nicopolans don’t have the capacity to conduct a siege.”

“Meanwhile, we don’t have the capacity to oust them,” Audrey countered.

“A stalemate,” he agreed.

She approached the table and cautiously suggested, “You know, the nomads might have a chance to make this work.”

“It’s a fortified position. We’d lose a lot of horse archers to make it work,” he stressed, then added, “I can’t afford to lose them. It takes at least ten years to train a good archer.”

“I sort of get that. Archery looks easy when they do it, but it feels unnatural when I try.”

Lansius took a seat and waited patiently. Soon enough, a knock was heard at the door, and Carla entered. “My Lord, enemy formations can be seen moving toward our camp outside the gate.”

“How’s the evacuation of the workers?” Lansius inquired calmly.

“I believe it’s still ongoing, My Lord.”

“How many Nicopolans? Are all of them on the field?” Audrey asked.

“They say it’s several thousand, but not all.”

No chance to hit their camp...

“Well, I better check, just in case,” Lansius said, rising to his feet. Audrey and their entourage followed him.

Lansius reached the battlements surrounding the city. Unlike in Korelia, he could see lush woodlands surrounding the hills before a sudden clearing some tens of meters from the wall. He glanced out, noticing the Nicopolan formation had advanced closer to the gate.

Hugo, who was also on the battlement, approached Lord Lansius. “My Lord, it seems we’re under attack.”

“Indeed. This Tarracan man is more than capable of sending people to their graves,” Lansius replied, and then added, “Can I trust you with defense?”

“Certainly, My Lord. I believe you don’t want me to chase?”

“Yes. Let’s not risk it. In time, Batu’s scouts will notice and take action,” he instructed.

Hugo quickly departed. Lansius glanced at the city’s interior. He saw hundreds of carpenters working and militias resting after training. Some looked up at him, and a crowd gathered below.

“I wonder what they think of me,” he mused to Audrey.

“A savior, if you can get them out of this situation,” she responded.

“And if I can’t?”

She took a deep breath and rested her waist on the wall. “I’d rather not entertain such thoughts.”

Lansius chuckled at her frank answer. Truthfully, the situation was worryingly bad. While they could stay safe inside the walled city, that would only free the Nicopolans to harvest the field. His troops were also significantly smaller in number compared to the enemy, and unlike in the last battle, he lacked any advantage in crossbow numbers.

Furthermore, the wind in Korimor, as expected, was inconsistent, and with the Nicopolans camped close to the farmland, it was too risky to use fire.

Footsteps were heard from the staircase and soon a knight with a black eye patch ascended to the battlement. “My Lord, My Lady,” he greeted.

“Sir Michael, you don’t need to respond to the enemy’s aggression. Please, continue your work," Lansius urged.

“I understand, but I’m here to give a report.”

“Ah, then let’s hear it,” Lansius said, his mood brightening.

“The preparation is halfway complete. We’re using some of the completed parts to train the militia.”

“Well done." Lansius nodded. "What about the supporting equipment?”

“The tools are ready. We’ve gathered enough sharp implements from the populace.”

Lansius drew a deep breath, mulling it over, before suddenly announcing, “No changes then, we're on schedule.”

 

***

 

Nicopolan Side

The Nicopolans under Sergio fought hard against the fortified camp outside the city gate. Crossbow duels opened the battle before it switched into a melee.

The attackers’ large numbers were countered by wooden fences and a staunch, stubborn defense.

Crossbowmen on top of the walls played a major part in turning the tide against the Nicopolans. Whenever the Nicopolans focused their attack, the crossbowmen would fire to disperse them, forcing them to take cover behind their shields.

The duel of crossbows continued, but due to the height advantage, it was a one-sided affair in favor of the defenders.

Attacking a well-fortified site was challenging, and the Nicopolans’ daring attack achieved little. When their scouts alerted them of the approaching nomadic cavalry, they retreated.

Sergio allowed the Nicopolans to retreat disorderly. He needed to bait Lansius’ forces into chasing them. His entire strategy was to provoke a response and then fake a retreat to his camp, where he had hidden crossbowmen and his best men-at-arms.

It was a trap designed for the Korelians and their nomadic allies. However, the enemy’s smaller force didn’t take the bait.

The nomadic cavalry also halted their chase as soon as they noticed crossbowmen in the distance. Some became unlucky victims, but most escaped with their lives.

The Nicopolans sustained casualties from this skirmish without achieving anything. The trap had failed, and Sergio led his men back to lick their wounds. Anticipating their shaky morale, he climbed onto a cart that formed part of their camp’s makeshift wall. “Why do you look like this?” he addressed the returning troops. “This is not even a setback. This is all according to plan.”

His claim attracted the attention of the men who stopped to listen.

“Don’t you dare take this as a loss. This is exactly what we planned for. There’s no surefire way to win a war; otherwise, sieges would be over in a day,” he said, glossing over the day’s failure.

Sergio continued, “Believe me when I say we still outnumber them and are stronger than their combined might. Right now, the Lord of Korelia is trapped in Korimor. I bet he’s busy trying to pack up and run.”

His joke triggered laughter and mockery from the crowd.

“The more pressure we apply, the more likely he’ll vacate the city and the castle. Soon, everything will be ours—warm bread, soup, and shelter. Now, do you have the courage to endure?”

His men nodded and cheered.

“I ask again, do you have the courage to endure? There will be more challenges tomorrow and the day after,” he warned them.

His men roared in agreement.

With just a single speech, Sergio effectively pacified his men. They would rest that night and try again to provoke the enemy the next day, better prepared for the challenge ahead.

Sergio returned to his tent feeling genuinely excited about the challenge. Although he was generally short-tempered, he approached military matters with a cool head. To him, a strong defense was like a tough nut to crack. Today, he had observed several vulnerabilities in the Korelians’ defense, particularly their reliance on reinforcements from the Nomads.

It was something he could exploit and abuse.

He and the Nicopolans hadn't arrived here without struggle. They had experienced their own battles and challenges and had cracked tough defenses. That was why so many of these eight thousand people were loyal to him.

Sergio had seen enough of how the new Lord operated his defenses. Enough to identify the nomadic cavalry as Lord Lansius' sole crutch, and tomorrow, he would cripple them.

 

***

 

Chapter 87

Veiled in Flames

 

The guardsmen rotated shifts as the night watch ended. Dawn had arrived, and the golden light breaking through the darkness marked the third day since Lord Lansius had set foot in the fields of Korimor.

The Lord refused to sleep in the castle and chose instead to spend the night in a humble cabin just outside the gates. He wanted to keep his troops' morale high and reassure the people of Korimor that they were not completely under siege.

Inside the cabin, the Lord and Lady sat on a carpet on the floor, meditating. Despite not gaining anything from the experience, they felt it was worth another try. After half an hour, they decided it was enough for the day.

Lansius munched on the breakfast Carla had brought them. After Carla had left, he asked, "So, did you feel anything?"

Audrey looked at her palm and shook her head. "I feel nothing has changed. Should I feel anything?"

Lansius chuckled. "You tell me. I've never been acquainted with a mage... No, wait. Technically, we know Hannei."

She shrugged. "But she hardly ever reveals anything about magic."

"Well, at least we're not tiring ourselves out," he quipped.

She found it funny and later commented, "I guess I really do need a mentor."

Lansius whispered, "Are you thinking of accepting Sir Morton's advice?"

"Only if you feel that's the best course of action," Audrey replied.

Lansius nodded. "Let's discuss this when we have the time. Right now, we're stuck here."

Audrey nodded in agreement.

"But you should probably continue to do it," he suggested.

She furrowed her brows and asked, "Why? Is it beneficial?"

"Well, I read somewhere that it builds mental strength."

"Mental strength..." she mused, "Does it make me smarter?"

"Wiser," he corrected her.

"I'll do it, but only if you accompany me," she said, flashing a grin.

Lansius chuckled, acknowledging that meditation was easier said than done.

...

 

The two finished breakfast and went out to inspect the fences. The captains and lieutenants recounted the details of the battles. Even without their explanations, Lansius knew they had been hard-fought. There were numerous wounded and even some fatalities.

In the absence of Calub, Sir Michael was the one who kept records of the fallen and the wounded on their side. It was always necessary to record and compensate for bravery and sacrifice.

Lansius visited his men's camp and was pleasantly surprised by their wholehearted welcome with big grins and jokes. Despite all the hardships and losses they had endured, the men remained optimistic.

Somehow, his troops had mastered mechanisms to cope with the violent nature of their business.

He was so impressed that he readily agreed when Audrey suggested ordering a keg of pale beer to be brought from the castle's supply as a reward. The camp came alive with loud cheering.

Lansius then continued with his schedule for the day. He was inspecting militia training with objects made by the carpenters when the trumpets rang again.

The men readily donned their armor and prepared their weapons. Meanwhile, Lansius and Audrey headed to the battlements, followed by their entourage. There he met Hugo, who had been observing the situation.

"My Lord," Hugo greeted.

"How many?" Lansius asked.

"Almost the same, probably half of their numbers; some three to four thousand." There was concern in his voice.

Lansius shared the same concern and asked, "Do you need to take the levied men?"

"I'll take more of Korimor's guards for today. They're better trained."

Lansius nodded. Both understood that deploying the militia in high-risk battles would only result in senseless casualties. They would only consider such a move when their main combatants were at risk of exhaustion.

The rate of casualties and wounded was a significant concern for Lansius. Setting aside morale, he knew that his small force could not win a battle of attrition unless he retreated behind the city walls. However, doing so would cost him his strategic foothold and limit his ability to execute his plans.

Under no circumstances could Lansius afford to have his gate blocked.

"Look, they're coming," said Audrey from his side.

Lansius squinted his eyes and saw the formations marching their way.

"If there isn't anything, I bid my leave," said Hugo.

"I'll send for Sir Harold, Dietrich, and their men to assist you," Lansius promised.

"Gratitude, My Lord." The deputy left to assume command for the upcoming battle.

Carla took a step forward and whispered, "My Lord, are you sure about sending Sir Harold and Dietrich? Their men are your only protection inside the city."

"She's right," said Audrey. "I'm yet to fully trust the Korimors."

"I've already given my word, and they're necessary to guarantee victory. Besides, at least I have you two at my side," Lansius said, and then sent a runner to summon Sir Harold and Dietrich.

Audrey sighed. "That kind of attitude will be fatal someday. Carla, please watch his back for me."

"Understood, My Lady."

Lansius decided not to retort. Even he knew the risk.

Sir Harold and Dietrich arrived soon, and the two accepted the task after leaving ten select personnel as bodyguards.

With that settled, Lansius observed from the battlements how the battle unfolded.

The opening crossbow duel was fierce, and unlike yesterday, a part of the Nicopolans from the start aimed at the men on the walls, forcing Lansius and the rest to cover themselves with shields.

If you come across this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen from Royal Road. Please report it.

Underneath Carla's shield, Audrey commented, "This looks fiercer than yesterday's battle."

"The result might also turn out differently," Lansius responded.

"But Batu will also adapt and improve," said Audrey, kicking the crossbow's metal stirrup to reload the bolt. She crouched, lined up her shot, and the crossbow jolted back as the bolt flew toward the target. By chance, her steel tipped bolt struck a loaded crossbow, causing it to break. The prod and string lashed out, knocking the crossbowman senseless while sending violent wooden debris flying around his vicinity. It caused a brief chaos before Nicopolans with big shields moved in to protect them from further attack.

"Good shot, My Lady," Carla congratulated, while another bolt glanced against her shield.

"Gratitude, Carla," Audrey said, but then paused as she looked at the horizon.

"What do you see?" asked Lansius, noticing her squinted eyes.

She looked at him. "Batu's cavalry is approaching."

Lansius rose to take a peek. "They're coming too fast. Are they trying to deter the Nicopolans from attacking? Did anyone send such a message?"

"None. We would never dare to change strategy without consulting you," Audrey reassured him.

Lansius gazed at the enemy's formation; the fighting was brutal and loud. The Nicopolans were more committed than yesterday. It was hard to discern the mass of people even from above, and at first, he found nothing was amiss. Meaning, the Nomads' threat would once again force the Nicopolans to flee.

Then he was piqued by several groups of Nicopolans with long spears who were holding back from the fight.

Anti cavalry? But directed at our gates?

Lansius became worried and looked elsewhere. His eyes couldn't find anything. "Get me someone with good eyes," he commanded.

Audrey volunteered while Carla called for her men to come closer.

"What are we searching for?" asked Audrey as two young men came up.

Lansius explained, "Search for groups of men with long spears, pikes, or crossbows hiding in the field."

Everyone tried to search, with more men covering them with shields.

"My Lord, something glitters over there," one of the young men pointed out.

Lansius hardly saw anything, but Audrey seemed to confirm it with her nods. He eyeballed the route the Nomads would take to flank the Nicopolans and found the hiding groups conveniently placed in the middle. "They're aiming at the nomads!" he blurted out.

"By the Ageless," Audrey muttered.

"Get me something to burn. Torches! We must send a signal," Lansius said to the two young men who hurriedly ran toward the kitchen.

"Horns won't work?" asked Audrey.

"Two signals are better than one," replied Lansius. He continued with instructions to the guards around him, "Gather a large cloth or some capes, along with spears and ropes."

As the men carried out his orders, Lansius confided in Audrey, "This Sergio guy got us. He's blocked our way out, so we can't send a rider to warn Batu and his cavalry."

 

***

 

Nomadic Tribes

Batu led his cavalry on a wide approach, not risking friendly fire from the on-edge Korimor defenders. He and his tribes had little love for this city. Yet, Lord Lansius had promised them that he would stop the raiding and slavery, Batu placed his trust in him. The prospect of securing peace and vast grazing lands for the tribes was too beneficial to ignore, compelling him to shed blood once more under the bronze and blue banner.

Today, he and his one-hundred and fifty cavalry—the real number of horsemen warriors he had—were en route to flank the Nicopolans. They were ready with their bows and had no intention of engaging in hand-to-hand combat. Their strength lay in horseback archery, aimed at softening the enemy and forcing them to retreat. He would only charge when the enemy was in disarray.

Unlike yesterday, they reacted sooner. Batu thought that Lord Lansius' small garrison would benefit from a shorter skirmish duration. He knew Lansius was planning something and he intended to help keep the Lord's troops fresh.

Riding with the wind around him, Batu and his men spotted a column of black smoke from the wall. The smoke confused them but didn't make them pause. They had seen the Nicopolans' formation and were busy chanting their war cries to pump their spirits higher.

Batu also heard a horn or trumpets from the wall and started to guess that something was amiss.

A fire? Did the enemy break through?

But the black smoke formed like small clouds, slowly rising to the sky. It wasn't billowing as it would if a wooden building were engulfed in fire. Batu shouted and signaled for his cavalry to slow down. He needed time to observe further.

Before all of his riders could react to his command, lines of men appeared out of nowhere from the tall grass, brandishing long spears and charging at them. Crossbowmen were also present and bolts started to fly.

A rider in front shouted, "It's a trap!" Batu quickly added, "Avoid, do not engage!"

His riders began to fall. Batu saw how the hiding Nicopolans had used dry leaves, grass, and dirt to prevent the sun's reflection from their iron helmets and armor.

The nomads, in disarray, tried to fight back, leading to archery duels between the crossbowmen and the horseback archers.

The Nicopolans were ready with shields, while the nomads' horses—mostly without barding—were getting wounded left and right.

"Get them out, get them out!" Batu commanded his brethren. Some tribes were stubborn and hard to control; he and his tribes ended up galloping toward the separated groups to dissuade them from attacking further.

Bolts whizzed past Batu, narrowly missing him and his horse. Despite the imminent danger, he chose to be bold, racing against time as hundreds of enemies converged on their position.

He needed to pull his riders out; otherwise, everything would collapse.

 

***

 

Nicopolans Encampment

Sergio was hailed as a victor after the Nicopolans successfully trapped and crippled the enemy's cavalry. Although the skirmish failed to breach the enemy's defenses, the victory over the nomadic cavalry was seen as a significant breakthrough. Consequently, the threat of the enemy's horsemen was now greatly diminished.

They also recovered a dozen dead horses and butchered them for meat. Seizing the opportunity to galvanize support, Sergio distributed the roasted meat to everyone.

While meat from a dozen horses could hardly feed eight thousand people, and a large portion was cleverly allocated to Sergio's most loyal supporters, this act of generosity further emboldened his reputation.

The Tarracan Man's reputation now eclipsed even that of the Black Lord of Korelia. Even survivors of the Siege of Korelia began to support Sergio earnestly.

The Nicopolans ate heartily that day, sensing that victory was near. They believed the Lord of Korelia would soon pack up his belongings and leave the city for them to conquer at their leisure.

With the harvest at hand and a secure place for wintering, they had little to worry about this year.

For the first time in a while, many slept without worries in their dilapidated tents.

...

 

It was around the third watch, at midnight, when an eerie rumbling and hundreds of dots of light emanated from a distance. The Nicopolans awoke in a panic, scrambling to grab their weapons and don their armor in the dark. Slowly, they attempted to form lines around their camp as their superiors shouted commands.

As the Nicopolans scrambled to defend their encampment, the distant torchlight continued its rhythmic dance, growing larger and more menacing.

Sergio was finally awakened in his command tent and was angered by this unexpected development.

"Lights, hundreds of them," a scout reported immediately upon arriving, breathless from the east side.

Quickly donning his armor, Sergio headed out. Flanked by his men, he noticed the distant but approaching murmur of hooves against the earth.

"The nomadic riders again?" Sergio seriously doubted this could be the case. His trap had killed at least two dozen riders, which should have deterred them for good. It was well-known that the nomadic tribes lacked discipline and were even less committed to battle than mercenaries.

However, there was no denying the sound of hooves and the speed of the incoming riders.

"Cavalry!" shouted a captain, breathless and panicked as he spotted Sergio. "They've emerged from the darkness and are circling us—thousands of them!"

Sergio ignored the panicked captain and instructed his trusted lieutenant, "Wake the entire camp as orderly as you can." Then, turning to his other lieutenants who commanded the reserves, he added, "Don't get baited. Stay at the flanks. They'll want chaos, but let's give them a wall of pikes instead."

"Yes, Commander," they replied and dispersed to their separate commands.

Sergio looked up at the sky and found it was full of stars—a good night for a night attack. He climbed atop a carriage he used as a platform and looked beyond the perimeter of his encampment.

He saw hundreds of reddish-orange torches piercing through the fabric of the night. The radiant, fiery dots moved in one direction, slicing through the darkness as they danced. The sound, the sight, and the rumbling that could be felt were otherworldly.

Feeling nervous about the size of the enemy force, Sergio made sure that his crossbowmen and pike-wielding infantry were ready behind the armed refugees.

"Hold your ground, and we'll win this," he rallied his men.

And thus, despite the confusion and fearfulness from the great spectacle before them, the men grew confident. The Nicopolans stood in line and maintained a large, almost circular formation. In a contest of wills, they stared down the thousands of riders who seemed ready to bear their fangs at them at any moment.

...

 

Meanwhile, on the opposing side:

"Sir, the nomads have encircled the Nicopolans," reported the lieutenant in charge.

Sir Michael climbed up the mound and confirmed the situation with his own eye. "Get the long torches out!" he commanded, and his men immediately obeyed. They had been toiling since sundown, working in near darkness except for the light from crudely-made, one-sided lanterns with large covers.

This was the moment the thousand men—carpenters and militia alike—had been waiting for. With the nomads drawing the Nicopolans' attention, horse-drawn carts were now racing from the city gates to drop off their precious cargo. Time was running out; the nomads and their long torches would hold attention for only an hour, if not less.

With a steady stream of carts and the added illumination from the torches and lanterns, they worked quickly and diligently to finish the construction. Although it had only just begun to take shape, everyone present understood that they had reversed the flow of the entire conflict.

 

***

 

Chapter 88

Wood Serpent

 

Nicopolan Side

While many were awakened from their slumber in a state of panic, Servius awoke with a clear mind. Despite the pain from the broken skin on his back, he was a man on a mission this night. Thus, with conviction, he strode through the darkness, a hammer in one hand and a lantern shrouded in damp, coarse cloth in the other.

The words from Lord Lansius echoed in his mind: "On the third day, remember to give your reply if you agree to my plan."

"How should I do it?" he had asked, to which the Lord had answered, "Set aflame a small section of the camp, and I shall see it clearly."

Tonight, Servius had made his decision. It was a risky move, but he knew that living under Sergio's rule was equally dangerous. Moreover, Lord Lansius' plan hinged on Sergio's defeat. This meant that, aside from setting a fire tonight, Servius wasn't taking on a big risk. His role was simply to lead as many people as possible into the forest once Sergio was overthrown. If this failed to happen, he would refrain from any action.

Steeling his heart once more, Servius walked with firm footsteps toward a specific place amidst the sea of tents. Approaching from the blind side, he saw a guard standing not far from a tent, observing the thousands of riders circling their encampment.

He waited, observed, and found no one else in their vicinity. Setting down his lantern, he crouched toward the lone guard, who was entirely focused on the events outside the camp. The fiery spectacle and the thundering hooves were the last things on the guard's mind as Servius' hammer slammed into the back of his neck, breaking the spine.

The guard had no chance and fell dead. Servius wiped the blood on the dried grass and searched for the keys but found none. So, he entered the tent and faced the captured Lady.

Lady Daniella stared at him from inside the cage and said, "I don't recognize you."

"There's not enough time. I promised Lord Lansius to go along with his plan, and I intend to free you so he may be more compelled to honor his part of the deal," Servius explained.

Daniella rose up. "Do you have the key?"

"Sergio must've kept it himself. I searched the guard, but he didn't have them."

"Then how do you plan to--" Daniella began, but Servius produced a pair of chisels and a smaller artisan hammer.

"It was hard to get these," he said, offering the smaller tools to Daniella, who grabbed them eagerly.

"Let me know if someone appears behind me," Servius instructed as he hammered the chisel against the area around the lock.

"Leave that to me," Daniella replied, working from the opposite side.

They attacked the sturdy wooden frame, chipping away little by little. Wood chips flew in every direction; some even got into their eyes, but they persisted.

After a while, the frame began to crack, and they redoubled their efforts. Even the cage designed to hold a beastman couldn't withstand two desperate humans with iron chisels and hammers.

The lock frame finally gave way, proving weaker than the reinforced frame on the opposite end that secured the heavy wrought iron bolt.

Servius stepped aside as Daniella pushed the cage door open. It crashed to the ground with a satisfying thud. Without hesitation, Daniella rushed outside, pulling Servius along as they made their way to the darker, more concealed side behind the tent.

"Gratitude for getting me out," said Daniella weakly. "What's next?"

"It's best if we split up here," Servius replied, drenched in sweat.

"Understood. May I learn your name?" she asked.

"No, lest you get captured and tortured."

"Then we part here," said Daniella, preparing to leave.

"Be safe." Servius pointing in one direction. "The castle is over there, but the camp's weakest link is on the opposite side. Move quietly without a lantern, and they shouldn't notice you. Jump off the carts they used for barricades and crawl through the grass. With the nomads out there, I doubt they'll chase you, but beware of crossbowmen."

Daniella nodded. "Till we meet again," she said, disappearing into the night after looting the dead guard's hooded mantle and sword.

Satisfied that nobody had seen him, Servius returned to his hidden lantern. Seeing the small tallow candle still burning brightly, he began to set the remainder of his plan into motion.

 

***

 

Sergio

The unnerving scene of thousands of cavalry with torches circling and randomly attacking with arrows continued to unfold in the Nicopolan encampment. The attacking nomads brought no torches, surprising the Nicopolans with arrows from the dark.

This sneaky attack forced Sergio to instruct his men to be on guard at all times. Just when things seemed manageable, cries of fire erupted from the inner part of the encampment.

"Fire, fire!" his men screamed to warn the rest. Many panicked, thinking the nomads had made a breakthrough.

"Stay where you are!" Sergio shouted back. From atop a cart, he could see that only some tents were alight, not his precious supplies in the middle section of the camp, which was guarded by a separate command.

Returning to his men and lieutenants, he commanded, "Let them burn a few tents; I can replace them and make them better! Hold your ground. They want us to scatter. Let's not give them that satisfaction!"

His lieutenants ran to every section, relaying Sergio's orders. They were to keep their ground and let the non-combatants handle the firefighting.

The Nicopolans held on despite the fire and the incessant attacks from the nomads. After an hour, the nomads' torches began to fade, and with them, their aggressive maneuvers. The tribal horsemen started to stray further and further away from the encampment. For a while, many Nicopolans feared a more severe attack was imminent. However, after several final volleys of arrows emerged from the darkness, all went quiet.

Only then did Sergio rush a portion of his men to douse the fire. Another half-hour passed, and it became clear they had survived the night. The Nicopolans rejoiced as they were certain that the thousand nomads had disengaged.

Sergio remained cautious, but his men were convinced they had won this battle of wits. They thought not even the Black Lord of Korelia was invincible. Many believed their defenses were so strong that the nomads couldn't find a weakness to exploit.

Praise for Sergio's command echoed among the men. They began to mock the Black Lord as a mere upstart with black hair, considering him inferior to Sergio.

However, as the golden sun broke the darkness after dawn, the Nicopolans, with dreary and reddened eyes, began to realize they had been outplayed.



Stolen novel; please report.

 

***

 

Battle of Korimor

It was easier to defend than to attack a fortified position—a fact well understood by both Lansius and Sergio. Initially, both sides had chosen to wait.

The difference was that Sergio could afford to wait indefinitely. He had access to water and nearly ripe farmland within his reach. The only factor that nudged him to engage in a minor skirmish was to bait Lansius into a decisive battle that would favor the Nicopolans.

Knowing this, Lansius did the unthinkable. Like Julius Caesar in the Siege of Alesia, he understood that results were everything. Thus, he took an unconventional approach, believing that adhering to conventional strategy would only squander opportunities for victory.

Armed with this mindset, and recognizing that the harvest, not the enemy's encampment, was the most crucial aspect of the campaign, Lansius decided to seize it.

Consistent with the strategy from the Art of War—when opponents are at ease, tire them; when resting, incite them to move—Lansius refrained from attacking Sergio's well-fortified camp. Instead, he brought a wall to their objective, forcing the Nicopolans to take action.

The long wooden wall, stretching from the castle to the river, protected a significant swath of Korimor’s farmland from the Nicopolans. Just like the famed Sunomata Castle from Lansius' world, his wall was also built overnight using pre-constructed sections.

As soon as the construction began to take its shape, it presented a dilemma to the Nicopolans: attacking the wall meant incurring heavy casualties, but failing to do so would allow its completion, permanently denying them access to the farmland and its harvest.

Upon learning about the wall, Sergio was initially in disbelief, convinced it was merely an illusion. The idea that such an extensive wall, stretching from the city to the river, could be completed overnight was hard to fathom. It was simply an impossible feat of construction.

However, he quickly grasped the urgency of the situation. He divided his troops into three groups: the largest, comprising five thousand men, would assault the incomplete wall; a detachment of one thousand would protect the main army's flank; the remaining troops would guard their camp against potential raids.

He also formed a sappers group to start digging near the river, where the ground was softer, in case a siege was needed. Sergio even considered relocating his camp next to the river to minimize the risk of raids from multiple directions.

Understanding the stakes, Sergio allowed his men full rations for breakfast. Within an hour, the Nicopolans marched out, shields, spears, and crossbows at the ready, confident that their five-thousand-strong force could breach the hastily constructed and incomplete wooden wall.

 

***

 

Lansius

The Lord had been present at the construction site since dawn. He knew his presence would boost morale and prevent a mass rout should the half-finished wall come under attack.

As the morning sun rose higher, both sides reached a critical juncture. Soon, they would learn if a thousand hastily trained militia, led by three hundred veterans, could withstand an assault by several thousand men.

At the moment, they were stockpiling spare spears and swords. They expected the battle to be hard. Unusually for Lansius, he had no crossbow superiority. Korimor had little stockpile of crossbows or bolts. While Hugo and later Lansius had brought a fair amount, they had expended much of it in previous skirmishes.

Hugo and Michael had tried to push for more production, but it ran slower than expected due to a myriad of problems.

From atop the newly erected wooden tower, Lansius kept an eye out for signals from his scouts. Noting some activity, he acted on his instinct. Turning to Sir Harold, he commanded, "Stop the militia from their work. Let them some respite, and bring in fresher men."

Harold nodded and relayed the order.

A man clearly couldn't fight after working all night, so Lansius had ordered them to work in shifts.

Now, the only ones still laboring were the seasoned carpenters who had pledged an oath to continue working until the site was overrun. Meanwhile, the rest of the carpenters were busy constructing another wall structure at a natural choke point to their rear.

While Lansius continued to observe the enemy camp, Hugo arrived with his men. He climbed the tower and greeted Lansius, "My Lord."

"Hugo, I hope you and your men slept well, because today, I really need you all to put up a good fight."

Hugo nodded and took a moment to gaze around the site. Though the tower was only two stories high, it provided a good vantage point over the surrounding area, which had been farmland until the previous night.

From their vantage point, it was evident that the wooden walls were not made of thick, sturdy logs typical of a proper palisade. Instead, they were assembled from timber, wooden planks, and various materials sourced from the town. These components were affixed to frames mounted on carts, forming a uniform, wall-like structure on one side.

Korimor's ample supply of carts made this strategy feasible. However, the extensive area to be covered meant there weren't enough carts to create a continuous line. Consequently, they were strategically spaced at even intervals.

Each cart was buried until half its wheels were deep in the ground, providing anchor points and foundations for these makeshift walls.

"What do you think—will the center wall withstand an assault?" Lansius asked.

"The training indicates it will," Hugo replied with conviction.

As they were discussing, another man climbed the tower. "Pardon my intrusion, My Lord."

"Sir Michael. Do you bring reports for us?" Lansius asked with anticipation.

"Yes, the preparations are complete," said the knight with an eye patch.

"Including the gravediggers' work?"

"Indeed, My Lord. They managed to do it."

Lansius sighed in relief as Hugo and Michael exchanged a firm hand clasp. The two had grown into close comrades.

"As planned, then," Lord Lansius said with newfound strength. "Hugo will lead the defense at the center. I will hold the reserves. Meanwhile, our left and right flanks will be led by the Baroness and Sir Harold."

Turning specifically to Hugo, he added, "I don't need to instruct you, but rally your men. Let them know that everyone must fight, or Korimor won't stand a chance."

Hugo bowed his head slightly. "I shall relay your message and push them hard, My Lord."

Having finished giving his orders, Lansius and Michael descended from the tower, leaving Hugo and his staff to use it for coordinating their troops.

Below, Lansius met up with his staff, as well as Lady Audrey and Sir Harold. He then instructed them, "Whatever happens in the center, stay true to your role. Do not, I repeat, do not worry about us in the center."

His firm voice struck a chord, their faces turning solemn.

"My Lord, I shall take my leave," replied Sir Harold, preparing to leave.

"Good hunting," said Lansius.

"Victory will be ours," said the tall knight confidently, and then he headed toward the right side near the river.

Lansius didn't need to rally his top retinues. Even before they had set out from Korelia, he had promised them a piece of farmland in Korimor as a prize for this campaign.

Audrey, already in her armor, looked at Lansius dearly.

"I know, I'll be safe. Sir Michael, Sigmund, and the squires will be with me," Lansius reassured her.

"Sometimes I feel like I don't need to speak with you anymore."

Lansius broke into a smile. "Please don't, I love to hear your voice."

Audrey couldn't resist smiling. She took a step closer and whispered, "Don't exhaust yourself. Remember, this is not a fight worth dying for. We still have Korelia."

Lansius nodded. "I shall take that advice to heart."

Audrey took a deep breath. "I'll take command on the left side then. See you after this is over."

As they parted ways, Lansius and his remaining staff headed toward a tent in the middle of a farm. They were careful not to destroy the tall yellowing crops, walking on a pathway.

"My Lord, a question if you will," said Michael.

"What is it, Sir Michael?"

"Why don't you use ditches for this battle?"

Lansius could understand the origin of the knight's curiosity. "Digging deep ditches requires a lot of work and time. I doubt the Nicopolans would let us finish. But more importantly, there's the river," Lansius explained. "I fear they could easily dig a canal, connect it, and flood our trenches."

Trumpets rang out, cutting their conversation short.

"The enemy has made their move," Michael observed.

Lansius let out a bitter sigh. He had hoped that Sergio and his Nicopolans would hesitate for several hours, if not half a day. Unfortunately, his opponent was far more competent than he would have liked.

Too competent for their own good...

Lansius turned to the men who were following him. He scanned the faces of the squires and men-at-arms until he found the one he was looking for. "Sigmund," he called.

The skald stepped forward. "Is it time, My Lord?"

 

***

 

Nicopolan Side

The six thousand Nicopolans marched toward the newly erected wall and stopped just short of the farmland. To advance further would mean destroying the crops they had waited so long to harvest.

For people who had endured years of famine, the thought of trampling a field ready for harvest was unthinkable. Many began to question whether this was the right course of action.

Before their leader could urge them on, several riders emerged from the wooden wall direction, bearing a flag of truce.

The lead rider, clad in polished armor, shouted in a clear voice, "Hail, O people of Nicopola! I bring words from the Lord of Korelia and the Lady of Korimor. All the farmland on this side of the wooden walls is yours to harvest. It should be sufficient to sustain you on your journey back to your home province."

The Nicopolans looked among themselves. Deep down, many wanted to believe it, but after the flogging and last night's attack, they doubted the Lord of Korelia's sincerity.

Sergio observed his men with contentment; he was sure that speeches like this wouldn't sway them. He had done his preparation to steel their conviction.

The rider rode closer, his shield held tightly to his body. "Do not waste this offer. Stand down and let us settle this amicably. Otherwise, there will be bloodshed you cannot win. The Lord of Korelia has never been defeated in battle."

"Remove him from my sight," Sergio ordered after noticing the subtle whispers, shaking heads, and confused looks among his ranks.

The rider persisted, "If you choose to attack, you'll be trampling your own share of the harvest. We won't be responsible for your hunger and death. I suggest you think this through. Do you want to cast your families into certain death just for your leader's glorious ambitions?"

However, this time, at Sergio's command, a group of crossbowmen rushed to the front, ready to fire.

"Nicopolans, is this your answer?" The rider bravely stared at them, still waiting for a response, but eventually gave up. He concluded with a cold threat, "So be it. You have made your choice. Your deaths are no longer our concern." He and his escort then retreated toward their wooden walls.

With that, the Battle of Korimor had begun.

 

***

 

Chapter 89

The Gravediggers' Tribute

 

Nicopolan Side

The five thousand Nicopolans marched across the farmland, trampling crops that were almost ready for harvest. Then they slowly approached the wooden wall, shields at the ready.

As anticipated, crossbowmen from both sides opened the battle by exchanging volleys. However, the Nicopolans found themselves at a disadvantage, shielded only by their own shields as opposed to the sturdy wall protecting their opponents.

After some time, many Nicopolans pleaded with their commanders to give the order to attack. Sensing that the moment was right, Sergio issued the command to attack.

Almost immediately, Nicopolan forces attacked along the entire length of the wall. Scouts had informed them that the wall was not particularly tall, eliminating the need for ladders. Instead, they brought stacks of wood or crates to serve as makeshift climbing aids.

Although they resembled a disorganized swarm of ants, Sergio had strategically positioned his strongest contingent on his left side, near the river, targeting what he believed to be the enemy's weakest point.

He ensured that, from above, the distribution of his troops would appear similar in number, effectively masking the significant differences in their fighting prowess. As an added diversion, Sergio concentrated a large number of his less-skilled troops to launch an assault on the center

What they lacked in skill, they made up for in numbers, hoping to overwhelm the enemy.

Now, Sergio waited patiently with his reserves, his eyes level as he searched for any weakness in Lansius' defense. He considered three potential outcomes:

First, the walls nearest to the river could give way under the assault of his elite troops.

Second, the center line might buckle under the sporadic but intense attacks from thousands of men.

Third, the one thousand men he had left behind might successfully trap another flanking attack from the nomads.

When any of these events occurred, Sergio planned to unleash his reserves to decisively win the battle.

 

***

 

Hugo

The Deputy and his men fought hard along the center wall. Clad in full plate armor, he struck out at anyone who dared to climb the wall. His footing was sure and firm, as the cart provided him a solid platform to move about. Spears or swords struck his head and shoulders several times, but this only angered him further.

Another wave of attackers approached, and Hugo rallied his men. "People of Korimor, this is your harvest! Your livelihood, the food for your families this winter—are you going to hand it over to them?"

Cries and shouts rose from the men around him.

"Stay with me! This is EZY!" Hugo ended with a forced laugh, mimicking a certain friend who used to boast like this in fights. "More harvest thieves are coming; let them know what Lowlandians do to thieves!"

With only five hundred men under his command, Hugo withstood the first wave of onslaught. He knew he just needed to wait and persevere.

...

 

Lansius

The Lord was dispatching group after group to reinforce a portion of the wall that was in dire need of support. His reserves consisted of men still resting from their previous shift, but he had no other choice. With the Nicopolans deploying their vast numbers, sections of the wall were overrun.

Before long, Lansius had exhausted his reserves, and he personally joined the fray to bolster their defenses

The Lord arrived at the overrun section with Sir Michael, Sigmund, Roger, and several other men. He watched as his men evacuated the wounded, leaving the dead and the Nicopolans on the walls. The fighting still continued on the Nicopolan's left and right, but they had enough support to assist as many men in climbing over the wall as possible.

Having a clear line of sight, Lansius stood still, took aim, and pressed the lever on his crossbow. A bolt flew angrily through the air, striking an unsuspecting man in the back. The look of disbelief and horror in his eyes was plain to see as he turned and ran away while clutching his wound.

Lord Lansius' attack made Sir Michael charge forward with a spear. He speared and took down the swordsman who had challenged him. Sigmund, at his side, lunged and swiftly dispatched another who had hesitated, with two strikes from his sword.

The fresh commotion, coupled with Lansius' personal banner being waved by one of his men, quickly drew attention. In no time, dozens of warriors from both sides converged on their position.

"I'll be fine, take them down," Lansius commanded the men around him, who sprang into action.

Lansius lowered his visor and readily engaged as his side was outnumbered. He squared off with a man whose eye sockets were sunken from hunger. Instinctively, he countered the man's reckless swing, feeling a brief resistance. Lansius executed a deft parry, stepped forward, and drove his sword into the man's chest.

The man's wet and dirty gambeson soon turned an ochre color. He writhed in pain, but Lansius knew better than to let his opponent die an agonizing death. Gritting his teeth, he swung his left gauntlet into the side of the man's head, ending the pain in an instant.

He felt no regret, only the pain of necessity as he killed. In one swift motion, Lansius pulled out his bloodied sword, took one deep breath, and walked to the next assailant, poised to flank Sir Michael's blind side.

Using both hands, Lansius gripped his sword like a polearm and charged. The man's eyes widened in realization, but it was already too late. Despite the man's futile attempt to block with his arm, Lansius' thrust found its mark, sliding into the man's chest near the armpit.

The man groaned as the sharp point of the blade punctured his body. Within a few breaths, he began choking on his blood. Sir Michael came from the side and struck the man's head with both hands using the pommel of his sword, granting him a quick death.

"My Lord—"

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. Please report it.

"Focus on the fight!" yelled Lansius to reassure him.

In front of them, Roger fought as if he were dancing, parrying, and countering with smooth, non-wasteful movements against multiple opponents. His armor, a plunder from the previous war, was bathed in red as he felled another man with a slash to the face. The man fell in complete agony, losing his nose and the soft tissues around it.

The squire wanted to deliver a coup de grâce, but more men were approaching him with spears and bardiches. Roger fell back, while Sir Michael and Sigmund readied their stances to protect their Lord. Fortunately, the Korimors returned to the fight, invigorated by the sight of their Lord in combat.

They soon clashed and regained the upper hand. Hugo must have noticed them, as crossbow bolts began raining down on the section in front of the wall. Soon, the Nicopolans who had climbed were all but slain to the last man.

It was unfortunate that in such an uneven battle, they couldn't afford to take hostages.

"My Lord," called Sir Michael, excitement in his voice. "Their gambesons are soaking wet. Our plan is working!"

Lifting his visor, Lansius noticed the wet mud stains all over the slain men's clothing and boots. "So, the gravediggers have done it," he remarked gratefully. Humble as they were, the hundred strong gravediggers had proven their craft and worth.

Sir Michael proceeded to rally the Korimors around them, while Lansius retreated to the rear.

On the way, he flicked his sword to shed the excess blood. His heart felt numb, but his mind was briefly filled with silent prayers for the fallen. Memories from the Battle of Korelia and of Sir Callahan surfaced in his mind. There was no guilt, only the heavy weight of responsibility for the men under his command.

Lansius knew he wasn’t fighting for himself. He was fighting for the people of Korimor, Korelia, and the entirety of Lowlandia. Only by securing victory here could Lansius move forward with his Grand Alliance, to usher in peace and stability throughout Lowlandia.

It was a future they had fought so hard for — a future where all Lowlandians, including him and Audrey, could live in peace.

 

***

 



 

Nicopolans Side

The Nicopolan left wing launched their assault on the far side near the river. Comprised of select groups of mercenaries, they fought hard to scale the walls, using logs and crates to aid them. However, the muddy ground proved more difficult than they had anticipated.

Contrary to Sergio's prediction that this would be the weakest point, they found it staunchly defended by knights in full plate armor, a healthy number of men-at-arms, and plenty of levied troops.

The rain of crossbow bolts was also fierce, pinning them down whenever it was unleashed. They fought in waves, attempting to breach multiple defense points simultaneously, but the muddy terrain hindered their progress and made everything slippery.

Still, they proved their worth by rallying on their Captain and redoubling their efforts. Like torrential rains, the best of Nicopolan mercenaries stormed the walls chipping the defenses little by little.

...

 

Sergio noticed his assault was beginning to bear fruit. Several sections of the wall were overrun, and things were going better than he had expected. He almost committed his reserves to attack when progress suddenly slowed.

Initially, he hardly noticed, but then the advance ground to a halt. Gone were the energetic attempts to scale the wall. In their place were men, exhausted and caked in dirt and mud, failing to climb after encountering strong resistance at the top.

"Get the scouts! Why haven't I been briefed?" Sergio yelled to his staff.

Pulled by one of the staff, the scouts hastily reported, "Some of the farms appear to be muddy. We suspect it's leakage from the river since the farms haven't been maintained."

Growing suspicious, Sergio decided to head to the front lines. As he drew closer, the air was thick with tension. Cries of command, words of encouragement, and the screams of men fighting with all their might filled the air.

His bodyguard helped him wade through the thousands of men waiting for their turn to climb. Suddenly, Sergio felt the ground soften beneath his feet. He stopped in his tracks, and his men quickly raised their shields around him.

Kneeling, he scooped up a handful of mud and realized it wasn't normal. He glanced at the yellowing crops around him; they showed no signs of long-term water submersion, which would have caused them to wither.

Squeezing the mud, Sergio realized it wasn't totally soaked, meaning it was recent.

"No..." he muttered under his breath, recognizing that his adversaries had likely altered the irrigation canals the night before. When the Nicopolans refused to back down, the enemy must have breached the canals connected to the river.

With the help of the existing irrigation system and the river's powerful current, the field on the Nicopolan side was effectively flooded.

Sergio saw his men struggling to trudge through the clayey mud, slipping and being hindered by it clinging to their limbs and armor. Worse, once they slipped and fell, their gambesons made of linen would absorb a lot of water and weigh them down considerably further taxing their strength and stamina.

Frustration boiling over, Sergio wanted to scream, but he held back, aware his lieutenants were watching. Pushing aside his shaken emotions, he motioned for his lieutenants to approach.

He saw their young, eager faces and commanded, "Commit more groups! We can't let the attack falter. Send them in, send all we got!"

His young, brave Nicopolan lieutenants puffed out their chests and saluted, ready to obey. Meanwhile, Sergio's hands trembled. A pang of guilt and regret pierced Sergio as he sent them into the fray, but he knew he had no other option. If he didn't secure victory today, another opportunity might never come, and rallying this mass of people again would be near impossible.

Under the command of the young lieutenants, the assault boldly resumed.

Ingenuity suddenly struck the Nicopolans: some began cutting the abundant crop stalks around them and throwing them into the mud to create better footing. The dried stalks absorbed water, and their coarse fibers acted like a fine, woven organic net. Seeing this, more troops followed suit, and the lieutenants ordered everyone to do the same.

"What are they doing?" Sergio asked in awe as the assault regained momentum and fighting erupted again along the wall.

Knowing this was the moment he had been waiting for, Sergio ran toward the rear of the formation to reach his reserves.

"Sergio, have you found the enemy's weakness?" his captain inquired.

"Soon," Sergio promised. "Now, ready your men. We either ride the wind of victory or die trying."

His captain, an old comrade who was fiercely loyal, grinned. Facing his men, he shouted "Men, ready to march! On my order!"

The horn-blower played an excited tone repeated twice. Soon, another thousand battle-hardened Nicopolans marched toward the battlefield, trying to keep the scales in their favor.

 

***

 

Lansius

Last night, a group of gravediggers and farmers was sent to alter the irrigation on the farmland opposite the walls that were being constructed. The job normally required many men and several days of work, but the gravediggers, with their sharpened tools, managed to complete it in just one night.

The plan worked superbly. After the initial two attack waves, the mud began to form in earnest, and the subsequent wave struggled due to the slippery, clay-like mud. As the Nicopolans slipped and fell, the layers of linen in their gambeson or padded jacket greedily took on water and doubled in weight, making it especially exhausting just to move around in it.

"Just like Agincourt," Lansius muttered as he observed from a recently secured section of the wall. The quagmire that had formed on the Nicopolan side was clear for everyone to see.

The only difference is this ground wasn't freshly ploughed.

By flooding the area, he had not only stalled the enemy's attack but also trapped Sergio into either fully committing or retreating with significant loss.

"My Lord, the runners from every section report that they withstood the attack," Sigmund reported.

Sir Michael chuckled, satisfied with how the battle had progressed.

"I hope our enemy will fall back. There's still remaining farmland for them to harvest," Lansius said to his staff.

"I believed that's the wish of many, My Lord," said Sir Michael.

Lansius was about to leave the wall to tour its length when Roger called out, "My Lord, the Nicopolans. They're doing something... They're fixing the mud."

Fixing the mud...?

Lansius was stunned. "Is that even possible?" he asked, then looked to where Roger was pointing his hand.

After a brief observation, Lansius drew a heavy breath and shook his head. Many Korimors interpreted this as a bad omen, and their faces were immediately painted with concern and worry.

Noticing them, Lansius spoke, "Men, don't be so disheartened. In war, nothing ever goes as planned. There are always variations, which is why we make plans in the first place." He then added, "Even this is within my expectations!"

His words emboldened his men, especially the Korimor people, who looked at him with reverence. "My Lord, please lead us to victory!"

"My Lord, please save Korimor City!" The soldiers' voices cracked with desperation, each man thinking of home and family.

Taking a rare moment, Lansius gestured for them to quiet down. He removed his helmet, looked at them with his deep brown eyes, and declared, "If you swear an oath of loyalty to my House, I promise you a victory that neither you nor your grandchildren will ever forget."

 

***

 

Chapter 90

The Reddened Reap

 

The battle had raged for an hour when the Nicopolan vanguard finally breached the Korimor wall defense. In an attack that exceeded expectations, the young Nicopolans demonstrated a fierceness and tenacity shaped by surviving numerous life-and-death conflicts that arose from recent famines. While the Korimor men displayed their stubbornness, hardened from countless wars in strife-ridden Lowlandia, they were outnumbered.

Lord Lansius' wooden walls, built atop half-buried carts, served as a formidable equalizer. His strategy of using irrigation channels to flood the area in front of the wall was a masterstroke, however, it wasn't enough.

Now, the three wooden platforms that the Korimor side had used as crossbowmen platforms were being captured. They failed to contain multiple breaches in their defense, and soon more than a third of the center wall section was overrun.

Watching this intensely, the Lord of Korelia finally gave the order. "Blow the horn."

Deep, resonating trumpet blasts filled the air, echoing repeatedly. Horn blowers atop the city walls amplified the command, ensuring all nearby heard the directive.

In the thick of battle, Hugo recognized the dreaded signal: a call to retreat.

His lieutenant and fellow men-at-arms' faces obscured by visors, glanced his way, filled with question and anticipation. Lifting his visor, Hugo shouted, "Halt, halt!"

The troops instinctively tightened their formation, brandishing their weapons defensively.

"Remember your training!" Hugo commanded. Methodically, they began to step back, pulling in any stragglers to form a solid spear line.

To the Nicopolans, it looked as if they were observing a hedgehog rolling into a protective ball. Impressed by the Lowlandians' discipline, they opted not to fight and instead took the chance to catch their breath. With the immediate threat gone, they fully realized their exhaustion; their limbs felt heavy, burdened by the weight of their soaked clothes and gambesons.

Some turned to scavenge from fallen comrades and enemies for knives, helmets, dry boots, or waterskins, while many others tended to their wounded if only to be present in their dying moments.

The rising sun intensified their thirst. Many considered drinking from the muddy puddles, regretting leaving their waterskins behind during the ascent.

However, the lull was short-lived. Once the young Nicopolan lieutenants caught their breath, they started to give commands to form a line.

Enforcers armed with wooden clubs began making their rounds to ensure compliance. The thousands who had scaled the wall and were not tasked with dismantling it slowly formed into a line formation.

Once the Nicopolans assumed their line formation, their vast numerical advantage over the defenders became evident.

For the Korimor side, despite their impressively orderly retreat, the situation looked dire. They had lost their makeshift wooden walls, their most significant defensive asset in today's battle.

On the other hand, for the hundreds of mercenaries who had survived the siege of Korelia, this initial victory felt like they had broken their curse. It seemed that the reputation of the once-feared Black Lord was finally waning.

 

***

 

Lansius

The Korimor side hastily abandoned the wall and retreated a hundred paces back. The morale took a plummet, but he was grateful that there was no rout. The Korimor people under him had proved to be courageous. Despite all the threats and the major loss, they followed Lansius' command.

Lansius saw Hugo approaching and gestured for his men to make way. Everybody in the center was converging on his banner.

"My Lord," Hugo greeted him with an open helmet. He was drenched in sweat, and his armor had new dents and was stained in various places.

"How's things on your end?" Lansius asked.

"I apologize that the center line failed." His voice held bitter regret.

"Nonsense! You and your men fought courageously. Lift your chin, I expect nothing less than a proud face. Now, tell me about your men, did you manage to disengage safely?"

With renewed confidence, Hugo reported, "We managed to form a wall of spears. No desertion."

"Excellent..." praised Lansius without sounding excited.

"How about on the other sector?" It was Hugo's turn to ask.

Lansius gazed at his captain, Sigmund, who reported to Hugo, "The left and right wings are holding. They're outnumbered but able to form a defense independent from our center."

Hugo could only nod and silently praised the other two commanders. He then gazed at his Lord. "My Lord, I understand that you have prepared for this eventuality."

Everyone could see the bundles of cloth and ropes scattered about, previously used to pack shields and spears. Drinking water and temporary medical aid were also present.

"But is this truly sufficient? Shouldn't we consider evacuating?" Hugo murmured, fearing that the left and right wings could become ensnared.

"I've called upon Batu and his riders," Lord Lansius replied, alluding to a contingency plan they'd discussed.

Hugo's worry deepened. A mere hundred cavalry wouldn't be able to mount an effective counter inside farmland, and he doubted Lansius would sacrifice his crops. Before he could voice his thoughts, yells from the opposite side indicated that the opponent had made their move.

 

***

 

Korimor born, Walter

With fifty years under his belt, thirty of which were spent in multiple battles, Walter and the other townsfolk believed they had seen it all. But watching the Lord lead a battle and personally fight alongside common men was nothing short of spectacular.

The Lord had dispatched his knights and men-at-arms to reinforce other sections of the walls, leaving himself without a regiment of knights for protection. Beside him stood just a lone knight, two squires, a bannerman, and several fighters.

Yet, this did not convey vulnerability. Instead, it fostered a deep sense of camaraderie and inspired all who saw. Here was a Lord willing to shoulder the same risks as the commoners fighting beside him, a leader who stood his ground even when the odds turned against him.

Lord Lansius demonstrated his mettle by plunging into the heat of the battle, leading his small group against the Nicopolan Vanguard at various points along the walls. Naturally, wherever his banner went, the Korimor men flocked to it, rallying around their leader.

Like the other people of Korimor, Walter had never expected outsiders to bleed for them. They were accustomed to being treated as mere commodities by conquerors, to be used and discarded at a whim. Thus, witnessing Lord Lansius and his entire retinue—including the Baroness—take an active role in the city's defense was nothing short of a revelation.

Stolen story; please report.

Many had expected the new Lord to loot the treasury and flee. Instead, over the past few days, they had worked tirelessly to establish a solid defense. This image was further reinforced by tales of how the Lord had ridden to the point of illness to come to the city's defense.

When most of Korimor had resigned themselves to the overwhelming Nicopolan forces, it was the Lord's conviction in victory that reignited the people's will to fight.

What the Lord had done during his brief time was unmatched in the war-torn region known as Lowlandia. For centuries, it had seen only wars, occupations, and rebellions, orchestrated and fought by countless usurpers and power-hungry tyrants. There had never been a true champion of the people.

Walter and the Korimor people realized that although their Lord, Lady, and knights had much to gain from holding Korimor, there were simpler methods to benefit from the city without facing the vast Nicopolan army. One such strategy would be to burn the harvest, thereby denying the Nicopolans its yield.

Such a choice would starve the people of Korimor in hopes of driving the Nicopolans away — a tactic other lords would employ without hesitation. Thus, witnessing Lord Lansius' efforts to preserve the harvest endeared him to the people.

This was why, even in the darkest hour, Walter and his comrades refused to flee. They were determined to stand by their champion until the bitter end.

When the Nicopolans finally resumed their attack, the Korimor men held firm. Brandishing their spears and shields, they roared their battle cries and fought fiercely for their families, livelihoods, and a Lord worthy of their loyalty.

From the elderly to young warriors, they traded thrusts and lunges of their spears against the more numerous Nicopolans. But passion alone couldn't substitute for numbers in battle, and casualties began to mount.

"Arghh!" Walter cried as a spear slipped through. The steel-tipped spear penetrated his gambeson. At first, it wasn't too deep, but as he staggered and tried to wrestle the spear out, his opponent thrust it deeper. The final push ruptured blood vessels, causing Walter to bleed profusely.

The opponent withdrew the spear, and Walter dropped to a knee. Locked in combat, his comrades to his left and right were unable to assist him. Strength drained from him as he gasped and clutched the searing, stinging wound.

Amidst the yelling, screaming, and clash of swords and spears, Walter's thoughts drifted to his family. Trapped between two forces who brandished barrages of spears above him, Walter saw no hope. He felt his time drawing near.

Amid the pain, a smile formed on Walter's lips, still defiantly wishing for Korimor to emerge victorious.

Suddenly, he sensed a change in the air. Even in his weakened state, Walter noticed a distinct shift in the Nicopolans. Their formation began to crumble, their spear thrusts lacked weight and ferocity, and their shouts became sporadic and confused.

The tide was turning.

With a laugh and a deep breath, Walter mustered what strength remained. He reclaimed his spear, discarded his shield, and gripped the weapon with both hands. He found strength in his legs and with a great roar, lunged at the enemy one final time.

 

***

 

The Nicopolan Vanguard

The young Nicopolan lieutenant watched in shock as his friend collapsed in front of him, his thigh pierced by a low thrust. Like him, his friend was just months away from turning twenty. But now, he would be forever nineteen as his face turned pale from blood loss.

Meanwhile, the perpetrator died with a satisfied expression.

What kind of monster is able to inspire a man to this degree?

But the lieutenant had little time for contemplation as another volley of ranged attacks rained down on their position. He shielded himself, fortunate to be spared, but another beside him fell, an arrow protruding from his shoulder.

Recognizing the long slender shaft, he realized it wasn't a bolt. "Arrows! It's the nomadic bowmen!" he shouted, trying to warn his men.

Many hadn't carried their shields or had lost them, leaving them vulnerable to ranged attacks. And unlike crossbowmen who reloaded slowly, bowmen could release a rapid succession of arrows.

Panic spread among his ranks. "They have nomadic archers!" one cried, echoing the sentiments of others as they began to see whether they were allowed to retreat.

"Lieutenant, the men can't withstand this anymore!" his enforcer shouted, after enduring a relentless volley of arrows.

Before the lieutenant could respond, he felt a sharp impact on his mouth, knocking him backward. Blood poured from his mouth, his front teeth were missing, and an arrow was lodged deep in his throat. He could only gurgle in pain, his body writhing in agony, much to his men's horror.

His closest men and the enforcer tried to assist, but a rout had begun. And they were in no condition to care for anyone but themselves.

The two friends were left lying side by side, neither having reached the age of twenty under the sun.

As the Korimor side began their counter-push, the Nicopolan vanguard hastily retreated to the wall while scavenging for shields or even helmets as protection.

 

***

 

Lansius

While the first part of his strategy failed to deter the opponent, the second phase successfully divided the Nicopolans. Using the wall as if it were a river, Lansius lured a segment of the Nicopolans across, only to mete out heavy punishment once they had ventured far enough into his chosen locale.

Lansius was positioning the enemy in the perfect killing zone. Separated from the main force, the Nicopolan vanguard, though numerous and aggressive, ultimately lacked support from their main army.

The Korimor men, with their phalanx-like formation, successfully kept the Nicopolans' advance in check while the newly arrived archers began their volleys with recurve bows.

Lansius had transformed the Nicopolans' numerical superiority into a weakness to be exploited by his archers. Here, the opponents had nowhere to run, and their retreat was blocked by walls.

While Batu had just over a hundred horse archers remaining, nearly all his tribesmen were proficient with bows. As a result, he could field two hundred archers on foot. Their sure footing made them even more accurate and deadly.

Facing such a densely packed enemy formation, even the younger, less skilled archers found it easy to land damaging shots. Batu personally positioned himself among the Korimor formation, targeting and eliminating the opposing group leaders and commanders, instilling fear in the heart of the Nicopolan vanguard.

Eventually, the Nicopolan vanguard reached their breaking point. Their formation shattered, and they sprinted towards the wall.

The wall, which they had fervently attacked, again became their obstacle to escape. In their panicked frenzy, they scrambled to climb over it. With the chain of command crumbled, many were either too exhausted to fight or paralyzed by fear of the nomadic archers.



 

Lord Lansius ordered his troops to pursue. While he didn't relish the slaughter, he had no other way to secure victory. Without hesitation, he commanded his men to inflict maximum damage upon the enemy.

The fighting reignited near the wall, with Nicopolans perishing in large numbers to the relentless archery volleys they couldn't counteract.

In addition to Batu and his nomadic archers, Lansius accepted reinforcements from the city. Youths capable of wielding arms rushed to assist, having observed the battle from the city walls. To them, the fighters weren't faceless grunts, but kin—fathers, brothers, cousins, nephews, and uncles.

Lansius directed these newcomers to retrieve as many arrows and bolts as possible. He readied his crossbow once again, helping to maintain pressure on the beleaguered Nicopolans as they desperately tried to escape.

The multiple screams and deaths from ranged attacks killed the Nicopolan vanguard's morale. Meanwhile, the Korimor regained their momentum.

The Nicopolans managed to form a shield wall, but they were quickly challenged by Hugo and his veteran men-at-arms. Batu downed another foe with his archery, while Lansius bolt struck into an unfortunate man's gut.

Still, the Nicopolans were a hardy people. Some of the fresher soldiers, having just scaled the wall and yet to engage in combat, rallied to lead a charge towards where the Lord's banner flew.

Shit, I put too much pressure... 

Lansius admitted to himself, realizing that cornering the enemy like this would drive them to fight desperately in a life-or-death scenario. But he had no time for regrets as he aimed and released his final bolt, which struck down a man clad in ringmail.

Sir Michael, Sigmund, and Roger stepped forward, confronting those who preferred to die fighting rather than be hunted like animals. Assisted by the men from Korimor, they halted the advancing Nicopolans. After an intense bout of combat, which left Roger injured, the Nicopolans' will to fight waned following significant losses. Many paid for their recklessness with their lives.

"Sigmund," Lansius called, watching as the latter stood with a pilfered enemy shield, "have I spilled too much blood?"

"No, My Lord," Sigmund replied. "We need more to convince them to leave the region."

Only now did Lansius understand what Henry V must have felt during the famed Battle of Agincourt. Facing a significantly larger opponent, despite gaining an advantage, the English monarch ordered the killing of prisoners and hostages, out of fear that they might re-arm and join a possible counterattack.

Lansius was now facing a similar concern. He had barely recovered from the brink of being overrun and lacked the manpower to properly guard a large number of prisoners. Moreover, unlike high-valued knights, nobody wanted to take the Nicopolans as prisoners, as the refugees presented no incentive for ransom. Worse still, if another major assault occurred, the prisoners could re-arm and rejoin the fight.

A young boy, no older than twelve, approached Lansius, holding four retrieved bolts. His helmet was comically oversized for his head.

"Gratitude, boy," Lansius said. The child responded with an angelic smirk.

As Lansius reloaded his crossbow, he found himself wondering how a boy so young could stomach all the carnage that had unfolded around them. Turning to Sigmund, he confided, "If I've taken too many lives, warn me. I don't want to be a murderer."

Sigmund quipped, "If that day comes, I'll gladly take that title from you, My Lord."

Despite the horrifying situation, Lansius let out a chuckle.

The skald continued, "To be honest with you, My Lord, you warned them. You knew your capabilities and tried hard to prevent this tragedy. Yet, they ignored your warnings. Now, they must realize they feared the wrong man. This Tarracan Man's leadership must fail, or our situation will never improve."

Lansius took a moment to survey the scene, noting that many of the yellowing crops now had a shade of deep ochre red, tainted by the spilled blood.

He took a deep breath and patted Sigmund's shoulder. "Let's retake the wall while we still have the chance."

Soon, the trumpets rang excitedly. The order for general attack had been cast.

 

***

 

Chapter 91

Collapsing Lines

 

Sergio was in deep denial upon learning that his vanguard had been pushed back. He heard sporadic reports of nomadic archers being deployed over the wall. "How strange," he pondered.

His words drew his staff's attention. Sergio continued, "If the opponent had their bowmen at the ready from the start, shouldn't they have rained arrows down from the walls?"

The staff members could only knit their brows in confusion. They, too, found it puzzling. Defending the wall with bowmen was a huge advantage.

"A lapse of judgment from the opponent's leader?" one ventured.

Sergio nodded. There was another reason, but he refused to acknowledge it. "This is nothing but a desperate move," he asserted. "Our opponent panicked after we drove them from the wall and called for any reinforcements they could get. It just so happens that the nomads answered his call."

His staff nodded in agreement, their earlier confusion vanishing.

"Do not be deceived. Commit the next wave. We need to send more men before they push us back from the wall," Sergio ordered.

His orders were swiftly relayed, and the Nicopolans continued to muster column after column to the wall, oblivious to the worsening situation.

However, the men weren't blind. When they saw their terrified comrades retreat, shouting to warn them of the dire situation, they understood that things were not as their commanders had portrayed.

Peeking over the wall, the sight of their comrades being slaughtered was evident. No one wanted to jump into a hopeless situation, and soon the stream of people halted. Thus, the ones on top hesitated.

They jumped down and refused to obey commands. Before long, the columns stopped in their tracks, and everything bogged down on the Nicopolan side of the wall. In contrast, more and more survivors successfully climbed back, many bearing scars and wounds from battle.

The survivors, having discarded their drenched gambesons, wore only their tunics. When confronted by the enforcers, a heated shouting match ensued. In a surge of rage, the survivors charged and maimed their enforcers. They had enough and only wanted to return to camp. They knew they had been beaten and had set their priorities right.

On their way back, almost everybody inquired about the situation. The survivors explained and tried to persuade everyone they met. Some offered weapons, while others joined the retreat.

One commander attempted to stop them, but they shouted that they had paid their dues in blood. Realizing it could turn into a fight, the commander and his guards backed down.

When Sergio heard of this, he ordered his men to downplay the event, fearing it would exacerbate the situation. "I'll deal with them later. For now, focus on restoring order," he insisted.

"But, Sergio, we've sent the youths, and they returned bloodied. Now, the rest are frightened, they won't listen," one staff argued.

"Then find those who will!" Sergio snapped.

"The right wing is fresh and separate from the rest," someone suggested.

"Pull them," Sergio consented. "Now that we know the nomads are behind the wall, we don't need a thousand to cover our right flank."

The staff member quickly left to mobilize the right wing.

Sergio continued, "Do whatever it takes to get the men to climb that wall and attack. If we fail, we'll lose everything. Do you want your families to be cooked as meals?" he threatened, causing discomfort among his staff.

"We burned the deal. We trampled the crops meant for us. If we don't win, how will we feed eight thousand men through winter?" Sergio practically howled his explanation to his staff. "Those men, the same men you commanded will eat our hearts out. So, get out there and make them climb! Better them dying than us!"

Afterward, his staff and inner circle ran with renewed spirits to act on his command. Sergio himself approached the front line again and pushed the column into attacking. Even to the point of brandishing his sword to make them obey.

Despite the stream of deserters, the men, fearing Sergio, pushed their comrades in the front to make the climb. But the progress was slow.

The arrival of the men with long pikes and crossbowmen from the right wing changed all this. Sergio deftly took command of these elite troops and formed them behind his other column.

"Climb or I'll make you bleed myself! If you don't fight, then you or your family don't deserve to eat!"

With that chilling cry, the attack finally resumed.

 

***

 

Lansius

The lull in the opponent's attack allowed Korimor to regain control of the center wall. Piles of Nicopolans' casualties were shoved aside while the mortally wounded were mostly left to their own devices. A few who were groaning or screaming from pain were given a merciful stab to the heart or a blow to the back of the neck.

Hugo reclaimed the wooden tower and allowed Batu's archers to occupy it, taking as many spare arrows as they could. Meanwhile, Sir Michael was organizing a new defense on the wall.

Inevitably, there were pockets of Nicopolans who surrendered. Even in their darkest hour, men wouldn't kill unless they truly had to. The surrendering men were brought to Sigmund who led them to Lord Lansius.

Gazing upon the two hundred of them, Lansius commanded, "Kneel."

His words weren't forceful, but the Nicopolans heeded them, driven by the dark-haired man's formidable reputation and appearance.

"Raise your right palm and swear to me an oath that you'll not follow Sergio anymore," he demanded.

"We swear, not to follow Sergio anymore," they chanted almost in unison.

Unauthorized duplication: this narrative has been taken without consent. Report sightings.

"The next time we meet, I will select a leader for you, and you'll obey that person with your life. Swear to me."

"We swear, to obey the person that you choose."

"If your oath is true, then I shall find a way to feed you through this winter," Lansius promised.

The Nicopolans looked up to Lord Lansius dearly. They couldn't believe what they had heard.

"If you dishonor this oath," Lansius began, then turned to Batu for ideas. This move looked ominous to the Nicopolans.

Batu stepped forward with a smirk. "If you dishonor your oaths, then all the tribes in Lowlandia shall hunt you down. When we find you, we'll make a hole from your rear to your head, so carefully that you won't die despite the excruciating pain. We'll fill that hole with lard, thread a large rope through as a wick, and turn you into living candles."

The men gulped, frightened by the unknown custom of the nomads, taking Batu's threat at face value.

Batu finished with, "The skies and My Noyan are my witnesses. Mark my words, this will happen."

Lansius was pleased with the creative threat. He glanced at the frightened survivors and commanded, "Now, drop all your gear and run north to the river. Hide until the war is over, and remember your oaths."

Sigmund and his men escorted the surrendering individuals north, towards the river.

Lansius was hesitant to shelter them, fearing they might rejoin the battle. He was aware that he had confronted only about a thousand Nicopolans, with another four to five thousand remaining. Yet, he anticipated a rout soon.

Unlike in epic tales where every foe perishes in battle, in reality, even minor casualties can cause an army to flee. Historically, most medieval armies would rout after incurring just 10% in losses, and almost certainly before the 20% mark.

Lansius felt that the Nicopolans were approaching this critical threshold. However, he wasn't solely relying on these hopes. He was also geared up for a prolonged battle.

Hugo returned to Lansius' side and saluted, "My Lord, we've secured the walls. May I learn your instruction?"

"Prepare to defend. Have the boys collect swords and spears, but prioritize bolts and arrows."

"Acknowledged, My Lord. But one question: will it be a long fight?"

"I'm not a seer," Lansius replied lightly. "But let's assume it will be, unless the commanders on our flanks find an opportunity."

Hugo observed, "The opportunity seems to be present on our left wing."

Lansius looked to the far left. "The Baroness's side?"

"Indeed. When I secured the tower, I saw that the Nicopolans had withdrawn their long pike wielders and crossbowmen from their right flank."

Hearing that, Batu spat to the side. "Those cunning bastards," he cursed.

The men Hugo mentioned had cost Batu dearly in yesterday's battle. "My condolences to your brethren," said Lansius.

Batu bowed his head a little in respect.

Lansius looked back at Hugo. "If our opponent is pulling their right flank, then the Baroness might have a chance."

Roger suddenly stood up. "My Lord, I should still be able to deliver a message to the Baroness."

"I admire your courage, but you have more than just a broken finger," said Lansius.

Distinct whistling sounds echoed from the tower, alerting everyone. Batu's bowmen had loosed their arrows, and in return, bolts came flying from beyond the wall.

Nobody needed to be told that the Nicopolans were back on the attack.

Hugo heaved a sigh, while Lansius shook his head. Somehow, Sergio continued to defy expectations. Despite the large casualties and the near-rout situation, Sergio had managed to regain control and resume the attack.

"Rally the men for defense," Lansius said to Hugo, "and this time there are no more ruses."

The Deputy nodded, and Lansius gazed at his ally. "Brother Batu, can I count on you again?"

"Till my bow is broken and my sword dulled," replied the tribesman solemnly.

Lansius was pleased and offered a customary drink that one of his squires carried. He shared the ale with Batu, Hugo, and the rest of the crew. It wasn't much, but the situation made it sweeter.

Hugo and Batu departed for their respective posts, and before long, fights erupted atop the wall. Assisted by Roger, Lansius donned his gorget, gauntlet, and helmet. Armed with a sturdy spear Roger found earlier, the Lord of Korelia strode to the wall, fighting side by side with his men.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Side

Threatened by Sergio's newly formed rear guard—comprising long pike wielders and crossbowmen—the Nicopolan attack surged with renewed vigor. They knew what Sergio was capable of. Although the rear guard were Nicopolans like them, they were nothing but Sergio's lackeys.

In total, three thousand men were pouring over the walls, haphazardly trying to climb or survive the onslaught of arrows coming at them. Many were wounded, and several succumbed from getting crushed or trampled in the frenzy. The situation was dire, but Sergio, driven by desperation, believed the battle could still be turned in their favor.

However, the situation worsened. The water had risen ever so slightly, but enough to swell the mud beneath. Now, with thousands on the move, the area before the wall had turned into a muddy swamp. Men struggled to trudge through the thick mud, striving not to slip or die from sporadic arrow attacks.

It was a matter of time before they could take no more. Finally, enough of them realized that Sergio was leading them to certain death. Gradually, they began to disperse in small groups, wandering and stalling for time. Then, seizing the opportune moment, they swiftly marched back, launching a surprise attack on Sergio's unsuspecting rear guard.

This move took many by surprise, but it was brutally quelled by a volley of crossbow bolts. Sergio witnessed the incident and moved quickly, trying to contain the problem, but his army had mutinied.

As the crossbowmen in the rear guard reloaded and the pike wielders still recoiled from the surprise attack, more groups fled west toward their camp. Many had no issue with Sergio, but they had no wish to die that day.

In just a span of several breaths, almost a thousand men made a run for it, evading the rear guard in two directions. Some were simply escaping the death march, while others followed their mercenary friends or family members who had decided it was better to loot their own camp and live as brigands.

Watching half the army flee, Sergio and his guards plunged into the fray to physically bar the soldiers from leaving. He caught several, shouted at them, and slapped one of them, but the rest simply ignored him and continued to flee toward the camp.

It was then that the harsh truth dawned on him: he had lost the battle. His rear guard, who should have prevented this, failed to act. They were unnerved by this sudden development. Despite Sergio's wishes, as long as they were not attacked, they refused to retaliate.

"Sergio, we must return to camp. The situation is critical," a trusted aide cautioned.

"I've put your uncle and his men to guard the supplies," Sergio snapped back.

"Even I can't truly trust them," the aide countered strongly. "How can you trust them? Our supplies might be the first they loot on their way out."

"Bah!" Sergio grew angry. But deep down, he recognized the possibility was real.

Casting his pride aside, he commanded, "Get the rear guard and anyone still loyal. We return to the camp, now!"

Without hesitation, Sergio left the battlefield, leaving his men to serve as a buffer against possible enemy counterattacks.

He had forsaken the hope of ever winning this battle. Now, his lifeline was clear: secure the supplies. If he still had the food and spoils, then he could maintain an army and survive this major defeat. Even with as few as a couple of hundred men, he could safely escape Korimor, or even form a raiding party and cross the Great Plains into prosperous Midlandia.

It would be tough to make the crossing and organize a base camp in Midlandia, but it was better than being trapped against a formidable foe.

However, his dreams were quickly shattered. A section of the wooden wall on the right side moved, opening like gates. Now, like a vulture sensing dying prey, the sons of Korimor marched through. They were no more than two hundred, along with several riders, but the thousands of Nicopolans had no heart to fight.

Wherever the Korimor went, the Nicopolans dispersed. The few hundred tore through the lines without fear and kept charging straight at where Sergio's banner was located.

Sergio saw the risk, but he couldn't lose his banner. The rear guard halted their march back and reformed their line formation.

Against hundreds of brandished spears at the front and crossbowmen at the flanks, the Korimor slowed their approach. Everything seemed in control. However, more Korimor people poured through the opened section.

It was like watching a building catch fire and collapse; another section of the wall just fell. As Sergio's elite left wing fled the scene, several hundred Korimor emerged from the wall near the river through a similar opening.

But the worst was yet to come. The blue and bronze banner finally arrived from the right wall with hundreds of men and tens of riders.

Despite the situation, Sergio's face remained stoic, though his hands betrayed a slight tremor. He was trapped by his own acumen. To move would mean abandoning everything he had built up to this point. And he knew he couldn't live without the success and reputation he had gained.

Unwilling to start anew and tempt the Lady of Fortuna a second time, the Tarracan Man made his stand.

 

***

 

Chapter 92

The Grim Reaper

 

A trumpet sounded in the distance, blaring low notes in quick succession. Lady Audrey and her Korimor men halted their approach. They had been facing Sergio's rear guard, who outnumbered them nearly five to one.

Audrey dismounted and joined the men-at-arms on foot. "Dietrich, bring all the men-at-arms to me and reform the line," she instructed.

"But, My Lady, the signal was to halt," Dietrich said, puzzled.

"It doesn't mean we shouldn't reposition and prepare for an assault. I'll be damned if the order is given and we're unprepared," Audrey explained.

Dietrich nodded and quickly relayed the Baroness's orders. Soon, the two hundred men reformed their column, with Audrey commanding the veteran men-at-arms who had been with her since the fateful battle against Lord Robert two years ago.

Audrey was satisfied with the formation and ordered, "Rest. Sit on the ground if you need to. Drink and catch your breath."

Almost all of her troops dropped to the ground to catch their breaths. By this point, there were no more stragglers in the field. Aside from Sergio's rear guard, the rest of the Nicopolans had retreated to their camp.

The heat of the day had caused everyone to sweat profusely, but the men were eager. Unlike their counterparts at other sections of the wall, these two hundred were still relatively fresh. From the start, the Nicopolans dared not to go against Audrey's position as they were relatively close to the city wall and benefited from the protection of the crossbowmen above.

"The Lord's banner is approaching from behind," one aide reported.

Audrey glanced back and smiled, dabbing the sweat from her brow with the cloth Carla had provided. "What do you think?" she asked her squire.

"I think the Lord is eager to unite the troops and offer battle," Carla commented, keeping her shield ready to protect her master.

"Sir Harold is also coming," Dietrich noted, observing their right wing approaching from the side.

Audrey chuckled and turned to her men-at-arms. "Boys, we've done so little today. Will you be content to let them take all the glory?"

The men chuckled at the verbal provocation. The Lady's style of command was simple, direct, and down-to-earth. Her troops saw her as the Knight Baroness, always there among them and treating them with respect.

After receiving her benevolence for almost two years, the men-at-arms at her side would readily follow her anywhere. Now, the two hundred Korimor under her command were also thinking the same. They were captivated by the Baroness' imposing black armor, sureness of action, and confidence in the field of battle.

Wherever the Lady's went, her troops followed with unswerving determination.

...

 

Lansius

"Did they heed the command?" asked Lansius as they trudged through the muddy field.

Sigmund, walking in front of Lansius, glanced back and nodded. "Yes, My Lord, My Lady's column has halted."

"Good," Lansius commented. He didn't want Audrey's column to interfere with the Nicopolan rout, in case she applied too much pressure for the Nicopolans to potentially regroup and mount a defense.

Never interrupt when the enemy is making a mistake.

Lansius recalled one of the maxims in the art of war. His aim was to provoke the enemy into a rout, not give them a reason to unite and fight.

Before Lansius' column could catch up with Audrey's, something unexpected occurred. The thousand men from Sergio's rear guard charged toward Audrey's column.

"By the Ageless," muttered Sigmund, and the sentiment was echoed by many nearby.

"Get Batu's riders out and make haste!" Lansius roared, setting a hard pace as he ran. Hugo and his column let out war cries, quickening their march. The three hundred Korimor and one hundred Korelian men-at-arms charged forward, striding across the battlefield.

Behind them, Batu and his brethren had retrieved their horses and now raced toward the frontline.

Lansius knew that both Audrey and Dietrich were excellent commanders, but they were also audacious.

This could backfire... 

Even though he had anticipated scenarios like this, Lansius hadn't expected that Sergio would still command a thousand men—let alone elites equipped with pikes and crossbows. Despite being weighed down by his armor and short of breath, Lansius and his column pressed on, running.

...

 

Sir Harold's column was approaching from the right when he saw the attack unfold on the Baroness' column. Though his men were fewer in number and low on stamina due to fatigues and injuries, he knew he had to rally them. The outcome of this battle could hinge on crushing the remaining Nicopolans.

"Lads, we've fought a static defense. I think it's time to stretch our legs. Fast march!" he commanded, and his men gave it their all.

Sir Harold watched as Batu's riders galloped past them. Their allies soon coming within range for deadly ranged duels against the Nicopolans. However, the enemy's rear guard was already in disarray, so much so that their crossbowmen were preoccupied and unprepared for the approaching nomadic riders.

The disarray among the enemy ranks presented a golden opportunity for Batu's riders, who unleashed a rain of arrows on their exposed flanks. This nomadic ranged attack, coupled with the unexpectedly fierce resistance from the smaller column and the arrival of two additional columns, ultimately broke Sergio's rear guard.

Faced with overwhelming odds, the Nicopolans panicked and fled the battlefield. In their haste, they discarded their cumbersome long pikes and ran towards the general direction of their camp.

Meanwhile, the two columns finally arrived alongside Audrey's column, greeted by cheers and celebrations. Lady Audrey and her men-at-arms had once again proven their worth. Their bannerman proudly waved the Baroness' newly made banner, which depicted a charging black horse over a white shield.

Just like the Lord's blue and bronze, the Lady's black horse banner also claimed victory the first time it was carried through the battlefield.

This narrative has been purloined without the author's approval. Report any appearances on Amazon.

"A blessed banner," Sir Harold murmured, catching his breath. Now, his column was in the process of regrouping, as many had lagged behind due to exhaustion from the sprint.

Off to the side, the tall knight noted that the Lord's column had reformed. In contrast to their orderly situation, chaos reigned to their west within the Nicopolans’ encampment. Thousands fled, resembling ants whose nest had been destroyed.

...

 

Korimor Side

Lansius drank from the waterskin provided by Roger. Within the confines of his helmet, which was both hot and damp, the heat lingered stubbornly even with the visor up. He stood tall, catching his breath and fighting off the nausea that the full armor sprint had induced. His sabatons were caked with mud, and aches pervaded his body. Yet he was overjoyed by Audrey's victory.

Sigmund and Hugo finally cleared a path, and he finally caught sight of Audrey. They approached each other and met halfway.

"Are you injured?" Lansius asked, ignoring the glances from their troops.

"No, thanks to this armor. Took a bolt to the pauldron, but it didn't bite," she replied gracefully.

Lansius noticed new dents on her gauntlet and thigh plate but chose not to mention them. He didn't know what she had done to overcome the enemy, but he knew that it was effective.

Results are results...

The study of her tactics would come later, at a more appropriate time. For now, he grabbed her wrist and raised it high, shouting, "Behold, the Baroness of Korimor!"

Their troops erupted in cheers and whistles.

Audrey was smiling, her face flushed from the excitement around her.

Lansius wished the celebration could last longer but knew they were pressed for time. "Hold your celebration for now," he said to his men. "There's still unfinished business. Pray that you gather your spirits once more and follow me to the encampment."

The troops responded with enthusiastic clamor. Hugo, Sir Harold, Sigmund, and Dietrich rallied their men. Afterwards, they checked their equipment and replaced lost or broken items with whatever they could scrounge from the battlefield.

"Who will lead the wounded?" Sigmund asked Hugo as they convened.

"Get that squire, Roger, to do it. Time for him to get used to leading," Hugo decided.

Dietrich joined the conversation. "Deputy, Sir," he greeted, his cheek and left ear bandaged and bloodied.

"What happened to you?" Hugo asked.

Dietrich touched his bandaged cheek and winced. "Direct hit to the helmet. Nearly cost me an eye."

Hugo breathed a sigh of relief. "You're one lucky bastard."

Sigmund chimed in, "It's fortunate that we have these confiscated armors; otherwise, many of us would be goners."

The staff nodded. Compared to the Nicopolans, the men from Korelia had the advantage of better armor.

"How did you win the fight?" Sir Harold inquired.

"Praise the Lady," Dietrich began. "She had gathered the men-at-arms before the fight. When they charged at us, she ordered us to form a solid wedge—much like cavalry—and execute a concentrated charge. The Nicopolans relied too much on their long pikes, which became cumbersome once we closed in."

"That's impressive," Harold praised.

"So they broke from just that?" Hugo asked.

Dietrich exhaled deeply. "I saw it in their eyes; these Nicopolans were not in for a decisive fight. Our counterattack shocked them, especially since we aimed at their standard-bearer. Before we realized it, they began to break and flee."

The staff nodded at his explanation.

Dietrich continued, "The challenging part was surviving their initial volley of crossbow fire, which took down many..."

The sound of hooves interrupted their conversation. The cavalry, led by Sir Michael, had arrived. The one-eyed knight had been tasked with retrieving horses from the city stables. Now, the Lord, the Lady, and the knights could mount up and prepare for their final move.

...

 

While Lansius and his men were preparing to march, Batu and his riders were decimating the fleeing one thousand. It was a vendetta against the column that had trapped them the day before. With their arrows and blades, they claimed justice for their slain kin.

The Nicopolan elite were not even fighting; they were running away as fast as they could. It was a gruesome fight, and many were eventually captured.

Batu and his men scoured the area, searching for the elusive Tarracan named Sergio. However, despite all their efforts, neither Batu nor his scouts could determine where Sergio was supposed to be.

 

***

 

Sergio

The Tarracan man was drenched in sweat. He had run from the battle like a coward, a fact that deeply humbled his ego. When he reached the camp, it was in an uproar. Many were waiting for him, seeking his guidance and comfort. Sergio could only assure them that he had a plan up his sleeve.

In truth, he had no plan to save them. With the loss of his rear guard, there was no hope to defend this camp. Sergio had dispatched his most loyal men to secure the food supplies, hoping that not much had been lost. His only aim now was to collect his valuables and await the return of his men, so they could make their escape from this cursed place.

"Guards!" he yelled, but nobody answered. "They left...? Spineless curs!" he cursed, discarding his soaked gambeson as he entered the inner part of his tent.

Upon seeing that his wooden chest was still locked, his anger subsided. The plunder he had amassed was significant. Feeling relaxed, he glanced at his bed. The clean sheets over the hay mattress and the lingering fragrance from burnt incense, made him want to rest.

He even considered taking a quick bath, the large bucket already filled with clean water. Sergio was tempted, thinking his thousands of followers would likely defend the camp long enough for him to escape if an attack came.

"Who knows when I'll be able to enjoy proper baths again," he muttered, not caring about the grim fate awaiting his followers.

"How about never?" came the answer from behind.

Sergio was shocked and was about to turn around, but something snared his neck, and all he could do was grab the strong thin cord that tightened like a noose around his neck.

He was gasping for breath when a kick came from behind, forcing him to kneel on the carpet. He wanted to ask, to curse, to plead, but could only gasp for air and helplessly cough.

...

 

Daniella

Due to certain circumstances, Daniella ended up as the one who strangled Sergio, forcing him to his knees. The previous night, despite her newfound freedom, she had decided not to flee, choosing to hide instead. With thousands of tents available, she figured she could survive for a day or two by stealing food as needed. Fortunately, she only had to wait one day before her patience was rewarded.

She hadn't been idle while waiting. She'd disguised herself in pilfered garb and a hood. When Sergio went to battle, she tracked the remaining people who had once been her cohorts before they were discovered. Daniella convinced them to join her in seizing this rare chance for vengeance. Lord Lansius' victory and the ensuing rout made it all easier.

By chance, she reunited with Servius, who had urged his family, friends, and allies to flee to the neighboring forest. Daniella asked him to join her. Together, they successfully infiltrated Sergio's tent, killing the guards and cleaning up the mess. However, the men froze when the Tarracan Man returned. It was Daniella who broke the spell with her stealthy attack.

Now, the infamous Tarracan Man was kneeling at their mercy.

Servius revealed himself to Sergio and declared, "It's time to answer for your crimes."

"You ungrateful wretches," Sergio spat, coughing and gasping for air. "I kept you fed and alive all this time! I demand a fair trial!"

Daniella laughed. "And who will be your judge? The Lord of Korelia?"

Sergio trembled at the suggestion.

Others wanted to strike Sergio, but Servius blocked them. "It's not a bad idea. Let's present this man to Lord Lansius."

"Bah! Servius, the people outside will kill us and free him," one warned.

"The affairs of Nicopolans will be settled by Nicopolans," another recited the well-known rite.

Servius sighed heavily. "Fine! A trial it is. Let's make it quick."

One man stepped forward. "We trusted you with our sons, yet you sent them on pointless raids that did nothing to secure food."

Another took a key from Sergio's pocket and opened the chest filled with golden goblets, rings adorned with gemstones, and gold coins.

"This is what you're looking for, not food but richness!" he half-shouted at Sergio. "You sacrificed my brother, cousins, and nephews as if they were your private army. They died as thieves and robbers."

"You lured us with promises of food, only to feed us human flesh. We know, Sergio, how you butchered those villagers who surrendered to you. You're no better than mindless beast!"

The accusations flew one after another.

Servius knelt and stared at Sergio. "One of your guards assaulted my friend's daughter. When we reported it, you only laughed. Then the whole family died from food poisoning. Were you involved?"

Sergio could only stare back in response.

Unfazed, Servius continued, "You also sent me with two other envoys carrying a box containing embalmed fingers. Was that an attempt to get rid of us?"

Sergio turned his gaze away.

Servius turned to Daniella. "You're also Nicopolan; you be the judge."

"Any defense?" Daniella asked, maintaining tension on her cord.

"I led you through famine and this is my reward—"

One of the men, who had lost brothers and kins, shoved gold coins into Sergio's mouth. "This is the reward you sought!"

Sergio choked violently. Daniella had had enough. She whispered, "Remember the one you left to die under the sun? He said thousands perished because of your ambitions, not to mention the innocents you butchered just for your rise to nobility. Sergio, it's time you met them again."

Gasping for air, the condemned cast a terrified, bloodshot glance at his captors. But Daniella summoned her strength, and the struggle of the Tarracan Man came to an abrupt end. His jaw opened wide, releasing gold coins that were stained with blood and saliva.

The fallout from his demise and the fate of the Nicopolans and Korimor region would finally be decided.

 

***

 

Chapter 93

Dirty End

 

The Blue and Bronze and the Black Horse banners marched confidently toward the Nicopolan camp, with the nomads on their left flank and the knights riding in front.

As they marched closer, more and more Nicopolans fled to the west.

"Should we give pursuit, My Lord?" asked Hugo.

"No, maintain formation. The men are exhausted, let's not over-exert ourselves," Lansius replied, trying to preserve their strength.

"A group of men ahead," Sir Michael called out from the vanguard.

Lansius narrowed his eyes against the distance, discerning a dozen of figures hastening towards them.

"That's strange," Audrey observed at his side. "Perhaps, they intend to surrender?"

"I'll lead a contingent to intercept," offered Hugo, his hand ready on the reins. "With your leave, My Lord?"

Lansius nodded. "Granted. Take Sir Michael with you. Inform Batu to have his men on standby, the situation is delicate at the moment."

The two spurred their horses forward, leading a column of armored cavalry across the field. Lansius watched as they galloped the brief stretch, swiftly encircling the newcomers before escorting them back.

Audrey's gaze lingered on Lansius. "What do you think they want?"

"It could be anything— an envoy wishing a truce, a discussion to stall time or a trap."

Audrey nodded and spoke with a deadpan expression. "With you around, I doubt anyone could backstab us."

"I take that as praise," he replied.

"Certainly, My Lord."

Both stifled chuckles as they watched Hugo and his riders approaching. The column were escorting the group who were on foot. Meanwhile, Hugo shared his ride with someone.

Sir Harold, always close at Lansius' side, was intrigued. As he had anticipated, he recognized the figure riding with Hugo. "Lady Daniella!"

The Lady pulled down her hood, nodded with respect, and stepped off the horse. "My Lord, Daniella reporting."

Lansius and Audrey were elated. "I thought we had lost you. Are you free as part of the truce?" asked the Lord.

Another person stepped forward. "My Lord, My Lady, I apologize for interrupting," Servius interjected.

Sir Harold glanced at Lord Lansius, who nodded to allow the interruption. "Envoy, we meet again."

"I upheld my part of the bargain," Servius asserted.

"And I will uphold mine," Lansius replied.

"My Lord, I was the one who freed Lady Daniella. However, she earned her merit on her own."

"Merit?" Lansius questioned.

Servius took a deep breath. "She convinced us to help her take down Sergio, and we succeeded."

Murmurs spread among the troops. The members of Lansius' staff looked hungry for answers but knew better than to interrupt.

"Is Sergio dead?" Lansius inquired directly.

Servius looked at Daniella, whom he felt was the right person to claim the honor.

In turn, Daniella replied, "By my own hand."

Lansius took a deep breath and glanced at Audrey.

"The battle is finally over," she said gratefully. Smiles and expressions of relief blossomed around them. The news spread quickly, lifting the spirits of the entire army.

"My Lord," said Servius with a hint of trouble.

"Speak," Lansius commanded.

"My allies have moved to the forest as you instructed. However, Sergio's followers... they threaten to burn the supplies if My Lord doesn't agree to let them flee with the supplies."

Lansius shook his head. "This madness must end. Servius, send someone you trust. Tell your men to remain in the forest and arm themselves. Be wary of troublemakers."

"Yes, my Lord," Servius bowed low and went to send a pair of messengers.

"Sir Michael, Deputy Hugo."

The two commanders approached their lord. "You called for us, my Lord?"

"Let's move forward. Be wary of crossbowmen. I wish to see just how mad they can be."

Under Lansius' command, the hundreds of troops and cavalry resumed their march to the Nicopolan encampment. The Nicopolans were clearly panicked, but the flow of those fleeing had ebbed. Nobody fled to the west anymore.

The remaining people barred the entrance with spears and pikes. Crossbowmen appeared on their makeshift wall. "Do not come closer!" they warned.

Lansius reined in his horse, and his formation halted. His men and squires quickly formed up around him.

"My Lord, let me handle the negotiations," Sir Michael stepped forward.

Lansius gazed at the native Lowlandian-born knight. "Take Servius with you and go with my blessing. Try to persuade them to send an envoy. I wish to talk."

"Gratitude, my Lord."

"Sir Harold, have the knights accompany Sir Michael and Servius."

Unauthorized duplication: this narrative has been taken without consent. Report sightings.

"At once, my Lord," the knight replied.

Upon his command, a column of men, all in shining plate armor, bravely rode toward the camp entrance. Sir Michael, in the middle, bore a pike with a piece of white cloth tied to it, the signal for parley.

"What do you want?" a man shouted from the front.

"Watch your tongue; you're addressing a knight!" Like a thunder strike, a powerful voice came from one of Michael's men.

It was enough to make most men shudder. Sir Michael guided his horse to take a step forward. "I am Michael, under the command of the Lord of Korelia. He wishes to speak. Send your envoys."

...

 

Lansius and Audrey shared a drink, the midday heat in the plains was taxing, especially when clad in plate armor and arming jack. Everyone around him was fatigued, drenched in sweat from the heat, but their eyes shone with determination to finish the fight.

His gaze turned to Daniella once again who stood not far from him. He motioned her to come closer. "I apologize for not being able to arrange a rescue party. I tried to select people for the task, but the situation was too risky."

Daniella, touched by the kind gesture, replied, "Please, My Lord. I am the one who troubled you with my reckless plan—"

"Don't be," Lansius interrupted. "I applaud your courage and initiative. I could use such talents."

Daniella could only bow her head in respect.

Lansius looked at Audrey. "My Lady, what do you think of having her as your Captain of the Guard?"

Daniella shot a nervous glance at the two.

"Nothing but gratitude," Audrey replied to Lansius, and then to Daniella, "We promised to ride together. Perhaps it's fate."

"Daniella, is this arrangement good enough for you?" Lansius asked.

"My Lord, My Lady, to be trusted in such a position is an honor. However, I fear there will be those who question my loyalty."

Audrey looked at her and said, "You fought the Nicopolans for us. Nobody will dare to question where your loyalty stands."

Her trust caused Daniella to break into a genuine smile. "I, Daniella, will be forever loyal to your Ladyship and Lordship."

Once an outcast daughter of a noble, forced to live as a mercenary, Daniella finally found a place to call home. She had once possessed nothing but memories of her former noble life; now, her resilience had paid off.

She would become a part of the household of the Baroness of Korimor. In Lady Audrey, Daniella found not only a leader worthy of her trust but also an incredible ally who could reciprocate that trust. To such a leader, she gladly pledged her loyalty.

 

***

 

Sir Michael and the knights finally returned, five Nicopolans in tow.

"My Lord, they have sent five envoys," Sir Michael reported.

"Well, let us receive them," said Lansius as he wiped his sweating face with a clean cloth.

"May I suggest offering leniency to those willing to submit?" Sir Michael proposed.

Lansius nodded. "The steward has advised me that many Nicopolans are excellent farmers, craftsmen, and scribes."

"Do you intend to recruit them?" Sir Harold inquired rather surprised.

"I'm aware of your reservations about Nicopolans," Lansius reassured his knight. "But we'll need all the talent we can muster for Lowlandia and the Grand Alliance."

The rest of the staff smiled, contemplating their lord's far-reaching plans. Even Sir Harold allowed a grin.

The five envoys, all young men, were then presented.

"You stand before the Lord of Korelia, Protector of Korimor, and leader of the Grand Alliance," Sigmund announced to the envoys.

The envoys bowed, murmuring, "My Lord."

Sir Harold and the knights stood imposingly, ready to act at the slightest provocation.

"You are here. But make no mistake, my interest is merely in satisfying certain curiosities."

"This is not to discuss a truce?" one envoy blurted.

"Truce?" Lansius feigned surprise, followed by a chuckle. "It is far too late for that."

Lansius glanced at Sir Michael, who caught on and said, "In case you are unaware of your current situation. One, you are surrounded. Two, your troops have been defeated. Three, we know that Sergio is dead."

"In essence, you have been totally defeated. There are no grounds for a truce." Lansius pressed on.

The envoys exchanged worried glances. One ventured, "We still have the food supplies."

"But I have heard that you're going to burn them," Lansius mused.

"That will be the case if my Lord pushes us," the envoy countered.

"Oh, I shall," Lansius retorted. "As I've said, I am simply inquiring. My strategy remains unchanged."

The envoys grew noticeably paler. One stepped forward, "We still have the baggage train, laden with gold and riches."

Lansius smiled at the naivety. "If you burn the food, you will die. Then I can send my men to take the gold from your cold, lifeless hands."

The stark message sparked a hushed argument among the envoys.

Lansius shook his head and said aloud, "You are all far too inexperienced for this. And certainly too young to die if I can help it. Where are your elders? Hiding in safety?"

Sir Harold, Hugo, and the knights subtly tightened their circle around the envoys.

"Please, my Lord," they pleaded. "Sergio is dead, we are without a leader. The crowds are splitting up."

"I presumed someone among Sergio's lieutenants had taken command," Lansius ventured.

"No, nobody wanted them," another envoy spoke up. "We only trusted Sergio, not his henchmen."

"Wise move," Audrey murmured at Lansius' side. She then addressed the envoys, "Do you speak for all inside the camp?"

"Yes, my Lady. The people trust us over Sergio's lackeys," one replied in a hurry.

"We never loved Sergio, either. We followed because we had nothing to eat, and he was the only one who could feed us and our families," another added.

Audrey turned to Lansius, who was prepared to deliver the ultimatum. "Inform everyone in the camp that they are surrounded," he directed. "Remind them that just as I made those walls appear overnight, I can encircle your camp just as swiftly."

The envoys listened, some with eyes red from strain, as they committed his words to memory.

"Lay down your arms, answer for your crimes, and surrender half of your supplies, along with the baggage train."

"What shall become of Sergio's remains?" an envoy asked nervously.

Lansius paused, turning to Sir Michael, who quickly suggested, "Should the Nicopolans see the Tarracan Man as a hero, let them bury him. If they deem him a villain, his head should grace a pike."

The young envoys were momentarily divided before one spoke up. "My Lord, we request time to deliberate further, perhaps with one of your knights to mediate. We assure you of their safety."

"They may come with escorts, fully armed," added another.

Lansius showed no intention of being delayed, but Audrey leaned in, whispering, "It would be wiser to delegate this negotiation to someone else."

He knitted his brows. "For what reason?"

"They fear you too much. They can't even come up with a counter proposal, frightened that they might slight you."

Lansius hadn't expected that, but in retrospect, he had indeed won the battle that ultimately ended Sergio's life. To them, he must be the living embodiment of terror.

Callahan, my adversaries now see me as a conqueror. Is this what you wished for?

Memories of his lost mentor flashed before him momentarily.

"Sir Michael, Hugo," he called.

"Yes, my Lord," they responded in unison.

"Let the troops rest. We will hold a deliberation to discuss the issue. Get the envoys something to drink while they wait."

Sir Michael had been prepared for this and had his men erect a small field tent for cover from the heat.

The staff followed Lansius inside, where he also invited Batu. He began, "It boils down to this: attacking them right now would invite a huge, unnecessary risk. If we're lucky, they'll flee and run. If we're not lucky, they may unite, and we'll be fighting desperate men who have nothing to lose but to make us pay dearly. Gentlemen, I do not wish to turn victory into defeat."

The staff pondered the Lord's words.

"Then how do we proceed?" asked Audrey.

Lansius gestured to his staff to offer ideas, but none could answer.

"Against three thousand. It's difficult without sacrificing more men," Sir Harold commented.

"I could lead a night attack and burn their tents. Maybe that way they'll be more inclined to surrender," Batu offered.

"I don't want to overburden your brethren. Horse archers are hard to train," Lansius replied.

Daniella stepped forward. "Pardon me, but isn't this similar to the situation when we took Korimor?"

Her words made Hugo and Sir Michael's eyes widen as they recognized the resemblance.

Lansius smiled. "Loss of leadership. External threats. And internal conflict. Well done, Daniella."

"Does that mean we only need to wait?" asked Audrey.

"No, waiting is for when we have nothing at hand and expect them to doubt themselves. In this case, we are in a better position," Lansius explained.

Audrey nodded. "Of course, we've just won the battle."

"The problem is, even if we win this battle of wits, how can we feed an additional three thousand souls?" Lansius asked.

The staff drew a collective sigh, while Sir Michael added, "My men just returned. Servius’ group and their families account for an additional one thousand. So, we're facing four thousand, My Lord."

Lansius drew a heavy sigh. No matter how he looked at it, for the Nicopolans, this would likely end in disaster.

 

***

 

Chapter 94

Grand Stage

 

Lansius

After deliberation, Lord Lansius sent Hugo, Sir Michael, and Servius to broker a deal with the remnants of Sergio's followers. Aware of his still precarious situation, he solidified his position by bringing Servius' group into his fold.

Riding to the western forest with a heavily armed escort, Lansius met with the Servius' allies. It was a tense moment, but Lansius quickly reassured them with his words, and in turn, they swore fealty. They agreed to serve without pay in exchange for the assurance of food and shelter for themselves and their families.

The five hundred men were taken in as the new Nicopolan regiment. Lansius planned to integrate their families into Korimor and its surrounding villages and hamlets, promising protection as long as the regiment remained loyal. He further stipulated that the family members must work for the benefit of his House.

Having done all they could, the Lord and Lady retired to their field tent. Now, all that remained was to wait.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Camp

It was already midday, yet the fate of the remaining three thousand Nicopolans in the camp remained undecided. Composed of Sergio's loyalists and common refugees from Nicopola, they were either too late to escape or had resigned themselves to their fate.

The meeting between the two sides had been delayed due to internal strife among the camp leadership. Tensions were running high, and despite this, Sir Michael still refused to promise them food or shelter, even if they swore fealty to Lord Lansius.

"It's out of the question," he declared. "This morning, you were given an offer, and you destroyed the crops My Lord has graciously provided. You must own up to your mistakes!"

The new camp representative, taken aback, then asked timidly, "Can you at least guarantee our safe departure from Korimor and a share of our own supplies?"

"Only to those who could ransom themselves," Sir Michael responded.

His answer seized the Nicopolans' attention.

"But don't even think to take it from the baggage train. It belongs to the war victor. For those who couldn't ransom themselves, then you must answer for your crimes," the knight explained.

"Can you guarantee safe passage to those who can pay?" the new camp representative asked again, to the mockery of the crowd, who felt betrayed. Clearly, only the top-ranking loyalists, who had been given a share of the loot by Sergio, could afford the ransom.

Sir Michael decided to play hard. "My Lord commands both heavy and light cavalry that could hunt you down at his whim. And let’s not overlook the nomadic horsemen under his command, who excel at hunting on the plains. So, tell me now, what guarantee do you seek?"

The answer embarrassed the new representative, but Sir Michael wasn't done with his sarcasm. "Shall we have the horsemen to slaughter their horses to give you that guarantee—that we won't give chase?" He highlighted the absurdity of their demand.

Before anyone could retort, the knight pressed on, "The tribesmen would slaughter you for less than this foolishness. Heed my words, forget about ransom. The only action you can take is to trust Lord Lansius' judgement. And be certain of this—he has never broken his word."

Whispers spread among the Nicopolans. Even his adversaries could not deny that the Black Lord had always been true to his words.

Seizing the moment, Sir Michael stood with the poise of a seasoned orator and addressed the crowd, "What transpired this morning should be clear for all to see. Make no mistake, the Lord of Korelia doesn't make bluffs—he makes guarantees. Thus, I urge you to place your trust in him. And mark my words, Lord Lansius is a far better leader than the Tarracan man who has deceived and exploited you for his personal gain."

"But what will he do to us? We don't have food, and if you can't provide us with any, how are we to survive?" shouted one from the crowd.

"Have faith!" Sir Michael responded with confidence. "My Lord has confided in me that he has a way, should you prove loyal and resilient enough to endure hardship."

The response invigorated the crowd. Like the most insidious of poisons, hope had taken hold of their minds and souls.

"There is still time before winter. Now, are you with us, or do you still follow Sergio?" asked Sir Michael.

Sir Michael's speech acted as a catalyst, prompting the common Nicopolans to turn against Sergio's loyalists. Increasingly, groups of men broke away from the perimeter and moved toward the supplies—the heart of the issue—where they taunted and threatened one another, weapons drawn.

Witnessing the near-inevitable end, Sergio's loyalists knew better than to prolong the situation. To avert their ruin, they quickly agreed to surrender the supplies to Sir Michael, on behalf of the Lord of Korelia, in exchange for protection.

If you stumble upon this tale on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

The news of the agreement spread rapidly, and the Nicopolans from both factions, albeit reluctantly, ceased hostilities.

Hugo and his men took command of the camp, firmly planting the blue and bronze standards on the ground. With this act, the battle of Korimor had finally been won.

 

***

 

The death of Sergio, the infamous Tarracan Man, coupled with the raising of the blue and bronze banner over the Nicopolan camp, marked the end of a conflict that had claimed more than a thousand casualties.

Despite rumors casting doubt on the Lord of Korelia's worth and insinuations that he had fabricated his reputation, the Black Lord ultimately triumphed. Those who had doubted him were now steeped in shame and fear, bracing for the punishment that awaited them.

In the aftermath of the battle, Hugo organized several hundred security guards, led by Servius, to maintain order in the camp. They then proceeded to disarm everyone.

The three thousand Nicopolans, having acknowledged their crime of invading and besieging Korimor, agreed to offer their labor as war reparations. The specifics of this labor would be determined later, as the Lord had not yet deliberated upon Sir Michael's proposal.

To demonstrate their sincerity, the Nicopolans voluntarily placed Sergio's head on a pike for all to see.

Meanwhile, a separate group under Servius’ command rounded up tens of Sergio’s close associates, notorious for terrorizing refugees and committing atrocities during Sergio's reign. These individuals would face execution or exile, but Hugo, suspecting the Lord might find them useful, had them taken to the dungeons.

Before the day's end, under the vigilant supervision of Hugo and Sir Michael, the Nicopolans relinquished their weapons, dismantled their makeshift defenses, and transferred half of their supplies, along with Sergio's baggage train, to the castle.

The Lord allocated the supplies between his newly formed Nicopolan regiment and the people of Korimor, alleviating their hunger. Today, the rationing ended, and Korimor City buzzed with renewed life, open for business once again.

Behind the scenes, more complex developments were taking place. For their services, the Lord and Lady bestowed the steppe plains east of Korimor upon Batu and his allied tribes. During their victory celebration, a hundred tribesmen pledged a blood oath before a grand pyre in the presence of the Noyan and his esteemed lady.

They swore that they, their sons, and their grandsons would safeguard the safety of the plains and remain faithful to House Lansius.

Content with their vows, the Lord of Korelia granted permission for them to pursue the fleeing Nicopolans. He was concerned that the armed fugitives might turn to banditry, which could threaten the safe passage of trade and goods to and from Korimor.

At the same gathering, Lansius called upon the city officials, urging them to swear an oath never to allow raids or slavery, under penalty of death. The officials took the oaths solemnly, under the watchful eyes of both the citizenry and the nomads.

That night, Lansius had forged a new alliance between the two communities, in the hopes of preventing future conflicts among his subjects.

 

***

 

Lansius

The next day, atop the gatehouse, the Lord of Korelia sat cross-legged on a fine carpet, sheltered from the sun by an overhead field tent. His eyes were focused on the point where the nomadic landscape gave way to the fertile lands surrounding the hill of Korimor and its adjacent river.

Lansius was enjoying this private moment with his wife. There were no guests, only Carla, Sigmund, and the castle musicians, who played their strings and flutes, evoking a rhythmic sense of calmness. As was customary, the ensemble included no drums, but rather the soft jingle of the smallest tambourine. Large percussion instruments were uncommon in the era, yet the mood remained decidedly upbeat.

To freely pick a place to take my lunch, and to have musicians follow and play as I dine—this is absurd...

Lansius mulled over where life had taken him, sipping a mild brew of herbal leaves to soothe his persistent sore throat. The brew was bitter, yet the honey-glazed, golden-baked snacks, no larger than a coin, offered a sweet balance. It felt almost decadent in a region just recovering from famine, but his staff assured him that enjoying such delights was only fitting for a Lord of his stature.

Lansius looked at his wife. The Baroness was gazing at the farmland below. The people of Korimor had been working hard to rejuvenate the neglected fields. Some of the fields damaged by the battle might yet be salvaged with tender care.

The good news was that, despite all the wars, it appeared they were in for a good harvest this year.

The mood in the city was uplifting. The siege had been lifted, and normalcy returned. The Korelia market buzzed with life as trade resumed. From the poorest to the richest, everyone was busy preparing for the upcoming harvest.

Lansius felt content, if not thoroughly grateful. The city had been freed, the populace clamored for his name, and the death toll on their side was so low there was no call for a mourning period.

Servants gracefully arrived with silver plates set on silver trays. Carla and another member of the staff checked the food for trouble and poison before it was served. All the while, the musicians maintained their harmonious melodies.

Lansius surveyed the feast before him: spiced skewered lamb, freshly baked flatbread, a medley of olives and seasonal vegetables, rich cheese, and fish grilled to perfection. The staff had outdone themselves, preparing a meal so lavish and complete it surpassed any they had enjoyed for days.

A victory, a city that supports our rule, loyal staff working diligently, and a loving wife by my side... What more could I ask for?

He concealed his smile, cautious not to disturb his wife who was still enraptured by the sweeping view before them.

Perhaps it's because Korimor is hers, there's a deeper attachment— something she never had with Korelia...

Lansius couldn’t help but be amused until he noticed the bruises marring her lower arm. Despite her assurances, Audrey had sustained more than mere bruises; there was swelling on one of her limbs from the battle as well. He had heard reports of the Baroness fighting like a hungry lioness, leading her men like a pride of lions against the Nicopolan elite rear guard.

While worried, Lansius also felt an overriding sense of pride in her accomplishments. Audrey was no longer just an adept rider but had proven herself a capable field commander in her own right.

He found the combination of Baroness and field commander to be fearsome, exactly what he had wanted—a growing power at his side. Pleased, Lansius breathed in the scent of autumn. A chill in the air signaled the coming of the harvest, and the landscape was teeming with life: birds chirped, foxes were sighted, and even moles were spotted.

More than winning, what Lansius truly cherished was the return of peace to the land. With Korimor secured, its resources, talent, and manpower under his command, and the grand alliance at his back, suddenly many doors of opportunity swung open before him.

Now, he could explore realms and enact policies previously beyond his wildest dreams. Even solving how to feed the four thousand Nicopolans seemed possible if he played his cards correctly.

As if echoing his thoughts, Sigmund and the musicians reached a crescendo in their performance, the harp’s strings resonating with vibrant anticipation, the flutes sounding a jubilant herald. It was as if they were celebrating Lansius' ascent to the grand stage.

 

***

 

Chapter 95

Accolade

 

The music, the field tent, and the high position of the gatehouse shielded Lansius from witnessing the grim aftermath of yesterday's battle. He knew his staff tried hard to protect him from the unsightly procession of the Nicopolans, who were collecting and transporting their dead to be buried in mass graves just outside the fertile grounds.

However, being put on a pedestal did not mean he could stop reflecting on the situation. The flight of crows overhead, on their way to the feast, reminded Lansius that death was always near.

A plan is only good if we act upon it...

Sooner or later, he would have to demonstrate how he could feed an additional four thousand souls through the winter. The Korimor harvest alone would support fewer than a thousand extra, and it might strain their grain market.

Despite the end of hostilities, tensions between the Nicopolans and the people of Korimor remained high, fraught with distrust, leaving Lansius with scant options to resolve the crisis.

Similar to their limited food production capabilities, the city and its surrounding community could, at best, host a thousand for wintering. That was his hope, at least. He would face significant trouble if social conflict arose; therefore, he planned to keep a close eye on reports of dissidents and crimes.

Fortunately, the other groups, the nomadic tribes, were less demanding. Content with the grazing grounds east of Korimor, they only wished to take the captured men and a portion of the loot as their prize.

Lansius agreed but on one condition: the captives would not be treated as slaves. Instead, they were to work as shepherds or in other labor roles for nine years — the time necessary for an infant to grow enough to assume the work of the fathers or relatives they had lost.

Aside from the immediate issue, Lansius was also troubled by the situation in Umberland. The mountainous gateway between Lowlandia and Nicopola remained uncertain. Not even Servius was aware of the conditions there, many months after their departure. There was fear that other Nicopolan groups might have followed into Umberland. The fate of the castle town itself had yet to be ascertained.

As these thoughts preoccupied Lansius, Audrey savored the meal, taking a bite of skewered lamb and flatbread. It was then that she noticed Lansius had not touched his food. "My lord, is something troubling you?"

"Mm...?" Lansius masked his surprise at her inquiry.

"You haven't touched your food," she said, her voice tinged with concern.

Her reaction, coupled with the situation, reminded Lansius of an old tale he once read, and he chuckled.

Audrey furrowed her brows, prompting Lansius to ask, "Would you like to hear a story about a young king and his adviser?"

"This comes out of nowhere," she protested, but then, with a spark of excitement, she added, "But do tell."

Lansius smiled. "In an ancient kingdom, there came a day when a newly crowned king visited his trusted advisor. During their lunch, the young king left his food untouched, lost in thought. Concerned, the advisor asked if he had made a mistake. Only then did the king reveal his worry: I am merely an untalented man; how can I possibly keep my kingdom intact?"

Audrey looked at him intently, and Lansius continued, "The adviser, relieved that he had not erred and recognized that the young king was wise to ponder the state of the kingdom, responded."

Adopting as regal a voice as he could muster. "If a talented ruler is surrounded by talented people, he will be a king above kings. If a less talented ruler has capable people around him, he will still maintain his kingdom as a prince. However, a ruler who is not talented and is surrounded by equally unskilled individuals will surely bring disaster upon his realm."

Audrey stared into the distance. Realizing that Lansius had stopped speaking, she asked, "Is there more to the story?"

"I believe so. The news spread that the new king was so concerned about recruiting talented people that he forgot to eat his lunch. Before long, skilled individuals from far and wide came to offer their services to the king. Because of this, the kingdom remained strong for several generations—until his descendants forgot to heed this wise lesson."

Audrey nodded her head and remarked, "It's a wise story..."

"Indeed," Lansius agreed, reflecting on himself. "Audrey, despite what you may think of me, I'm not that talented—much like the young king in the story."

"Humble are we after the grand victory celebration last night?" she asked with a smug expression.

Lansius chuckled. Last night, everywhere they went, people chanted their names as if they were celebrities. The Korimor people toasted to their health and their everlasting rule.

Audrey licked her lips and adopted a more serious expression. "I understand why you wanted to recruit talent from the Nicopolans."

"From any place," he corrected her. "We need people skilled in various crafts. From fletchers who make arrows, to individuals familiar with clay making for pottery and roofing, to statesmen who can assist us in governing the realm."

"Realms," she corrected him with a sweet glance. "I haven't paid my dowry, so I've decided to give Korimor to you."

"Drey..." he rejected the idea.

"Lans, the town, the castle, even the House... You'll have more use for them than me."

"I'm honored, but it's your House."

She looked at him longingly. "I'm a simple shield maiden. I'm not talented enough to run a city."

"You've used my own story against me," Lansius lamented.

"Praise me, for I have been a good student," Audrey quipped.

He laughed at her jest, all while the beautiful melodies of string instruments and flutes continued to fill the air.

"Accept it. Otherwise, I fear that someone will exploit me sooner or later," she suggested.

"I doubt anyone would dare to cross the famed war Baroness."

"That’s the thing. I’m good with battle, but know nothing about leading a domain or managing the coins."

Her words made Lansius ponder. "The city isn’t mine to take, but I can manage it on your behalf," he said, finally finding his appetite and taking a bite of the skewered meat.

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Audrey sighed with relief. "Then, I shall keep Korimor for our sons."

Lansius was intrigued. "Sons?"

"Yes, I doubt you’ll settle for just one," she replied, resuming her meal.

The way she stated it so plainly made him stifle a laugh. "How about a daughter as charming as her mother?"

"I'd rather have a daughter as charming as Lady Felicity."

Lansius selected the best-looking olive and offered it to her. Audrey accepted it with her mouth, savoring the buttery taste of the fermented fruit. After a moment, she said, "Lans, you're now the lord of two baronies and the leader of a grand alliance."

"My title means nothing if you're not happy."

"Who says I'm not happy?" she protested. "I'm overjoyed." She took his hand and caressed it. "It's I who fears that you're not happy."

"Me...?" Lansius asked, surprised.

"Once, you told me that you wished to live far from the city—in a village or up in the forest. Do you still wish for that?"

Lansius chuckled, the words reminding him of simpler times. "I admit, I did say something to that effect."

"Where is home, Lansius?" Audrey asked softly.

The music from the skald's harp and other musicians became even more uplifting, as if they were on the verge of a great adventure.

Lansius gazed at his wife, whose fierce eyes were directed at him longingly. "This is home," he assured her. "Wherever you are, I'm home."

 

***

 

Korimor Castle

It was the second watch when Lansius heard knocking at the door. Audrey was the first to get up, blade in hand.

"My Lord, My Lady, I apologize, but Roger is in critical condition," explained Carla from the other side of the door.

Audrey opened the door to a slit and asked, "How bad?"

"The physician told me that they might need to amputate the hand," Carla replied worriedly.

"The sword hand?" Audrey turned grim. For a squire to lose his sword hand would be the end of their career.

Lansius appeared behind Audrey and asked, "I'm guessing the physician asked for our permission?"

"Indeed, My Lord. They're waiting at the castle's infirmary."

"Guide us there. No need to wake anyone else," Lansius instructed.

...

 

Roger lay on the sickbed, sedated but mumbling and groaning in pain. His skin was pale, his fever unrelenting, and some spots on his right hand were turning black.

Upon seeing Lansius, the physician blurted out, "My Lord, we mustn't tarry. The man's life is in peril."

"But it's the sword hand," Carla protested on behalf of her friend.

"Better the hand than his life," replied the tired physician.

"Give us some room," said Lansius, and they obliged. He inspected the hand himself and was taken aback by the severity of the infection.

Gangrene has set in... 

The broken finger from the battle had led to a nasty infection. "Have you got the poppy milk?" Lansius asked.

Before the physician could answer, Audrey interjected, "Wait, leave us." Lansius looked at her, puzzled.

Carla, the physician, and his aide left the chamber.

"What are you doing?" Lansius asked in a hushed tone, watching as Audrey carefully inspected the hand. She then held her palm just above it, not touching but seemingly hovering with purpose.

"Recite the verse Hannei used to chant," she urged. Lansius realized her intent.

"I don't remember, and we don’t have time. The flesh is rotting; he needs immediate treatment."

"I know this sickness. Trust me, we have time. Just recite something from your language. It’s Roger's best shot."

Lansius racked his brain and recalled the only prayer he could remember. "Our Father, who art in heaven, hallowed be thy name..."

Audrey blinked in surprise as Lansius uttered the unfamiliar language. She tried her hardest to recite the tongue-twisting words. However, despite her best efforts, even after half an hour, there were no changes to the hand.

She exhaled deeply, and Lansius comforted her, "You’ve done your best."

"No remorse," she said before calling back the physician, who returned with the town's best barber.

The barber brought his sharpest tool and performed the amputation cleanly and with ease. They were fortunate that only the little and the ring fingers needed to be removed.

Hearing this, everyone breathed a sigh of relief. With two fingers and a thumb remaining, Roger might still be able to wield a sword, though his grip wouldn't be as strong.

"There are ways of using a strap connected to the wrist to improve grip strength," Lansius reassured Carla and Audrey.

Keen to avoid causing a commotion as more castle staff curiously peeked in, eager to be near their Lord and Lady, Lansius and Audrey decided to retire to their bedchamber.

"I feel foolish," Audrey admitted.

"For a Baroness to care deeply for her squire is praiseworthy," Lansius replied.

She sighed. "I’m just a fake one."

"Hush," Lansius said, drawing her close. "I won’t allow anyone to belittle my wife."

She looked up at him. "Not even myself?"

"Especially not yourself."

Audrey managed a small pout. "I’ll heed My Lord’s words then."

He continued to embrace her. "He’ll be alright. He’s receiving the best care available in Korimor. Just like the last time with the spear wound, he’ll return stronger."

"I’ll train him harder. He’s been too careless and reckless," she resolved.

Satisfied with her response, Lansius gently suggested they rest, mindful of the long night and the important day awaiting their two Houses tomorrow.

 

***

 

Korimor

On the third day following their victory, the Lord and Lady of Korimor held a knighting ceremony. For many in their retinue, this honor had been a long time coming.

Hugo, attired in fine white linen and a red robe symbolizing purity and readiness to shed blood for their realm, knelt in the Great Hall before Lord Lansius. The assembled staff watched solemnly.

Initially, Lord Lansius had suggested that Lady Audrey, the one who held the Baroness' patent to knight Hugo, since he had not yet received his. However, Hugo had personally requested Lord Lansius, declaring, "Patent be damned. I want the man who led us to victory to knight me."

This sentiment resonated with the staff, bringing an additional challenge to Lansius who scrambled to memorize the lines since this morning. Despite being officially registered as a knight of the Mercantile Empire, Lansius had never been formally knighted. While not required to memorize the lines, he feared botching this important event.

Carla was now reading the list of Hugo's achievements, detailing the battles he had fought under the blue and bronze banners. Once the embellished records were complete, Hugo solemnly made his vow of honor, loyalty, and bravery.

Afterward, Lansius took the sword offered to him on a silver tray. The ceremonial sword was heavier than the usual arming sword, intricately etched and decorated. He gently tapped the flat side of the sword on Hugo’s right shoulder, then on the left. "Rise, Sir Hugo, may you serve the House with loyalty and honor."

Following Hugo, Daniella was also knighted. Unlike Hugo, she had personally requested Lady Audrey to confer the title.

The event also celebrated Sigmund and Dietrich, who received their formal titles as Captains. Roger, still recovering in the infirmary, and Carla were formally titled as squires to the Lord and Lady.

In addition, rewards and prizes were given to Sir Harold, Sir Michael, and Servius for their large contributions in battle.

This week would mark Sir Michael's last in Korimor. With the campaign concluded and their pockets filled with coins, his riders longed to return to White Lake. For them, the last few weeks had been a grand adventure. They had started as a relief force for Korelia, but ended up taking Korimor and fighting against thousands of Nicopolans.

Their victory would bring back honor and prestige to White Lake and Lord Robert.

The knighting ceremony also established a clear distinction between House Lansius and House Audrey. In House Lansius, Sir Justin and Sir Hugo served as Marshal and Deputy, respectively. In contrast, similar positions were intentionally left vacant in House Audrey.

Instead, for overseeing security and the troops, House Audrey relied on the role of Captain of the Guard, held by Dame Daniella, assisted by Captain Dietrich as the Master of the Horse, responsible for the cavalry.

Carla and several staff members were also transferred to House Audrey. This arrangement enabled House Audrey to maintain complete independence during emergencies, as it already managed its own expenses, paying its own troops, officers, and other essential staff.

 

***

 

Council Chamber

After the celebration and lunch, due to pressing matters, the two Houses convened for the first time. The council chamber in Korimor, larger and more grandiose than Korelia, boasted a marvelous round table, its surface lacquered to a high-gloss finish.

"You should ask Sir Michael to stay," Audrey suggested, once they had settled down for the session.

Carla and Sir Hugo turned their gaze towards them.

"What made you think that way?" asked Lansius.

"He's reliable and matched your wits well."

Lansius nodded his head in agreement, also believing that Sir Michael had become indispensable. "What's your take on him?" he asked Sir Hugo

"Well, he's one of the best we have in terms of court-related manners. He's also a well-rounded knight. I count myself as his friend," Sir Hugo stated.

"You said it yourself, you lack talent. There's no need to wait for Nicopolan talents to prove themselves," Audrey urged.

"But he's Lord Robert's vassal," Lansius pointed out.

Suddenly, a distinct sound from outside interrupted their discussion, drawing everyone's attention.

"Weapons clashing," the deputy observed, quickly rising and heading for the door, with Carla following close behind.

Outside, Sigmund was sprinting alongside the guardsmen. "We have sightings of intruders."

 

***

 

Chapter 96

Intruder

 

Korimor

People were still celebrating the accolade ceremony when several armed men barged into the castle, quickly breaching security and clashing with the guards. The skirmish reached the courtyard. The Lord and Lady watched the scene unfold from above. They were barred from descending, as Carla had blocked the stairs, following Sir Hugo's orders.

"Twenty men, they said? I only see four," Audrey observed, loading a crossbow.

"We're not sure, My Lady, but the intruder reportedly has defeated at least a dozen guardsmen," Carla replied.

Now, the fighting was intense near a small iron fence that separated the garden from the rest of the castle complex.

The lead attacker skillfully used his broadsword to loosen the metal hinges, almost like using a crowbar. Noticing what the attacker was trying to do, the guardsmen quickly rallied. They pushed against the heavy iron fence, attempting to trap him. However, the attacker, displaying remarkable strength, managed to hold back the fence with just his left hand.

In an extraordinary feat, the attacker forcefully pushed the iron gate, causing it and the guards leaning against it to topple over.

Watching from above, Lansius was astonished by the display of superhuman strength. Carla behind them gulped while Audrey remained sharp, possibly feeling challenged by the extraordinary display before her.

By chance, the attacker looked up and noticed Lansius and Audrey at the window. "Fuck, you two are really wed!" the man roared with laughter, effortlessly deflecting an incoming attack.

Lansius' eyes widened in recognition. Audrey sighed and put away her crossbow. "Get them to stop. He's one of us..." she instructed a confused Carla.

"But My Lady--" Carla began, only to be cut off by Lord Lansius shouting, "Anci, you bastard! What are you doing here?"

Anci's laughter echoed through the air as he tackled the nearest guard. The other guards, unnerved by his overwhelming strength, opted to maintain a safe distance.

"My Lord, Sterling, your squire is here," another voice called from below.

"Sterling...?" Lansius' tone was full of doubt. "Why is he here too?" he asked, turning to Carla and Audrey, who appeared equally bewildered.

"Why are you hiding your face?" Audrey asked.

"I beg your pardon, My Lady, the helmet's jammed!" Sterling replied while trying hard to remove the headpiece.

"Just stay there, we're coming down," Lansius shouted at them. Led by Audrey, they descended the stairs.

Meanwhile, the guards, upon recognizing the names, widened the distance between themselves and the intruder. While they might not have remembered Anci, Sterling was certainly a familiar figure to the Korelians.

As the Lord and Lady appeared, Anci removed his helmet with a flourish. "Archibald, at your service."

Audrey called out, "It's really you, Anci," as she stood beside Lansius and Carla, with the rest of the castle guards surrounding them.

Anci smiled. "Are you a consort or a Lady now? The innkeeper in Korelia gave me quite the tale," he chuckled.

"From Korelia?" Lansius was piqued. "And put down your sword; you’re scaring everyone."

"Apology, My Lord. Just some morning practice," Anci replied, tossing his sword and helmet aside. Two young men behind him caught them. "They’re my squire and servant," Anci boasted. "And guess who I found in Cascasonne?"

The man with the stuck helmet stepped forward. "The visor's jammed, but My Lord, I assure you, I have no part in this."

Anci couldn't help but laugh.

Lansius sighed, well aware that this was typical of Anci's antics. "Sterling, good to see you walking again."

"Gratitude for your Lordship's mercy in sending me to a healer," Sterling said.

Suddenly, thundering footsteps echoed from the entrance. "There they are!" Sir Hugo shouted as he arrived with Dietrich and the rest of the men-at-arms stationed in the city.

"Slowpoke!" Anci called out, catching Hugo by surprise.

"Bastard! It's you!" Hugo exclaimed, immediately recognizing Anci.

"I heard about your knighting, so I came to see for myself!" Anci declared as he charged toward Hugo.

The two clashed in a wrestling bout, but Anci effortlessly tossed Hugo into the garden, stunning the onlookers. Dietrich rushed to aid a visibly shaken Hugo.

"Something’s off with him," Lansius remarked to Audrey.

"His strength is almost like that of a Mage Knight," she agreed.

"Traveling with him, I still can't figure out if he's a man or some fell beast in disguise," Sterling added, his voice muffled by the jammed helmet.

"Not even a fell beast is that strong," Audrey remarked.

Lansius shook his head. "Just what happened in the Capital?" he wondered aloud. "Oi, Anci, let’s talk over snacks and drinks." And then to Carla, "Could you arrange that?"

"At once, My Lord," Carla responded, though her expression showed disapproval.

“It’s okay. He might look tough, but even he is wary of Hannei," Lansius reassured.

"Hannei? That cursed Mage is here?" Anci suddenly crouched, scanning the area cautiously.

Audrey chuckled at Anci's reaction.

Feeling the need to move the discussion, Lansius urged, "Come, let's talk inside. Otherwise, we'll draw more attention."

 

***

 

Council Chamber

The Lord and Lady dismissed the destruction caused by Anci as a security test. The guardsmen who had been bested voiced little complaint, especially after receiving compensation for their injuries. Many who knew Anci were thrilled by his return. With the matter settled, the Lord and Lady proceeded to the Council Chamber.

Lansius was still dressed in his celebration attire from the accolade ceremony, while Audrey wore her black gambeson over her robe, her sword resting neatly on the wooden bench beside her. Anci, comfortably still in his armor, joined them at the round table.

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Hugo, having fortunately landed on soft ground, suffered no injuries except to his pride. Now, the recently knighted man sat beside Anci, with Carla standing behind him.

Sterling had been sent to the blacksmith, accompanied by Dietrich, to have his jammed helmet removed, a casualty of his scuffle with one of the guardsmen.

"So, how's the Capital?" Lansius initiated the conversation.

"It’s glorious! I had sword bouts almost every day. Lots of tournaments, both formal and informal," Anci chuckled. He then glanced around, seeming to recall something. "You okay, Sir slowpoke?"

"Never felt better," Hugo replied with a load of sarcasm.

Anci chuckled again. "I said I'm sorry. I thought you'd be heavier."

"Your strength is uncanny. Did you eat a fell beast's heart or something?" Hugo complained.

"Ah, never tried that. Though I almost fought one," Anci replied, casually munching on a fruit.

"How did you manage to send me flying?"

Anci chuckled. "I didn't go to the capital just to run errands. I'm also on a quest to strengthen myself. And as you know, there are ways to gain strength, either naturally or unnaturally."

Anci's cryptic answer was met with a grumble from Hugo.

"So, how's Lord Arte's mission?" asked Lansius, trying to put the conversation on track.

...

 

Through Anci’s occasionally incoherent ramblings, Lansius understood that the mission to the Capital had been successful. Lord Arte’s bid to reclaim Arvena was sanctioned, and Bengrieve’s bid for Lansius' Baron title had also been approved.

He then silently expressed his gratitude to the men and women who had made this possible.

The diplomatic gymnastics must be crazy... 

Lansius couldn’t fathom the favors owed and the bribes necessary to achieve all this. However, not everything was cause for celebration.

"On our journey, we found the towns and villages in Elandia lifeless. Bandits are on the prowl, and the local lords seem to be losing their grip," Anci reported.

Lansius listened intently.

"Even armed convoys are being ambushed. Bah, I couldn’t find a moment's peace there!" Anci added somberly. "The villagers I had saved on my first trip had turned into brigands by the time I returned from the Capital. They blamed the bad harvest. But that didn't explain why they killed a nobleman's wife, so I had no choice..."

Lansius poured ale into his cup. "Drink up," he offered gently.

Anci gulped it down.

So the situation in Elandia was already bad before the Nicopolans even showed up...

Sadly, there was little they could do to help. Despite Lansius' newfound prestige and power, he was just a minor player in a backwater province.

"So, you got knighted?" Audrey interjected with a lighter question, casually munching on a morsel of bread, ham, and lettuce.

Anci showed a smug expression before answering, "I won the jousting tournament, and Lord Arte knighted me afterward."

"Ha, good for you!" Audrey smiled, genuinely happy for a fellow Arvenian's success, despite her Centurian origins.

Hugo raised his cup to honor Anci, who nodded respectfully.

"So, has Lord Arte returned to Midlandia?" Lansius inquired.

"Yes, he’s sorting things out in Midlandia. Oh, and their marriage got approved, so I'll be heading back to Korelia to fetch Lady Felicity."

"Just you and the squires?" asked Lansius.

"Nah, in about two weeks, officials from the capital will arrive in Korelia. The entourage and escort for Lady Felicity will be part of the officials' convoy," Anci elaborated.

Lansius leaned back in his sturdy wooden chair. "So, my baronial patent is finally coming."

"A word of caution, though," Anci added. "Lord Arte mentioned that, given the circumstances in the Imperium and your recent victories, they might want you to intervene in the Elandia - Nicopola conflict."

Upon hearing this, Hugo and Carla exchanged troubled glances, and Lansius sighed deeply. "Lowlandia doesn't have the capabilities to wage war out of province. We don't have the manpower or the logistics to support it."

"I find that hard to believe," Anci remarked.

"Let me clarify: To wage war outside Lowlandia and actually win."

Anci grinned and chuckled. "Well, now that Lady Audrey is a Baroness in her own right, I doubt those officials will be able to pressure you much."

Lansius gave a thoughtful nod.

"My Lord, are you considering a return to Korelia to welcome them?" Hugo inquired.

"No, our priorities lie here in Korimor. We need to figure out how to sustain four thousand people through the winter," Lansius said, more to himself than to his staff. Then, turning to Anci, he asked, "What's the word in the Capital about the Emperor?"

Anci's grin widened. "Do you really want to know?"

Lansius nodded. "The rumors are many, and I need the truth."

Anci chuckled. "You're lucky to have asked me. I was sought after by many factions, and they were quite open with their secrets," he boasted. "I wasn’t exactly a white knight. For the right price, I'd accept invitations and, let's say, resolve disputes in duels..."

Hugo shook his head in disapproval but remained silent.

Leaning in closer, Anci continued, "And let me tell you, behind closed doors, they speak of the Imperium and the Ageless as if they're already dead..."

Lansius silently drank his ale, offering no response.

"From what I've gathered, it's likely that the Ageless One is dead. Yet, the ministers and the Imperial bureaucracy continue to maintain a facade. Meanwhile, the nobles, like vultures, are busy carving up the Imperium: making alliances, countering, and impeding their rivals. It's as if they expect the Imperium to fall any time soon."

"How utterly foolish of them," Lansius finally commented. "The end of the Imperium isn't going to be pretty, or clean. We'll have a succession crisis followed by strife before the strongest can claim as the successor."

Lansius' dire outlook prompted Audrey and Hugo to take a sip of their drinks.

After a brief pause, Hugo ventured, "What do you think of Lord Arte’s chances of reclaiming Arvena?"

Anci looked squarely at Hugo. "Even with Midlandia's backing, Lord Arte admitted it’s a long shot. But it’s a blood feud, and you know how these things go."

Lansius exhaled deeply. "Sometimes, I wonder when things will start to improve for us. Will it take ten years? Or perhaps twenty?"

"Twenty? I'll probably be dead by then," Anci lamented half-jokingly.

Audrey chuckled at his remark. Unexpectedly, Hugo retorted, "Please, die alone. I still plan to raise my kids and keep them away from unscrupulous men like you."

Hugo's coarse joke managed to draw laughter from the rest of the council members. The laughter was a welcome reprieve, as their nerves had been strained by the dark tidings from the Capital.

 

***

 

From Anci, Lansius learned about the situation outside of Lowlandia. Unfortunately, Anci had no information about his family from Bellandia, mentioning he hadn’t met Lord Bengrieve despite, traveling to Cascasonne. When asked how he met Sterling, Anci explained that their meeting was coincidental, as few were traveling to Lowlandia, making it likely for people like them to encounter each other.

Despite Hugo's insistence on putting Anci in the dungeon, Lansius gave them accommodation in a guest house, entrusting Sir Harold and his men with security.

Dame Daniella returned to the castle as soon as she heard about the security breach. However, Lady Audrey instructed her to return to her task. Lord Lansius wanted her to ensure that the newly formed Nicopolan army had a functional administration and was well motivated to march.

Priority was given to repairing the carts, as the Lord wanted them in good shape for transportation. Given the limited number of draft horses, only well-functioning carts that wouldn't overburden the animals were allowed.

As for the Nicopolan men, a fitness selection reduced their size from three thousand to two thousand. Those who didn't make the cut, along with the civilians who couldn’t be integrated into Korimor, were designated as camp followers.

Servius' contingent of five hundred remained an independent regiment, acting as military police in case the much larger army became involved in a mutiny.

Thus, there are currently two distinct Nicopolan groups: Servius' Nicopolan Regiment and the larger Nicopolan Army.

...

 

The castle's study chamber was occupied only by the Lord and Lady.

"Nicopola, Elandia, Tiberia," Lansius mumbled, standing and observing the map on the table.

"Still thinking about them?" Audrey asked from a chair overlooking the window.

"I don't want to, but I can't help it," he lamented.

With the agility of a big cat, Audrey moved up behind him and gently encircled her arms around his waist, leaning in to whisper in his ear, "You better focus on things we can handle."

"But they're all interconnected. Without Elandia-"

"That's a problem for the people in the Capital. We're not the Lord and Lady of Elandia."

Lansius caressed her hands and nodded. "Good point."

"Glad to help," she quipped, nestling her face comfortably into his back.

"What's with the sudden affection?" he asked gently.

"Why, don't you like having a sweet and affectionate wife?"

Lansius chuckled. "Drey, what's on your mind?"

"Aside from you on top of me?" she flirted.

Lansius blinked. "I must warn you, I'm bad with temptation."

Audrey giggled and released her hug. She sat on his chair and leaned in. "So, My Lord, when will you make your move?"

"When the troops are well-rested," Lansius replied, recalling the recent report from Three Hills about Umberland that had solidified their decision. "That reminds me, I need to send word to Korelia. Also, I have to meet with Sir Michael to convince him to stay."

"It might be better to send a letter directly to Lord Robert, asking him for a favor," Audrey suggested.

Lansius raised an eyebrow. "And that favor would be Sir Michael?"

Audrey nodded. "I heard Lord Robert still hopes for Sir Michael to marry into his family. I think he might agree to attach Michael to our forces, seeing it as a better opportunity for him to distinguish himself."

"That's quite an insight... You're getting good at this," praised Lansius.

Audrey’s expression turned smug, then quickly serious. "Lans, there's one thing I still don't understand: Will there be food in Umberland?"

"Unlikely." Lansius shook his head. "And that's precisely why we can't wait until harvest. We'll march as soon as we're ready."

 

***

 

Chapter 97

Imperium in Imperio

 

Arvena Province

The land south of the Great River ripened, appearing as if a blanket of gold had been spread over the countryside. The fall of 4425 had arrived, and it should have been the merriest time of the year. However, for the Arvenians under Lord Gottfried's control, there was only preparation for war.

Men from Bellandia were among the thousands of Arvenians recruited for the upcoming campaign. They were encamped near the Arvena-Tiberia border, and tensions were running high. While the Arvenians were reluctant participants in this conflict, they felt pressured to demonstrate their loyalty.

Worse yet, rumors circulated that the Emperor was dying. These whispers were embellished with claims of Lord Gottfried attempting to rescue the dying Emperor from the clutches of evil ministers. However, the Arvenians weren't buying it.

Although they were shocked by the news that the Ageless was dying, the memory of how Gottfried had killed the previous Lord of Arvena and his family remained fresh in their minds. There seemed to be no good reason for Lord Gottfried's actions, other than to seize Arvena for himself. Thus, the Arvenians generally viewed their new overlord with distrust.

Hans, a young lad in a gambeson, entered the tent in a hurry. "Marc, did you hear? Another marching order has been issued."

"So soon?" Marc groaned. They had just made themselves comfortable.

"It's possible that they're not going to wait for the harvest," Darren, the butcher's son, commented.

Hans and Marc sighed as the three of them began to pack their belongings. Marc and Darren hailed from Bellandia, while Hans was from a neighboring village. The three were levied troops, lightly armed with spears, helmets, and thick clothes serving as gambesons.

A muscular man with a graying mustache peeked from outside and asked, "You lads heard of the marching order?"

"Connor," Marc exclaimed excitedly. "Indeed, we just heard it. What's the news on your side?"

"I'm on an errand," he explained, offering a lump of waxed parchment to Darren, his son.

The trio was ecstatic. Darren quickly went outside to their fireplace to cook the red meat while they still had the chance. Hans followed and nudged Darren playfully. "It's a good thing your dad's a well-known butcher, eh?"

Darren could only respond with a proud grin.

Connor entered the tent before replying to Marc, "Yeah, the news isn't good. They're moving us away from the villages and marches. I guess they're not going to use us to help with the harvest."

"You think they are going to send us into war?" Marc asked.

Connor's response was only to exhale sharply. He took his wineskin and offered, "Wine?"

"Don’t mind if I do." Marc gratefully took a sip of the spiced wine. The paleness in his cheeks from sleeping rough turned into a healthy red.

The two talked briefly about the situation and what news Connor had about Bellandia.

"It's a good thing that your mother and sister aren’t in the village anymore. Life is hard with all the food and grain quotas."

Marc sighed, knowing that, as vegetable farmers, they had limited means to fulfill such quotas.

Darren and Hans returned with sizzling meat on a skillet.

"Eat well," Connor said with a grin.

The three used their knives and devoured the steak.

Marc noticed Connor looking at Darren with worry. "Don’t you worry. When the time comes, we will protect Darren, I swear it—on this piece of good meat." The sudden declaration prompted laughter from the others.

Connor chuckled. "I love it when the bribe works."

"But really, you should ask them to put Darren as a clerk. He can calculate. That way, he'll be working with the command staff, much safer than here."

Darren groaned. "Stop it, Marc. I'm not as good as my teacher. I calculate slower than a snail moving."

Connor sighed bitterly. "If only he were here to mentor. Perhaps we could save more youngsters from becoming footmen."

"Well, not even Lansius can save me. I am far too stupid to be taught," Marc joked. "It is always spear and shield for me."

Before they could continue their banter, the sound of horns echoed in the distance.

"That's the call to assemble. Better hurry," Connor said to Marc and then to Darren, "Take care. I'll visit when I'm on another errand."

The trio quickly tidied up after their meal, grabbed their gear, and headed to the designated assembly field. The sun shone brightly as thousands of Arvenians formed up next to their northern army counterparts.

 

***

 

Chateau de Cascasonne

Seneschal Bengrieve's preparations were complete. He and his private army would march west to maintain order along the Elandia-Midlandia border. Southern Elandia was in turmoil after the famine-stricken people from neighboring Nicopola province raided the land in search of grains or livestock.

However, instead of focusing on static defense along his province's border, Lord Bengrieve and his staff had a different plan in mind. Recognizing the challenge of maintaining a watch at the border, they aimed to seize a strategic castle in Elandia, intending to keep all fighting confined in Elandian soil.

Externally, this strategy was to prevent the conflict from spilling over to Midlandia, but in reality, they planned to claim the land and castle for themselves. Like other lords, Lord Bengrieve had no intention of aiding the Imperium without personal gain. Moreover, he doubted that the high court would dare antagonize him and Midlandia, given their dire need for support against Gottfried.

The situation was ripe for the taking. However, Bengrieve was cautious not to overreach. With the affluent Saint Candidate Nay swaying the masses and the Lord of Midlandia's position vacant, the region faced potential jeopardy.

The region's stability was far from set in stone; it was akin to sitting on a three-legged chair, each leg of a different height, creating an imbalance that could easily topple. Bengrieve understood this precarious situation perfectly.

Thus, he wielded his army like a double-edged sword, each side pointed at his enemy from both within and without.

"Please excuse me, My Lord," the steward interrupted, finding Lord Bengrieve sitting in his lavish garden outside the chateau, enjoying the sunset.

"What's the urgency?" Lord Bengrieve inquired, motioning his squires to give them privacy.

"Lord Gottfried has made his move against Tiberia."

"Before the harvest? Are you certain?" the Lord asked calmly.

Unauthorized duplication: this tale has been taken without consent. Report sightings.

"I've confirmed it from two different sources."

"What about our border with Arvena?"

"Our scouts have infiltrated Arvena but found no military buildup on our border."

Bengrieve mused, "It seems that Gottfried has respected his promise."

The steward raised an eyebrow. "What is your plan then, My Lord?"

"If nothing is amiss, then we'll depart for Elandia in three days," Bengrieve declared.

The steward bowed his head. "Understood. But, how about young Lord Arte's wishes?"

"Let him be," Bengrieve answered without hesitation. "Gottfried never asked or mentioned him. And Midlandia hasn't formally endorsed the young lord of Arvena."

"Not to overstep my position, but is it wise, My Lord? When he finds out that we backed an insurgence, Gottfried might use this as a pretext for hostility."

Bengrieve smiled. "I keep a dagger at Gottfried's back, just as he keeps one behind mine. The only difference is the size and sharpness."

"It doesn't seem like he has one behind you," the steward ventured.

"Then he'll fall, and I'll be the one to uproot his evil intentions from the Imperium's soil." Bengrieve chuckled at his rhetoric. "I doubt Gottfried is that incompetent."

"Your position is solid, My Lord, save only for the ongoing succession crisis. Perhaps if you—"

"Don't worry. I have a better candidate than myself for that role," Bengrieve interjected, knowing that his staff wanted him to take the position as the Lord of Midlandia.

The old steward bowed his head respectfully.

"Ah, my guest has arrived," Bengrieve observed, watching a squire escort a woman.

"Then, I'll excuse myself."

"I don't mind if you stay. It's only Hannei."

"Understood." The steward then moved to a more appropriate place, close enough to be within earshot, yet far enough to maintain discretion, ready to offer advice as needed.

"Lady Hannei, please take a seat," Bengrieve offered from his seat.

"Gratitude, My Lord," Hannei responded, taking her place on the wooden bench opposite her master.

"I apologize for keeping you in this chateau for so long, but the situation is rapidly evolving."

Hannei bowed her head, signaling her acceptance. She understood this wasn't a genuine apology but rather a formal way to initiate a discussion.

"You said you're here on an errand?"

"Yes, My Lord. My charge, Lady Felicity, has arrived safely in Korelia and wishes to stay there. I'm here on behalf of the Lord of Korelia to bring his squire to a healer and to deliver his letter."

Bengrieve nodded; he had already received and read the letter. "And what are your plans after this?"

"Should my lord release me from my charge, I wish to retire to my hometown," she articulated, echoing the words she had practiced.

"Very well, I release you from your charge. Your contract is fulfilled and I'll reward you accordingly."

Hannei bowed deeply in response. However, instead of dismissing her, Bengrieve handed her a missive, and Hannei rose respectfully to accept it.

"It's the latest report from Lowlandia," he explained.

She read the missive, expecting something major, but found nothing noteworthy. Puzzled, she read it again.

"Well?" Bengrieve inquired.

"Pardon, My Lord, but I couldn't find anything—"

Bengrieve sighed. "Those two are married."

Hannei furrowed her brows. "Lansius and Audrey? Indeed, they are, My Lord."

"Why didn't you mention this in your reports?" the Lord asked with frustration.

"B-but, My Lord, this humble servant already did mention it. My report stated that the two are enamored," Hannei explained, nervously.

"Enamored...?" Bengrieve shook his head, falling into deep contemplation. "Yes, you did write something to that effect... It's just that I never expected..."

Hannei squinted her eyes. She had never seen Bengrieve at a loss for words and became suspicious of Audrey's true identity.

"Lansius should marry Lord Robert's daughter, not Lady Audrey. I have plans for her," the Lord lamented, fury evident in his tone.

It was only then that Hannei understood the issue. If Lansius were here, she was sure he would tell her: 'In this day and age, nobles marry not out of love, but out of necessity and alliance between Houses.' She vaguely recalled one of his stories about young Romans who often married wealthy widows for support. He had mentioned someone named Octavian or Augustus, who married a woman already pregnant by her first husband. This marriage, was a strategic move for wealth, political connections, and legitimacy.

Bengrieve asked for and drank some spiced wine, seemingly attempting to quench his overwhelming emotions. However, his disdain was unmistakable. "Why do even smart men like Lansius behave illogically? This is absurd!" he exclaimed, raising his voice.

Hannei flinched and lowered her gaze, aware of how powerful and terrible Bengrieve could be.

The Steward stepped forward. "A word, My Lord, if you wish to hear it."

Bengrieve gestured for him to speak.

"My Lord should remember the letter from the current Lord of Korelia brought by Lady Hannei."

"What about it?"

"The letter is full of praises and hopes for My Lord's support. I doubt the person who wrote it has any seditious plans behind your back."

Bengrieve grumbled. "Perhaps he's even darker than Gottfried."

"I doubt it, My Lord. It's more likely that the current Lord of Korelia simply doesn't know."

Bengrieve took a deep breath and nodded. "Perhaps this is but a coincidence..."

The steward nodded. Meanwhile, Hannei, visibly anxious, was eager to ask but knew it wasn't her place.

Bengrieve leaned back in his chair and turned his gaze back to Hannei. "Is Lansius loyal?"

"Lansius is Lansius. He has fooled other lords in battle and defeated them. I doubt I could fathom him. However, from my observation, there's no indication that he's disloyal to you, My Lord," Hannei answered spontaneously.

Bengrieve seemed pleased. "And why is that?"

"The Lord of Korelia needs an ally, and you are the most able and understanding benefactor anyone could wish for."

Bengrieve smiled at the praise, but replied, "I wonder if your sweet words will change under the nectar of truth."

Hannei gulped and could only look down.

Bengrieve stood up. "I'll march west in three days. I shouldn't worry about some Lord from Lowlandia. However, let it be known that he has taken a prize greater than he's worth."

 

***

 

Korimor

In a move that shocked everyone, Lord Lansius announced his order to mobilize. He explained to his staff that they couldn't afford to wait for the harvest due to the deteriorating situation with the Nicopolan refugees; there was simply no solution to be found in Korimor.

Upon hearing the announcement, the castle and the city immediately buzzed with activity to prepare for the upcoming march.

The recently knighted Sir Hugo was appointed steward of Korimor. To maintain order, Lord Lansius stationed two hundred of Servius' Nicopolan regiment to ensure Korimor's loyalty to his House. While public sentiment was generally favorable, he did not want to risk the city succumbing to rebellious tendencies.

Sir Hugo's new position came with a personal cost. This appointment meant he had to postpone his marriage until next year. However, the prestige accompanying the role, coupled with the absence of a more suitable candidate, made the decision easier for him.

While waiting for the army's two-day preparation for mobilization, the Lord and Lady organized a special banquet to send off Sir Michael and his White Lake cavalry. The cavalry, having completed their mission and recovered from the battle, were set to return home the following day.

Despite the food situation not yet improving, with the harvest still a week away, the castle staff successfully managed to prepare a modest yet lively banquet. The Great Hall of Korimor was filled with feasting, music, and laughter.

"Sir Michael, please extend my gratitude to the Lord of White Lake," Lansius said to the honored guest seated next to him.

"Certainly, My Lord. On behalf of Lord Robert, please accept our gratitude for the share of the baggage train and the spoils from the city."

"It's within your rights. You earned it," Lansius replied with a smile. Audrey then asked, "Sir Michael, are you sure you don’t want to wait until the harvest festival?"

"I'd love to, My Lady, but the men are restless to return home. Please excuse their manners."

The Lord and Lady chuckled and raised their cups, followed by Sir Michael and the others. They drank and enjoyed the music and lively atmosphere.

"A letter if you will, for the Lord of White Lake," Lansius said as the festivities began to wind down.

Sir Michael respectfully took the sealed letter. "I'll ensure My Lord receives it."

"Sir Michael, know that the doors of my House are always open to you," Lansius said.

Sir Michael bowed. "It's an honor, My Lord."

Suddenly, noises from outside interrupted the banquet. Dietrich and Carla escorted in three men, who turned out to be Batu and his two relatives. Sigmund, the skald, sensed that something was off, and the music stopped. However, despite the urgency of their actions, Batu showed no sign of hostility, only a proud and joyful expression.

"My Noyan," he called out as he approached.

The Lord and Lady descended from their high table. "Batu, what brings you here?" Lansius asked.

"A messenger from my tribe just came. They said, my first wife delivered a healthy baby boy!"

The room erupted in congratulations for Batu, the new father. Cheers were raised to salute the fortune of their honored ally.

"What wonderful news," Lady Audrey said, pouring spiced wine into a silver goblet.

"Brother, congratulations on your son," Lansius said, offering the goblet to Batu.

"My Noyan, My Lady, this is a great honor," Batu replied, overwhelmed by everyone's well-wishes.

Audrey offered her congratulations, "May the boy and mother stay healthy." Caught up in the moment, Batu raised his goblet and took a hearty gulp, his action met with cheers from the crowd.

"I hope for the Noyan's blessing," Batu declared, addressing the room. "I plan to name him Lancius."

Upon hearing this, Lansius let out a chuckle, and the crowd erupted in cheers, proud of the name Batu had chosen. "May he rule the plains as an honorable warrior!" someone called out, eliciting nods and smiles from the others.

"I feel unworthy," Lansius admitted, but the Lady pulled his arm and whispered, "It's a good name. You should feel honored."

"I do," Lansius reassured her with a smile.

"Noyan, may the boy inherit some of your battle skills," Batu insisted.

Lansius exhaled, and the crowd fell silent. "May Lancius, son of Batu, only know peace and never need to use his skills in warfare."

Hearing this, the crowd and Batu rejoiced. Sir Hugo, Sir Michael, Dietrich, Sigmund, and Carla all took turns to congratulate the new father. Sterling, who had resumed his position at Lord Lansius' side, returned from the castle's cellar with extra spiced wine and ale to refill everyone's cups and goblets. It was truly a day to celebrate.

The Lord and Lady, along with their staff and allies, were savoring their brief respite, uncertain of when they would meet again. Soon, they would embark on their campaign to the west, not knowing what fate awaited them there.

 

***

 

Chapter 98

Champion of the Imperium

 

Korimor

Who would've thought that the fearless intruder was the current Knight Champion of the Imperium? And that such a highly esteemed champion was on friendly terms with the Lord and Lady. People were abuzz with this newfound revelation, their respect for the Lord and Lady reaching an all-time high despite the order to mobilize.

Wherever the Arvenian knight and his squires went, people flocked to catch a glimpse of the current Knight Champion. The title meant that Sir Archibald was the strongest knight in the Imperium, be it on mount or on foot.

Had it not been for the tight schedule, Lansius would have thrown a party to celebrate his friend's victory. His friendship with Anci harkened back to his previous world, where he had formed strong bonds with fearless, sometimes reckless, but unyielding players. He saw a similar spirit in Anci and felt he could trust his back to someone like him.

Since their arrival, his two squires had tirelessly spread the account of their master's victory in all the places they visited in the city. Anci himself frequented the best taverns in the city with a heavy escort from Sir Justin and his best men-at-arms, lending more credence to the squires' stories.

While it was hard to fathom whether the squires' story was true or heavily embellished, the crowd enjoyed a good story and treated the Champion like a celebrity. Moreover, the tens of guardsmen who had fought Sir Anci were all too happy to embellish the story further, recounting Sir Anci's superhuman strength and unrivaled martial prowess in their fights.

The minstrels spun the story into an even greater one in their ballads. For all who were fortunate to be involved, the greater the story, the better the drink, the better the tips.

Spontaneous parties were held wherever he visited, and there were countless invitations for supper, lunch, and dinner, even hastily made proposals to marry their daughters to him.

Sir Anci was pleased to be treated like a celebrity. He hadn't expected his new title as champion to be held in such high regard so far away from the Capital. Little did he know that above all else, the Lowlandians respected strength.

However, as abruptly as he had arrived, Sir Anci decided to ride alongside the White Lake contingent as far as Korelia.

...

 

The next day at first light, Sir Michael and his White Lake cavalry assembled outside the city gates. The Lord and Lady were there to bid them farewell. Again, stealing the limelight was Sir Anci and his two squires, with people from the city flocking to send him off.

"You know, my only regret is probably not accompanying Lansius during his search for you. But at that time, I had lost so many friends, and the thought of confirming another loss was just unbearable," Sir Anci confided to Lady Audrey as they walked to his horse.

"If that's an apology, then consider it accepted," Audrey replied casually. Although they weren't exactly friends, they had met on several occasions during their service to the previous Lord of Arvena and had briefly fought together, with her as Lansius' cavalry commander and him as the deputy.

Sir Anci chuckled. "Gratitude, My Lady." Then, turning to Lord Lansius, he added, "My Lord, thank you for the hospitality and the extra coins."

"It's the least we can do for your assistance," Lansius replied, patting the knight's shoulder. "I didn’t expect the Knight Champion of the Imperium would ride to Korimor only to ask for permission to take Lady Felicity home. Also, our gratitude for bringing Sterling safely back to us."

Anci laughed. "The warm welcome, the parties, and the heavy purse certainly made this extra trip worthwhile. Korimor is surely a fine city."

Lansius responded with a smile. "Please, ensure Lady Felicity's safety for me and extend my best wishes to Lord Arte."

"Consider it done."

Sir Michael approached with his squires. "My Lord, My Lady," they greeted.

"Sir Michael, please take care of Sir Archibald for me," Lansius requested.

The two knights exchanged slight head bows.

Anci spoke first, "I better say it now. No hard feelings? I believe we've met in battle before."

"It's common for knights to cross paths in battles. No hard feelings, Sir Archibald. In fact, I feel much safer knowing the Knight Champion of the Imperium is willing to ride with us."

Anci laughed at the compliment. "Please, call me Anci. My squires and I will trouble you until we reach Korelia."

"The honor is all mine."

Lansius watched the two and commented, "Seeing former opponents trading friendly banter like this, perhaps the Grand Alliance isn't so far-fetched after all."

"The Grand Alliance is a brilliant idea, My Lord. I shall use all my talents to make it happen," Sir Michael declared, with Sir Anci grinning beside him.

Lady Audrey, pleased with the declaration, said, "Safe travels, you two. Drink plenty, watch out for the sun, and take care of your horses."

The knights and their squires bowed to the Lady of the city. "May fortune always follow you, My Lady, My Lord. I await good news from your western campaign," Sir Michael said, before motioning for his squire to bring his steed.

"When will you leave for your campaign?" Sir Anci asked Lady Audrey.

Audrey looked at Lansius, who replied, "If preparations are complete, tomorrow after breakfast."

"Why ask? Interested in joining us?" Audrey quipped.

Anci chuckled. "Tempting, but I'm responsible for a noble wedding."

The three chuckled. Three years ago, they were merely unnamed commoners; now, their reputations had grown immensely. Lansius was known as the Black Lord, a reputation so frightening it could stop a crying toddler. Audrey had become the Baroness of Korimor with rumors of her possessing the Fell Beast's eyes, and Anci was celebrated as the current Knight Champion of the Imperium.

Stolen novel; please report.

Their rise to power was unprecedented, but fate was a fickle mistress and might easily take it all away. Tomorrow, Lansius and Audrey would embark on a dangerous campaign to the west, while Anci was destined to fight an uphill battle in the upcoming Arvenian war.

The Elven year 4425 was yet to end, but Lansius was facing his third armed conflict of the year. From summer through fall, his small troops had engaged in the battles of Korelia and Korimor, and now they were preparing for the campaign to the west. Spirited as they might be, the continuous wars were beginning to take their toll on everyone.

Lansius himself quietly harbored doubts about his own health, yet he knew there was no choice but to personally lead this complex campaign. With Audrey on his side, he drew a deep breath, watching Anci and the White Lake riders sally south into the Great Plains of Lowlandia.

 

***

 

The following day, Lord Lansius led his House to march. The people of Korimor bid them farewell with mixed feelings. Many were grateful that the Lord was taking the Nicopolans away, yet they were also reluctant to part with their new Lady and Lord Protector. Their departure cast a gloom over the populace, who were just a few weeks away from celebrating their harvest festival.

Nevertheless, those from Korimor who joined the march were highly motivated. Just as he had done with the Korelians, the Lord selected only those who could ride horses and use crossbows. The chosen two hundred were reformed into a new dragoon company.

Excluding the nomadic tribes, the Lord and Lady had arrived in Korelia with only a handful of heavy cavalry. Now, they commanded almost three thousand men, along with another thousand camp followers.

Before leaving, Lord Lansius summoned Sir Hugo to the castle's battlements.

"My Lord," Sir Hugo greeted as he arrived.

"Sir Hugo, please, join me for a walk."

They strolled along the battlements, overlooking the golden swathes of ripened land soon to be harvested. "It'll be a good harvest," the Lord commented.

"I shall do my utmost to assist the populace with their harvest," Sir Hugo replied.

"That is wise," Lansius praised. "We need all the grain we can get. Beware of pests and locusts."

"I shall keep a watchful eye."

Their walk brought them to another side of the castle, overlooking the vast plains of Lowlandia stretching into the distance.

The Lord stopped and gazed at his knight. "Sir Hugo, our past had its complications... But I believe we've moved beyond that."

"My Lord, I am part of your House. Your victory and grandeur are all I wish for," the knight replied earnestly.

Pleased, Lansius presented a letter to Sir Hugo. "Tonight, read this and think it over. It outlines two paths for you to choose from. Remember, there's no right or wrong, both are equally wise."

Sir Hugo accepted the letter. "Gratitude for your trust. I will consider it carefully."

After their discussion, they returned to the gatehouse and descended the spiral stone staircase. Below, the staff had awaited.

"My Lord, please return safely. I shall await your instructions," Sir Hugo said.

"Gratitude for your concern. Please, keep me informed of any developments. Then, until we meet again." Lord Lansius then joined the Lady and their staff in a parade through the city, where the people of Korimor gathered to wish them a swift victory and a safe journey home.

The parade, though brief, was memorable, with the townsfolk offering drinks and wrapped gifts as snacks for the journey. Soon, they reached the city gate, where the army awaited their arrival.

For this campaign, Lord Lansius commanded:

20 Knights, led by Sir Harold

30 Light Cavalry, led by Dame Daniella and Dietrich

30 Nomadic horse archers and scouts, led by one of Batu's sworn brother

150 Dragoons from Korelia, equipped like men-at-arms and with crossbows

200 Dragoons from Korimor, similarly equipped

300 Nicopolan Regiment on foot, led by Servius

2000 Nicopolan army on foot

1000 Nicopolan camp followers

As instructed, the Nicopolan army and camp followers utilized the carts confiscated from the war, loading them with as many tents, tools, and weapons as they could find. They were aware that the Lord anticipated multiple sieges and prepared accordingly.

For supplies, they relied on what the Nicopolans had, which would last only three more weeks. Even with additional provisions from the city's granary, they could sustain no longer than a month.

The only saving grace was the freshly smoked fish. Korimor boasted thriving freshwater fishing in their river, and the previous Lord had popularized smoked fish as a delicacy. Thus, the army's morale was quite high, as they could enjoy good meals during the early days of their march.

The Lord rode toward the center of the formation and gave a small speech. "Fellow Arvenians, Korelians, people of Korimor, and Nicopolans. From now on, you are members of House Lansius. Once again I promise to treat you as fairly as possible, given your seniority and past merits toward the House."

Everyone felt pumped by the Lord's address.

The Lord continued, "Since you are now members of my House, remember this well: No one is born or raised a hero, but everyone can walk the path of a hero. I'm sure you know the stories of the heroes of old. Yes, they're unrealistic. Yes, they're what the old women tell their children. However, the idea is pure and true! And victory tends to follow whoever is pure and true."

Now, even the staff was piqued by the speech.

"Remember the way of the hero of old: Be cunning, but honest toward the innocent. Be strong, but compassionate toward the weak. Be powerful, but respectful toward the law. Men, display this on your march, and people will see you as heroes. Display this consistently and perhaps we'll redeem the blood we've spilled on this soil, so the Ancients will grant us another victory and protect us from hunger."

The men nodded solemnly. The Arvenians and Korelians were especially grateful for their past victories.

As it ended, the Lord and Lady, flanked by the knights and riders, led the march southwest. Thousands of people with hundreds of horse-drawn carts followed in high spirits.

"What did you speak with Sir Hugo about?" Audrey asked as they rode slowly, careful not to burden the footmen.

"Well, if he's going to be our right hand along with Sir Justin, then he needs to navigate power and temptation," Lansius replied, ensuring they were not within earshot of anyone.

Audrey squinted her eyes. "Lans, that's too cryptic."

Lansius chuckled. "I told him if he could resist temptation, he should seek advice from Omin and learn from him."

Her eyes widened. "Are you sure that's a good idea?"

"Your cousin is a smart man. It'll be a waste not to have someone learn from him."

"But, Hugo is rather ambitious," she revealed her worry.

"This is why I gave him two paths. One is the loyal path, where he does not need to meet with Omin. This path is also no less wise or smart. I call this the 'see nothing bad, hear nothing bad' path."

Audrey pondered. "So one path involves not meeting cousin at all, while the other requires learning from him but at the risk of compromising his loyalty... Why push him into such a situation?"

Lansius broke into a smile. "I need to know his tendencies when in power. The wise warn that power tends to corrupt, and absolute power corrupts absolutely."

The Baroness of Korimor nodded deeply before quipping, "Am I in danger then?"

Lansius furrowed his brows. "Why?"

"Because you're the most powerful person I know right now, and you said you're bad with temptations." Audrey grinned as she said it.

Lansius chuckled and retorted in a whisper, "I'll have you tonight."

"But we'll be in tents," she protested.

"No excuses."

Audrey shook her head, feigning trouble, but nodded in agreement. This led to a lighthearted banter that eased their tension on the slow march southwest.

Meanwhile, miles away from the main army, Dietrich was leading a forward scout team, establishing a surveillance net spanning almost half a day's journey. Behind him, Dame Daniella led a reactionary force.

Acting as the senior commander in the Lord's army, Sir Harold kept watchful eyes on the surroundings. He was concerned about remnants of the Nicopolans who might attempt to raid their baggage train. Although it was a slim chance, given that many feared the famed Black Lord and cowered at the sight of the Blue and Bronze banner, Sir Harold took no risks.

As a commander, his experience as a traveling knight proved to be invaluable. Well-versed in travel logistics, Sir Harold was adept at planning by utilizing available information and limited resources. Furthermore, during his brief tenure under Lord Lansius and Batu, Sir Harold had learned to be meticulous and paid great attention to detail.

He learned to utilize the scouts to their fullest abilities and to prepare an adequate reactionary force as a countermeasure. Sir Harold was also constantly on the lookout for safer routes and better places to camp each day. His experience shaped him into the type of commander whom opponents would find hard to catch off guard.

Together with Dame Daniella, Dietrich, and Sterling, they worked tirelessly to safeguard the main army from potential ambushes and unpleasant surprises.

And soon, they would encounter their first surprise on the march.

 

***

 

Chapter 99

Three Hills Visits

 

Three Hills

The Lord of Three Hills, Jorge, had summoned a war council to discuss the situation in Umberland. They had sent multiple armed parties to assess the situation. Jorge and his staff had personally little interest in the mountainous region, but now their survival depended on it.

If Umberland remained at the mercy of the Nicopolans, then thousands more armed refugees from Nicopola could arrive, with deadly consequences for Three Hills City.

"Our scouting group found Nicopolans camped in Ardia village," the Steward reported.

"That's close to our land. Do we know their number?" the Lord asked.

"The scouts believed it's almost a thousand."

Jorge drew a deep breath.

"Harvest is near; this could jeopardize everything," an old knight who was loyal to House Jorge lamented.

Sir Arius stepped forward. "I'll lead my contingent and the crimson knights to deter them from the village."

"The fame of the crimson knights might be enough to prevent the villagers from fleeing, but can we actually win the fight?" the old knight pondered.

Jorge gazed at Sir Morton, who replied, "If you wish, I could send a small contingent of Black Knights to accompany Sir Arius."

He nodded and walked to the large glass window. After observing the bustling cities below, he turned to his staff, asking with a hint of worry, "Do these Nicopolans really eat human flesh?"

The staff had no definitive answer.

Sir Arius, feeling the need to change the subject, asked the Steward, "What about the Lord of Korelia and Korimor? Any new report?"

The Steward hesitated for a moment. "We've received another report following the initial one, though I have my doubts about its accuracy. I'm waiting for further verification."

"What does the report say?" Jorge pressed.

"It indicates that the Lord of Korelia is advancing with a sizeable army."

This revelation caught everyone off guard. They had only recently heard of Lord Lansius' conquest of Korimor, a feat presumed to have involved a fierce battle against eight thousand Nicopolans, with Lansius commanding merely a thousand. His triumph in such a scenario seemed nothing short of miraculous.

"Could you repeat that?" Jorge asked, needing reaffirmation. Even he, who held Lansius in high regard, did not expect him to mobilize so soon after such a brutal fight.

"The Lord of Korelia is on the move," the Steward repeated and quickly added, "The report might be erroneous, though. Its contents are... hard to believe."

"What makes you think so?" inquired Sir Arius.

"The report claims the Lord of Korelia is leading over three thousand men, which seems exaggerated," came the response.

Instead of agreeing, Sir Arius flashed a grin and turned to the old knight beside him, who was once his mentor, "Do you think the Lord of Korelia might have incorporated the Nicopolans?"

The knight, with arms crossed, delved into deep thought. "It's a stretch, but not beyond the realm of possibility. He could have enticed them with promises of food or safety. However, the real challenges lie in how he would sustain them and the issue of their loyalty."

Sir Arius turned his gaze to Sir Morton, seeking his perspective.

Sir Morton, the Mage Knight, simply shrugged. "Incorporating former opponents into the ranks would require an overwhelming victory."

Reflecting on their last encounter in battle, Jorge let out a chuckle as he moved away from the window and returned to his seat. "That's precisely why he's the undisputed leader of this Grand Alliance," he mused thoughtfully.

The Steward implored, "My Lord, please, let's wait for confirmation."

Their discussion was abruptly cut short by the distinct sound of knocking. The door opened to reveal a weathered but unassuming figure, recognized as the head of their scouts. "My Lord, we've encountered the advance party of the Lord of Korelia. They assured us there's no cause for alarm. The Lord of Korelia plans to pass near Three Hills City to purchase winter gear," he reported.

He then added, "He'll be accompanied by a sizeable army and intends to encamp within a day's travel from the city to avoid causing any commotion. Still, we'll keep a vigilant eye on their movements."

Jorge barely concealed his amusement, shaking his head in disbelief. "He must be reading our minds," he commented, noting Lansius' apparent anticipation of their doubts.

Sir Arius and Morton were equally impressed by Lord Lansius' move.

The unassuming man discreetly took his leave, being unprivy to the ongoing discussion. Once he had departed, Jorge turned to his staff and inquired, "What should we do now?"

"Clearly, we must adhere to the etiquette befitting nobility. Let's extend an invitation and host a grand banquet in his honor," Sir Arius proposed.

"Any objections?" Jorge asked, turning his gaze towards the Steward, the old knight, and Sir Morton.

The three other staff members voiced no objections.

"What about Ardia village?" the Steward reminded the council.

"I'll go, but Sir Morton should stay," Sir Arius said. "Although I admire the Lord of Korelia, he's dangerous, and I want our Mage Knight close to My Lord at all times."'

This tale has been unlawfully obtained from Royal Road. If you discover it on Amazon, kindly report it.

Sir Morton gave a nod of acknowledgment as Lord Jorge inhaled deeply. "What difference does it make? If the rumors hold any truth, that man took Korimor in merely a staring contest. And now, he's triumphed over eight thousand with a mere thousand, also swelling his ranks to three thousand. What chance do we stand if he sets his sights on conquering us?"

His staff did not share Lord Jorge's nihilistic view, yet they shared his nervousness about the prospect of facing the Lord of Korelia again. The consensus was clear: he was far too formidable an adversary for direct combat. If one wished to challenge him, one would need to employ intrigue and uncover his weaknesses, and such strategies would undoubtedly require close proximity and time.

"If he could achieve so much with just a few hundred men... Now commanding three thousand, just imagine what he can achieve," Sir Arius observed thoughtfully.

"In that case, it would be prudent to divert his focus to Umberland," the old knight wisely suggested. Meanwhile, the Steward chose to withhold his opinion.

 

***

 

Three Hills, Lord Jorge

Five days had passed since they sent a messenger inviting Lord Lansius to the city. Sir Arius and his Crimson Knights had departed for Ardia village to counter the escalating Nicopolan activities. Today, the Lord of Three Hills attended the small council meeting. The Steward had swayed him into believing that Lord Lansius' army would only spell trouble for his domain.

"Even if harvest is as good as last year, we can only expect a marginal surplus. There won't be enough to feed thousands," the Steward stated.

Jorge leaned back in his chair. "I know that our granary is almost empty because of the last war, but there must be something we could do."

"My Lord, the city has only a little to spare," the Steward replied. They knew that the Lord wished to be supportive of Lord Lansius' cause. Yet, a sense of distrust lingered among them towards their supposed alliance leader, particularly regarding his abilities beyond the battlefield.

"What about trade?" the old knight tried to give counsel. With Sir Arius' absence, he was the only one who could, aside from the Steward. Sir Morton, though in attendance, seldom participated.

"After the fallout from the siege of Korelia, I doubt South Hill will be willing to assist us. Now, it depends on their merchants and whether they had enough harvest."

Jorge gazed thoughtfully at his Steward. The news of a significant Nicopolan presence within Lord Lansius' army had spread, sparking widespread fears that the approaching forces would either seek supplies or demand to purchase grain at low prices — both prospects equally worrisome.

Furthermore, with the harvest yet to begin, they anticipated that Lord Lansius' army might camp near the city, exerting pressure to meet their demands.

Like it or not, Jorge found these fears justified. Although he had grown to like and trust Lansius, his priorities lay with his domain. A famine could severely strain his rule, potentially even inciting dissent among his ranks. This concern was rooted in his past experiences; after all, it was precisely such circumstances that led to his loss of Korimor and South Hill. The haunting thought lingered in his mind that a similar fate might unravel his control over his last domain.

...

 

That very same day, an envoy accompanied by a squire from the Lord of Korelia arrived in Three Hills, bearing unexpected news.

"Lady Daniella!" Lord Jorge exclaimed, his surprise evident as he caught sight of her standing beneath the grand chandelier in the guest hall.

"My Lord, I'm relieved to see you well," Dame Daniella greeted warmly, recalling their time fighting under the same banner last season.

"The last I saw you was in the forest. I'm glad you made it out. How did you end up with the Lord of Korelia?"

"I wasn't captured. In fact, I was in Korelia when discussions about the Grand Alliance were underway. Now, I serve as the Lady of Korimor's knight captain."

Lord Jorge noticed the bright and good-looking squire behind her. Her change of allegiance unsettled him, yet he couldn't help but respect her rapid advancement, a testament to her new master's appreciation for talent and merit – qualities he cherished. Collecting his thoughts, he asked, "What message do you bring? Does it pertain to the invitation?"

"Yes, My Lord. The Lord of Korelia and the Lady of Korimor respectfully decline the invitation."

The reply took them by surprise. "But why? Where else will your Lord and Lady wait out the harvest if not in the city?" inquired the Steward. He had been hoping that they would stay in the city, separated from their army, which could potentially give Three Hills leverage over their decisions.

Dame Daniella responded with a smile. "My Lord believes that an army near a city creates unnecessary strain and tension. With the harvest not yet arrived in Three Hills, his appearance would only lead to price gouging and speculation, harming all parties, especially the community."

The Steward sighed in relief, realizing this was probably a good outcome. "Your Lord is wise to make such a decision," he acknowledged.

Meanwhile, Lord Jorge exchanged knowing glances with Sir Morton, who smiled faintly. Both were reassured of Lord Lansius' abilities.

"Pardon me," the old knight interjected, "You haven't answered: where will your Lord and Lady stay before the harvest?"

"My Lord, Lady, and the army aren't stopping," Dame Daniella revealed, causing a stir. She added, "They're heading south as we speak. I'm here to gather winter gear, spiced wine, and crossbow bolts."

"South? To South Hill?" Lord Jorge interjected.

"Yes, My Lord. They have unfinished business with the Lord of South Hill."

This left Lord Jorge and his staff dumbfounded. They were too focused on Umberland and their city.

"He has the pretext, but it's overly ambitious," the Steward protested. "What about Umberland?"

"The supplies are for Umberland," she explained.

"But you said they're marching to South Hill?"

"Yes, we expect quick results. The Lord and Lady likely celebrate the harvest festival in South Hill and then proceed to Umberland."

The Steward, caught off guard by the response, was rendered speechless. Meanwhile, Lord Jorge couldn't help but chuckle, deeming the idea audacious, almost to the point of absurdity. "Attacking South Hill and expecting a swift victory? That would be a jest if we weren’t talking about the Lord of Korelia," he mused, shaking his head in disbelief yet with undeniable fascination.

He continued, "I do hope Lord Lansius isn't biting off more than he can chew. Dame, must he not be weary from constant warfare? This would be, what, his third campaign this year? And now he's already plotting a fourth?"

"It's difficult to say," she responded thoughtfully. "The Lord of Korelia's victories, though hard-fought, only resulted in a small number of casualties."

The Lord of Three Hills nodded thoughtfully. "And what of his plan for South Hill?"

"Regrettably, I am not privy to that information. The Lord of Korelia is known for keeping his strategies close to the chest."

"I see..." Jorge nodded, acknowledging the careful nature of his ally.

"I am only aware of his plans concerning the upcoming grain deal," she disclosed.

"A grain deal?" the Steward interjected, his suspicions confirmed. "Are you intending to purchase grain to sustain the army?"

"After the harvest," she reassured him.

The Steward shot a glance at Daniella. "Even Three Hills doesn't produce such an excess. To buy enough grain to feed three thousand, essentially half a city's population through winter, would create an enormous burden."

Daniella turned to Sterling, prompting him to step forward. "As the personal squire of the Lord of Korelia, I must correct you, Maester. We are not here to beg for grain, but to offer assistance."

"Assistance?" the Steward responded with a hint of sarcasm.

"Pardon my directness," Sterling began, "but My Lord believes that, given the Nicopolans' strength and numbers, no nobleman in Lowlandia could single-handedly seize, fortify, and hold Umberland. Currently, we find ourselves in a precarious situation. Without additional support, even the spoils from South Hill would likely prove insufficient for the upcoming Umberland campaign."

This insight into Lord Lansius' thoughts captured everyone's attention. Lord Jorge gestured to the squire to continue with a wave of his hand.

"The Lord also confided that without the Grand Alliance, Three Hills would likely face costly wars against the Nicopolans alone. Thus, he trusts that his assistance will be welcomed with open arms. If this isn't the case, then I'll inform the Lord and Lady so they might reconsider their plan."

Lord Jorge exhaled deeply. While he was personally inclined to assist, Three Hills had limited resources to offer. Could he risk a famine to support Lansius in the Umberland campaign? Would his council even allow such a decision?

Not aiding Lansius might jeopardize their only chance against the Nicopolans' threat. Yet, supporting him risked inciting rebellion within his own ranks. Each option carried the risk of potentially catastrophic consequences.

Now, the fate of the Grand Alliance and Lowlandia hung precariously on Jorge's decision.

 

***

 

Chapter 100

False Messiah

 

Lansius

It was evening on the seventh day of their march. Soon, they would arrive at the closest point to Three Hills City. Since the main army was laden with the confiscated baggage train, almost everyone assumed the Lord would purchase food in Three Hills City and solve all their food problems. However, this was certainly an unrealistic hope.

"Why can't we just purchase food in Three Hills?" Audrey asked, alone with Lansius in their tent, waiting for Carla to bring their supper.

Lansius folded back a copy of his letter to Sir Justin in Korelia and tucked it into his pocket. "Well, we'll buy food from Three Hills, but not now. And certainly, it won't be enough to last the entire winter."

She looked surprised. "We don't have the money?"

"No, we have the money," he reassured her. "But if we purchase that much, then we will ruin Three Hills' economy, and I do not want to be hated by our potential ally."

Audrey furrowed her brows. Lansius had already briefed his staff on this matter, but only Sterling seemed to grasp the concept. The rest of the staff simply chose to trust Lansius' plan. Sir Harold had once said he would rather cut down a tree with a blunt axe than ponder what caused market prices to rise or fall. Although educated enough to avoid blaming merchants, he preferred to deal directly with farmers, bakers, and other producers.

Meanwhile, Sigmund would play ballads about shopkeepers and fair market ladies, yet excuse himself when asked about market matters. Carla would politely avoid discussions on the issue, claiming she was too busy ensuring security.

Aside from Sterling, perhaps only Dame Daniella could comprehend the issue, but she was busy managing the Nicopolan contingent and the camp followers. Thus, Lansius was glad that Audrey was genuinely trying to understand.

She'll be a good Baroness...

Lansius explained, "If we buy as much food as possible from the city, then food prices will rise sharply, right?"

Audrey nodded, understanding that much.

He continued, "If the food prices rise sharply, then how will the city folks and the poor buy food for the upcoming winter?"

"Ah," she exclaimed in understanding.

"Footmen, guardsmen, and their families, also less fortunate farmers or laborers who had a rough year. Moreover, they just suffered a major defeat in Korelia, so I assume many are in a bad position for this winter."

Audrey seemed to catch the general idea before she suddenly stared at Lansius.

"Why the gaze?" he asked.

She looked away. "Nothing. I am just surprised that you think that far. Even to worry about the life of people who are not even your subjects."

Lansius chuckled. "Am I crazy for thinking about them?"

Audrey crossed her arms and pondered. "That is beyond me. But that is probably why you are able to do all this. So don't let my words bother you."

"Drey, I trust you the most. Let me know if I'm going too far."

She tilted her head as if pondering. "I will try. But really, I am only good with a sword and horse, not words."

Carla entered the tent with her aides, bringing bowls of food from the field kitchen. Despite some expectations that the Lord would hold a daily feast like in the Great Hall, Lansius opted for a simple meal like common travelers to reduce the burden on his kitchen staff. Clearly, preparing for a feast during a journey was tremendous.

As the Lord set the example, his staff and army followed.

Unexpectedly, rumors began to swirl that the Lord and Lady were cleansing their spirits for the upcoming battle on behalf of the Nicopolans, who had gravely erred by consuming human flesh. These rumors found fertile ground as servants confirmed that the Lord and Lady subsisted on modest fare, akin to commoners. Consequently, many began to see them in a different light.

More than respect or admiration, those who had witnessed their impossible victories, seen the fruits of his labor and grasped his grand plans, grew deeply devoted to the cause. They congregated, driven not by monetary gain, the thrill of battle, or mere survival, but by a sincere desire to aid Lord Lansius in fulfilling his destiny.

Many believed he was marked for greatness. His black hair, once a symbol of foreignness and mistrust, had transformed into a revered omen from the Ancients. His wife, initially thought to be a mere squire but later revealed as a Baroness, was now perceived as an undeniable harbinger of greater destinies.

In Lowlandia, as in the rest of the Imperium where organized religion was abolished by the decree of the Ageless One, superstition still thrived. The people began to regard the Lord and Lady not merely as nobles, but as beings transcending ordinary mortals. Many speculated that the Lord might have the Grand Progenitor's blood in his veins.

...

 

Despite being on the move, the Lord of Korelia had received a fair amount of intelligence gathered from his long-range scouts, who traveled days ahead in the direction he had set. He wasted no time reading their reports whenever he could.

Based on their information, he contemplated sending his cavalry to march ahead. The decision needed to be made now before his intentions towards South Hill were laid bare. However, he was yet to receive reports from Three Hills, and currently it was still too early to expect a response from Korelia.

Audrey entered the camp and spoke, "We're going to break camp."

"Yeah, sure. I'm prepared," Lansius replied, checking his gear.

"What's the news from Dietrich?" she asked, cleaning her face with clean water from a copper basin.

"Lots of interesting facts. I might even need to alter the plan."

Audrey was piqued. "What changed?"

"South Hill is not only unprepared, but they're also in worse shape than I expected. Just like the captured men said, the Lord of South Hill has little redeeming quality aside from his tight grip on power."

"No surprise there," she said as Carla entered and began to pack the things inside the tent.

Lansius quietly approached Audrey's side. "What do you mean?"

This narrative has been purloined without the author's approval. Report any appearances on Amazon.

"He was once a knight under Lord Jorge and was trusted to defend South Hill, but he decided he was better than Jorge and led his House in rebellion..."

Lansius nodded, recalling the story of how Three Hills lost all the neighboring regions and how Lord Jorge was called the Fool of One Hill.

"Is this what you meant by 'power corrupts'?" Audrey asked.

"Oh, nice, you're learning fast. Indeed, power tends to corrupt. In the case of the Lord of South Hill, power revealed his true nature."

Audrey looked concerned.

"I doubt we're so blind as to misjudge Hugo that badly. Besides, his hold on power in Korimor is questionable, and his troops' loyalty is not to him," Lansius reassured her. "If you're that worried, you should stay behind," he teased.

She quickly furrowed her brows at the suggestion and exclaimed, "No. Titles are just names. I'd rather lose the city than not be by your side in battle."

Lansius chuckled and was about to praise her, but Carla was everywhere, packing for travel. He ended up taking Audrey's hand, guiding her to a folding seat, and caressing her shoulder. "Don't worry about Korimor. Focus on the problem ahead of us."

"South Hill then. What will you do to him?"

"It depends. If his defense is strong, then I'll extort what I can. If it's not..." He shrugged and quickly added, "Whatever we do, we only have limited supplies, and Three Hill's assistance isn't guaranteed."

Audrey uncharacteristically groaned and looked at the tent's ceiling. "Why is it always an uphill battle for us?"

Lansius patted her arm. "At least now we have the numbers. South Hill probably has less than a thousand men."

The revelation turned her frown into a smile.

 

***

 

Chateau de Cascasonne

The wind outside was raging, heralding the changing of seasons. Hannei stood alone, gazing out the window glass. Though Mages possessed the ability to see through the night like beastmen, she sought not to see anything but to appreciate the dark beauty of the night, which bore a certain void-like quality.

Memories of Bengrieve’s year-long, subtle interrogation still haunted her. The truth nectar had forced her to spill everything she knew about her world's history.

Bengrieve had shown keen interest in the Renaissance and the Victorian era, not just for the steam engine and industrial revolution, but also for the shifts in government model and its economy. In their meetings, the diminishing role of nobility and the concept of nationalism were also recurring subjects.

This was why Hannei had distanced herself from Lansius. The more she knew, the riskier it became. She realized she was just an ordinary girl with basic historical knowledge, whereas Lansius was a juggernaut who could recite 'The Art of War' and detail the campaigns of Julius Caesar and Genghis Khan.

She feared that Bengrieve could learn too much, endangering the Imperium and everyone.

Despite being favored amongst the retinue, Hannei didn’t fully trust Bengrieve.

The man isn't evil, just too powerful and cunning for his own good. 

That was why she was relieved when, two years ago, Lansius left a meeting with Bengrieve without arousing suspicion, not even needing to mention his amnesia. She was even more relieved when Lansius was sent to Lowlandia and ended up staying there.

Truthfully, even when escorting Felicity to Korelia, she had intended to keep Lansius at a distance to protect him from Bengrieve. Yet, her warnings about the situation outside Lowlandia drew them closer. Fortunately, their benefactor didn’t seem concerned. Somehow, Bengrieve hadn’t suspected anything about Lansius' origin.

The wind paused momentarily before returning with greater force, creating a howling sound as it swept past the towers.

Hannei shivered. Years had passed since she left the Progentia continent and its labyrinth. Now, she felt weak and aimless, drifting from task to task, trapped in the employment of a powerful Lord. She couldn't blame Calub, who had introduced them; she needed Bengrieve's protection.

She wasn't a member of the Mage Guild, and some powerful families might be tempted to use her. It was ironic that she felt safer in a continent filled with monsters than in one filled with humans.

"Should I sail east again and settle there?" she asked her reflection in the glass window.

Hannei had the means to live comfortably, but beyond the labyrinth, there was little else to do there. The region was dotted with small city-states along the coastlines, subsisting more on traditional fishing than trading.

Without skills in apothecary, crafting, or baking, starting a business seemed out of reach. This had been her dilemma before meeting Tia, the little girl now sleeping peacefully in her bed. Tia was intelligent and could assist her significantly in various tasks.

A thought struck Hannei: to ask Tia to leave everything behind and sail west. In a few years, Tia would complete her education. Hannei resolved to propose the idea after her graduation.

She would neither force nor manipulate Tia. If they were to leave for Progentia, it would be by the girl's own decision. In doing so, Hannei once again tied her fate to someone else's choice, just as she had done before: first to her savior and mentor, then to Felicity and Calub, and now to a little girl.

...

 

The evening before the Lord's departure, Bengrieve summoned Hannei to a private dinner with just them and a squire. They enjoyed a meal together, a change from their previous encounters, with Bengrieve treating her more amicably.

"The steward mentioned your inquiries about the current situation," Bengrieve began as they sipped their after-dinner drinks.

"I merely wish to learn, My Lord," Hannei replied.

Bengrieve smiled. "Ask away, Lady Hannei. You play an important role in my plans."

Hannei resisted the urge to furrow her brows. "I'm grateful, but I feel unworthy of being part of such an important plan."

"Don't play the fool with me," he said with a faint grin. "I march tomorrow, so indulge me with my request."

Hannei pondered for a moment. "About the Emperor. Is it true that the Ageless One is no longer in this world?"

Bengrieve's smile stiffened. "You know I keep a close watch on the military movements around the capital. Despite the crises in Nicopola and Elandia, there's been no movement."

Hannei nodded, recalling the briefing from the Steward. "But, My Lord, as you said, there's been no movement."

Bengrieve's pleased expression deepened. "No movement is a move in itself."

Only then did Hannei begin to grasp what he meant.

"No movement means the Imperial House cannot trust anyone with military command, fearing they might not relinquish control and potentially lead a coup."

Hannei felt a growing nervousness. "Is the Imperium heading into a succession war?"

"Lord Gottfried will ensure it. His forces should be crossing into Tiberia, and he won't stop until he reaches the Capital. That's the plan, assuming Midlandia commits troops to Elandia."

Hannei grew uncomfortable at the revelation. She wasn't privy to such information. "Does this mean we're cooperating with The Lord of Brigandia?"

"Cooperation implies a partnership, which can be misleading. We are simply doing what's natural for us: expanding. The Imperium is too vast for its own good; fortunately, that means there's no need to vie for supremacy. With other Lords, we can simply choose to coexist," Bengrieve explained.

Hannei swallowed hard, her mind racing.

Why is he telling me all this?

At this point, the lone squire sensed it was prudent to exit the room and did so quietly.

Hannei, noticing the squire's departure, asked, "My Lord, is it wise to entrust me with this insight?"

Bengrieve chuckled. "Things have happened and cascaded into this. Lady Hannei, now you play an important role."

"But my Lord, you promised to allow me to retire to my hometown," she reminded him nervously.

"And do what there? Waste your life? Marry? If you're considering marriage, how about Sir Stan?"

"My Lord, I have no desire to marry."

Bengrieve leaned forward, his hands on the table. "Are you sure? This may be a crossroad in your life."

Hannei, believing that marriage was the crossroad, shook her head. "My Lord, this servant does not wish to marry anyone."

Bengrieve's laughter unnerved her, as though he had anticipated her refusal. "Very well, I will honor your wishes," he declared.

She shook her head in panic. "No! My Lord, what do you mean?"

"You may not be the prime candidate, but you are equally perfect."

Her heart raced as she processed his words.

"Yes, this is all a blessing in disguise," Bengrieve mused, more to himself. "Did the Ancients orchestrate this for me? How devious and yet, marvelous!"

"My Lord, you're frightening me," she pleaded.

"Fear not, for you are the future leader of the Saint Candidate."

Hannei shuddered at the title. "Please, My Lord..."

Bengrieve's laughter echoed as he strode to the window and flung it open against the dark sky, proclaiming to the wind, "The Emperor is dead! Long live the virgin Saint Messiah!"

She stood, her hands trembling and her face pale with shock. In this world's language, there was no real equivalent to Messiah, and the term Bengrieve used was the one Hannei had chosen when she retold her world's history. "My Lord, what are you saying?"

Turning to her, Bengrieve explained, "We will transform Midlandia into a theocracy, mirroring one from your world's history. And how fitting that you shall be the leader."

Hannei felt weak and dropped into her chair.

Is this what he had planned for Audrey? To play as a false prophet? But why...?

She felt sick. Meanwhile, Bengrieve walked toward her and bent his knees, placing his hand over hers. "With you as the Messiah and me as the Prime Minister, we shall create a new kingdom in Midlandia."

The wind blew hard as if harboring warnings from the gods, yet Bengrieve was determined. "Imagine, an unshackled Midlandia Kingdom. We could lead the people to its full potential and achieve the unthinkable!"

With that declaration, Midlandia quietly cast the dice against the Imperium's survival.

 

***

 

Chapter 101

Dulce Bellum Inexpertis

War is sweet to the inexperienced

 

Fall of the Elven Calendar, 4425. Despite the ongoing succession crisis in Midlandia, at the behest of the Tiberia and Elandia provinces, which were struggling against Lord Gottfried's assault from Arvena, Lord Bengrieve decided to act, marching his troops to the border.

Externally, this action demonstrated Midlandia's loyalty to the Imperium. However, Bengrieve harbored a different motive. He had secretly entertained an open pact with Gottfried by agreeing not to wage war or compete against each other. Therefore, Midlandia's move towards Elandia was essentially an annexation, veiled as a relief force.

The catalyst for this decisive move was a critical piece of information: the Capital had not mobilized its army to resolve the Nicopolan crisis. Bengrieve interpreted the absence of military movement in the face of a major threat as a clear indication of the Emperor's demise.

This revelation emboldened and spurred Bengrieve to accelerate his plans for Midlandia. Even the absence of Audrey, the person he saw as most fit for the purpose, did not stop him. Bengrieve settled on Hannei as his future head of state—a figurehead for the theocratic rule he deemed most effective for controlling the masses.

Meanwhile, outside Midlandia, at least three other Lords saw through the Imperium's indecisiveness. Born into power and with little understanding of the horrors of war and the age of strife, these nobles maneuvered to advance their own agendas, treating the situation as nothing more than a game of politics.

Lord Gottfried had gained a foothold in east Tiberia and began spreading rumors that the Ageless One was dying and had been taken hostage by the High Lords. As refugees traveled westward to avoid the war, the rumors traveled with them. This way, Gottfried successfully sowed chaos among the Imperium's populace.

With Nicopola, Elandia, and now Tiberia engulfed in turmoil, the Imperium faced its darkest hours.

 

***

 

New Korelia

"Dear Lord and Lady, your vassal, Sir Justin, writes to report on the progress in Korelia. I hope this letter finds you well. The building project for Korelia is progressing smoothly. The city wall on the western side is beginning to..." The Marshal seemed to ponder about the correct words.

"To take shape?" Calub suggested, and Sir Justin motioned with his hand, prompting Cecile to write it down.

Sir Justin then waited for Cecile to catch up. "Now, what comes after the wall?" he asked afterward.

Calub massaged his temple. "Well, we have reports from the newly opened farms, its windbreaker, and windmill..."

"I think we also need to report about the orphanage, guild hall, and bazaar," Cecile commented while jotting in her waxed tablet.

"I guess we can report on the orphanage," Sir Justin mulled. "But there is almost little to no progress on the other two."

"We also have the mud houses for winter, the duck project, and the market posts," Cecile offered more suggestions.

Sir Justin whistled at the suggestions. "You know, when I learned Sterling had arrived I was overjoyed. I thought that I could just report all this verbally to him. So unfortunate that he left so soon to Korimor."

The other two chuckled upon hearing the confession.

"Well, he is with Anci, and he is always unpredictable," Calub commented, followed by Cecile, "Which reminds me, we have news of the coming of officials from the Capital and the noble patent."

Calub leaned forward. "I think we should write it down first since it is the most important. That and the grain shipment from White Lake and the East Lowlandia Merchants."

Sir Justin nodded in agreement. "As long as Cecile can keep track."

"Let me add that to the draft. What else?" she asked.

Sir Justin pondered. "I want to report that the military training for levied troops using crossbows is progressing smoothly."

Calub added, "The spinning wheel device the Lord ordered has also arrived. Also, Lord Robert had sent his staff to begin the work on his estate."

Cecile wrote what they had said on her wax tablet.

"There is also a... What should we write about the bathhouse?" Sir Justin asked with a big grin.

Calub chuckled. "A slight error?"

"A happy accident?" Cecile suggested.

The three chuckled at their own words.

"Don't worry, I shall take the blame," Sir Justin declared.

"No, you must not. I'm the one who gave the approval," Calub insisted.

Due to being overworked, both Calub and Sir Justin approved the Midlandia Mason guild's proposal to prioritize the watermill and bathhouse. The two had only seen the watermill, not realizing it was part of a package with the bathhouse. As it turned out, the watermill, aside from grinding grains into flour, also functioned as a water pump.

The guild that built it was highly specialized, having constructed hundreds in Midlandia. They brought finished cogs, axles, and gears from their workshop ready to be assembled. With the help of local carpenters and masons, they built the first watermill with ease.

Stolen from its rightful place, this narrative is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Developed in parallel with the watermill by another branch of the guild, the bathhouse's open-air section opened and quickly became an attraction. Although it lacked a heated section, essentially just an open pool, from day one it drew large crowds compared to its humble size. Visitors gladly paid for a respite in the clean pool and its sporting hall.

Rumors that the golden-haired Lady Felicity was visiting only sparked more interest. Women flocked to the bathhouse, eager to bathe their daughters in the same pool as the honored Lady.

With the bathhouse proving profitable, the guild planned to expedite the completion of its heated section, thereby transforming it into a full-fledged facility. However, a problem arose: Korelia's small forest couldn't meet the increasing demand for firewood. It barely supplied enough for the castle and townsfolk during winter. Moreover, the forest was privately owned by the Lord as a hunting ground.

Thus, one merchant group took the initiative and decided to import quality firewood from neighboring White Lake. When news reached Korelia that Korimor had been taken, another merchant group swiftly arranged a caravan to secure a firewood contract from that region.

The bathhouse inadvertently became the first economic powerhouse in New Korelia. It attracted two merchant groups, each vying to become the top supplier of firewood. Their quest for quality wood stimulated active trade routes between Korelia and two other cities, trading local goods and surpluses.

With each return journey, they also stimulated smaller economies along the way. Sensing an opportunity, villages and marches improved their inns and maintained stables to accommodate these merchants. Given the bathhouse's nearly year-round demand for firewood when it was completed, their regular visits were almost guaranteed.

The effect on the route to Korimor became even more pronounced. Traveling through Lord Lansius' new market post route, the merchants began to reap clear benefits from the available shelter, protection, water source, and hospitality. What was once a harsh and inhospitable route in the Great Plains turned into a bearable journey.

As for the tribesmen, after receiving their first guests, they began to recognize the profit potential. Coins, which were hard to come by, now flowed easily with each transaction. These coins were used as savings to purchase grains and secure their livelihood when the weather turned bad.

Thus, the tribes adapted to meet the travelers' needs. They put more work into making their renowned wool products, ranging from thick, durable socks that provided warmth on long journeys, to blankets woven with intricate patterns, offering not only comfort but a taste of tribal artistry.

Their woolen jackets, sturdy and weather-resistant, became a popular choice among the merchants and other travelers for their practicality in the often harsh climate.

Additionally, they boosted the production of mare milk wine, a local specialty, to be traded for high-quality, almost smokeless firewood. The humble firewood, originally only intended to meet the demands of the bathhouse, turned into an unexpected linchpin in a growing trade network.

...

 

Sir Justin

The Marshal strolled along the corridors with a relaxed gait, accompanied by his squire. His whistling brought forth a carefree, wandering tune that his little daughter liked. With Korelia now at peace, Sir Justin had invited his family from the safety of Midlandia. They were among the lucky few who had managed to escape from Arvena.

He couldn't wait to meet them and bring them to the manor house he had prepared. But before that, he planned to take them on a tour around Korelia. The new bathhouse was phenomenal, even boasting a private family section. The new bakery was also offering the latest patisseries trend from Midlandia.

As Sir Justin descended into the Great Hall with mind drifting to his family, a messenger was waiting for him.

"Marshal, a letter from the Lord," the man in weathered attire informed.

Upon hearing this, the Marshal couldn't help but smirk. "Talk about coincidence," he mused as he broke the wax seal and read the letter. Yesterday, he had just finished his report and sent it, and now the Lord had sent his own.

To Sir Justin, Marshal of the House,

I, the Lord of Korelia, command thee to release one hundred of the best-behaved men from South Hill that we have captured. Thou shalt send them to South Hill—

"South Hill!?" he exclaimed, gazing at the messenger. "You sent this from South Hill? By the Ageless, where is the Lord right now?"

The rider proudly answered, "By now, my Lord should have left the Three Hills region and is currently marching towards South Hill."

Hearing this, the Marshal burst into loud laughter, drawing the attention of the servants and other castle staff nearby. "Did you hear that?" he asked his squire. "The Lord isn't in Korimor anymore. He's on march, to South Hill."

The news amazed everyone and they began to crowd around. Meanwhile, his squire commented, "The Lord is certainly spirited. Then what should we do, Sir?"

Sir Justin returned to the letter at hand and muttered as he read, "You'll send them to South Hill with enough escorts and using horse carts or simple carriages as much as possible so they could reach South Hill with haste. You're also to pack a hundred crossbows and bolts for the future campaign..."

He nodded in understanding and said, "It seems we have our work cut out for us." He then drew a deep breath and called, "Squire."

"Yes, Sir."

"Summon Maester Calub, the Captain of the Guard, and the Stable Maester. Let's get to work. Lord Lansius is waiting."

 

***

 

South Hill

A young girl clad in simple brown garments, typically worn by the farming community, ran hastily along the dirt road, barefooted, her small brother's hand tightly in hers. Shouts and cries echoed from the direction of their humble home, but she did not dare look back. Her breaths soon failed her, yet she managed to put some distance between them and the Lord’s men.

Her brother pulled at his hand, feeling pain in his wrist. As they caught their breaths, a group of minstrels on a journey stumbled upon them.

“What happened? A bandit?” the closest man in flute and bright yellow garb asked.

Panting, the girl warned amidst her breathlessness, “Do not go there. The Lord’s men are at it again... Just now, they were beating our parents.”

The troupe, a motley crew adorned in colorful garb, turned tense.

The one who looked like a leader in red garb with a small harp slung across his back stepped forward and knelt. “Do not worry. You are safe with us. We'll protect you.”

Another member expressed his displeasure openly. "But why? What could provoke them to beat the peasant so close to harvest?"

“The lord demands more time spent on his lands, but our own fields... they are being neglected,” the girl boldly explained. “My brother and uncle went to Korelia and have not returned. We cannot tend to both, or our harvest... will fail.”

The red minstrel nodded solemnly, understanding the gravity of the situation. “Without a good harvest, there will not be enough food for winter.”

The girl nodded, her eyes darting back toward the direction of their home, fear and concern obvious in her gaze.

The leader motioned to his band. “I think we need to meet these men and play some music.”

Ruckus and lively banter appeared out of nowhere until one said, “Sigmund, are you sure?”

“What, you are going to let these lord's men to exact violence?” the red minstrel asked.

“No, but I do not want to get on the Lord and Lady’s bad side.”

The man named Sigmund smiled jovially and patted the sister and brother’s shoulders. “You see Dietrich. That is why we have them.”

“Oh, that's clever..." the ones named Dietrich nodded.

Sigmund smiled. “Kids, we will help your parents.” Then, to the rest of the group, “Men, onward. Don't let anyone escape.”

The men in bright clothing laughed and walked steadily with purpose. The children watched them, finding it bizarre to see a circus of colors with flutes and other musical instruments marching with determination and wide, sinister grins.

“But Maester, you are only minstrels,” she cautioned, while the boy continued to hide behind her.

“Don't worry, we are strong enough to handle bandits,” Sigmund replied.

“But the Lord has many men,” she warned them again.

The skald chuckled while Dietrich patted the girl's head and spoke, “No worries, soon we will have hundreds of friends. And tomorrow, probably more friends than you have learned to count.”

 

***

 

Chapter 102

Destination South Hill

 

Three Hills

The Lord of Three Hills treated Dame Daniella and Sterling as their guests and allowed them to stay in a guest house in the scenic part of the city. It had been almost a week, but the Lord of Three Hills still postponed their decision. The indecision was not expected, but not entirely surprising.

Fortunately, the envoy was allowed to conduct their business while waiting. Thus, Dame Daniella and Sterling had reviewed the city's bustling market for items Lord Lansius wished to procure.

Aside from grain which would come later after harvest, other foodstuff, and winter gear, the Lord also wished to purchase all kinds of backpacks for his army. His requirements were that the backpack should have two straps for each shoulder and a third to be tied around the waist. All the straps should be adjustable. The bag should be large enough to accommodate two helmet-sized objects and be capable of being securely tightened or closed.

As for the materials, there were no specific requirements. He accepted leather, canvas, or even woven baskets, as long as they fit his criteria.

Diligently, the two browsed the workshops and market, made purchases, and more often, ordered items to be tailored to their specifications. Throughout their negotiations, they were careful not to reveal the true quantity they were buying to prevent price increases.

Slowly but surely, the two amassed a considerable stockpile of goods, stored in the guest house and its stable. The Dame arranged for more storage space, and the guild readily rented her an empty warehouse.

Without wasting time, they began inspecting the building, as they had two cartloads of goods awaiting unloading.

"What do you think?" Dame Daniella asked Sterling beside her.

"Big double doors, wide enough for a cart. Brick walls, no holes, and not too damp. I think it's a good place," Sterling replied.

She nodded and motioned for her Nicopolan men to inspect. "Check the locks, attic, larder, and look for signs of rats," she instructed.

They nodded and proceeded. Her lieutenant returned and said, "We're going to need blankets. It's unsafe to leave a warehouse unguarded. Also better procure a cat."

Daniella agreed. "Yes, it would be shameful for all parties involved if our warehouse was compromised by vermin or thieves."

"Then I shall take three men and sleep here tonight. Is that arrangement satisfactory, Dame?" the lieutenant asked.

"No worries, I doubt the Lord of Three Hills intends any harm to me. However, our goods are another story. You should take more men from the guest house. "

Despite their caution, news had spread about a party stockpiling a significant amount of long-lasting food, winter gear, and bags, enough to supply a village. Although they were not worried about price increases after placing their order, they couldn't shake off the concern that this might attract thieves or other unsavory characters.

Sterling climbed into the cart to take a peek and said, "But these are just wool coats, boots, woolen foot wraps, and bags. I don't see them as highly valuable items."

Daniella looked at him, deciding to educate him. "There's a simple trick to make them valuable."

Sterling furrowed his brows. "A trick to make these valuable? Is that even possible?"

The lieutenant grinned, seeing the squire's confusion, and revealed, "It’s actually simple. Take enough and spoil the rest."

"Spoil the rest?" Sterling's eyes widened as he understood the implication.

Daniella explained, "Mercenaries deal with this kind of thing. Creating scarcity is a tactic. Once, a Nicopolan legion was ordered to burn a ripened field of barley, so those who stockpiled beer could sell it at higher prices."

Sterling looked disgusted, and the lieutenant patted his back. "You should learn as much as possible from us. The world isn't just about honor and duty. To truly protect your Lord, you must be prepared to face the dirty underbelly."

"The bigger the city, the higher the nobility and its rich merchants, the nastier it gets," Daniella added.

Sterling nodded thoughtfully. "Even as a squire, I realized that people also fight in underhanded ways."

"Such is the world," the lieutenant smiled wryly. "Now, with me stuck in here, please kindly escort the Dame back to the guest house. It's almost sundown."

"Nah, I'll stick around," Daniella declared. "Go gather some food, lanterns, and blankets for the night. I'll be here, keeping watch until you return."

The lieutenant chuckled lightly. "I only wish to take some of the old man's role, but I'll heed your command."

Daniella offered a grateful smile, yet gestured for him to hasten his preparations. He nodded and departed with another man, leaving her with Sterling and a few men.

"The old man?" Sterling asked after the lieutenant's departure.

Daniella looked at Sterling with a soft expression. "He was more than a friend... Not blood-related, but he raised and cared for me like a family. He passed away in Korimor, just before we set off on our march."

"My apology, Dame, and my condolences."

"Apology not required. He passed away peacefully a few nights after my knighthood ceremony. I hope he's at peace now, considering all he endured for my sake."

Sterling paused, choosing his words carefully. "Dame, these might seem like just comforting words, but as a squire and servant, I believe he was truly content to see you achieve knighthood and forge your own path."

Daniella nodded, her gaze drifting to the orange sunset nearing the high walls of Three Hills. "I've made many mistakes. How I wish I had heeded his advice more."

Sterling reflected quietly. Throughout his two years of service, he had encountered and observed many great individuals. Yet, behind their success and fame lay a trail of sacrifices and losses. Dame Daniella had mourned the loss of a father figure; Sir Hugo had delayed his marriage by another year; Sir Justin had been away from his children for two years; and perhaps most tragic, Cecile and Claire had lost their father.

As conflicts and turmoil persisted, both minor and significant sacrifices continued to be made. Sterling knew this all too well, having served alongside the late Sir Callahan and nearly made the ultimate sacrifice himself.

If you stumble upon this narrative on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

"Dame, is it all worth it?" Sterling asked, his tone free of malice or judgment.

Daniella was piqued. "What is worth it?"

"The sacrifices we've made... Will peace really come to Lowlandia?"

The Dame offered a gentle smile. "Peace often comes at a steep price, but without it, there's only sorrow."

Sterling took her words to heart, valuing the insights of someone who had journeyed from noble birth through anonymity as a runaway, to a life as a mercenary, and finally to knighthood. Despite having known her only since the beginning of this march, he had grown to respect her unique perspective.

 

***

 

South Hills

At 51 years old, Gunther, the ruler of South Hill was still younger than the Lion of Lowlandia, yet his service in numerous campaigns for the Three Hills had left him scarred with wounds. These experiences did more than age him; they rendered him both vicious and brutal to those who opposed him.

Worse, two years ago, an old wound on his thigh became so painful that he needed crutches to walk. He turned to undiluted wine and small doses of poppy milk for relief, which led to emotional outbursts and sometimes even erratic decision-making.

Despite all this, Gunther still ruled with an iron hand, supported by his competent family who used their extended kin as knights and lieutenants to maintain their grip on power. However, there was no denying that the last campaign for Korelia was a grand fiasco and had become a challenge for his rule and prestige.

The coalition had been brokered by Lord Omin of Korimor to unite and repair relations with the Three Hills. Gunter had been a knight under Lord Jorge before he rebelled ten years ago. Officially, it was due to Jorge's incompetence, yet it was clear he seized the opportunity when entrusted with South Hill Castle.

Even in his old age, the Lord of South Hill felt no remorse. Gunther only intended to serve a worthy lord and would not say no to an opportunity. He had always lived by that creed.

But, as it turned out, Korelia wasn't an opportunity but a complete loss.

For weeks, only stragglers returned home. Out of almost two thousand, less than four hundred survived. The Great Plains had claimed their lives. Even for the natives, the vast expanse of the plains made it all too easy to become disoriented and perish from thirst.

The news came as a surprise, yet Gunther chose to ignore it. His indifference was not born out of foolishness, but from a deep-seated readiness to sacrifice them. He was rather pleased that his contingency plan, which involved sending only levies along with a hundred ambitious, non-blood-related officers, had proven useful.

Despite the huge loss, his smaller but competent men-at-arms were largely unscathed. Thus, he had little concern for external or internal threats. Not even the new acting Lord of Korelia's veiled threat of a Grand Alliance could sway his stance.

With his spies reporting that the Lord of Korelia was personally fighting in Korimor, he felt assured that South Hill would be safe for several more years. This would be enough time to build a significant force to deter sieges. For that, he needed to stockpile arms and supplies.

"Surely not even this Lansius can win battle after battle without replenishing his men and resources," Gunther muttered to himself as he walked through his fruit garden with the help of a crutch, a favored pastime.

"There," he pointed to a low-hanging fruit, its skin a vibrant mosaic of yellows and green. His servants promptly picked the succulent fruit for him, gently cleaning it in a bowl of water to reveal its glossy, sun-kissed surface. They then presented it on a silver platter.

Despite the pain, he forced himself to sit on the grass and let them place the tray beside him. He tasted the golden-yellow-fleshed fruit. It was sweet and aromatic. "It's a good fruit," he complimented the tree and its caretaker.

The caretaker bowed deeply, and the Lord motioned for the fruit to be shared among his guards and servants. While violent towards those who wronged him, he treated his servants with respect.

He was about to ask his servants for assistance to stand when the head guard appeared.

"What is it? You look bothered, and I don't like it," Gunter remarked.

"My Lord, there's a slight issue. I request permission to take some men and riders out."

"Explain," he said while still sitting on the grass.

"A small group of men is missing after inspecting a village to our north."

"Hmph, they probably indulged too much," he said, shifting his weight to the other leg to lessen the pain.

"It's been four nights, My Lord."

Gunther sighed, conceding, "Then it might be a prelude to a peasant rebellion."

"My Lord, I assure you, it's probably nothing."

"Then go and see it with your own eyes and report back. Take enough escort but don't mobilize the troops."

The head of the guard bowed and left, leaving the Lord to ponder the possibility of a peasant rebellion. "I've already lost so much, and now I might lose even more peasants," he lamented over the potential loss of productivity in his lands.

To him, peasants were too cunning for their own good. On multiple occasions, they were found slacking, failing to fulfill their end of the bargain. Left unsupervised, they would even harvest the best crops for themselves from the communal fields, leaving the lesser produce for the Lord.

Now, with the failed campaign resulting in fewer men to work the fields, he suspected the peasants would stir up trouble.

While Gunther could accept some loss in yield, the peasants prioritizing their land over his felt like an insult. Harvest was approaching, and the fields left late for harvesting would surely be infested with vermin, potentially wreaking havoc on the entire region. Sooner or later, he would need to discipline them again with an iron grip.

 

***

 

Lansius

The Lord of Korelia stood inside the spacious tent as the first light of dawn cast a soft glow across the landscape. He leaned over a copper basin filled with water. With caution, he cleaned his face using the cool water, the chill more than enough to wake him.

Audrey, already clad in her marching gear, entered the tent and watched him with an alert gaze.

"I'm awake, just give me a minute to dress," Lansius remarked, reaching for a cloth to dry his face.

Without waiting, the Baroness of Korimor approached and helped him dress.

"You don't have to—"

"All my life I've been a squire, and last I checked, I'm still your squire. You've made me a consort—"

"Wife," he corrected her.

Audrey smiled and continued, "Wife and Baroness, but that doesn't mean I shouldn't help you dress."

"Gratitude," he said warmly as she diligently made sure that he wore his arming jack properly underneath the traveling attire, with the belt fastened enough to make it comfortable but secure.

"There, all set. Now what's left is just the armor."

"I think we can still skip the armor today." Even this close to South Hill, they remained undetected by the enemy. Their decision to use the nomads' route instead of the normal one, combined with Lansius' clever use of disguised scouts, enabled them to gauge the enemy's reactions effectively. So far, there had been no abrupt military movements.

"I'll make sure Carla is ready with your cuirass. Although we've made it this far, the castle is just two days away."

Lansius nodded, while his senses were admiring his wife's gentle side.

"Anyway, Lans. Congratulations."

He squinted. "For what?"

"Well, I'm glad you're doing fine despite all the marching. This is the first time you've arrived somewhere without getting sick or becoming an annoyance."

He grinned at her direct honesty and quipped, "Then kiss me, or I'll become a major annoyance."

Audrey shook her head but drew him closer with both arms and kissed him without hesitation. Just then, Carla entered with her aide carrying breakfast. Seeing their masters, they quietly retreated.

"No, come back," Lansius instructed, half-chuckling. "It's just a morning kiss."

That small innocent event spread quickly through the camp. For their men, the behavior of their Lord and Lady was a reassuring sign that the campaign was progressing smoothly.

Despite the weariness from long marches, the bruises, and calluses on their feet, thousands of men surprisingly found some enjoyment in the march. There was dust and pesky horse flies, but the weather was generally pleasant. Moreover, seeing the yellowing crops from afar, they were content, knowing the answer to their plight might be just ahead.

...

 

"The question is, how should we approach this? Do we send an envoy to announce our arrival and make our demands?" Sir Harold asked as they convened after breakfast.

"Wouldn't that just squander the element of surprise?" Audrey remarked.

Lansius let out a satisfied smirk, pleased to see that the concept of surprise attack had become second nature to her.

Sir Harold chuckled. "Despite our past victories, it's actually against noble decorum."

Lansius decided to comment, "Last I heard, I'm seen as a barbaric foreigner and a Lord wannabe. So I might as well play the part."

The tall knight's chuckle grew louder.

Carla appeared in the tent doorway. "Urgent message from the forward scouts," she announced.

"I guess we've been discovered," Audrey commented, causing Carla to tense up.

"Let's not jump to conclusions. Please invite the messenger inside," Lansius instructed, without any hint of urgency.

Audrey was piqued by his uncharacteristic calmness. "Are you planning something?"

Lansius almost chuckled at the thought. "No, but what's there to fear? For the first time, we have numerical superiority. If they want to come," his tone turned serious, "let them."

 

***

 

Chapter 103

Hearsay

 

Two-day distance from South Hill Castle

The messenger dressed in bright clothes but covered with an inconspicuous brown traveling coat entered the tent, knelt, and reported, "My Lord, My Lady, a message from Dietrich."

"Speak," Lansius instructed.

"We rescued children and their families from rampaging guardsmen, capturing six men. None have escaped. That's the message from Dietrich. He also ordered us to bring two of the most cooperative captives to you, under escort, for questioning."

Lansius nodded but refrained from commenting.

"When did this happen?" Sir Harold inquired.

"Four days ago Sir. It took us three days to find you."

"Have they discovered our intentions?" the knight continued.

"No, Sir, at least not yet. The villagers are mostly on our side, and they believed the story that we're armed because of bandits."

Audrey asked, "I ordered Dietrich not to make contact. Why did he break the disguise?"

"Maester Sigmund encountered children on the run and took pity on them."

Audrey gazed at Lansius, who nodded once. "We'll record his mistake in the book, but that comes later. Sooner or later, we'll make contact, and this might be as good a reason as any." Then, turning to the messenger, "Tell me, what's the village like?"

"My Lord, the village is sizable, with at least a hundred families."

That's quite a big community, especially in Lowlandia...

His original plan was to catch South Hill unguarded, block it from requesting reinforcements, and then send an envoy to stall for time while his army made ladders from the nearby woodlands. The discussions, despite having a fair chance of succeeding given the size of his army, would likely fail. When that happened, Lansius planned a continuous day and night assault on the castle, as a form of exercise before Umberland.

Of course, this plan was merely an initial strategy until he could gather more information about his opponent, understand the situation, and study the topography to formulate a better approach. He had learned about Lord Gunther and his character but had yet to find anything concrete about his military style or capabilities.

However, Lansius now felt he might have stumbled upon an unexpected prize. While he was certain that South Hill wouldn't attack to save a large farming village, he believed he could potentially provoke them into doing so. He gazed squarely at the messenger. "Is it situated on a hill, or does it have any wide river or marshland nearby?"

"We didn't find any hill. There's a river, but it isn't wide, and there's no marshland. However, there is a forested area nearby."

Lansius thought of a plan. "Along your travel on the usual route, did you encounter any other villages as large as this one?"

"We seldom found anything larger than small communes; they hardly have a tavern, let alone an inn."

Lansius nodded and remained silent for a while before saying, "Sir Harold."

"Yes, My Lord."

"Interrogate the captured men for me. Ask them about the number of men-at-arms in their Lord's service, and who's in charge of the military. Are they bold or confident? Do they gamble or like to boast? Do they like hunting or riding? I want to know what they are like, their likes and dislikes. I want to know everything."

"With pleasure." The knight smirked, recognizing that the Lord was concocting a plan.

 

***

 

A Village north of South Hill

Two days after the messenger had brought the captured men to the Lord's encampment, things took an unexpected turn. Contrary to what Sigmund had predicted, the Lord didn't march his army to the village. Instead, he divided his forces unevenly into two groups, keeping them hidden away from any villages.

Before midday, the Lord, disguised as a wealthy merchant, entered the village in a carriage, accompanied by a group of muscular, dangerous-looking packhorse drivers, porters, and caravan guards. Their arrival was met with surprise and a mixture of suspicion and coldness.

Soon, Dietrich and Sigmund recognized who was inside the cart and rushed to greet them, albeit in panic.

"My—" they both started, then exchanged a glance, unsure how to address the couple since it was obvious that the Lord and Lady were in disguise.

Lansius waved them closer to the carriage window. "I'm Jans, and my wife is Jean. Easy to remember, right?"

"Yes, My—" Dietrich began but found himself unable to continue.

Quickly, Sigmund intervened, "We mean, yes, Maester Jans and Jean. So good to see you."

Audrey gave a small nudge of acknowledgment from inside the carriage.

Not to waste time, Lansius inquired, "Does this village have an inn?"

"Yes, it does. Please follow me," Dietrich quickly motioned to the coachman.

After the interaction, the villagers gazed at the convoy of carriages and carts, laden with goods, with newfound curiosity. The guards escorting them, common in protecting merchants, were notably well-armed, disciplined, and sophisticated in appearance.

"Carla," Lansius called to a woman riding a conspicuously fine horse.

She nodded slightly in her saddle. "Yes, Master."

"Split our group into three. Two should keep watch on the village's edge, particularly the road leading to the castle. Keep your group close to the inn."

"Understood," Carla responded.

Audrey leaned toward the window. "Inform the lieutenants to allow their men to buy drinks and food, but to avoid causing trouble."

"Anything else, Master?" Carla inquired.

After a brief exchange of glances with Lansius, Audrey replied, "No, that's all for now. Best to keep things simple."

Carla nodded, signaling to the lieutenants, also in disguise, to gather around her.

...

 

The inn in the village was so small that the merchant convoy in disguise ended up renting the entire place after negotiating a discount. Lansius himself haggled the price while listening to the innkeeper's stories about the village and the region, all over a large order of food and drinks.

After a modest but merry lunch, they convened in the upstairs hall for a private meeting.

"The innkeeper looks happy," Dietrich commented, sitting on the floor. There were no chairs, as the hall was intended for sleeping, with travelers typically bringing their own bedrolls or simply sleeping with their jackets over their heads.

If you spot this narrative on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

Lansius and Audrey's entourage ensured that folding seats were available for the Lord and Lady, but they too chose to sit on the wooden floor, out of habit. "So, what's the latest situation?" Lansius asked.

"My Lord, have you questioned the men we've sent?" Sigmund inquired.

Audrey's small chuckle drew the attention of the others. Since it would be impolite to question the Lady directly, Dietrich and Sigmund turned to Carla, who sat near the window to observe their surroundings.

Carla glanced at Lansius, who sighed deeply but nodded. She then explained to the two, "After the captured men realized they were in front of the Lord of Korelia, they were so frightened that they groveled on the ground, pleading for their lives."

Sigmund and Dietrich grinned rather sheepishly.

"Are any of you responsible for this?" Lansius asked.

"How could it be possible for us to spread such fear? Methinks, O Lord, your reputation in battle hath spread far and wide. Thus, even at the utterance of thy name, their courage doth falter and their bravery loseth its spirit," Sigmund praised.

"Oh, shut it," Lansius said, dismissing the praise. He understood it was natural for people to fear him, especially after the Battle of Korelia, where he had executed ambushes, fire tactics, and utilized nomadic cavalry. Despite this, he couldn't shake the suspicion. "Someone is fabricating bad stories about me."

Audrey shifted in her seat, uncomfortable with her disguise, before leaning toward him, "It's probably people who survived the battle of Korelia. It's only common for people to embellish stories of their victory or defeat."

Lansius could only nod.

"Is it really that bad?" Dietrich asked Carla, who replied, "One was even sobbing hard and wet his pants."

Lansius sighed at his growing infamy, fully aware that as tales of his victory in Korimor and his handling of the three envoys spread, his name would be further tarnished in scandal. "By the Ageless, just what are they saying about me?" he lamented.

"The gossip is wild—" Dietrich started but stopped abruptly under the Baroness's stern gaze.

"Go on," Lansius urged, but Dietrich only shook his head and muttered, "It's not good. I'd rather not say."

Lansius exhaled deeply before deciding it was time to focus. "Sigmund," he called.

Sensing the change in tone, Sigmund straightened his back. "Yes, My Lord."

Lansius retrieved something from his inner pocket, placed it on the floor, and revealed a blank parchment. He then took a charcoal stick and began to draw on it. "Imagine this is the village. Now, where is the route to South Hill Castle? Are there other hamlets along the way? Any rivers, large farms, or orchards nearby?"

 

***

 

South Hill Castle

Undetected by Dietrich's men or the villagers, the South Hill senior guard and his men had successfully infiltrated the village outskirts and apprehended three men. From them, they learned about the suspicious traveling minstrels who had attacked the guardsmen. Sensing something was off, they decided to return to the castle with the three men in tow.

"Minstrels?" Lord Gunther shouted upon hearing the report during his court session. "Your men got captured by men with flutes and gitterns?" He burst out laughing.

The senior guard tried to explain, but an intoxicated Gunther chose to be merry, jesting, "Beware thee, for my zither is mightier than yer sword?!"

The Lord's uncharacteristic reaction provoked laughter from his entourage. The senior guardsman could only shake his head and decided to get a drink instead.

"Better to deal with minstrels than a peasant rebellion," the steward reassured him.

"They captured my men," the senior guard grumbled. "Their wives and uncles keep asking me about them."

The steward patted his colleague's shoulder and intervened. "My Lord," he began, "won't this incident become an embarrassment later on?"

"Yes, it will," the Lord unexpectedly revealed, capturing everyone's attention. "It could even encourage the peasants to consider rebelling against our rule," he added.

"Then what should we do?"

The Lord chuckled and, without missing a beat, said, "It's just a village and men with flutes. Just send thirty men, and it'll be over. No need to embarrass ourselves further by overreacting."

The staff and the senior guardsman nodded, satisfied with their Lord's decision.

 

***

 

Northern Village

With help from Dietrich and Sigmund, Lansius completed the crude map. There were two routes leading to South Hill City and Castle: one direct path through open plains and a longer one passing through several hamlets. Unfortunately, there were no forests, marshland, or a body of water until South Hill City itself.

"Hmm..." Lansius rubbed his chin, finding no convenient place to position his troops for an ambush.

"Finding no good place to hide the troops?" Audrey inquired.

Lansius was pleased that his wife was starting to share his penchant for tactics. "That, and more importantly, I can't find anything to use as bait."

Dietrich observed quietly. A bold and brave cavalryman, he was not as adept at planning.

Sigmund, more comfortable with speaking out, put down his prized small harp to his side and suggested, "Can't we use the harvest as bait, as we did with the Nicopolans?"

"I doubt that'll work. The Nicopolans were desperate to alleviate their hunger, but South Hill, from what we've gathered, is well-stocked," Lansius explained.

Audrey recalled a quote, "A good castle always aims to have enough to last through winter and spring."

Hearing that, Dietrich scratched his head while Sigmund pondered.

"Time to be bold? Maybe we should start making ladders now," Audrey suggested.

Lansius exhaled sharply. "That's a last resort. I still want to avoid unnecessary bloodshed. Attacking a well-stocked and fortified castle is a bad idea. Any other suggestions?"

"The situation seems tough," Dietrich admitted.

Lansius clasped his hands behind his neck and stretched his back to relieve the tension. "We're running out of time," he warned his staff. "Soon, South Hill will send another group to search for their lost men. If we don't act now..."

Audrey filled in, "They'll detect our presence and will begin to barricade their castle."

Silence fell over the room, with only the muffled noises from the kitchen downstairs audible.

What Lansius aimed for was to bait a large portion of the South Hill garrison or even capture some of their key staff. If successful, this strategy could likely force them to capitulate, or enable Lansius to storm the castle with minimal casualties.

"We can also rule out using a ruse," Sigmund commented. "Everyone says Lord Gunther is cunning, even crafty, and suspicious by nature."

"He also doesn't like gambling and isn't superstitious," Lansius added.

Their initial expectations, based on word of mouth from sources outside of South Hill, turned out to be mere hearsay. While they had heard that the Lord of South Hill was old and violent, it emerged that his subjects viewed Lord Gunther as devious yet respectful, cunning, and possessing a strong sense of justice.

Looking up at the ceiling, Lansius noticed cobwebs and dirty wood beams. He had come here hoping to find something that would bait Gunther into sending his troops, but seeing the village for himself, he realized it was large yet mostly poor, offering little of value aside from its crops.

"My Lord," Audrey called, and from her tone, Lansius knew she was about to say something serious.

"Yes?"

"Servius isn't here," she began calmly. "But even if he were, I doubt he would say no to your original plan to assault the castle."

Lansius gazed at his wife and felt her warm, almost reassuring gaze. "If I sacrifice the Nicopolans to gain a castle, then what's the difference between me and Sergio?"

Audrey's gaze intensified. "Sergio is dead. Daniella and Servius killed him. Meanwhile, the two only speak praises about you."

"It's not about that," Lansius muttered. What he meant was whether it was morally right to send people to their deaths if there were other means. However, for this era, such a concept was almost alien as sacrificing lives in battle was commonly accepted and part of their culture.

"My Lord, apologies for interrupting, but what My Lady said is true. Even in ballads, the hero doesn't always find a weakness. Sometimes, the strength of men is needed."

Lansius gave no answer.

"Should I summon Servius and end this speculation?" Audrey offered.

"No," Lansius rejected the idea firmly. "There will be days when all we can rely on is brute force, but today is not that day."

The room looked at him with anticipation, even Carla paying close attention.

"You have another plan in mind?" Audrey looked impressed.

"Two," Lansius revealed. "They're risky, but I have two other ways to win without attacking the castle."

"Tell us," Audrey urged.

"One option is straightforward. Appear at the castle and lay siege, but don't attack. Just wait for the harvest, take what is ours, and then leave South Hill."

"Ah," Audrey exclaimed. "Indeed, our goal is to acquire supplies, not necessarily to win the castle."

Meanwhile, Sigmund expressed skepticism. "My Lord, to march this far with such a large army and not capture the castle... My apologies if this sounds rude, but it seems like a failed campaign. It could affect My Lord's reputation."

"I know." Lansius drew a heavy breath. "It's also a wasted opportunity. Our pretext probably only allows us one chance to take South Hill, and personally, I don't want to squander it."

"Not wanting to squander this chance, but also not wanting to assault the castle," Audrey mused, feeling the contradiction. "Wait, you said there are two ways. What's the second one?"

"The second one..." Lansius hesitated. "Let me tell you this first. More than just provision or the castle, we need South Hill to protect The Grand Alliance from famine."

His words captured everyone's attention.

The Lord continued, "Korelia is strategic but doesn't produce enough food. Trade with Eastern Lowlandia is risky and unreliable. The surplus from Korimor will be used to support Umberland, which I foresee will consume a lot of resources for years to come."

Dietrich, finding this a bit odd, voiced his concern, "But South Hill is too far from Korelia."

"But not from Three Hills city, our biggest ally," Lansius reminded the cavalryman. "If we control South Hill, then Three Hills would be able to support us more, both in terms of the campaign for Umberland, or trade with Korelia."

Audrey leaned closer and asked, "If South Hill is this important, then why haven't you revealed this to anyone?"

"Because... I feared my own staff would push me to commit to an assault," Lansius revealed his concern.

Audrey was taken aback, realizing the words were also directed at her. She turned to Dietrich and Sigmund, who both shook their heads earnestly. Sigmund pleaded, "My Lord, My Lady, we would never do such a thing. I doubt even your knights would dare."

Turning back to Lansius, she said, "My Lord, your control over us and our trust in you is absolute. Please, have more faith in us."

Lansius hadn't expected such a strong response and couldn't help but break into a smile. "If everyone feels the same, then perhaps the second plan will work..." His words trailed off, but nobody dared to interrupt.

Then, with a decisive tone, he declared, "There's still enough time. Let's prepare the plan for tonight's battle."

"A battle?" Dietrich was the first to react.

"Yes," Lansius confirmed, a chuckle in his voice. "Tonight, we'll be battling hundreds of bandits in this village."

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

Chapter 104

Skirmisher

 

South Hill Castle

The supper feast in the Great Hall was lively, especially so close to harvest season. While wheat and rye were yet to be harvested, the wild animals in the forest had fattened and the fruits in the orchards had ripened. Moreover, the barley, harvested half a season earlier, was now ready to be consumed.

The ale had been malted and fermented to perfection. It was rarely aged but consumed fresh to avoid spoilage. Along with plenty of food and good drinks, there was also music to keep everyone entertained.

Despite what happened to the two thousand men in their disastrous campaign to Korelia, hardly anyone here was bothered. Everyone was either a firstborn or one of the fortunate with ties to Lord Gunther. They considered themselves the elites of South Hill society, and the failure of the officers who led the Korelia campaign only inflated their egos further.

They lived well, dining on white bread, fresh meat, puddings, and good ale. Born affluent, the concept of famine was alien to them. In their view, famine was merely a consequence of peasant stupidity and laziness, a byproduct of weak discipline. These little landlords and their cohorts, who never tilled the land in their lives, ironically believed their role in life was to enforce obedience among the populace so that work on the land and tax obligations were fulfilled.

Amidst the lively laughter, a guardsman approached and leaned in to whisper to the senior guard at his table. The head of the guard appeared stunned and glanced at his men, who nodded to confirm the news.

"Has something happened?" the steward beside the senior guard inquired, taking a bite of ripe, yellow-fleshed fruit.

"I'm not sure at this moment, but I'll inform you if there’s cause for concern. Please enjoy the feast."

The steward nodded, and the senior guard rose and headed to the door, excusing himself as others inquired.

...

 

The next morning, the senior guard and the steward awaited the Lord in front of his chamber. It was unusual, but they deemed it urgent. Yesterday, three of their men had escaped from the village and returned to the castle, bringing with them puzzling developments.

Following the three men, more than a dozen villagers seeking refuge also arrived. They too reported the same thing about the village. The situation was so puzzling that the head of the guard brought the issue to the steward, who suggested bringing it directly to the Lord.

After a period of waiting, the guards watched as the squire finally opened the lavishly decorated oaken door, a sign that Lord Gunther had awoken. Bracing themselves for their Lord's erratic temper, they entered following the squire's announcement of their visit.

The Lord's face turned to displeasure, thinking something bad must've happened. "How bad?" he asked.

"My Lord, let's refrain from making such assumption so early in the morning," the steward replied with a measured tone. "Three of our men have returned to the castle."

The Lord furrowed his brows. "So the troublesome minstrels are gone?"

"Not quite. The men said they escaped when the village was raided," the steward explained.

"Raided?" Lord Gunther raised his voice. "By whom?"

"Our men reported bandits attacking the village," the senior guard took over.

"Bandits?" Lord Gunther's tone was full of doubt. "But there are no bandits in these lands. Have you heard of any?"

"This is the first time, but given our current situation, it's not too far-fetched. Also, villagers who fled confirmed the same story."

Lord Gunther said nothing but gestured to his squire for some water.

"There are other things that might interest you, My Lord," said the steward. "Before the bandits appeared, a group of rich merchants arrived in the village. The villagers who came to us spoke of carts laden with goods, heavy wooden chests, and dozens of hardy men for protection."

This piqued the Lord's interest as he drank from his goblet of water, foregoing his medicine since the pain in his thigh wound was manageable. He pondered, "If they had such protection, how could the bandits overcome them?"

"They said that bandits attacked at night. It was so chaotic that our men were able to escape."

Despite the steward's explanation, the Lord harbored doubts. "For rich merchants to come to South Hill uninvited... This region hardly has anything special to trade, aside from rock salt."

The senior guard nodded readily. "Indeed. This series of coincidences, including the armed minstrels, rich merchants, and bandits, is all suspicious."

The steward, however, thought differently. With a knowing smile, he suggested, "My Lord, have you considered the grain."

"Grain?" The Lord echoed, and then realization dawned. He recalled reports of rising food prices in the Three Hills, particularly after Korimor was besieged by the Lord of Korelia. "You're suggesting they are Lord Jorge's merchants? This is starting to make sense."

"Exactly, My Lord. They must have been uneasy about their low supplies after the failed campaign and decided to procure grain secretly."

"But why clandestinely?" the Lord asked.

"Probably because the Lord of Korelia's Grand Alliance prohibits trade with non-members like us."

"Hmph, that Jorge still has clever aides," Lord Gunther chuckled.

"Not only does this explain everything," the steward continued, "but it might also prove lucrative."

The Lord smirked. "The bandits might be tougher than angry peasants, but the potential wealth from those merchants should be rewarding."

The senior guardsman proposed, "My Lord if you wish to capture them, allow me to lead the vanguard while you wait for the bannerman to summon the rest of the troops."

"Indeed, we had better make haste. Those bandits already gained a day on us," Lord Gunther agreed. "Then take a hundred men and go with my blessing. Win this and I shall make you my Marshal."

"At once, My Lord," the senior guard responded confidently.

 

If you discover this narrative on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the violation.

***

 

Lord Gunther

Unable to withstand the pain of riding, the Lord chose to travel in his carriage. His nephew, who was in charge of the cavalry, had fashioned protection for the carriage and suitable barding for the horses. Even without the added protection, they were still flanked by a heavy escort of knights, cavalry, and men-at-arms.

Unlike those sent to the ill-fated Korelia campaign, these troops were the elite who had fought under Gunther since his days as a knight. Many were battle-hardened veterans and considered well-equipped.

"My Lord, a report from the front," his captain announced from outside the carriage as they paused for a midday rest under the shade of a cluster of large trees.

Struggling against the effects of the poppy milk, Lord Gunther gestured for his lieutenant to continue.

The captain relayed, "Our vanguard have located the bandits in the village. They seem unaware of our approach."

At this, the Lord chuckled merrily. "It's fortunate they haven't thought to flee... Do we have an estimate of their numbers?"

"Approximately seventy, or perhaps under a hundred."

Euphoric from the poppy milk, Lord Gunther couldn't help but smirk widely. He then instructed hastily, "Let's wrap things up and make haste. Opportunity awaits."

With that, two hundred men, sixty cavalrymen, and a dozen knights prepared to advance. Despite the heat of the midday sun, they were eager, anticipating an easy victory.

Many assumed that the bandits were stragglers from the last campaign, likely Nicopolan mercenaries who couldn't return to Korimor due to the ongoing conflict. Like other Lowlandians, they had little respect for their neighbors, even harboring disgust for their mercenary tendencies.

Thus, the South Hill men-at-arms were in high spirits, eager to demonstrate their superiority. They were confident that not even the famed Lord of Korelia could defeat them at their best.

...

 

The main army, led by the Lord of South Hill, arrived at the outskirts of the village. Unlike the vanguard that could conceal its approach, the larger army, with its tens of horses, alerted everyone to their presence as they neared the village. This was not a lapse in judgment but a well-planned strategy.

En route, the Lord had commanded the vanguard to circle the village and await at the road leading out of the province. The vanguard would act as the mouse catcher, and the main army as the one to smoke out the nest.

The plan was proceeding smoothly, with their army closing in on the village unopposed.

However, the villagers' behavior was concerning. They seemed suspiciously afraid of the main army's approach, running away from them, despite the clear display of Lord Gunther's coat of arms on the banners.

The men at the front began to question amongst themselves about the villagers' odd behavior.

"Aren't we rescuing them from bandits?" one of the men-at-arms asked.

"Don't overthink. It's only common for peasants to be a bunch of cowards," his lieutenant dismissed.

Meanwhile, Lord Gunther, inside his armored carriage, advanced steadily along the main route, flanked by his column. He was already pondering what to do with the rich merchants – whether they would offer enough gratitude or if it was better to declare that the goods were 'gone' and blame the bandits.

"A good opportunity," he muttered merrily to himself, considering how the extra spoils could bolster his army against next year's threat from the Lord of Korelia.

His Captain, riding alongside the carriage, leaned in through the window. "My Lord, we've spotted the bandits. They're in chaos, attempting to erect petty defenses in the village."

The report left the Lord overjoyed, and the double dose of poppy milk he had taken for this journey only heightened his feelings. He then inquired, "Have you located the merchants or their wares?"

"We've seen carriages and loaded carts hidden in barns and other buildings."

"Excellent!" Lord Gunther exclaimed, feeling immensely relaxed. "Now, Captain... unleash the men. Let them advance, but keep the cavalry by my side..."

"At once, My Lord. But what about potential damage to the village?"

The Lord's smile remained unchanged as he said, "Crush them if you need. They have harbored criminals and bandits. Now is a good opportunity to remind them of the Imperium's law, discipline, and duty to me."

 

***

 

Village

The farmer's daughter ran breathlessly, passing through the villagers who watched her with curiosity. "Maester Sigmund," she cried as she found him.

The minstrel turned toward her, surprised at her sudden reappearance. "Hey, slow down. What's the rush?" he warned, reaching out to grab her, fearing she might fall.

Gasping for breath, she managed to say, "Maester, the Lord's men—I saw many of them from our fields. You have to get out of here," she said with urgency.

Unfazed, Sigmund scolded her. "See? You should've convinced your family to move away from the village like the others, at least temporarily. I'm part of the bandits, after all."

"B-but you don't look like bandits," she cried her heart out, choosing to believe in her guts. "Please, Maester, run, they'll torture you."

Her response made the other supposed bandits around Sigmund chuckle.

"She's got a good wit," one praised.

"Bold too," another complimented.

The girl looked at them with furrowed brows. "Why don't you run? I'm not lying, the Lord's men—"

"I know. We know," Sigmund reassured her.

"The Lord will torture you." Panic tinged her voice.

"I bet he'll try," Sigmund replied, his tone either fearless or foolish.

As if on cue, ruckus, shouting, and cries were heard outside the village. The villagers began to disperse, some to their homes, others to the adjacent woods. Sigmund gestured to his men, signaling them to move.

The girl watched as a dozen men readily moved the newly made sharp wooden obstacles, cheval de frise, to block the road and pathways leading to the center of the village. The rest gathered around a cart and retrieved helmets, poleaxes, and even crossbows.

She gasped. "Maester, you really are bandits."

Sigmund laughed as his men provided him with his helmet. "You might want to stay somewhere safe. Don't you have friends around here? And where's your little brother?"

"He's with my mother," she answered, then quickly added, "Sir, you might be armed, but you only have this many. The Lord has so many people."

Sigmund wore his helmet loosely on his head and patted the girl's brown hair. "I told you not to worry. I have friends more numerous than you could count."

"But you lied," she protested, her words catching the man off guard. "The bakers told me you have four of twenty friends. I can count that high."

Sigmund chuckled and knelt down. "Worry not, lass. We still have a bandit king."

"A bandit king?" she echoed, her voice a mix of fear and anticipation.

"Indeed, a cruel bandit king," Sigmund sighed heavily. "Tasking me to defend this village with but these few men. O Sigmund, how poor thy fate hath been."

Almost without warning, bolts began to fly from both sides. The girl barely registered the whistling sound as Sigmund scooped her up and rushed her to the open barn. "Get inside and don't come out."

"Can I peek from the upstairs window?" the girl asked defiantly.

Sigmund, already on the move, didn't reply. He ran seemingly to assume command. His eighty men clashed with the first wave of South Hill troops.

The girl went inside the barn and found only an old donkey in the pen. She located the ladder, climbed it, and made her way to a window, only to discover it faced the wrong direction. Undeterred, she carefully moved the dried stacks of hay, searching for a vantage point. Her diligence paid off when she found a loose wooden board.

Peering through the gap, she observed the skirmish between the two sides. To her eyes, it was chaotic, with small groups fighting sporadically in different places. Others merely brandished their long spears, seemingly waiting for the correct time to engage.

The screams and shouts were disheartening. Even the old donkey was bothered and getting restless. It all quickly became overwhelming, and she instinctively covered her ears with her hands. Witnessing the Lord's men limping or crawling to safety, she felt a sinking feeling.

Worse yet, several lay motionless on the ground. Nobody was helping or giving aid.

Then she realized that those were left to die.

Her heart was beating fast and sweat formed on her brows. The vivid carnage was vomit-inducing, yet it also strangely compelled her to keep watching. Amidst the brutal spectacle, she found herself silently asking the Ancients for Sigmund and his friends' safety.

Despite the man's claim of being a bandit, she chose to trust in her savior. Without his timely intervention, her father would have lost all his teeth again.

The last time it had happened was when her father and uncles were wrongfully accused of being part of a plot to steal crops from the Lord's fields. They were beaten and lost nearly all of their teeth. They survived by subsisting on soup for nearly five years until enough of their teeth had regrown.

The Lord's men said that punishment would instill discipline, but it only bred fear and resentment towards their Lord.

Inside the village, the chaos continued, yet even to her untrained eyes, it was clear that the Lord's men were stalled. They couldn’t breach the village's defenses. Observing closely, she noted how Sigmund's allies moved with remarkable speed, applying pressure rapidly without waiting for commands and retreating without hesitation when needed.

The South Hill's men struggled against these nimble and adaptable groups. The defenders seamlessly transitioned between melee and ranged attacks, baffling their opponents. They were also adept at feigning retreat, baiting the Lord's men into vulnerable positions only to have another group launch a surprise flank attack.

Not just swords and bolts, but also throwing stones and hurling insults were part of their repertoire. The girl noticed that these fighters cannily used any available cover, contrasting with her image of armed men, whom she had imagined would stand proudly and openly in battle.

Gradually, the Lord's men abandoned their assault and retreated. "They're beaten?" she whispered in astonishment.

The farmer's daughter found it hard to believe that Sigmund could have defended the village. Yet, her smirk faded as she saw the Lord's men regrouping, launching another, more coordinated attack with additional forces. She also saw the Lord's cavalry had gone from their original spot.

"It's far from over," she muttered to herself, clenching her fists so tightly that her knuckles turned white.

 

***

 

Chapter 105

Black Bandit

 

The sound of a girl screaming was heard as the knights and cavalry charged toward Sigmund and his men's lightly defended position. Despite firing their crossbows, many of the untested skirmishers ended up wounded, saved only by their cheval de frise, or the tight and narrow streets of the village.

"I'm fucked!" one of the men groaned, his leg appearing to be broken by the recent attack.

"They're also fucked," Sigmund retorted, observing the two captured horsemen. More were wounded, but only two had fallen.

"Captain, let me gut them if they prove worthless," the wounded man rasped as his colleagues dragged him to safety.

"Stay alive; you can complain later." Then, turning to the rest of his men, Sigmund shouted, "We repelled them once, we can repel them again!"

Just like that, bolts whistled menacingly through the air as the fighting continued. Once again, the South Hill main column advanced on their position. This time, they proceeded with greater caution and committed all their forces, holding nothing in reserve.

Sigmund crouched and leaned against the wall of the wooden house. He passed his crossbow to the man in the best-concealed position at a corner, who then made the shot. After firing, this man exchanged his spent crossbow for a loaded one. This tactic allowed them to maintain rapid fire from a few advantageous positions, effectively slowing the enemy's advance.

Another group was pushed toward Sigmund's position. Spotting Sigmund, the young lieutenant called out, "Captain, we're getting pummeled."

"Take cover behind the building beside me," Sigmund instructed.

The lieutenant crouched and sat on the ground, his back against a nearby house. "We've spent our bolts. Besides, they're everywhere. We don't have room to maneuver."

"Go to the carts, see if you can find more bolts, and get halberds for everyone."

The lieutenant promptly began moving his group to the nearest cart, as instructed.

Watching them, Sigmund added, "And get your men to watch for the cavalry. They won't be gone for long."

How he wished that Dietrich, Sir Hugo, or Sir Harold was here. Only now did Sigmund truly feel what it meant to become a commander. Moreover, he was commanding the Lord's latest creation, the skirmishers. While these men-at-arms with crossbows were proven capable, they needed space to maneuver, and right now, they were losing ground.

"Captain, a report!" a youngster called out from behind, pausing to catch his breath.

Sigmund quickly pulled the young scout's head down, fearing a bolt might strike him.

Once the scout was kneeling low, he hurriedly reported, "Another column is approaching from the rear."

"Ours?" Sigmund asked.

"No, it's the South Hill."

"By the Ageless," Sigmund cursed as he reloaded his crossbow again. His men were looking at him, fear and doubt painted on their faces.

Sigmund shoved his loaded crossbow to the man next to him. "Don't get distracted. Keep sending those bolts."

His group returned to action, and Sigmund gazed at the young scout. "How many?"

"Groups of twenties, possibly a hundred, if not more."

The skald took a deep breath. "How long before we're surrounded?"

"Soon, Captain. They're moving unopposed."

"Isn't it better to reposition somewhere else?" the man next to Sigmund suggested.

Sigmund shook his head. "My gut tells me that if we try to move, then the cavalry will bear down on us."

The lieutenant's group had rearmed themselves with halberds and a few quivers of bolts. They returned just in time, as another group emerged from their hideout, pursued by dozens of South Hill's men.

"Have courage!" Sigmund yelled, donning his helmet and taking his spear, as he led his men into the fray.

 

***

 

Peering through a hole in the wooden wall, the girl watched with horror as Sigmund and his men engaged in a brutal battle. The clash of swords and the sight of blood-stained streets filled her with dread. Overwhelmed, she pressed her hands over her ears tightly to muffle out the loud shouts and screams.

Minutes of fighting felt like hours to her. She finally breathed a huge sigh of relief when it became clear that Sigmund's three groups had managed to fend off South Hill's attack. Yet, she was aware that this was not the last. Wherever she looked, the South Hill forces seemed to be gaining the upper hand against the bandits' defenses.

Now, Sigmund's men looked exhausted and seemingly wary of another cavalry attack on their position. Gone were their rapid attack and bait tactics. They were slowly losing their edge, and this deeply frightened her.

Worse, she heard different shouts from behind. At first, she thought it was just her imagination, but it bothered her so much that she waded through the dried haystack and returned to the barn's window. What she saw frightened her further.

A large column of men was marching from behind, their banners fluttering in the wind. "It can't be," she shuddered uncontrollably as she recognized her Lord's coat of arms.

From her perspective, the Lord of South Hill had managed to maneuver a column of men to hit the bandits' weak point. As she observed, Sigmund had neither erected any wooden blockades nor positioned his men to defend the other side of the village entrance. Thus, the column was advancing steadily.

At this point, the girl lost all hope and simply sat in the corner, no longer wanting to witness or learn more about the unfolding situation.

For her, if reality was this bitter and bleak, then she no longer wished to know.

This tale has been unlawfully lifted from Royal Road; report any instances of this story if found elsewhere.

...

 

Sigmund rested his back against the wooden house, his breath ragged, his face and body covered in sweat. His men were no better. They had survived the attack, but their situation was dire.

Their only respite was the fact that two other allied groups were converging on their position. These groups had lost their checkpoints and had no more opportunity to bait and attack, yet with this number, they could fight as regular men-at-arms.

"Captain, our rear is blocked," the lookout reported.

Sigmund gazed at his men, who were eyeing him. "Listen. We should be able to form a box formation. Use the buildings' walls to our advantage."

"But it's seventy against a few hundred," warned the lieutenant, who was resting next to Sigmund.

"The Lord ordered us to stall for time." Sigmund raised his voice. "Come, let's form the damn formation!" He stood up and brandished his spear.

Slowly, the remaining skirmishers formed a box formation, using the buildings' walls as their stronghold. Watching this, the South Hill forces reformed their combatants and approached from two sides - the vanguard from the north and the main army from the south.

Feeling trapped, many were feeling hopeless. "Where is the Lord and Lady?" one muttered.

"Captain, do you think they changed the plan without telling us?" another asked whilst standing in formation.

Sigmund shook his head. "I doubt they would do that."

"But that makes the most sense," the lieutenant explained timidly. "If they decided to rush the castle, they could easily secure the region."

"That means abandoning us?" another blurted out.

"Our Lord isn't that kind of man!" Sigmund declared strongly. His conviction was enough to soothe his men's fear. "Recall how the Lord has saved us again and again in battles."

The expressions on the men's faces began to shift, their fear diminishing as they recalled how the Lord, even in wars, had always shown genuine concern for their well-being.

Sigmund knew he had captivated his audience. And like a good skald, he pressed on, "We've survived the Lion, the Coalition, and the Nicopolans. Our Lord has never failed us. Let us show him our courage!"

The men in formation started to chant their nomadic-like war cries, steeling their hearts.

"For the Black Lord!" one shouted.

And then another replied, "For the Black Bandit!"

The cries further rallied the men. Due to their role in this battle as bandits, they had informally dubbed themselves the 'Black Bandits,' a tribute to their Lord's hair. However, since no one had dared to seek official permission from the Lord, the name remained unofficial.

Then, as if to reward their conviction, a deep, resonant sound of a brass cornu, recently acquired in Korimor, was heard for the first time. Despite the distance, its powerful and penetrating sound cut through the noise of battle, delivering clear and haunting notes.

At first, nothing changed, but a small confusion emerged at the enemy's position. However, another cornu was heard from another side, and then another, only then did the enemy columns stop dead in their tracks.

Witnessing their opponent stopped, Sigmund and his men were filled with jubilation, cheering loudly. They watched as their allies arrived, not just in one location, but seemingly everywhere, all at once.

"It's the Lord," one of them cheered, echoed by others.

Sigmund heaved a sigh of relief and patted the shoulder of his lieutenant beside him, who had let slip a few tears.

The lieutenant of many battles smiled and nodded, his gratitude evident.

Although it took longer than expected, the Black Lord had now achieved total encirclement. His greater force had surrounded the entire village, along with the South Hill army. The battle entered its second decisive phase.

 

***

 

South Hill Side

"That is not possible!" Lord Gunther shouted angrily as he learned about the situation. Even the euphoric effect of the poppy milk couldn't ease his tension.

His Captain was at a loss for words, while the squire diligently offered a tonic. The Lord chugged the concoction of wormwood, mint, and rue, hoping to clear his mind.

A messenger arrived. "Captain, My Lord," he greeted and reported, "our troops are requesting instructions."

"Just get them to return here. We need to protect the Lord," the Captain instructed.

The Lord remained silent, offering no comment. Upon this cue, the messenger bowed deeply and hurried to his horse, racing back to the village.

"Get me the scouts. What army did they see?" the Lord suddenly asked.

"My Lord, we're still ascertaining--"

"Meaning you know things. Speak, or I shall remove you from command," Gunther snapped. At the Lord's words, his armed entourage moved closer to the carriage.

"My Lord, I only wish to do my due diligence. It could be a ploy by the bandits," the Captain explained.

The Lord's temper flared. "Reveal it to me, I command thee!"

Feeling cornered, the Captain said in a hushed, reluctant tone, "It's blue and bronze."

"What...?" came the puzzled response.

"The scouts reported seeing a blue shield with a bronze chevron," the Captain clarified.

Upon hearing the news, the Lord's strength failed him. He slumped in his carriage seat, feeling suddenly old and weary. His anger had gone, in exchange the pain in his thigh throbbed relentlessly, unaffected by the poppy milk still in his veins. He remained silent, his face etched with an expression of shock.

The Captain, anticipating such a reaction, swiftly assumed command. Reluctant to suggest that the Lord or his entourage move closer to the village, his only option was to pull their columns back to defend their current position. Naturally, he deemed the Lord's carriage as an ideal rallying point for the troops.

"Quick, bring me a horseman," the Captain commanded. He knew his only hope was to regroup their forces. Once consolidated, he hoped the head of the guard might find a way to prevent a rout.

As his command was relayed, a cavalryman quickly rode forth. "Yes, Captain."

"Inform our vanguard of our situation," the Captain instructed, "and ask them to retreat to our location."

 

***

 

House Lansius Side

Standing at the edge of the forest adjacent to the village, the Lord of Korelia watched as his men advanced toward the South Hill columns' position.

"My Lord, acting Captain Servius marched the Nicopolans with great strides. They will soon make contact with the enemy's main army," one scout informed.

Lansius nodded. Another scout knelt and added, "My Lord, Sir Harold is leading his knights and cavalry to engage the enemy's vanguard column."

"Carry on," Lansius instructed. Their maneuvers were part of his plan.

Due to the skirmishers' small number and resilience, Lansius had successfully formed a complete encirclement of the South Hill army. Any other column might have failed spectacularly or suffered heavy losses in the process. However, periodic reports from the scouts had kept him informed of their situation, and Sigmund's column held against all odds.

The bait had worked flawlessly, and now the Lord of South Hill was within his grasp

Thunderous hooves announced the arrival of the Baroness along with her entourage, all armored and riding their warhorses.

"My Lord, permission to capture their cavalry and their banner," Audrey requested from atop her charger horse.

Lansius gazed at her and gave a nod. "We're winning, don't do anything reckless."

His warning made Audrey smile. "Gratitude, My Lord, for allowing me the honor."

"Good hunting," Lansius responded.

As he said this, all of the staff standing around him cheered for the Lady, the air filled with excitement and hope.

Audrey led the two hundred Dragoons on a big hunt, while Lansius kept the remaining hundred, along with the Nomad's Horse Archers, in reserve.

Today, Audrey would test the Dragoons' mettle against the opponent's knights and cavalry.

In them, Lansius hoped to create a cranequiner brigade, a specialized mounted crossbowmen. With the Skirmishers on foot and the Cranequiners on horseback, they would form a powerful combination, capable of harassing, provoking, and stalling the opponent until he could deploy his main attack.

These forces wouldn't replace the established mounted crossbowman's Dragoons, but instead, provide more options and utilities on the battlefield.

Lansius looked at his staff and entourage. Some were new, having climbed through the ranks on merit, while others had been with him since the event in Toruna village. "Men," he called, and everyone in his vicinity looked at him with growing anticipation.

"I'm going to have a chat with the Lord of South Hill in person. Will you accompany me?" the Lord asked.

His men responded with a chorus of chaotic but energetic reactions. They would gladly follow Lord Lansius anywhere. This battle was poised to be Lansius' fifth triumph. In just two short years, the unassuming teacher from Bellandia had become the most prolific warlord in Lowlandia.

Everyone present there was exhilarated. They had seen the strategy unfold and witnessed how the South Hill forces amounted to nothing more than a pebble on their Lord's path to greatness.

 

***

 

Disclaimer: This story, Horizon of War by Hanne, has not been published on Amazon or any platform other than Royal Road, Patreon, and Scribble Hub. If you encounter this work on Amazon or any site beyond those specified, please be aware that it has been posted without permission by an unauthorized party engaging in copyright theft.

 

***

 

Chapter 106

Cranequiniers

 

Nicopolan Column

During their march to South Hill, the Lord of Korelia often spent time walking with his men on foot, claiming that riding all day was tiresome. And just as he had promised at the start of the campaign, he treated his men equally. Without any hesitation, the Lord marched alongside the Nicopolans, with Servius proudly at his side.

It was clear from his interactions that the Lord did not discriminate between his established columns and the newly joined Nicopolans. He repeated this multiple times, slowly gaining the trust and respect of the Nicopolans. While it might have seemed small and insignificant, his camaraderie and the fulfillment of his promise for equal treatment resonated genuinely with everyone involved.

Physically, the Lord was an unassuming man, yet approachable and sincere in his actions. Unlike the charismatic noble born, who attracted people with their physical presence and elaborate clothes, the Lord of Korelia gave more of the impression of being a comrade in arms.

He wasn't stingy, pompous, or demanding like most nobles. He resembled the few nobles who didn't mind sitting and eating with their subjects. Beyond his strict military law, he was genuinely concerned with his men's well-being, as shown in his policies.

While he couldn't control the food situation, he made efforts to secure clean water, improve camp conditions, and even allow longer midday breaks so everyone could mend their footwear.

Despite their limited interactions, most Nicopolans came to view the Lord as a trustworthy leader. His leadership felt natural because he had earned his victories and acted honorably, even toward those he defeated. Thus, despite his rather unassuming character traits, people were drawn to his presence out of admiration, eager to see and listen to him speak.

His men followed him not because of his rank or title, but because they believed he was the one who could truly protect them in these chaotic times. While other nobles would send their men to their deaths to settle petty rivalries, in Lord Lansius they saw hope. A way to escape from this time of chaos and turbulence.

This sliver of hope for peace was well-founded. With his recent victories still vivid in their minds, the march had once again proven the Lord's canny abilities. Despite covering long distances, they were not rushed. The Lord never called for a forced march, opting instead to maintain a steady pace. Yet, surprisingly, they covered significant ground each day.

Many of the former mercenaries realized that this performance was due to meticulous planning and expert scouting practices.

Currently, the Lord had scouts as far as three days ahead. He also employed another group constantly looking for suitable places to build camps, along with alternatives. They looked for water availability, the height of the land, and food sources if available.

Thus, even though they marched at a steady pace, the Blue and Bronze army moved faster than most troops of their size. This feat was also attributed to the Lord's humane treatment of his troops. From the start of the campaign, he had set aside dozens of horse carts for the injured or weakened men who couldn't continue the march.

For everyone involved, the thought that no one was left behind naturally boosted morale. Because of all this, and the fact that the Lord and Lady were personally involved in solving the Nicopolans' hunger crisis, the Nicopolans felt immensely grateful.

They had expected to be abused or treated as a burden to be discarded at convenience, but their new Master proved to be magnanimous and treated them like first-class citizens.

Thus, when Lord Lansius asked his troops to continue hiding despite their arrival at South Hill, the Nicopolans complied without question.

Although eager to take the villages, as they were still on rations, they chose to endure it. Even the thousand camp followers chose not to escalate their complaints when Servius barred them from visiting the village.

Under the care of Sir Harold, the Nicopolans happily camped far from the village or any farmland and kept a lookout to avoid detection.

When they learned that the Lord disguised himself as a merchant, the Nicopolans watched with a mix of curiosity and anticipation. Many believed that this was nothing but a scouting activity, while some thought that this was the start of an elaborate ruse to conquer South Hill with as little fighting as possible.

 

***

 

Village

Caught off guard by the sound of cheering outside, the girl's hope returned. She nervously took a peek outside and couldn't believe her eyes. A large force of unknown origin was mustering just outside the village and now encroaching inward.

She quickly waded through the hay, frustrated when she couldn't find the previous hole in the wall to peek. Instead, she found a smaller crack, but it was enough to see Sigmund and his allies rejoicing.

"It must be the Bandit King," the girl muttered as she recalled Sigmund's words. "So he wasn't lying."

She returned to the window and observed the Bandit King's forces closing in. They were so numerous that the entire village was surrounded.

Suddenly, the old donkey made a hearty, infectious laugh, prompting her to peek out.

At the same time, the silhouette of someone appeared at the door. "Girl, where are you?" a familiar voice shouted from below.

She looked down and saw Sigmund. "Maester, I'm up here!"

The man looked up and grinned happily. "Climb down, hurry. I'm going to take you to the Lord. I mean, the Bandit King."

The farmer's daughter caught the word 'Lord' again and grew suspicious of the Bandit King's true nature. However, her excitement led her to climb down as quickly as she dared.

Below, Sigmund was waiting for her, spear in hand, and helmet worn in a relaxed manner.

"Maester," she called out again as she ran toward him.

"Easy, I'm dirty and sticky," Sigmund warned her.

Stopping shy of hugging him like she did to her uncle, she looked at the blood on his armor with great concern. "Maester, are you injured?"

"You're not afraid of blood? Never mind that, can you run?" Sigmund asked. "We might need to make haste. There's still danger out there."

"We're repositioning?"

"Clever girl," Sigmund replied, leading her outside where his men were already on the move. They had loaded their wounded onto the three horse-drawn carts they had. Although there was space for the little girl, Sigmund didn't want her to see the gnarly wounds some of his men had sustained.

The author's narrative has been misappropriated; report any instances of this story on Amazon.

With urgency and heightened alertness, the Skirmishers made their move. The South Hill forces had abandoned their attack, opening a path for Sigmund to lead his men to safety.

 

***

 

The Nicopolan Column

Three days after their arrival to the South Hill region, the Nicopolans received their commands. They donned what armor they had and fastened their belts. Despite being weakened by hunger, they were well-spirited for battle. After a short march, what they saw surprised them. The Lord had unexpectedly used an elaborate ruse and lured the South Hill army into a trap.

This thrilled the Nicopolans, who understood that a guaranteed victory awaited them as they surrounded the village as ordered.

Without wasting time, Sir Harold led his knights and cavalrymen in attacking the opponent's isolated column, which he perceived as the most significant threat. As the knights rode to glory, Servius led his select one thousand to descend upon the South Hill main column where Lord Gunther's banner was located.

Feeling grateful for the Lord's fair treatment, the Nicopolans under Servius were eager to show their worth in battle. As their column rushed toward their opponent, the remaining Nicopolans at the back cheered hard for them. Deep inside, many harbored fears of being seen by the Lord as unworthy, or worse a deadweight.

Thus, Servius and his men doubled their efforts to secure a spectacular win. "Let us teach these South Hill backwater shepherds and farmers how the Imperium finest condottieri fight wars!" Servius rallied as they reached the final distance.

The deadly whistling of bolts greeted them. Two hundred strong South Hill men-at-arms stubbornly brandished their spears and threw everything they had, but the one thousand picked Nicopolans were unfazed. Approaching steadily in good line formation, they endured the punishment and enveloped the enemy. Soon the South Hill's flanks recoiled as the Nicopolans exacted terror upon them.

Like ants, the Nicopolans swarmed upon the smaller and already exhausted force, which could do nothing else but form a circle and brandish their swords and spears in vain.

 

***

 

Sir Harold

The opponent's cavalry and vanguard were baffled by the appearance of a large army surrounding the village. Before they could regroup, Sir Harold and his twenty knights and thirty cavalrymen were already galloping toward the Vanguard's position.

While the narrow and winding village streets weren't ideal for cavalry, Sir Harold knew he needed to take out the Vanguard to prevent them from regrouping with the main army. He only needed to break this column and stop the South Hill from struggling further. If he failed, then the opponent might attempt to break out, prolonging the fight and possibly inflicting unnecessary casualties on both sides.

The thought of a decisive victory lingered heavily in his mind as he latched his visor shut. Through the narrow iron slits, he watched as the opponent was running away from him.

The South Hill Vanguard, numbering around one hundred, panicked at the sight of heavy cavalry bearing down on them. The combination of being surrounded by an unexpected army and now facing a heavy cavalry charge convinced them that their situation was hopeless. They weren't prepared to fight such formidable opponents.

Worse yet, their advantageous position for a back attack on Sigmund's skirmishers was now completely turned against them. Separated from their main army, they were vulnerable from all sides. Facing a heavy cavalry charge, the Vanguard had no choice but to abandon their position.

Sir Harold's knights gained on them and delivered a punishing blow. The first row of casualties led to an almost instantaneous rout. The Vanguard quickly disintegrated, with soldiers discarding their unnecessary equipment and fleeing for their lives.

"Commander, they're breaking up," a fellow knights reported.

"Ah, what a beautiful sight," Sir Harold laughed, unlatching and lifting his visor. "Let's not let them get away. Men, your ransom awaits."

With that simple command, Sir Harold and his cavalry hunted down the Vanguard remnants.

 

***

 

Audrey

Watching Sir Harold and the cavalrymen aim at the Vanguard, Audrey knew there was a chance that the South Hill cavalry might come to help. Thus, like she had been taught by Lansius, she divided her Dragoons into two groups: one as the hammer, the other the anvil. The Dragoons were flexible enough to dismount and fight like crossbowmen or footmen, even set up ambushes.

However, the South Hill cavalry didn't react as she had expected; instead of aiding the Vanguard, they headed toward their main army. Without recalling half of her Dragoons, Audrey led the remaining one hundred in a swift race along the outer side of the village, intent on capturing the opponent's cavalry.

Riding with the wind blowing hard against the vents of her visor, the Baroness spearheaded the pursuit. Their cavalry was lighter, and only a few of the one hundred Dragoons wore heavy armor. Like Audrey, those in heavier armor compensated with better horses, more than capable of matching the speed with the rest.

The South Hill cavalry, stunned by the chase, veered to avoid contact. Yet, the Dragoons' warhorses were fresh and well-rested. Moreover, having marched and fought since summer, their speed and stamina had increased significantly.

"Don't aim at the horses," Audrey commanded as they were getting closer and preparing their crossbows.

Finally, Dietrich, who led a separate detachment, managed to block the opponent's move. Bolts were fired, causing the enemy to react with unease and confusion. This distraction was all Audrey needed; her Dragoons rushed from behind and moved past the opponent's side and crossbow bolts were loosed.

Within a few breaths, they inflicted significant damage and spread terror toward the South Hill cavalry. It was widely known that only Mage Knights were proficient with crossbows on horseback, as they alone could reload the heavy draw using just their arm strength. Thus, the sight of a mass of mounted crossbowmen was unexpected.

Realizing they were facing a different type of cavalry, the South Hill remaining cavalry decided to offer combat. They gambled that crossbowmen on horses wouldn't anticipate close-quarters fighting. They veered and charged into the Dragoons' double-file formation.

However, it was a mistake. Lady Audrey and her select riders had already swung their spent crossbows to their backs, trusting the leather slings to hold them, then retrieved their second crossbows from their left waists. They aimed at the approaching cavalry and loosed their second volley. As soon as the crossbows reverberated and the bolts flew true, they pulled their sabers, ready for a fight.

Under the barrage of bolts, the South Hill cavalry broke from the wounded in their ranks. While not all bolts penetrated, it was enough to cause tremendous fear and destroy morale. More than twenty fell, twenty fled, and the remaining thirty who maintained their courage finally tasted defeat in close combat. The lighter and more nimble Dragoons were more than a match against their heavy opponents.

Audrey pulled the reins of her horse and her staff followed dutifully. She lifted her visor and saw that one of her riders was proudly carrying the captured enemy's banner. She had experienced firsthand the power of mounted crossbowmen. Even without the special cranequin crossbow with a spanning mechanism that Lansius had talked about, they were a powerful addition to their force.

She considered them a second-best yet more readily available option compared to mounted nomadic archers, who required ten years of practice.

Now, after observing the South Hill cavalry was nullified, Audrey knew that what remained was cleanup. "Anyone without a hostage, give chase."

Hearing her command, forty riders galloped after the remaining twenty.

Meanwhile, Dietrich approached and reported, "My Lady, they're fleeing. We've achieved complete victory."

"How's the situation with Sir Harold?" she inquired, still concerned.

"I saw Sir Harold routing South Hill's column."

Audrey pondered for a moment. "Task our separated 100 to assist. And also, Dietrich, good job blocking their path."

"At your service, My Lady."

"Armed men approaching!" one of her lookouts suddenly cried out.

She gave a quick look and replied confidently, "It's Sigmund."

"Watch your aim," Dietrich instructed, squinting his eyes to discern whether it was truly Sigmund. The distance was too great for him to see.

After some time, Sigmund appeared, leading his seventy skirmishers and a few horse-drawn carts. The two groups, brothers in arms, greeted each other.

"Reporting, My Lady," Sigmund announced as his force rejoined with the Baroness' column.

"Good work holding them for so long. And who's the little girl?" Audrey asked from atop her charger.

Sigmund brought forward a girl from behind him and presented her to the Lady. "She's a peasant's daughter whom I saved. Today, before the battle, she bravely informed me of South Hill's approach."

"Clever girl," Audrey commended.

"G-gratitude, My Lady," the girl stammered, still confused about how Sigmund, a self-proclaimed bandit, could befriend a noble.

"Can you read and write letters?"

"A little, My Lady."

"A little will go a long way," Audrey mused, smiling. "I can use more attendants. Come to my tent and say: Lady Audrey, the Baroness of Korimor, invited you. Or you can continue to follow Sigmund."

The little girl's eyes sparkled at the offer. "Y-yes, My Lady. I'll do as you say."

The naive answer piqued something within her, and Audrey teased, "You should ask your family first. Don't just abandon them."

"Y-yes, My Lady. My apologies, I shall run and inform them... But is it safe enough right now?" she asked nervously.

Watching her childish reaction, Sigmund, Dietrich, and the rest of their men chuckled. With their victories, the battle for South Hill was nearing its end.

 

***

 

Chapter 107

The Hands of Wraith

 

With South Hill's Vanguard routed and their cavalry captured, the battle for South Hill was largely over. The remaining men under Lord Gunther's command, having fought in vain against much larger forces, finally offered a truce when facing near annihilation.

Servius, the column's commanding officer, accepted their truce, recognizing that further bloodshed would be pointless. Their victory was now certain, with South Hill's men no longer desiring battle.

The surviving South Hill troops formed a defensive circle around their Lord's armored carriage, agreeing to lay down their spears and crossbows, but keeping their swords. They stood guard, pale and weary, awaiting the arrival of the true victor of this battle. The flicker of hope had vanished from their eyes.

Approaching from the east, Lord Lansius walked toward the Nicopolan column. His arrival was grand, flanked by his entourage and thousands of men, their armor and weapons shimmering in the sunlight.

Eager anticipation filled the air as everyone awaited the battle's conclusion.

Carla, his squire, guided Lansius' destrier. He could have easily ridden but chose to cover the distance on foot, savoring the moment. The euphoric looks on his men's faces were as unforgettable to him as they were to them. Although it was against his nature to be in the spotlight, he knew it was good for their morale.

Such a victory would forge long-lasting memories for them and might pave the way for lasting loyalty to House Lansius. More men reached him, joining from the other side of the village. In a friendly manner, Lansius called out to them, "Walk with me," or "Come with me."

His inviting gestures and words prompted everyone to follow him earnestly.

Before long, he was marshaling close to a thousand men before he arrived at the position of the Nicopolan column, where Servius was waiting.

"My Lord, South Hill has offered a truce," Servius reported, pride evident in his face and that of his staff.

"Good work, Servius," Lansius responded and offered his hand. The two clasped hands, much to their men's delight. The Nicopolans, craving honor and recognition, were ecstatic.

"What are the terms?" Lansius asked.

"Their surrender, My Lord, in return for a private meeting with you," Servius explained.

Lansius nodded thoughtfully. "Let's meet the Lord of South Hill and hope their request is reasonable. Otherwise, more blood will be spilled."

 

***

 

South Hill Side

The South Hill Captain and his men watched Lord Lansius' approach as if witnessing a raging storm. The famed Black Lord walked amidst a sea of warriors. Only then did the South Hill men realize the scale of the army they had been battling against.

As they watched the columns of men, everyone from South Hill felt not only defeated but also humbled and outclassed. They couldn't help but view the conqueror with awe. And they weren't alone in this sentiment. Peeking from his carriage, Lord Gunther mumbled, "So this is the man who has humbled half of Lowlandia..."

His Captain could only nod bitterly, pained by his failure and their defeat.

The Lord gazed at him and sighed. "All our men are battle-hardened, and he dismantled them as if they were nothing."

The Black Lord had completely crushed South Hill's forces, leaving no opportunity to rally. Even the usually stubborn Lord Gunther became compliant. Surrounded and thoroughly defeated, he had no choice but to offer terms.

The Lord of Korelia and his entourage now walked toward Lord Gunther's carriage. His escorts cleared any obstacles and shielded him from visible threats. Behind him, the bannerman proudly carried the Blue and Bronze standard, its few golden strands sparkling against the sun.

Everyone present watched the banner with a mix of raw emotions. It was the flag that had humbled every major Lord in Lowlandia. Many whispered that with the fall of South Hill, it was unequivocally the banner of a united Lowlandia.

The creak of a wooden door was heard as Lord Gunther, assisted by his squire and Captain, descended from his carriage. He had spotted Lord Lansius, but Lansius greeted him first.

"My Lord of South Hill, it's a genuine pleasure to meet you."

The words could be seen as an insult, but the tone was free of malice, prompting Lord Gunther to reply courteously. "My Lord, I am merely the caretaker of this region. I apologize if I have wronged you—"

"Ah, so you acknowledge your role in the attack on Korelia?" Lord Lansius interjected, speaking freely since they were out of earshot of their men, with only their closest aides nearby.

The directness was unexpected, but Lord Gunther was prepared. "Indeed. At that time, I was merely following the Coalition's urging."

"Will you shoulder the blame?" he asked sharply, his tone filled with impatience and perhaps also a disdain for long political sophistry.

"I have seen the error of my ways, but isn't it excessive to come here unannounced, using trickery, and trapping my troops like this?" the older Lord inquired.

"It is excessive, but time is a luxury I don't have," the Lord Lansius responded.

"Time...?"

"That issue is for later," he deftly sidestepped the question. "For now, I'm ready to discuss your terms."

Lord Gunther refrained from sighing and motioned to his squire, who offered a lavish silken pouch. Extracting the iron keys, Gunther showed it to Lord Lansius. "This is the key to South Hill Castle. I accept my defeat, but please, show leniency to my House."

"I will ensure a pension for your House. However, due to your past transgressions against the Lord of Three Hills, the Grand Alliance will decide your fate."

Lord Gunther could only offer a weak nod. His face showed strain as he surrendered the key to Lansius.

"Are you injured?" Lord Lansius asked, concern evident in his voice.

"Just an old wound," he responded.

Lord Lansius gestured to his confidant, "Fetch my physician." Then, to Sir Gunter, "I will ensure you receive proper care and treatment. Please return to your carriage; your pain gives me no pleasure."

 

***

 

In the aftermath of the battle, four hundred knights, cavalry, and dragoons, led by Sir Harold, galloped toward South Hill Castle. Armed with a few key hostages, a letter, and the seal of the Lord, they hoped to secure the castle's surrender.

Their arrival, like a thunderbolt in clear midday, shocked everyone on the other side. Panic ensued in both the castle and South Hill City. Chaos was only allayed when the cavalry showed no intention of attacking, looting, or sacking the city.

The narrative has been illicitly obtained; should you discover it on Amazon, report the violation.

With knights at the forefront, Sir Harold projected an air of order and discipline. Heralds and messengers were dispatched to both the castle and the city to explain their intentions and garner support.

For the castle and the city, witnessing such a large cavalry force and evidence of their Lord's capture left them no choice but to request time to deliberate. Outwardly, they claimed the need to welcome the new Lord, while internally, the House controlling South Hill and its supporters grappled with their abrupt loss of power.

Despite their blood ties, the very recipients of Lord Gunther's favor were unwilling to surrender the castle just to save a defeated Lord. Ultimately, fear of Lord Lansius, concern for their captured family members, and the sight of the large cavalry force, indicating a larger army nearby, swayed the House and the castle staff.

Before sundown, they lowered their drawbridge and opened their gates. Following Lord Lansius' instruction, Sir Harold sent Dietrich and his group to take over the castle's defenses, while he and the remaining cavalry camped outside, vigilant against any potential trap.

They politely declined offers of wine and beer, remaining alert until the arrival of the main army.

As day turned to night and dawn broke anew, Sir Harold awoke with reddened eyes, relieved that nothing concerning had occurred. He promised himself not to tarnish his Lord's near-flawless victory.

That morning, Sir Harold began receiving visitors from affluent families, treating them cordially. Most were there to discuss hostages or ransoms, and a few even boldly offered marriage proposals for their daughters. He requested that they await his Lord's return. The knight's and his staff's non-threatening gestures helped to ease these families' apprehensions.

They didn't have to wait long. Just after midday, the Black Lord arrived at South Hill castle, accompanied by two thousand of his forces and a thousand camp followers. The officials and castle staff nervously awaited outside to greet their new Lord.

"Behold, you are in the presence of the Lord of Korelia, Protector of Korimor, and the Leader of the Grand Alliance," a rider heralded.

"My Lord," greeted the officials and castle staff as politely as they could.

Unexpectedly, Lord Lansius and the Lady chose to dismount and walk with their escorts toward the castle. Whenever informed of important or elderly figures, the Lord stopped, exchanged polite greetings, and conversed briefly about the castle or city.

This gesture left a favorable impression on his new subjects.

While the family of squires accepted defeat and adapted to their new master, the townsfolk remained fearful.

The shock of their troops' defeat, compounded by the recent failure at Korelia, was still fresh. Many had fled since yesterday, fearing Lord Gunther's capitulation wouldn't suffice to appease the Black Lord.

Informed about the situation by their informants, the Lord of Korelia and the Lady of Korimor chose to conduct a quick procession. The transfer of power was completed smoothly, without any show of force or a parade. It was marked only by a symbolic gesture: the staff silently lowered Sir Gunther's banner, which had adorned South Hill for over ten years, and replaced it with the Blue and Bronze standard.

Behind closed doors, ransom and negotiation talks proceeded peacefully.

The absence of military maneuvers and harsh decrees allowed the townsfolk a measure of relief. There were no indications of retribution from the Lord of Korelia, despite South Hill's involvement in the Coalition against his fief. No punitive actions seemed imminent against the populace.

Furthermore, the Lord's decision to camp his large army away from the city, allowing only the camp followers to establish camps and trade, was reassuring.

Another day passed in South Hill, and despite some persistent skeptics in the city, the feared aftermath did not materialize: there were no customary three days of looting, no gallows erected for executions, and no open courts set up to punish select individuals.

For the Lowlandians, this was as favorable an outcome as they could have hoped for—an almost bloodless transfer of power.

Gradually, the residents of South Hill began to reconsider their views on the Black Lord. Contrary to the dire rumors, he might not be as terrible as they had believed. Some even started to believe that he could be a better Lord, or at least a competent warlord who might bring peace to their region.

 

***

 

Lansius

The day was turning to dusk, and the wind carried a certain chill along with an earthy scent. Despite having secured the castle, Lansius chose to stay with his troops.

He had ordered Sir Harold and his knights to occupy the castle while allowing the cavalry and skirmishers to rent inns and celebrate the victory as they wished.

Having secured victory, Lansius had lifted most of his restrictions, permitting most of his army to celebrate freely.

The remaining issue was the Nicopolans. Owing to their large numbers, Lansius couldn't allow them to enter the city, as they might cause problems. This was why he stayed with them, celebrating in his own fashion.

"Servius," Lansius called, seated in his wooden chair on the platform erected for the feast.

"My Lord," Servius answered politely, while the thousands of men around them buzzed with anticipation.

"Light the fire and bring out the food. It's time to feast," the Lord instructed, and three thousand men cheered in unison.

"At once, My Lord," Servius replied, signaling his staff to light a large campfire. Before long, the encampment was filled with the glow of lanterns and long torches, taller than a man, designed to last for hours.

Then, the cook's assistant brought out the food they had prepared. Only now did the men see the roast meats and other dishes, their tantalizing scents and aromas having tormented them for hours.

Observing their eager reaction, Lansius commanded with a grand gesture, "Bring everything out, even the duck."

Everyone was astonished. A roast duck, the size of a small horse, was being hauled on a cart by no fewer than six people. Duck was a rarity, not so much for its expense, but because it was challenging to raise, with only the bravest venturing to breed them.

Moreover, due to their size, ducks were hard and time-consuming to cook properly, and most cooks shied away from the task. Fortunately, they had captured a bold squire who, upon ransom negotiation, revealed that his family excelled in this unique trade.

Beside Lansius, a certain Baroness also drooled in anticipation.

Lansius stifled a chuckle and, despite understanding that the servants were doing their best to be quick, he couldn't help but rally his men. "Well, what are we waiting for? Cut the meat and share it with everyone."

At the Lord's instruction, the Nicopolans surged forward. The higher-ranking individuals attacked the duck, helping the servants carve it. They then ran towards the Lord and Lady's high table, presenting the finest cuts before distributing the rest to their men, who had formed a queue.

"Form a line," their officers shouted to those yet unorganized, arranging them into six orderly lines.

"Everyone will get a share! There's enough for all," Servius reassured those at the back.

Meanwhile, at the high table, Carla tasted the food and approved. Afterward, Lansius ate a small portion and drank from his goblet, signaling everyone else to start eating.

Like a race, those with filled plates began to eat. Audrey went straight for the roast duck, and Lansius couldn't blame her. The meat, with its strong odor, was lean yet tender, slightly chewy or gamey but satisfyingly rich and filling. The skin was crisp, the fat juicy, and the sauce—a blend of vinegar, honey, herbs, and mustard—masked the odor and enriched the flavor.

"Eat well, I'm going to help with the line," Lansius announced to Audrey as he stood up.

"But the duck, it's best eaten hot," his wife said, gazing at him, baffled by his culinary transgression.

Lansius leaned in closer to her ear. "I'll let you in on a secret."

She furrowed her brows in curiosity.

"There's another duck, and it's even fattier."

Audrey's eyes widened, shimmering with affection.

"Make sure to get the best cut. That's an order," Lansius said with a smile, to which Audrey responded with an approving nod.

Escorted by Carla, Lansius made his way to the middle of the long lines. As he walked, his men bowed their heads and greeted him, some cheering or weeping upon seeing him in person.

I just can't get used to this... Is this what famous actors and actresses go through? 

Their reaction to his presence was overwhelming.

"My Lord," Servius greeted.

Lansius patted the older man's back and then gazed at the hundreds who were lined up. "Rest assured, there's plenty of food today, and everybody will get a piece."

"I hope it's not a small piece, My Lord," one man commented, eliciting laughter from the others.

Lansius playfully retorted, "If anyone doesn’t get a full plate, I'll invite him to my table."

The men cheered at the Lord's promise.

Lansius did this strategically to maintain their support and to ensure order. Since it was risky to allow them to enter the city, he needed to keep them confined here until he could formulate a proper plan. Besides that, he also had an ulterior motive.

They can have slices of duck egg...

Apart from ducks, Lansius had also acquired duck eggs as gifts from the duck tamer family. Before his staff could use them to prepare broth for him, he chose to distribute the eggs directly to his men. He had sent five hard-boiled eggs to the infirmary as gifts for those injured in battle, and he planned to distribute the rest here.

"My Lord, may I have a word in private?" Servius called out suddenly.

Lansius nodded at the request. The two, followed by his escort, moved to a quieter area.

"I've just received word from the kitchen staff," Servius said, his tone grave. "A portion of the supplies we have is compromised."

"Compromised?" Lansius echoed in surprise.

"It's Sergio," Servius revealed. "He must've mixed dirt and sand at the bottom of his supplies to make them seem larger than they actually are."

Lansius couldn't even sigh. His mind already raced to find a solution, his heart pounding and hands shaking with rage. He was incensed that even in death, Sergio could still cause disaster.

Servius continued carefully, "I thought My Lord should know that if we stop rationing, there's likely only enough grain for about ten days."

"What about the harvest?"

"I'm not a farmer, but they have said that the harvest in South Hill has been delayed each year. They say it will need at least two to three more weeks, perhaps even longer, before it's ready to harvest."

"That's almost a month..." Lansius murmured bitterly.

"My Lord, we should continue with rationing until we can find a solution," the former mercenary leader suggested. "The men have had their fill tonight. Tomorrow, we can tighten our belts once again."

"How many know about this?" Lansius asked. Without waiting for an answer, he added, "We need to work quietly. Perhaps I could turn this into an opportunity."

 

***

 

Chapter 108

Half Victory

 

Several weeks before Lord Lansius' battle in South Hill, Sir Michael and the White Lake cavalry had arrived safely in Korelia. The city celebrated their victorious return from the Korimor campaign. As Korelia's leading authority, Sir Justin promptly organized a celebration to honor their allies and commemorate House Lansius' latest victory in Korimor.

After resting for three nights, Sir Michael and his contingent resumed their march back to White Lake, eager to return home before the harvest season.

Their all-cavalry force swiftly covered the distance, arriving in White Lake just in time for the harvest. Sir Michael's triumphant return to the city, laden with spoils that sparked envy among many, quickly became the talk of the town.

The stories of their battles against the Nicopolans captured the admiration of the populace. Even the nobility, who had previously disgraced him, began reconsidering their stance, impressed by the spoils he secured and his exploits in battles. Moreover, the fact that he had fought alongside the Lord of Korelia, a rising power in Lowlandia, indicated that Sir Michael had made a significant name for himself and was likely in favor.

Subsequently, talks began about restoring his reputation or at least amending their relationship. The once-fallen Marshal was now viewed as a redeemed figure.

Watching this unfold, the most pleased was Lord Robert. He had gambled on sending Michael to Lansius, hoping for a positive outcome, but he never expected such a turn of fortune.

The Viscount's belief in Michael had been vindicated. He had always known that Michael possessed the necessary qualities. Maybe not as a general, but certainly as a competent knight and an able nobleman.

And now, fulfilling his daughter's wish, Lord Robert had allowed Sir Michael to meet her in the castle's garden for a quiet chat.

...

 

"Sir Michael," Lady Astrid called as she saw him at the garden's entrance.

The knight, who was the talk of the city, broke into a smile. "Lady Astrid," he greeted as they approached each other.

For a moment, they both smiled, unable to hide their feelings.

"I've returned," the knight reported warmly.

"Pray that you're not injured. How is your eye?" the lady asked with concern.

Michael adjusted his eye patch as he reassured her, "It's not painful, and it doesn't hinder me anymore."

"Michael," Lady Astrid began, her tone filled with excitement. "I've talked to Father."

"Yes?" the knight responded, full of anticipation.

Astrid blushed and, instead of giving a direct reply, asked carefully, "Do you still want my hand in marriage?"

"The sky is my witness. I didn't fight battles in faraway Korimor for myself. The glory and prestige are dedicated to you, My Lady."

"Michael..." Astrid gazed at him affectionately before revealing, "Father has agreed."

Michael's eyes widened. "The Lord agreed to our betrothal?"

Astrid nodded, her sweet smile gracing her lips.

Michael's reaction was one of unbridled joy, his wide grin accompanied by clenched fists as if he was ready to leap for joy. Discipline kicked in, and instead of jumping, he knelt and asked for her hand.

Astrid happily extended her hand, and Michael vowed, "I will be a good and loving husband. I shall be loyal, protect you, and bring honor to your House."

Astrid, blushing red, turned her face away. "You've already brought honor to my father's House. He's pleased with your triumphant return. Now, no one in the court can look down on you."

Standing up, he said, "The court may need more time to accept me back. Only after they're comfortable can we arrange our marriage. Perhaps a season or two will be necessary."

Astrid let out a small grin. "A wise approach. But unfortunately, the marriage needs to take place as soon as possible."

Michael blinked in surprise. "I have no complaints, but won't it cause issues for your father's standing?"

"There will be no issues. The letter you gave to Father has already solved that problem."

"The letter from the Lord of Korelia?" Michael was surprised and curious. "What did it say?"

"The Lord of Korelia expressed his desire to take you under his wing."

Michael was stunned by the answer.

Astrid continued, "It's prudent not to waste this opportunity. The Lord of Korelia is the biggest name in Lowlandia right now."

"The Lord of Korelia actually said that?" he muttered, still in disbelief.

"He wrote it in a letter with his seal on it. Sir Michael, it seems you truly did a commendable job," she said with pride in her eyes.

"But, My Lady." Michael was hesitant. "If I am to be under the Lord of Korelia's command, then you'll have to accompany me to Korelia or even to Korimor."

"Likely to Korelia," she answered lightly and without hesitation.

"You don’t mind leaving White Lake?"

Astrid gazed at the garden around them. "I love this place, but I am no longer a child. We are about to unite our Houses, and I will do my part. Whether it's Korelia, Korimor, or elsewhere, I'll go with you."

Michael was dazzled by his change of fortune and could ask for nothing more.

"Besides," she whispered, turning to him, "Father is also moving to Korelia."

Michael was surprised and lowered his voice, asking, "The Grand Alliance, has it been approved by everyone in the council?"

"Almost, but with the Lord of Korelia's victory over Korimor, those opposed are losing ground fast." Astrid then added, "Father will risk it and support the Grand Alliance wholeheartedly. Our House won’t let anyone steal our initiative."

...

 

Riding the wave of Sir Michael's popularity, the castle officially announced his marriage to Lady Astrid, to the delight of the people. The ceremony was scheduled to take place at White Lake Castle, just six days after the knight's triumphant return. Lord Robert had acted swiftly to solidify his standing by welcoming a victor into his House.

One day before the wedding, father and daughter chatted while walking through the castle, now adorned with decorations for the upcoming event.

"Astrid, remember that it won't be easy. After the marriage, you must accompany Michael wherever he's stationed."

This narrative has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. If you see it on Amazon, please report it.

"Yes, father. I understand. I'll dutifully follow my husband, riding beside him and donning armor if need be."

Robert sighed. "I've provided you with the best tutor and assigned the best lady-in-waiting, yet you seem to have grown into a shield maiden."

"But father, people everywhere admire Lady Audrey, who followed the Lord of Korelia into battle. Isn't that also a noble way to bring honor to our House?" Astrid teased.

"The Lady of Korimor is an exception. Please, don't emulate her path in life."

"Father, I have my own path," she reassured him. "I'm a proud Lowlandian, the daughter of the Lion. I will not tarnish my father's name."

Robert looked at her proudly. He knew that despite her ladylike demeanor, she could endure hours of riding without a hint of fatigue. Riding had been her favorite hobby before marriageable age leading her to a more cloistered life in the castle.

Upon arriving in the Lord's spacious study, Astrid took a seat as her father gazed out the small window, overlooking a golden expanse of land covered with ripened crops.

Their entourage closed the thick oaken door, leaving them in privacy. Lord Robert turned to his daughter, "Astrid, I still feel that you would be better suited to marry the Lord of Korelia."

"But father, you've said yourself that Lady Audrey is a unique individual. And now she holds a Barony. I surely can't compare to her."

Lord Robert found himself recalling memories of Lady Audrey, who was fierce beyond competition and exuded the aura of a powerful yet loyal companion. Yet, he couldn't resist teasing, "Well, a second wife isn't—"

"Dad!" Astrid rose from her seat.

The Viscount chuckled, turned to her, and opened his arms wide.

She recognized the gesture and wrapped her arms around her father. They embraced, their bond uniquely strong, as Robert had no other children.

"Promise me you'll stay safe in Korelia."

"Yes, father."

"And oversee the construction of our House's manor in Korelia. Ensure it's not lesser than the Lord of Three Hills' manor."

Astrid giggled at her father's competitive spirit.

...

 

The White Lake region soon found itself amid a series of jubilant celebrations. In sharp contrast to the previous year's somber mood, the grand wedding, coupled with the victory in Korimor, captured the people's hearts and imaginations. This joy was further amplified by a bountiful harvest that swept over the region, bringing more reasons to rejoice.

The people organized a large harvest festival, dedicating it to Lord Robert's House and the newly married couple. However, the couple themselves were unable to attend the harvest ceremony.

Heeding the Lord of Korelia's offer, the newlyweds, after their brief honeymoon and escorted by fresh cavalry, were already en route to Korelia. There, they were set to embrace their new roles and responsibilities.

 

***

 

Nicopolan Encampment, South Hill

After pacifying the Nicopolans with a great feast, Lansius ordered the castle to send him documents for study. Sir Harold quickly complied, sending the documents along with the record keeper and his aide, all under escort. Lansius wasted no time in perusing the documents.

While his troops enjoyed a relaxed day, going hunting for small game or fishing, Lansius was busy interviewing the record keeper, learning about the South Hill region. He had a plan in mind, but he wasn't sure if it would be applicable.

After all, a solution that was effective in his world might not necessarily be suitable for the problems of this one. Lansius understood that each world, place, and its people was unique.

Burning the midnight candle, Lansius read through the scrolls and noticed something peculiar. He compared the numbers between harvested yields and military campaigns involving South Hill. The correlation was more than just severe. Every time there was a campaign, the harvested yield dropped significantly.

While a decrease was natural due to lesser manpower, in South Hill's case, it was severe enough that some years saw the yield almost halved compared to the previous year.

"This doesn't make any sense," he muttered to himself.

"What...no... making se—" Audrey mumbled from the bed before dozing off again.

Lansius looked at her, asleep with a book in her hand. Audrey had tried hard to stay awake, reading just to keep him company as he studied. While she had fallen asleep, he felt blessed to have someone like her by his side.

Returning to his scrolls, Lansius pondered the erratic harvest of the South Hill region. With incomplete data, there were various possibilities for the loss of productivity. Then he recalled the South Hill column he had faced in the western plains of Korelia this summer.

He remembered a field of grass, the wind over the tiny vents on his helmet, the weight of a heavy lance in his arm, and charging through a wall of humans.

Suddenly, he had an epiphany.

They're relying too much on levies.

He sighed as he unraveled an unexpected puzzle. While using a large number of peasants as levied troops was common, South Hill was mustering an abnormally large number. So much so, that it disrupted their agriculture.

Lansius searched furiously through the scrolls for population numbers and found them beside the lantern on the table. He saw the figure and muttered, "Less than seven thousand in the city and all the villages combined."

The last survey was done a decade ago, but it was clear that the population was marginally small. Lansius became worried. South Hill's last campaign for Korelia had been a disaster. Out of the two thousand who had set out, only several hundred returned. The rest were either captured or died on the run.

If even a small campaign could damage their harvest to such a degree, then their recent loss in Korelia could cause a catastrophe.

The South Hill region was unknowingly heading toward an agricultural disaster.

Rising from his chair, Lansius quietly headed out of his field tent. He encountered Carla sitting with the guards. Lansius motioned for them to stay seated and said to Carla, "Get me Servius."

It was the middle of the night, but Carla didn't ask questions. She knew it must be urgent.

...

 

Lansius waited in the front section of the command tent where he usually held council. He didn’t have to wait long.

“You summoned me, My Lord?” Servius asked as he arrived, escorted by Carla.

“Please enter,” Lansius said. “I apologize for summoning you so late, but this matter is dire.”

“I’m here to serve,” Servius replied as he approached.

“We have a problem. The records indicate that South Hill didn’t have enough men.”

“Men, My Lord?” Servius inquired.

“They might have cultivated enough land in the spring, but they don't have enough men to harvest."

Servius gave Lansius a sharp look as he pondered. “How much manpower are we talking about?”

“This summer, the previous Lord levied two thousand for a campaign. Only four hundred returned.”

“By the Ageless.”

Lansius exhaled deeply. "You asked about the amount of manpower we need. I’d say at least a thousand farmers, ideally closer to three thousand."

Servius’ face turned grim. “My Lord, I have farmers in my ranks, but not three thousand.”

Lansius walked closer and whispered, “We need to solve this. Otherwise, we can only expect half of the region's annual harvest. I’ve checked the numbers, and they don’t bode well for us or the populace.”

"My Lord," Servius pleaded. "I’ve already followed your instructions. I’ve secured the men who uncovered Sergio’s ruse. The dirt and sand at the bottom of our supplies have remained untouched. So please, I beg you, don’t let another famine befall us."

Lansius could see the horrors of famine reflected on the former legion leader's face. Even veterans of countless conflicts bow down in the face of hunger threatening their men and families. "I haven’t abandoned you. We’ll overcome this."

The legion leader grasped Lansius’ hand and knelt. "Please give me instructions. Command me."

"Servius,” Lansius began, pulling him to his feet, “at first light, gather all Nicopolans who have experience in farming. Don't give up yet. We still have a chance."

...

 

Lansius watched Servius leave and was about to return to the rear section where he slept when he noticed a figure waiting for him, standing silently in the dim glow of a lantern. "Sorry to have kept you awake," he said apologetically.

"Do you need someone to talk to?" Audrey offered a waterskin. "I might not be able to help solve the issue, but I can keep a secret. Or I can pretend that I hear nothing."

Lansius took the waterskin and drank from it. Afterward, he revealed, "South Hill's harvest is in big trouble."

Audrey pondered for a bit before responding seriously. "It's related to those men you captured and kept in Korelia, isn't it?"

"Yes, almost all of the South Hill column are peasants," Lansius confirmed.

"Still," she hesitated for a bit. "I imagine there will be a lot of issues if we free them before they've finished their work. Besides, the harvest is not even a month away."

"Indeed, there's no time to transport them here."

Audrey sighed. "I feel like we're going from one famine to another."

Lansius could only nod. "This is what warfare does. In their quest for power, the nobles use peasants to fight, and thus the farms get neglected."

"Crippled men make poor farmers," she commented. "So, what is the Lord of Korelia planning?"

Lansius shook his head. "Some rough plans. But I'm not sure if it will work or if it will cause a riot. I guess I'll need to study the scrolls again."

Audrey closed the distance between them and hugged him tightly. "You know, I wish I could help more."

"You're already helping," he reassured her. "I bet if I married another Lady, she would pester me with castle decorations, winter furs, and perhaps even jewelry."

Audrey chuckled and teased, "Is it a bad time to ask for a decoration for my armor?"

Lansius chuckled and lifted her. All his armored exercise and riding had paid off, he could do it with ease. Carrying her in his arms, he went to the sleeping section and laid her on the bed, but refrained from joining her.

"You sure you don't want company?" she asked again.

"I'm perfectly happy seeing you asleep."

"Then, I'll be here when you need me. Just wake me up," Audrey said, closing her eyes.

She must be weary.

Despite her status, Audrey took charge of the cavalry, their training, equipment, and maintenance. With their numbers reaching four hundred, it was no small task.

Lansius returned to his seat and a small table.

Time passed, and despite his thorough study, only one solution continually came to mind. Initially, Lansius had favored a Roman model to aid the harvest, but now the situation called for something more drastic.

The problem was that fully implementing military-agricultural colonies would take years to develop. However, he could extract the essence for a more immediate, crash course solution.

Thus, he wrote in his native Earthen language: the Han Dynasty's Tuntian strategy?

While unsure, Lansius began to lay out a heavily modified yet simplified version because he didn't have multiple years to develop it.

The next morning, Lansius was awakened by an unforeseen development. Unexpected reinforcements had arrived.

 

***

 

Chapter 109

Sapere Aude

 

Nicopolan Encampment, South Hill

As dawn broke over the camp, Lansius, still bleary-eyed from a night spent poring over scrolls, was roused by activities outside his tent. He had just taken his first sip of water when Audrey entered.

"Oh, you're awake," Audrey said with a smile, already clad in her stylish black brigandine.

"Did I hear someone mention reinforcements?" Lansius inquired.

"Indeed. We've just received twenty cavalrymen, freshly trained, and fifty men from Korelia," Audrey informed him as he began to settle down for breakfast. "They're escorting two hundred South Hill men, along with several cartloads of bolts, crossbows, and barrels of salted meat."

"More than I ordered and faster than expected," Lansius praised.

"Indeed, the Marshal has proven to be reliable. However, this doesn't help our current issue," said Audrey, sitting down beside Lansius and taking a bite of freshly baked bread.

"The situation has changed, but those two hundred men will be useful."

Audrey gazed at him. "Why do you want them anyway?"

"At first, I planned to use them to turn the villagers to our side. Possibly for making ambushes or traps. But as it turns out, our little merchant and bandit circus was quite successful."

"Ah," she exclaimed, understanding. "So, what do you want them to do now?"

"I want them to be my little heralds."

"Heralds?"

Lansius nodded. "I have to create a new policy to solve this issue. The problem is, a policy means nothing if people either don't know about it or fail to understand it."

"I see, so you're using them as your speakers."

"Something like that. They're locals, and I hope they can bring the peasants into our fold."

The two continued with their breakfast. As they neared the end of their meal, Audrey spoke up. "There’s one more thing, or two," she informed.

Lansius gazed at her, waiting.

"The reason the reinforcements arrived so fast is that Sir Justin arranged for them to use nomad guides."

Lansius pondered for a bit. "I still doubt that nomad guides and our nascent market post route could be this fast."

"They don’t. They're fast because they used a shortcut."

"A shortcut to South Hill?" Lansius blurted out.

"It turns out there is one. They don't need to go through the Three Hills area to reach here."

"We need to look out for this new route; it would be beneficial."

Audrey chuckled. "Unfortunately, they sort of warned everyone not to use it. The route is treacherous with little water and hard to navigate, with only the stars as guidance. Also, it ends in a large forest with only a goat trail."

Lansius chuckled, thinking about the hardship they must have endured to get here. "Must have been hard. They're lucky to have gotten here at all."

"Well, they were almost lost, but fortunately, one of our lieutenants who led a hunting group found them by chance."

"Ah, a reward is in order then."

"The name is Farkas. He's a young lieutenant under Sigmund."

Lansius nodded, making a mental note of the man. With his top retinue holding his fiefs, he would soon need new staff.

...

 

Sir Harold and Sigmund arrived at the encampment upon Lansius' summons. Together with them, Lansius led a meeting with the two hundred South Hill men. He wanted to cross-check his findings, but in the process, he uncovered a whole different issue he hadn't anticipated before.

"My Lord, the problem with the harvest isn't the peasants. We are willing to work. But the previous Lord gave a lot of the land to his relatives," one of the farmers recounted their story.

Another man added, "They told us to treat it like the Baron's land. We had to work on it first, even before our own."

"How much land are we talking about?" Lansius inquired.

"It's spread unevenly, but combined with the Baron's land, they account for almost half of all the fields."

Lansius was astounded. He glanced at Sir Harold and commented, "I never imagined that this region was so poorly managed."

Sir Harold gave no verbal response but sighed, his jaw hardening.

Emboldened by the reaction, the peasant continued, "My Lord, the previous Lord's relatives expect us to work their land as if they were little barons. And as if that weren't enough, they also send us on campaigns."

Murmurs of agreement echoed from the others.

"We can confiscate the land," Sir Harold suggested firmly.

"Pardon me, Lord and Sir," another man interjected. "Confiscating their land wouldn't help. Even before harvest, they’ve already sold the produce for cash."

"Please explain," Lansius instructed.

"The former lord's relatives are always cash-strapped and often sell their harvest in advance. So, the actual owners of the yield are always the merchants."

"Forward contracting," Lansius muttered. He understood the practice, which, although not inherently bad, could be highly deceptive and predatory, especially against the poor and financially illiterate.

Sigmund, standing beside Sir Harold, asked, "Does this mean we can't confiscate the land?"

"We can confiscate the land," Sir Harold explained, "but this year's harvest is already in the merchants' hands."

Sigmund exhaled sharply, muttering curses under his breath. The skald was clearly in league with the peasant.

Meanwhile, Lansius looked unsure.

Sir Harold leaned toward him. "My Lord, we can handle the merchants. A little coercion goes a long way."

"No," Lansius said, shaking his head. "We need something more potent."

If you come across this story on Amazon, it's taken without permission from the author. Report it.

Sigmund stood at the ready. "My Lord, we await your command."

"While I was not previously aware of this issue, my plan will encompass it as well." Lansius' voice took on a determined tone. "Let's organize a military parade. Gather all the city representatives. It's time to introduce a new policy."

 

***

 

As the guests arrived at his encampment, Lansius intentionally kept himself exclusive, letting only his retainers greet the representatives. As they waited, the guests naturally inquired about their host. For this reason, Lansius had posted Sigmund there to subtly spread hints about his motives, preparing them for the new policy.

Before the atmosphere could grow stale, a military parade performed by a thousand men and a two hundred cavalry soon captured the guests' attention. The archery display from the crossbowmen and the thunderous hooves of the cavalry sent a raw message about the host's military strength. It was a show of force, subtly coercing them not to be on the wrong side.

Lansius wanted to cut through the unnecessary politics and get straight to business. He had little time, and the harvest was fast approaching.

In a display of military prowess, Lord Lansius and his impressive entourage rode against the parade as the columns split in half and saluted their Lord and commanders. The Lord then veered towards the command tent where the guests were waiting. As he dismounted, a subtle signal from him was all it took for thousands of his men to abruptly halt the parade.

The representatives gulped, fully aware of the Black Lord's absolute control over his military. No herald was announcing his arrival, as if such formalities were unnecessary.

Truthfully, his presence alone could be felt even with eyes closed. As the Lord, clad in his strikingly deep blue brigandine, entered the tent, there was an eerie silence while his retinue and guardsmen briefly tensed, standing ramrod straight.

More than just fear, there was respect in their eyes. The guests observed this with mixed feelings. Initially, they had viewed the meeting as an opportunity to advance their agendas. However, upon witnessing the Lord in person, their ambitions gave way to relief, grateful simply to be spared his wrath.

"My Lord," they addressed him respectfully.

"Gentlemen, please be seated," Lord Lansius instructed.

The city and merchant representatives, who were also wealthy landowners, took their seats in front of a long mahogany table. At the opposite end, the Lord sat, flanked by his knights and squires. Select members of his retinue stood at attention to his left, right, and behind him.

"Today I am enacting a new policy," the Lord announced.

The representatives, dressed in fine silken robes, velvet, and fur coats, appeared guarded yet nodded their heads in acknowledgment.

"This new policy isn't designed to harm anyone. There will be some loss of profit, but it won't affect your capital," he reassured them. Then he signaled for the scribe to begin writing.

"From this day forward, I designate South Hill as a Military Agricultural Colony."

The guests looked at him, unsure of what the name change implied.

Lansius continued, "Therefore, I am abolishing the South Hill Barony and all its holdings."

Understanding dawned on everyone. Their eyes bulged, and their throats felt parched. They wanted to ask questions but dared not, choosing instead to wait for a more appropriate moment.

"As such, all lands under the Baron's holdings will now be managed by the new military council," the Lord explained. "Now, what does this mean?" he asked, as if echoing the guests' unspoken concerns.

He explained, "Aside from the legal changes, not much will radically change. The peasants will continue working their land and the communal land. The harvest from their land will remain theirs, while the harvest from the communal land, previously for the Baron, is now held by the military."

The guests remained silent, absorbing the information.

"The biggest change is that all land gifted by the previous Lord is now null and void." Lansius then looked around the room, meeting the eyes of his audience before continuing with a stern warning, "Anyone challenging this rule will trigger an official investigation. We will scrutinize whether they are liable for violating Imperial law by illegally forcing the peasantry to farm on their land."

A guest in finely decorated red clothes firmly raised his hand.

Lansius motioned for him to speak.

"My Lord, pardon my intrusion, but what will happen to those farmlands? Many of them are already under contract to provide us with their harvest yield."

"Those affected farmlands will be taken over by the military. The peasantry will no longer work on them. They'll be harvested by the army, and the yield will be used as military supplies. As such, all contracts related to those farmlands are considered void."

Many guests went pale. The man in red seemed about to speak, but Lansius motioned for him to wait. "Void doesn't mean worthless. To show my appreciation for your support of this policy, those who can provide legally binding written contracts will be reimbursed at their inception value, either in cash, commodities, or through tax exemptions."

Relief washed over many, with a few wiping sweat from their brows.

"What about verbal contracts?" a guest in green velvet clothing asked.

"Verbal agreements and accords will be addressed through the judiciary," the Lord replied without hesitation.

The guests seemed pleased with this arrangement.

Then Lansius added, coldly, "Any attempt to cheat will result in prosecution, with the perpetrator's assets confiscated and their family reduced to peasantry."

Hearing this, the guests straightened their backs, visibly uncomfortable and fearful.

Lansius leaned back in his chair, and Sir Harold stepped forward, asking, "Any other questions?"

"My Lord, you mentioned that the new military council will manage the farmland and holdings. Does this mean that you really intend to use your men-at-arms for hard labor?"

"Indeed, the situation demands it," Lansius confirmed. "Gentlemen, I'm trying to avert famine, not gain benefits. The records show that South Hill is heading towards a famine. I'm sure you're all aware that each time the city is involved in a campaign, there's always a steep decline in harvest yield. And this past summer, South Hill faced its biggest loss ever."

The guests nodded nervously. The losses in South Hill during the failed Korelia campaign were nothing short of disastrous. Even in the city, they had lost many friends and relatives.

"But, My Lord, what about next year? I doubt you will station these many men here indefinitely as farmers."

Lansius chuckled. "Despite what the rumors say about me, I'm not a seer," he jested, prompting chuckles from his entourage. Returning to the issue at hand, he said to his guests, "Let's not overthink this. Let me evaluate my plan and when it's appropriate, I'll unveil it. But right now, let's focus on securing a good harvest in this region."

...

 

After his meeting with the representatives, Lansius addressed the two hundred freed men and the thousands of Nicopolans.

"Men," he began warmly, noticing smiles on his men's faces. The easy victory and the great feast still had an effect on them.

"We ventured to South Hill to settle my issue with the previous Lord. That objective has been fulfilled. However, there's another objective: securing a good harvest for everyone. But as it turns out, we've made a mistake."

The smiles on his men's faces changed as they realized the gravity of his words.

"We expected South Hill to be ready for harvest. And yes, thanks to the hardworking people, the region is well-cultivated. However, due to their past defeat, they lack two thousand able-bodied workers to tend to these fields. I don't want to say this, but this region is unknowingly skirting close to famine."

Murmurs broke out among his men at the mention of famine.

"Gentlemen, don't be afraid," Lansius said, gazing upon the thousands of Nicopolans. "Fortunately, we are aware of this in advance. Though there's little time, we can make enough changes to avoid the issue."

His men listened attentively to his explanation.

"Servius has informed me that we have able farmers among you. Thus, we will form groups consisting of farmers and soldiers to work the fields. Some will work in the communal fields. Others will provide help to villages or families in need."

Seeing his men's confused reactions, Lansius added, "Even if you know nothing but how to hold your spear, this region can use your help. We need able bodies to fix granaries, hunt pests, repair roads, sharpen farming tools, maintain carts, and escort grain transports safely."

His explanation prompted a wave of nodding and light murmurs.

"We can do that," one man said, followed by a chorus of agreement from his colleagues.

"The bottom line is, we can't be idle and expect food to be available. We need to assist the people of South Hill. Otherwise, famine and winter will end us all."

The grim warning left everyone uneasy. Silence fell as the Lord exited the stage.

Sir Harold then took the stage and commented, "Well, unfortunately, we can't beat famine in a fight. If it were a person, I assure you the Lord of Korelia and I would find a way to beat it senseless."

Some burst into laughter, releasing the tension that had been building in their nerves.

"I thought Famine was scared of the Lord of Korelia," someone shouted.

"No," Sigmund chimed in, standing beside Sir Harold, "Famine is afraid of the Lady of Korimor."

"Ooh, the eyes!" someone exclaimed, and laughter erupted again.

Despite the threat of famine, morale was high. In the eyes of the Nicopolans, their new master had yet to make a mistake.

Sir Harold continued, "The Lord has decreed exemptions for those who can smoke fish, also for individuals who can hunt big game. For those, please report to me afterward. If you think you can contribute in other ways, let us know."

 

***

 

After midday, Lansius supervised the formation of the work groups, proactively gathering various inputs from his retinues. He took all their suggestions into consideration. As expected, food and supplies quickly became an issue.

"There's no other way," Servius advised during their private meeting inside the command tent.

"I share his opinion," Sir Harold voiced. "I will share the castle's provisions and also reach out to the merchants for additional supplies."

Lansius sighed, realizing they had exhausted all their options. "We just enjoyed a feast with roast duck. I don't have the heart to tell them that we must return to rationing."

Audrey stepped forward, offering, "Let me handle that announcement."

Just as Lansius was about to respond.

"Um, My Lord, My Lady, this might sound foolish, but Agatha might have some ideas," Sigmund interjected, bringing the girl forward.

 

***

 

Chapter 110

Third's Shadow

 

The Lord of Korelia's Command Tent

The girl whom Sigmund ushered forward was becoming the center of attention. She had her hair in a ponytail and wore a simple brown garb, marking her peasant background.

"Sigmund," Sir Harold called lightly. "This area is off-limits."

"I know," Sigmund replied. "But her ideas are quite convincing."

"Who is she?" Lansius asked while Audrey approached the girl.

"Her name is Agatha," Audrey revealed, guiding her in front of him.

Lansius glanced around and caught Sir Harold's gaze. "It's the girl Sigmund found in the village," the knight informed.

"Ah, the one who warned him of the impending attack," Lansius recalled, remembering a story from two days ago.

Audrey patted the girl's shoulder and turned to Lansius, saying, "She's joining us as Carla's assistant. Without Sterling around, she needs help from time to time."

"I see..." Lansius nodded.

Audrey noticed the girl staring at Lansius in awe and quipped, "Lass, if a noble hero you seek, look elsewhere."

The remark made Lansius chuckle. "That's uncalled for," he protested.

The rest of the council members chuckled as well.

Agatha was surprised to find that the famed Black Lord and his top retainers had a sensible sense of humor.

"Can you keep a secret?" Lansius suddenly asked Agatha.

She nodded eagerly.

"Alright, I'll tell you one." He then whispered, "I'm actually a nice person."

Audrey and the others stifled their chuckles while the girl, not recognizing the jest, looked confused.

"How old are you?" Lansius asked.

"I'm twelve, My Lord."

Lansius frowned as the girl looked much older than twelve. Still, he continued, "So, Sigmund says you have something to say. Can you tell us?"

Agatha furrowed her brow in thought, then remembered, "About food. Families in the village have plenty, and nobody wants to keep old grain for another year."

"Go on," Lansius encouraged.

"If your Lord's men help us with the farm work, the villagers will gladly help with food. Just remember to bring something to eat with. We don't have cheese, but we have plenty of grain and vegetables."

Lansius looked at his retainers. "This is an interesting find."

Servius, who had been silent, spoke up. "My Lord, let me investigate this."

"Do so quietly," Lansius instructed.

Servius nodded and left the tent.

Meanwhile, Sir Harold, towering over Agatha, knelt down and asked, "Lass, we're talking about feeding many people. I'm sure the villagers can't cook for us all."

"Cooking is hard, yes. You'll need to help with that. But there's plenty of grain."

Lansius became curious. "Is the grain good to cook?"

"It's brown, but it's good for winter soup. You'll need salty bone broth and fat, though."

Lansius nodded, intrigued by this unexpected development.

"Is your father hiding the grain from bad men?" Audrey asked.

"No, My Lady. Nobody wants it, not even the bad men."

Audrey looked at Lansius. "Must be leftover legumes, peas, and rye."

"In short, horse bread," Sir Harold commented as he stood up. The girl gazed at him in awe, and he scooped her up, carrying her like a toddler in one arm.

"Given the situation, I doubt the Nicopolans will complain," Sigmund suggested.

Audrey's face looked disturbed, while Agatha giggled. "But they're delicious."

...

 

Before long, Servius confirmed the girl's statement. "It's true, My Lord. The villagers seem to have plenty of leftover grains that nobody wants. But they are of such poor quality that grinding them would take too much time and labor."

"If we use the city mill, can we produce flour for bread?" Lansius inquired.

"We can, but don't expect all of it to be suitable for bread-making," Servius reported.

Lansius scratched his head. "We need a culinary breakthrough."

Agatha, seated beside Audrey, suddenly spoke up. "That hunter knows how to make good gruel. His was tasty."

"Where is this hunter? Do you remember his name?" Audrey asked.

"Fanther? Fafner? Furkus?"

"Farkas...?" Audrey ventured.

Sigmund's eyes widened, recognizing the name of his lieutenant.

"That's the one! He visited my house, and my father gave him some of our brown grains. He mixed them with his blood sausages to make a tasty gruel."

Without needing instruction, Sir Harold, Sigmund, and Servius headed out.

 

***

 

South Hill, the Lord's Command Tent

A young man clad in camouflage attire, with a crossbow slung across his back, was escorted into the tent by a group of guardsmen led by Sir Harold.

Upon seeing who awaited him inside, the young man panicked and exclaimed, "I'm innocent! I took a little extra, but I was the one who hunted that deer!"

The Lord and Lady appeared disturbed by this revelation.

Spotting Sigmund entering the tent, Farkas pleaded, "Captain, please."

Sigmund raised an eyebrow and grinned. Turning to the Lord, he explained, "He's a rather energetic fellow, but I'd trust him with my life in a fight."

Farkas had just sighed in relief when a child suddenly exclaimed, "Yes, that's the one!"

If you spot this story on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

"D-don't say that. I don't even know you," he recoiled thinking it was an accusation.

"But I know you," the girl insisted.

"By the Ageless, spare me..." Farkas groaned, almost comically.

Watching the pair, the Lord burst into laughter, even the Lady giggled.

Farkas left puzzled, watched as Sir Harold approached and patted him firmly on the shoulder. "Relax. We're not here to punish you."

The young hunter nodded gratefully.

"The girl said you visited her family two days ago and received some grains. Is that true?"

Farkas seemed to remember and exclaimed, "Ahh, you're the farmer's daughter."

The girl grinned. "Yes, you cooked a good meal. And My Lord wishes to know more."

The Lord clarified, "We need to know what kind of grain you used and how you turned it into a decent meal."

"It's mostly rye, along with bran and peas," Farkas revealed, seemingly unsure why the Lord and his staff were inquiring about his meal.

Noticing their serious demeanor, he continued, "They're too coarse, not good enough to be ground into flour. But, if we soak them in water for a quarter day, the hard parts will soften. Then we can boil them over a roaring fire in an iron cauldron, pressing it tightly with an iron pan and weights on top."

The Lord and Lady nodded in understanding.

"Where did you learn this?" the Lord inquired.

"My father taught me," Farkas replied, a hint of nostalgia in his voice. "He also advised mixing in fat or blood sausages for flavor."

The Lord turned to the tall knight. "Have you ever heard of such a meal?"

Sir Harold mulled for a moment. "I've seen it, but never really knew or tried it."

"Sir, it's unlikely anyone would dare to offer such a humble meal to a knight. It's mostly a hunter's meal," Farkas explained.

"Why is it a hunter's meal?" the Lady asked.

"Well, one can buy such grain cheaply in the market. And hunters usually have plenty of leftover blood sausages, since the butchers rarely pay us all in cash. Also, almost everyone prefers meat."

The Lady seemed satisfied with the answer.

The Lord finally motioned for Farkas to approach. When he did, the Lord handed him ten silver coins.

"Eight for aiding the reinforcements stuck on the goat path, and two for the information about the meal."

Farkas was overjoyed. And it wasn't over yet. The Lord handed him a quiver, explaining, "These bolts fly far. Use them for hunting and bring us good meat."

...

 

After further deliberation, Lansius' staff agreed to experiment with the available peasant's grain. They formed a group of hunters to show and teach the Nicopolans how to cook the brown grain. To enhance the otherwise unsavory, bland, and bitter gruel, they added blood sausages and salted meat to the rations.

Servius encouraged his men to eat what the locals had to offer and began reducing the grain rations. Fortunately, he faced little rejection, as the portions of salted meat from Korelia kept the men content.

With the food issue partially solved, Lansius and his staff quickly organized the first wave of approximately seven hundred people. They were divided into a dozen groups to be sent to neighboring villages. Each group included locals from the recently freed two hundred South Hill men, ensuring that the policy was well received and didn't cause confusion.

These groups were tasked with assisting in work, particularly on the Baron's communal lands. Men of war they were, but temporarily they would adopt the lifestyle of farmers.

As the first wave set off to their assigned locations, Lansius and his staff watched sombrely. They placed their hopes for the upcoming harvest squarely on these men's shoulders.

 

***

 

Korelia City

The colder wind had prevailed over the summer sun as Korelia celebrated its harvest season. Despite the lackluster harvest results due to the past siege, the people held a modest celebration.

Yet, life in the growing city continued to be exciting, thanks in large part to Sir Anci and Lady Felis, who were seen everywhere in Korelia.

A few weeks ago, Sir Anci, the Champion of the Imperium, had returned from Korimor riding alongside the White Lake cavalry. Since then, he had been staying in Korelia, seemingly enjoying all that the city had to offer. His remaining task was to escort Lady Felicity, who was scheduled to return home.

With Sir Anci's presence, Lady Felis became even more adventurous. She explored everywhere and tried everything she desired. Every place they visited soon became popular.

Recently, she dedicated her time to the newly opened orphanage. Felis arranged for a field kitchen to introduce the orphans to a variety of foods, hoping that good meals would inspire them to learn cooking and grow their own vegetables.

Lady Felis funded the project with her own money, but Calub quickly reimbursed her, feeling it was the right thing to do. The field kitchen's success, and the joy it brought to her heart, encouraged her to extend similar support to the neighboring complex housing veterans.

The veterans and their caretakers warmly welcomed them, grateful for the visit. Lady Felis was a popular figure, and the appearance of Anci, the current Champion of the Imperium, made their visit even more special.

As the field kitchen prepared the meal, Anci engaged in conversation with the veterans. Initially reserved and sympathetic towards the crippled veterans, he came to deeply respect them for their laughter and positive attitude.

After these events, Lady Felis was on the brink of organizing an archery competition for the city's defenders when a large convoy entered the city. Among them were two carriages, escorted by armed cavalry and bearing red banners with twelve silver dragon insignia, unmistakably the Imperium's royal envoys.

Lady Felis knew the envoys were here to bring Lord Lansius' official patent of Baronage. And also served as her escort home. Her fiancé, Lord Arte, had confided in her about the importance of winning their hearts to garner more support for Arvena's cause.

Lady Felicity and Sir Anci quickly collaborated with Calub and Cecile to welcome the royal envoys. As was the custom, they organized a feast on behalf of the Lord of Korelia.

...

 

Sir Justin

While others were busy welcoming the royal envoy from the Capital, the Marshal was expecting a different carriage.

"Boss!" a member of a particularly armed group called out, escorting a carriage and cart.

Just then, the cart's door swung open, and a young girl burst out, running towards Sir Justin. "Father!" she exclaimed excitedly.

"Eleanor!" He embraced her tightly, lifting her up. "Where's your brother and mommy?"

"Brother chose to stay, and mother is taking care of him. I'm the only one who cared enough to come for you," the child spoke rapidly. "See, am I not your best child?"

"Indeed, you are my bravest and best," the knight affirmed, holding her close. "But to travel to Korelia alone, accompanied only by thugs and violent criminals..." He shook his head in pity.

"But daddy, I trust them. They're good company. Tradesman one-ear has the funniest stories, Maester red-face cooks the best meals, and funny-baldy is so thorough with his cleaning."

Sir Justin chuckled, looking proudly at his men, who grinned back.

"Sir, she'll make an excellent little boss," one-ear remarked.

"She's not stingy with money either," the bald one added, prompting laughter from the rest.

"I almost bought you guys a drink, almost..." Sir Justin jested.

The crew groaned, then laughed even harder, knowing Sir Justin was too generous to let good work go unrewarded.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle

The next day, before the banquet honoring the royal envoys, Sir Justin met with them privately. He had previously deliberated with Lady Felis, Anci, Calub, and Cecile.

The envoys, middle-aged men weary from travel, spoke as though they had journeyed continuously from the Capital to Korelia. However, Sir Justin, informed by Anci, knew this was an act. The messengers had actually been in Midlandia for months, stalling as they anticipated a battle.

It was only after Lord Lansius emerged victorious at the Battle of Korelia that they begrudgingly made their way to the city. Their intention now was to exploit the situation, hoping to extort Lord Lansius for his patent of Baronage.

Unfortunately for them, upon their arrival, they learned that Lady Audrey had taken over as the Baroness of Korimor. Her claim was legitimate as she shared blood ties to Omin, the previous Lord of Korimor.

This turn of events lessened the importance of the official patent of Baronage. With Audrey as Lansius' wife, he could legally hold Korelia even without the peerage.

Consequently, after brief negotiations, Sir Justin suavely persuaded the envoys to settle for a small sum of gold as a token of appreciation. While some might view it as wasteful, Lord Lansius had confided to him that their House couldn't afford another front to wage.

Instead of provoking enmity, Lord Lansius had encouraged Sir Justin to promote their commodity, particularly the unique shawls of the nomads, refined by the Korelians to suit noble tastes. In a stroke of ingenuity, the Marshal invited the envoys into the bathhouse and presented them with these shawls as luxurious bathrobes.

The materials were not only soft to the touch and comfortable to wear, but also remarkably warm despite their lightness. Their lustrous sheen and delicate yet strong texture immediately captivated the envoys.

"Is it imbued with magic?" one joked, admiring the fabric.

Sir Justin laughed. "It's our most unique product, only made in winter and in small quantities. What we sell to the market is of lower quality, but what you're wearing is the purest form. We reserve it only for the most distinguished individuals."

Intrigued, the envoys coaxed Sir Justin for more. After feigning reluctance, for a price, he promised to secure another shawl for each of their lovers back in the capital.

That same week, following a short ceremony, the royal envoy officially confirmed Lord Lansius' status as the Baron of Korelia. A royal patent signed by the High Lords Council served as proof. With this, the legality of Lord Lansius' hold over the city and his noble status were affirmed.

While it was only a legal matter, when the Korelians heard about it, they spontaneously threw a modest but city-wide celebration to commemorate their Lord's achievement. Even in his absence, the people of Korelia continued to feel Lord Lansius' presence.

Soon, the burgeoning city would witness the arrival and departure of more important figures as it evolved into the de facto capital of Lowlandia. With sections of its city walls completed, operational windmills, vast agricultural projects, and a thriving market, Korelia had become a magnet for traders and migrants seeking better lives and opportunities.

While this city in faraway Lowlandia was enjoying a peaceful season, outside the province, in Tiberia, a large-scale war was raging. After several pitched battles with inconclusive results, the Imperium forces, led by the high lords, were losing ground.

The ambitious Lord Gottfried of Brigandia, emboldened by Midlandia's favorable reaction, was exerting his utmost efforts to breach the Capital's outer defenses before winter's onset. His northern army was besieging towns and cities, forcing the populace to flee westward.

With the losing battle against the western nomadic incursions in Centuria, the Nicopola famine disaster, turmoil in Elandia, and now a raging rebellion disguised as a civil war in Tiberia, the crisis had fully engulfed the Imperium. 

 

***

 

Chapter 111

Fruges Hiemales

 

Korelia City

The city buzzed with celebration, honoring Lord Lansius' official confirmation as the Baron. It was during this festive atmosphere that Sir Michael and Lady Astrid arrived, accompanied by their new household and entourage. Everyone was pleasantly surprised to learn that the newly married couple had pledged their service to House Lansius. Their arrival provided even more reasons for the Korelians to celebrate.

The merriment and festivities masked the arrival of master masons. These highly skilled and experienced builders hailed from Midlandia and White Lake regions. They had returned with their team to fulfill a contract for building vital infrastructure projects.

While discussing their plan and contract, the conversation often turned to the Lord and Lady of the city. Last season, several had the opportunity to meet and talk to them in person. Despite the rumors, they found the Lord and Lady to be down-to-earth and reasonable, even outright likable.

In their meetings, the Lord of Korelia had expressed his desire for a functional and cost-effective design for a new Great Keep. His intention was not self-glorification or a display of power, but to provide a practical abode for his retinues. He envisioned the Great Keep as defensible, yet equipped with necessary amenities, including heating and plumbing.

Following the Lord's wishes, the master masons based their designs on proven, robust, and maintenance-friendly concepts. The contract stipulated keeping the ornamental pieces to a bare minimum. This approach earned the master masons' respect.

While other nobles favored grand archways, alabaster marbles, and fine sculptures, the Lord of Korelia prioritized defensive capability. This aligned with the master masons' passion for constructing robust defensive structures.

To them, building a castle was akin to a defense game, using a maze-like layout to bewilder attackers. Corridors led to false exits with arrow slit windows on the defenders' side, enabling them to counter with impunity. The gates were deceptive, appearing as main entrances, but were actually wooden gates set against sturdy walls.

Their focus wasn't solely on trapping and countering attackers; they also prioritized the occupants' survival. The design included large warehouses, divided into several chambers, ample water storage, and innovative methods for replenishing fresh water from rain or underground sources.

The master masons fondly recalled their surprise upon completing the blueprint, realizing the Lord of Korelia aimed to construct not just a Great Keep, but a formidable fortress.

Now, they had returned to bring the design to life. They began laboring on the crucial sections of the City Wall and the construction of the new Great Keep. Their commitment would bind them to Korelia for a few years, until the final stone was correctly placed.

 

***

 

Korelia Castle

It was a pleasant morning at Korelia Castle, with clear skies above and a calm wind gently stirring the air. In the courtyard, a bustle of activity unfolded. Coaches and lesser carriages lined up in orderly fashion, attended by a diligent array of escorts. Half of them bore the emblem of twelve silver dragons on a red banner, while others flew the banner of Arvena, featuring a riverbank and a white castle.

From inside the castle, Lady Felicity emerged first, dressed in her traveling attire, followed by the knights and then the squires. The multitudes of people engaged in light hearted chatter as they walked toward the courtyard. The discussion was filled with smiles and chuckles.

During their conversation, the lady paused in front of the coaches and looked back at the castle. "I can’t believe it’s already been one year," she said, her voice tinged with nostalgia.

The others around her responded with sympathetic smiles.

"I hope this isn’t the last time I set foot in Korelia," Felis added, without sounding bitter.

"Lady Felis, you’re always welcome here," Sir Justin reassured her. "Next time you visit, probably the new Great Keep will be finished."

"When that time arrives, I hope to see little Lans or little Drey running around," the lady said, her eyes sparkling with hope.

Sir Justin chuckled. "I'll be sure to mention that to the Lord and Lady."

Lady Felis shifted her attention to the newlyweds, Sir Michael and Lady Astrid, who had recently joined as Lord Lansius' retinue. "Alas, Lady Astrid we haven't had the time to know each other."

"It's a most unfortunate situation, my Lady."

"Please make sure to let Cecile know if you need anything. The weather in Korelia can be challenging at times. Do remember to keep yourself well-quenched with beverages and use herbal balms for your skin."

With a courteous smile, Astrid bowed her head. "I shall keep your advice at heart, my Lady."

Lady Felis then gazed at the knight with the eyepatch, who bowed his head in response. "Sir Michael, I expect great things from you. But remember that you also have duties to your wife."

Sir Michael responded with a respectful nod. "Indeed, my Lady. I am wholly committed to taking care of Lady Astrid with utmost diligence. Her well-being shall always be paramount in my mind."

Satisfied with the answer, Lady Felis’ eyes moved to Calub and Cecile, offering them a warm, acknowledging smile. "I’m going to miss you both."

"I as well, Lady Felis. Please take care out there, Midlandia isn’t safe even for someone like you. Always watch your back and remember to ask Hannei for help," Calub advised.

"Will do, old friend. But really, I wish I had your help just like in Progentia."

Calub chuckled. "When you truly need me, send a rider. I'll be sure to pack my gear and head your way."

Lady Felis smiled but shook her head. "I can't do that. You must be a responsible husband to Cecile and soon father to your children."

Calub and Cecile exchanged smiles, their wedding set for two months' time, just before the onset of winter, when work would subside. At present, everyone was busy and couldn't afford distractions. Should they marry now, every party involved – the guilds, the master masons, Sir Justin, and the castle staff – would be drawn in, inevitably delaying their work.

Lady Felis then beckoned Cecile and Lady Astrid for a private chat.

While the Ladies engaged in their extended farewell, Sir Michael conversed with Calub. Meanwhile, Sir Justin approached Sir Anci. "Are you all set?"

"Should be. My squire and servant are quite the combo," Anci replied with a smug grin. Today he was wearing a bold red brigandine.

The older knight nodded before asking more seriously, "So, what will you do after returning to Midlandia? What is our Lord planning?"

If you stumble upon this tale on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

Anci grinned. "Lord Arte? Can't say for sure, but I sure wish I could bring Lord Lansius. Even just as a guest, he would be a powerful ally." Then he looked at the older knight, asking, "What about you, Sir?"

Sir Justin whistled a tune. "My family estate in Arvena is vast but rocky and stubbornly not fertile. Three generations have tried in vain to grow food on it."

"Ah, I understand that feeling. Still, we could use an advisor."

"Certainly, I owe a lot to your master, Sir Peter. When Lord Lansius returns, my hired company and I shall pay a visit to Lord Arte. I'm no longer his retinue, but for old times' sake, and to settle our blood dispute with Gottfried, I'll do my part."

The two men grinned and clasped hands firmly.

"Gratitude, Sir Justin. I'll let them know about this."

The Marshal then pulled something from his pocket. "A favor if you will, to Lord Arte?"

"Easy, I shall make sure the Lord receives it." Anci accepted Sir Justin's sealed letter and tucked it into his purse.

As Lady Felis concluded her farewells to Cecile and made her way to her carriage, the atmosphere subtly changed. Noticing this Sir Justin took the opportunity to say his final words to Anci. "Please safeguard the young Lord and Lady Felis. And if things get dicey with the Midlandians, you can always find refuge here."

Before the sun grew hotter, the coaches, carriages, and cavalry escorts began their journey back to Midlandia. The castle staff, guards, and townsfolk cheered and prayed for their safe journey.

Along with Lady Felis and Sir Anci, the official envoys also returned to Midlandia. They had been briefed about the ongoing crisis in Elandia and how the seneschal had led his troops to pacify the unrest. The envoys planned to wait in Midlandia until the situation was under control. However, they weren't aware of another war breaking out in Tiberia.

 

***

 

South Hill, Lansius

Midday arrived in one of the villages surrounding South Hill city. The sun cast a mild, gentle warmth over the scenery. A cool breeze, playful and light, gently swayed the golden crops that dotted the landscape. The view gave a sense of lull and peacefulness that contrasted with what Lansius was feeling.

With an uncertain late harvest, his schedule for the next campaign had been compromised. He couldn't help but feel that he was going against time. Worse, his men, who should have been resting to recover from their march, were working in the field.

There's only so much I could do...

The previous day, Lansius had dispatched his first wave of seven hundred men to help with the agriculture production. And today, he was marching with the second wave, sending more men to locations where help was most needed. With the risk so high, he decided to get involved directly.

Lansius was well aware that there was no method to improve the grain yield. What would be harvested now, had been planted in early Spring and matured slowly through summer and early fall. Thus in a sense, the yield had been predetermined.

However, they could still make sure that all cultivated grains would be harvested with minimum loss. In this case, workforce availability was paramount, as well as the correct tools, storage, and transportation.

As support, Lansius had selected three hundred men who had experience with construction to build temporary storage in strategic locations. They were also to maintain the vital road to the city. To assist these groups, he also contracted skilled masons and seasonal laborers from the city.

Guarded by his light cavalry, Lansius wore a humble straw hat and conversed with the village chief, elder, and villagers. He wanted to ensure that his policy was well received.

"For this season only, I free you from working on the communal land," Lansius explained to a crowd of villagers surrounding him.

"My Lord, does that mean we don't need to harvest the Baron's land?" the village chief asked carefully.

"Yes, just this once, you can focus on your patch of land. My men will take care of the Baron's land. But be sure to assist them if they need help. After all, most aren't as experienced farmers as you are," Lansius answered lightly. He had been giving a similar explanation today multiple times already and he needed to repeat the line many more times.

It was a tedious job, but his presence kept his men and new subjects' morale high. While the villagers were at first fearful and guarded, Lansius' demeanor and favorable policy had won them over.

On every occasion, Lansius tried to listen to any problems or suggestions that might arise. He was also checking the brown grain and was relieved to find quite an amount that could sustain his men until the harvest.

From their interaction, Lansius also learned suggestions about winter crops.

"You know about how to grow winter wheat?" Lansius asked in disbelief.

"We do, My Lord. Several generations have successfully planted them, but we lacked the seeds," the village chief explained.

Lansius mulled his response. While the winter crops wouldn’t directly aid his campaign this year, their success would ensure South Hill's food security. This, in turn, would enable him to take more for this upcoming campaign. "Where do you get the seeds for winter wheat?"

"The merchants brought them from Three Hills City, My Lord," the elder replied. He added, "The mark of successful farmers in South Hill is when they are able to buy winter wheat seeds and harvest them in late spring."

"And then switch back to summer wheat after harvest."

"Indeed, My Lord. You seem very knowledgeable about this," the chief said, clearly pleased.

"I'm aware of the practice, but I won't force you to do this. Cultivating and harvesting twice a year is surely taxing on the body."

Not to mention, it might cause a peasant rebellion.

Lansius didn't say the last bit.

"It is, My Lord, but in case of famine, we can endure it, as long as you don't expect many of us to do it every year."

Lansius gazed upon the villagers and declared, "I shall put it in writing that peasants can be taxed only once per year."

The villagers around them cheered, albeit in a subdued way, because they feared offending their new Lord.

"A question though." Lansius returned to the village chief. "Why doesn't Midlandia practice this?"

"My Lord, Midlandia is fertile. If they grow winter wheat and harvest twice, then the price of grain will become worthless. Meanwhile, South Hill and most of Lowlandia are not so fertile. When harvest yields so little, sometimes we need to do this just to survive."

Lansius nodded his head like a student listening to his teacher. Afterward, he said, "I still need to check with the other villages, so I shall take my leave. But tomorrow I shall return to seek your advice."

The village chief, feeling honored, politely bowed deeply. His fellow villagers followed suit.

Lansius gazed at the Nicopolan group who were stationed in this village and instructed, "Treat them well."

The footmen-turned-farmers straightened their backs and replied crisply, "Yes, My Lord."

...

 

Lansius rode his horse and rejoined a separate group that rested at a forked dirt road. Audrey and his entourage were resting there underneath a cluster of old trees. They weren't joining him in the village because they acted as a security lookout and also because Audrey was feeling tired.

Yet, she had insisted on accompanying him, citing that anyone who wished otherwise should be prepared to draw their swords.

"How is she?" Lansius asked Carla as he dismounted.

Carla took the horse's reins and replied, "The Lady just needs a bit of rest. She just had a light snack and has-"

"Has recovered without anything to worry about," Audrey declared as she approached.

Lansius smiled. Meanwhile, sensing it would turn into a private affair, their entourage quickly moved elsewhere and faced the other way.

"So, what does it feel like to return to the farms?" Audrey asked.

Lansius smiled warmly and gently guided her towards a nearby tree, ensuring its broad canopy provided a cool shade over their heads. "Well, it reminds me of Bellandia."

Audrey took a deep breath. "You know, sometimes I feel guilty for bringing you into this. Perhaps it's better if I let you be in Bellandia."

Lansius drew a deep breath and shook his head. "No," he declared firmly. "I wouldn't trade you for anything."

Audrey wasn't expecting such an answer, and her cheeks were slightly flushed. Yet she teased, "Not even for Felicity?"

"No, no, no. I prefer to keep my head attached to my neck."

Audrey giggled. "I doubt Lord Arte will dare to do anything to you. Now that you're a big power in Lowlandia."

Lansius shrugged and then returned to his main concern, "My dear Baroness, I have my sword ready. Shall we duel so I can send you to rest?"

Audrey gave a mischievous grin. "Even in fever, I could still beat you."

Lansius sighed, leaned closer, and then went to check her forehead. "Doesn't feel like a fever..."

"Yes, so let's ride again and finish this inspection tour," she urged.

"You sure, nothing is wrong?"

Audrey left him and went to mount her horse.

Carla brought Lansius' horse and said, "I'll make sure to watch her closely."

"Gratitude. I'm counting on you."

As they were about to ride off, a group of horsemen approached, their banner revealing them to be led by Sir Harold.

Lansius and Audrey paused as the knight rode up to them, greeting, "My Lord, My Lady, we've reached several breakthroughs."

"Do we have the blacksmiths' support?" Lansius asked.

"Yes, My Lord. We can expect good prices for the farming tools."

"Excellent," Lansius responded. "We're going to need those tools as loans for the farmers. Were there many difficulties?"

"Not as many as we expected. Sigmund believes everyone is keen on building good relations and has acted accordingly."

Lansius nodded thoughtfully. Audrey then asked, "So, aside from farming tools, what are they willing to offer us cheaply?"

"We can expect shipments of blood sausages, pickles, turnips, carrots, and cheese," Sir Harold reported.

"That will certainly boost morale," she commented, gazing back at Lansius, who then asked, "What about my other request?"

"It's being prepared as we speak," the knight assured. "But My Lord, is it really necessary?"

Lansius mulled for a moment before saying, "Food security has more aspects than just production and storage. There are other aspects we need to fix. Otherwise, South Hill could become a thorn in our side."

This piqued Audrey's curiosity. "What aspects are you talking about, and what's being prepared?"

"A banquet." Lansius then added with a lower voice, "A grey banquet."

 

***

 

Chapter 112

Long Shot

 

As the sun leaned toward the western horizon, Lansius, Audrey, and their entourage rode towards South Hill city. Instead of heading to the castle, Lansius stopped at the gates, pulled his hood down to conceal his face, and then proceeded to walk towards the market. Audrey and half of their entourage followed, similarly disguised.

With plans for the farming villages taking shape, Lansius now focused on another aspect of rulership: establishing order.

This would be his first time doing so. In Korimor, the Nicopolans had forced them and the Korimor people together, negating the need for such actions. However, the situation in South Hill was different. Though their army had been defeated, the castle, the city, and its inhabitants remained intact.

The situation presented a certain danger and questions of loyalty. Despite having troops stationed, Lansius was determined to ensure South Hill remained under his control, and he had a plan.

Lansius found a suitable place, a modest inn, and he instructed Carla to handle the arrangements. She paid for three people, after which they ascended to the upper floor, leaving the guards outside.

Reaching the second floor, Lansius noted the communal sleeping space was vacant. He hurried to a window overlooking the market.

"Why are we here?" Audrey inquired, peeking through the window.

Absorbed in his thoughts, Lansius replied offhand, "Because it has a view of the market."

Audrey's dissatisfied expression prompted Lansius to add, "I want to... wield my authority."

"Wield what...?" She began, furrowing her brow, but raised her hand to stop him. "Never mind, it's probably complicated. But aren't we supposed to attend a banquet?"

"This is more important than the banquet. Besides, we're not the stars of that event," Lansius said, smiling.

"Interesting..." Audrey mulled.

At that moment, Carla approached. "My Lord, My Lady, your drinks?" she offered, extending a wineskin filled with ale and a waterskin.

Audrey chose the ale, while Lansius continued to watch the market. Spotting a familiar figure, he asked, "Isn't that the hunter from yesterday?"

"Yes, that's Lieutenant Farkas," Audrey confirmed, offering Lansius the wineskin.

"I envy your eyesight," Lansius remarked, accepting the drink. He then instructed Carla, "Fetch Farkas discreetly. And bring Sigmund, but ensure he keeps a low profile."

 

***

 

South Hill Market

The sun had sunk low in the west, but the market was still abuzz with activity. Peddlers occasionally shouted, selling their wares, sellers invited passersby into their shops, and various food stalls offered snacks or a full meal experience.

Captain Sigmund, accompanied by two guards, attracted everyone's attention. Their movement indicated it was a formal occasion, not a mere shopping errand.

The three ascended to the elevated platform usually used for morning auctions.

"Hear ye, hear ye," Sigmund began, addressing the crowd gathered in front of the platform. "I hold a letter from the new City Council."

He displayed a parchment with a wax seal, drawing the crowds closer.

"The City Council decrees: Whoever brings this basket to the guardsman at the gate and takes the receipt will be rewarded with a basket of coins."

Hearing this, the crowds laughed and shook their heads in disbelief. Their laughter grew as many made jokes about it. It was a simple task, yet the reward was so substantial that no one took it seriously. Everyone thought it was a joke, a mistake, or worse, something sinister.

Many tried to persuade their friends to accept the task, but ultimately, no one dared to take the basket from Sigmund's hand.

Sigmund waited patiently. Some inquired about the basket's contents and weight, and he revealed it was filled with simple blood sausages. This further puzzled the crowds and fueled their laughter.

Suddenly, a girl, older than Agatha and wearing miserable, dirty clothing, ascended the platform. She appeared nervous and seemed to anticipate being ousted at any moment. However, Sigmund motioned for her to approach.

The girl cautiously walked closer and Sigmund asked, "Do you understand the assignment, or should I repeat it?"

"Yes, master. Deliver this basket to the guardsmen at the gate and take the receipt from him."

"And then return here with the receipt. Good," Sigmund nodded and handed her the basket. Meanwhile, Sigmund's guard nailed the letter to a wooden pole, marking that the job was taken.

The crowd watched in anticipation, thinking they were in for another jest. As the girl descended with the basket in hand, the crowd followed enthusiastically.

She strolled nervously to the gate, the crowd around her, eager to see what this was all about.

Before long, she reached the gate and handed the basket to the guardsman. Farkas, who was there, counted the sausages and gave her the receipt.

The crowd followed her until she returned to the platform. Many chuckled, ready for the finale of this absurd joke. Some had guessed what would happen, and bets had been made.

The girl handed the receipt back to Sigmund, who gazed upon it and confirmed it. He then said sympathetically, "Place the basket on the floor. It's about to get heavy."

The girl did so, and Sigmund motioned to one of the guards, who opened his thick canvas rucksack and poured copper coins into the basket.

The shimmer of polished copper under the waning sun, the sound of coins trickling down, and the way they poured like water into the basket, left everyone shocked. Mouths agape, jaws dropped. The laughter ceased.

"Enough," Sigmund commanded, and the guard stopped as the wicker basket was filled with coins.

"A basket of coins. The reward is now complete," he announced to the stunned crowd. Almost everyone in the market needed time to process what had just happened. The amount of copper coins they saw was probably worth several months of their salary.

The skald looked at the girl, still amazed at her fortune, and urged her, "Take the reward."

"May I go now?" she asked nervously.

"Certainly. But with so many coins, do you need someone to protect you?"

This content has been misappropriated from Royal Road; report any instances of this story if found elsewhere.

She shook her head. "No, I have friends, and I'm going to share it with them."

"An excellent idea. You may call them now if you wish."

The girl smiled, tears in her eyes. She turned and called for her friends, who ran toward her. They were similarly aged children in ragged clothing and dirty appearances, the lowest of society, living in the slum and working as small laborers, beggars, or pickpockets.

In an unexpected twist, Lansius' mysterious request had likely guaranteed their survival for the winter.

...

 

Lansius watched the entire situation unfold from a prime spot, comfortably seated as Carla had borrowed two chairs from the innkeeper.

"Well, that's unexpected," he remarked.

Audrey expressed her surprise. "You didn't foresee someone like that girl winning?"

"How could I have anticipated things like that?" Lansius chuckled. "Still, it's a fortunate coincidence."

Noticing Audrey's puzzled expression, he elaborated, "I mean, they needed the coins more than mere peddlers."

"What are you trying to achieve by giving a basket of coins? It's a large amount."

"What I have in mind is worth more than a basket of gold coins," Lansius stated confidently, piquing Audrey's curiosity.

The sound of footsteps from below caught their attention. Carla appeared. "A message from Sir Harold. Your presence is expected at the castle."

"It's time to leave," Lansius declared.

Audrey stood up, and Lansius noticed her wincing. "Do you need to lie down?"

"No, no need. I'm just a bit hungry, that's all," she replied lightly and went on her way, leaving Lansius scratching his head.

 

***

 

South Hill Castle

The Lord and Lady entered the Great Hall where a banquet was being held.

"Behold, you are in the presence of the Lord of Korelia, Lord of South Hill, Protector of Korimor, and the Leader of the Grand Alliance," his herald announced.

In contrast to his grand titles, Lansius wore a milky-white tunic that had little to show.

Ever perceptive, Lansius noticed the subtle looks, ire, and smirks. Yet he said nothing. With Audrey by his side, he walked toward the high table as their new subjects slightly lowered their heads.

Before taking a seat, Lansius turned around to face them. "Gentlemen and ladies. My gratitude for your presence. Please accept my apologies for my attire. In my defense, the inspection of the farmland took more time than expected."

The nobles seemed pleased, offering subdued chuckles.

"South Hill is a fine place, long mismanaged, but I am hopeful we can rectify this. Through my policy, which many of you have supported, I hope we can start with a clean slate." Lansius took a goblet from Carla and raised it high.

Sir Harold led the nobles in raising their goblets. "To a new start," the knight announced, and they echoed in unison.

Lansius took a drink, followed by the others. Then, the Lord and Lady took their seats, and the banquet continued with an assortment of snacks.

"A banquet while we are on the verge of famine," Audrey remarked, her voice nearly lost in the music.

"Occupying a land involves more than just garrisoning it with troops," Lansius explained. Seated apart from the rest, they conversed without being overheard.

Audrey listened intently. "I see, so we're keeping them happy. But what about the plan you, Servius, and Sir Harold have concocted?"

Lansius smiled. "It's the same objective: ensuring our food security."

Her gaze sharpened. "But they're not farmers."

"Audrey, food security lies not only in the fields but also at the tables of the rich."

She looked surprised, then thoughtful.

Lansius continued, "When people discuss the food situation, they usually think of production or storage. However, there is one other equally important aspect, and that is consumption."

"But these are landowners. Wealthy as they are, they only number a fraction compared to the thousands of people in this region."

"You are correct. But you see, there are only two actors in consumption: the gentry and the commoners. Naturally, if we want to save on food, it would make more sense to address the commoners' consumption."

Audrey nodded, agreeing with the notion.

Lansius then grinned unexpectedly. "Audrey," he called her, feigning disappointment.

"What?" she frowned.

"That's how the noblemen think. To address the commoners' consumption: Do you want to ration the poor while the rich feast at their leisure?"

Surprised, she blinked several times. "I didn't mean that."

Lansius chuckled. "My dear squire turned Baroness, you're starting to think like a noble."

She pouted. "I'll reflect on that. But then, if we can't fix the commoners' consumption, what should we do?"

"It's quite a hard issue. We could order the populace to eat less, but we could risk a rebellion. Meanwhile, it's also a useless move."

"Useless, how?"

Lansius chuckled. "They're just like us several years ago, but worse. Commoners in Lowlandia mostly only eat just enough to get by. Compared to Arvena or Midlandia, they have it worse."

"True, our Lowlandian-born troops are easily contented. A bowl of hot gruel can make them happy," Audrey recalled from her experience.

"Exactly. So, we can't ask the South Hill commoners to eat less. It would be like ordering them to starve."

"I understand now." She exhaled sharply. "Earlier, you mentioned food security also lies at the table of the rich?"

"Indeed. We need to focus on these wealthy people. Look at this banquet. They expect nothing less than a feast. I told Sir Harold to ask the castle staff to prepare an ordinary banquet as we're not celebrating anything special, yet here we are."

Audrey observed the Great Hall, filled with an array of food including two roast ducks, fruits, and ales. "It is rather excessive."

"They're accustomed to abundance. Ironically, the fall of House Gunther made them more powerful. After all, land and food production go hand in hand with wealth and power."

"But they feared you. A decree might be enough."

Lansius put a slice of honeyed milk bread pudding on her plate and explained, "A decree would only alienate them. We've already asked them to support the new policy, pitting them against Sir Gunther's associates."

"True, we've already asked that of them. Demanding more might provoke trouble," Audrey said as she stared at the cake-like pudding. "Also, I believe you don't intend to garrison South Hill with such a large force indefinitely."

"Indeed. That's why we need to address the elephant in the room," Lansius said, taking a bite of egg custard.

Audrey put her plate aside. "What about the reason behind the basket of coins?"

"That one will take time to fully mature." Lansius pondered finding it difficult to explain. "It's to coax the populace to our side, and there's also a different benefit you'll learn about later."

"So, it was more than just giving away a basket of copper coins," she nodded thoughtfully.

Sir Harold, dressed in an exquisite gambeson tailored to fit his height and stature, approached the high table. "I apologize for the interruption, but My Lord, Servius is ready."

"Servius?" Audrey asked.

"He's the star of this show." Lansius chuckled and then added, "Now, it's time to go on the offensive."

With Sir Harold by his side, Lansius stood in front of his table, capturing the attention of everyone in the Great Hall.

The musicians stopped their gittern and lute. Lansius then addressed the chamber, "Gentlemen and Ladies, I'm sure you have met my acting Captain and host of this banquet, Servius." He gestured towards the man.

Servius, dressed sharply in striking yellow and black, bowed to the audience.

The nobles nodded, acknowledging Servius.

Lansius continued, "You may have discussed various topics with Servius: politics, mercenaries, even perhaps food production. He knows it all. As the commander of a condottieri legion, I'm sure you all feel safe in his presence."

Many nodded their heads in agreement.

"Now that we've established his credibility, we have an important story to share," Lansius said, motioning for Servius to take the lead.

"I apologize, as what I'm about to reveal may be unsettling," Servius began. "It happened this summer in Nicopola. Just like the previous year, there were rumors of famine. However, such occurrences had happened so often that frankly, nobody gave a damn. After all, it was all too common for the poor and peasants to die. 'Such is the law of this world,' they say."

The guests nodded, each sharing a similar sentiment.

"As for the better members of society, well... It was only expected for us to have enough to weather the storm. Being a legion commander, I had more than just land and money. I also had connections and armed men at my disposal. Securing food for myself was all too easy."

The landowners looked captivated by his story. As Lansius had expected, Servius who had wealth, power, and commanded men served as a relatable figure for these people, almost a role model, embodying what they aspired to be.

"That summer, I expected food prices to rise, but I wasn't worried. If prices doubled, I would simply pay more. If they tripled, I would use my men to negotiate a better price. But I was wrong," Servius said, his tone turning grim.

The guests could sense something was about to be revealed, and their expressions hinted at fear and discomfort.

"Prices rose tenfold for a week, and then there was none to be found. The markets closed; the stalls... empty."

Small gasps emerged from the female guests. Servius paid no heed, "I sent armed men to 'borrow' grains. The merchants begged, fought, and cried that it was all they had left for their families. Only then did I realize that my city was doomed."

As Servius's tale unfolded, a heavy silence fell over the Great Hall. The guests, who had indulged to the point of excess as was customary, now felt a wave of nausea washing over them, their faces painted with concern. While Lowlandia was accustomed to lawlessness and armed conflicts, it had never faced total societal collapse.

Their relatively small population and reliance on herding had shielded them from the worst outcomes. But now, Servius's story brought the horrors of famine to their minds, starkly contrasting with the abundant leftovers from the feast still on their table.

Lansius observed calmly, eying the room for even the subtlest shifts. He needed to ascertain whether his subjects bought the story. If not, he would have no choice but to resort to more radical measures to curb their excessive consumption. Such measures, he knew, could eventually provoke attacks against his lieutenants and captains.

A knife in the back, or poison in their drinks – such were the risks. And when that happened, even Lansius feared what he would do to them. Thus, for everyone involved, this evening would be a turning point.

 

***

 

Chapter 113

Gentle Giant

 

South Hill, Great Hall

The banquet halted as Servius recounted the fall of the Nicopolans. From their high table, Lansius and Audrey noted how intently the entire chamber listened, with even the castle staff and servants straining to hear.

"There was no more food in town. The baker had closed, and everyone kept a watchful eye for chimneys billowing smoke," Servius continued his account. "For the first time in my life, I had no choice but to gather what I had and venture out in search of food. I was fortunate to have my men with me. Like nomads, we raided villages and manors for food. Without my men, my family and I would likely have ended up dead."

The guests were visibly uneasy, gripped by their insecurities. Lansius understood that, despite the guests' earlier merriment, they felt vulnerable. After all, he had just toppled their previous lord, who had reigned for over a decade. And it had all happened so suddenly, without even a warning.

"Many stragglers followed us, starving and desperate. Initially, my men chased them off, but eventually, even that became too much effort. They were too numerous. Like vultures, they scavenged the places we had raided, searching for leftover crumbs. Yet, even for us, there was hardly anything to eat." Servius paused, his sharp yet somber gaze sweeping over the guests, who sat at long tables still laden with leftover food.

"Some resorted to eating insects, rats, lizards, and even young tree bark. When those ran out, they boiled leather from pouches and shoes collected from the dead. Some hallucinated and ate wild grass. Many died en masse. I witnessed people killing each other over worn boots found in gutters." He hesitated for a moment before continuing, "Then, I found help."

Many in the chamber breathed a sigh of relief.

"We encountered a large group who persuaded us to travel east through the mountains into Lowlandia. They had a large cache of food from raiding bigger manors and estates."

The guests exchanged uneasy glances. It dawned on them that they, as owners of similar manors and estates, could easily have been the victims of such raids.

Servius continued, unfazed by the guests' reactions. "I thought my men and our families were saved, but it turned out we were deceived. They wanted men to fight their war, thinking to become Lord and nobles." He sighed. "A war in the height of famine? To even attempt this foolishness was just unthinkable. However, we followed because the group was able to provide food against all odds. Unbeknownst to us, they fed us with a mixture of horse meat and human flesh."

The chamber was filled with horrified expressions and gasps, some guests turning pale. Some looked to Lord Lansius, imploring him to intervene.

One man spoke up, "My Lord, please, this is too much."

Lansius didn't budge. "You should know that all three thousand Nicopolans under my command have tasted human flesh. If I had lost the battle in Korimor, I might have been eaten," he said with a scornful laugh, maintaining the pressure. Then he added, "Everyone here would do well to listen, so the tragedy that befell these Nicopolans doesn't occur in South Hill."

With the Lord's support, Servius took center stage again. "Even before crossing into Lowlandia, the situation had become dire. We saw more and more corpses with missing limbs on the road. Fleeing groups from other towns said they witnessed how the weak and the unfortunate were butchered. But the poor had nothing left but skins and bones, and so these cannibals began to target the wealthy and nobles as if they were livestock."

The grim tale managed to instill fear, especially among the wealthy.

"Servius, enough. They've learned the lesson," Lansius declared, and the man in yellow and black turned and bowed.

A guest quickly asked, "My Lord, why are you telling us this? Is this meant as a warning?"

"A warning...? Not quite," Lansius remarked. "Did you know that the Nicopolans came to Lowlandia and laid waste to Umberland?"

The guests started to murmur among themselves, having heard nothing of this predicament.

"Servius, tell them how many of you attacked Umberland," Lansius instructed.

Servius took a deep breath and replied, "Eight thousand crossed into Umberland and raided the communities. We found food, but not enough, so we ventured further to Korimor."

The hall was in disbelief; such a large number was hard to fathom.

"In Korimor, I encountered Lord Lansius, and our two armies battled. Fortunately, Lord Lansius defeated the vile group and freed my men. It was a great victory, one I still cherish. However, Umberland, the gateway to Nicopola, remains open. The Lord and Lady have defeated one group, but more are on their way. And on this side of Lowlandia, there are only Three Hills and South Hill."

The revelation left the guests, especially the wives, even more disturbed.

A man in his late fifties, plump and well-dressed, retorted, "My Lord, forgive me, but we in South Hill have never experienced such extreme famine. Perhaps-"

"Yes, Lowlandia is more robust because we have a large number of herders. However, do you think it's feasible to survive by only eating meat alone?"

His simple question left the guests troubled.

Lansius pushed his point further. "Are there enough lambs, ducks, and, the Ageless forbid, horses for us to eat and survive Winter and Spring?"

Most guests could only stare down, some with defeated looks.

"Gentlemen and ladies of South Hill, some of you will think of my Captain's story as no more than a veiled threat. A way to scare you and to deceive you. But let it be known that I'm merely trying to save this region, its people, and all of your families included."

The shift in tone prompted the guests to look upon Lansius with renewed spirit.

"I'm sure there have been rumors about me. So let me make it clear: I don't take what isn't mine by law. I don't want to impose complicated rules. And I certainly have no right to order you to eat less. By the Ageless, I believe that everyone is entitled to freely buy what they want and to eat what they want, as long as it's not detrimental to society."

The guests' expressions lightened. One of them asked, "Then, My Lord, what do you want us to do?"

Lansius smiled. "All I'm suggesting is: Maybe we could feast with less. Perhaps, we don't need to eat this many loaves of bread or this many plates of lamb chops. Maybe some of this fruit would even taste better if dried or preserved in honey to be eaten during winter? And surely cheese is finer when aged."

If you find this story on Amazon, be aware that it has been stolen. Please report the infringement.

Nods of agreement followed. The idea wasn't hard or taxing to implement and in some cases had some benefit.

"The next harvest is uncertain, and even if it appears abundant, it is wise to conserve. Ensure you stock up and try hard not to waste food. I'm sure you're aware that increasing food production is challenging. However, we can save a little on food. Even a little savings will be useful and might save this region from famine. If we achieve this, my troops will have a free hand to retake Umberland and prevent another incursion into Lowlandia."

With these words, the guests seemed to be swayed to Lansius' cause.

...

 

After Lansius' speech, where he encouraged his subjects to consume less, the banquet continued with lively conversation. Servius and Sir Harold remained as co-hosts, while the Lord and Lady excused themselves to rest after an earlier, lengthy inspection tour.

"I'm surprised you didn't threaten them to eat less or face famine," Audrey commented as soon as the door closed behind them. Here, in the privacy of the Lord's chamber, they could speak freely.

"Threatening them with new laws or rules wouldn't do us any good. They'll find a way to circumvent the rule or just hide their feasts," Lansius said, scanning the colorful room, which was more spacious than those in Korelia or Korimor, though Korimor had better furniture and taste.

She gazed at him. "Can't we use punishment to deter them?"

"Unfortunately, we don't have a reliable way to enforce the rule, unless you want to create an armed group whose job is to break into people's banquets and check whether they're eating too much," Lansius chuckled. "And really, just how much is too much?"

"Ah, true. That would be hard to do," Audrey muttered.

"Impractical and also unpopular," Lansius added.

A soft knock was heard, and then the door cracked open slightly. "My Lord, My Lady, Sterling just arrived from Three Hills City," Carla reported.

"Ah, I'll meet him in the council room, then," Lansius said to Carla. He was eager for news from Three Hills. And then, to Audrey, "Do you want to come?"

"No. Not this time. I'm all sticky from the heat; I'd better clean up while there's still some light, or I might ruin the new bedsheet."

Lansius nodded. "Indeed, the linen looks new. Then I'll be heading to the council room."

"Lans, can you ask Carla to enter on your way out? I need to check this chamber."

"Checking for venomous traps?" Lansius asked, observing the room.

"Yes, we'd better be vigilant," Audrey replied. "One vengeful servant with a snake can wreak havoc. Even with Sir Harold and Dietrich's assurances, I won't rest easy until I've checked things myself."

...

 

Council Chamber

"My Lord," the young squire greeted as soon as Lansius entered.

"Sterling, when did you arrive?" Lansius asked.

"Just in time for the banquet. I must say, that was an unexpected speech."

Lansius chuckled and gestured for him to take a seat. "What do you think about Servius' story and my speech?"

"Captivating, My Lord. But you did ask them to stock up for winter, wouldn't it raise the price of grains?"

"Oh, I'm expecting that."

"You want the price of grain to rise?" Sterling asked, baffled.

Lansius chuckled as he understood Sterling's confusion. "Unlike in Korelia, South Hill has a different situation. Here, more than half of the people are farmers."

Sterling gave no response but listened intently.

"Usually, prices go down at harvest so that the farmers barely make a profit. Thus, for them, high prices mean great benefits. It'll empower them to buy tools, winter clothes, oxen, or draft horses for ploughing. But more importantly, it'll give them more incentive to plant winter wheat."

Sterling looked surprised. "Winter wheat? The farmers here can do that?"

"Indeed, it's surprising that they are familiar and willing to do it. South Hill farmers are more advanced than I expected. Or it might have something to do with their climate," Lansius mused, remembering that South Hill is close to Corinthia, which had access to the Middle Sea.

"But what about the poor and the seasonal laborers?" Sterling inquired.

"It's unfortunate that they won't enjoy cheap grain this season, but at least at the end of spring, there will be another harvest. For this region, my aim is to guarantee grain availability. Price will follow availability. Besides, it's not like the price won't come down at all."

Sterling nodded, trying to comprehend the new concept.

"So what happened in Three Hills?" Lansius changed the subject. "Are there any difficulties?"

Sterling took something from his inner pocket and revealed a leather wrap. "My Lord, the letters and reports from Three Hills."

Lansius took them, broke the seal, and read some of them. "Did we make it?" he asked.

"Yes, My Lord. After we received news of your victory in South Hill, the Lord of Three Hills quickly rallied his supporters to back our campaign to Umberland."

Lansius exhaled deeply. "I'm relieved, but I'm surprised it took another victory to convince them."

"Lady Daniella and I wish to offer our apologies; perhaps our incompetence was the cause-"

"No, don't be. You did well. These letters, proof of purchases, and reports of winter provisions, prove that you two worked hard. Perhaps, I underestimated the complexity of the politics in Three Hills," Lansius considered. "Tell me, how's the harvest in Three Hills?"

"I heard it's not their best, but still a good harvest, My Lord. Unexpectedly, they're doing well. One more thing, I also received news that Korimor also enjoyed a good harvest."

Lansius rested his back on the seat and felt a lot of weight lifted from his shoulders. He couldn't resist chuckling.

Watching his Lord brighten, Sterling smiled. "I heard people say that every land My Lord has graced has produced a good harvest."

Lansius responded with a small grin and shook his head. "That's a dangerous idea. If next year's harvest is bad, then they'll blame me."

Sterling chuckled and then, adopting a more serious tone, spoke, "My Lord, since I'm here and Lady Daniella didn't specify for me to return, may I have my old post back?"

"You want to be my squire again?" Lansius wanted to confirm.

"Every youth in Lowlandia wishes to be your squire, My Lord."

Lansius was pleased with the praise. "Then I'll gladly have your service back."

 

***

 

South Hill Market

The next day, before midday when the market was slowing down, Sigmund and several men appeared with a donkey cart in tow. Their appearance triggered a wave of onlookers who crowded around the market's elevated platform.

"Hear ye, hear ye," Sigmund addressed the crowd. "I hold a letter from the new City Council."

He displayed a parchment with a wax seal, and the crowd looked on with intense anticipation.

"The City Council decrees: Whoever brings the donkey and the goods to the village north of the city, will receive a house and a sizable farmland."

Instead of racing toward Sigmund to accept the order, the crowd burst into laughter. The reward seemed too good to be true. Many were convinced that the council was trying to make a joke out of them.

A few approached the donkey, trying to get a feel for the beast's temperament, but were subsequently kicked or bitten. This led the crowd to laugh even more; many were brought to tears by the hilarity of the scene. Some offered encouragement, while others made jokes, as the donkey turned out to be unexpectedly fierce and strong.

When they were all defeated, the crowd called upon one name, the market's champion, Robart.

Robart emerged from the workshop where he worked. Towering over the crowd, he was a strong but gentle man with a simple mind. He wasn't interested in the commotion, finding it amusing but not for him until the crowd convinced him to give it a try.

With his maester's encouragement, Robart went to the wooden platform and accepted the challenge.

Sigmund asked, "Do you understand the assignment, or should I repeat it?"

Robart nodded, saying, "Take the donkey and the cart to the village north of here."

"Excellent!" Sigmund replied and motioned his men to give the donkey's rein to Robart.

Sigmund then nailed the letter to a wooden pole himself to mark that the job was taken.

The crowd watched in anticipation. As expected, Robart easily wrestled the donkey and guided the beast and the cart to the city gate. Many followed him eagerly as if it were a parade.

As Robart and the cart left the city, the crowd returned to their work, thinking this was nothing more than just an amusement.

Sigmund also left the market, leaving only one man in the general vicinity to keep watch.

As the sun reached its zenith and then slowly descended to the west, people began to rest from their daily labor. That's when Robart returned with the donkey cart. His return was hailed like a hero's, with people and kids crowding around him.

Before he even reached the market, people were already laughing at this apparent foolishness. "A house and a sizeable farmland, just for taking a donkey to a village? What mad jest the new council has concocted."

Nevertheless, people flocked to see the end of this spectacle, expecting a punchline. Many had placed their bets against Robart, with most betting that the Council would give nothing more than a small guardhouse and a garden with a single tree beside it. Some even bet that the Council would give a toy house and bags of soil.

Oblivious to the laughter directed at him, Robart lumbered happily to the market; he even effortlessly carried two small kids in one of his arms, all the while guiding the donkey with the other. Meanwhile, the empty cart had become a playful ride for the poor kids who worked and grew in the market.

Soon, Robart found the guard and handed over the donkey's reins, which the guard smilingly tied to a fence.

"Please wait a moment. On behalf of the Lord, the new Council shall send their men with your reward," the guard said. The crowd didn't have to wait long before the sound of hooves echoed in the distance.

 

***

 

Chapter 114

Agrarius

 

The City Council official, Sigmund, and his men returned to the market, riding their horses. Upon seeing the donkey and the empty cart, Sigmund asked Robart, "Do you have the receipt?"

Robart gently set the kids down from his arms and rummaged through his pocket to produce a small parchment with a seal on it.

Sigmund took the parchment, examining it with a smile. He then turned to face the crowd and declared, "I hold the contract fulfilled."

Robart's face broke into a happy grin while the kids in the cart erupted into cheers and claps. Meanwhile, the crowd watched on, their faces full of anticipation.

Sigmund gazed at Robart and said, "Please follow me. I'll show you to your new house and the land promised by the new Council."

Hearing that, the crowd turned dead silent. They exchanged doubtful looks, and skepticism was in the air. Driven by curiosity, they followed Robart and the Lord's men. Soon, the market was nearly empty, as shop owners, stall keepers, peddlers, and even innkeepers joined the procession, all eager to see whether the council would keep its promise.

Sigmund rode at an easy pace. He conversed with Robart and traded banter along the way.

Not far from the city gate, they found a good house surrounded by good land for crops, vegetable plots, or orchards. Many were familiar with the house as it was one of the most coveted properties. The previous Lord demanded a high price for it and so far, none had been able to rent or buy it.

Sigmund dismounted as the crowd gathered around them. He held an official parchment sealed with the Lord's stamp. "As promised. A good house and a good land." He then surrendered the document, a key, and three silver coins. "For the repairs should it be needed."

At first, the crowd shook their heads in disbelief, murmuring in confusion. Soon, however, a chorus of congratulations overtook them. They cheered for Robart. While feeling the prize was excessive, they also believed the gentle giant was probably the most worthy recipient of the house, as he had helped many, countless times without asking for anything in return.

When someone attempted to buy the house from Robart, Sigmund intervened, saying, "The Council only recognizes Robart as the owner. Only the Lord of the City could change the arrangement."

The mere mention of Lord Lansius was sufficient to deter anyone from exploiting Robart's simple nature.

After ensuring everything was in order, Sigmund and his men departed, leaving Robart and the onlookers to examine the property to their hearts' content.

As the sun began to set, many gathered at Robart's new house, bringing meals, small gifts, and ales to celebrate the unexpected boon. Some even introduced their daughters to Robart. The evening unfolded beautifully, with plenty of warmth and joy.

Throughout the feast, one topic dominated their conversations: the Lord and his new Council's commitment to keeping true to their words. Despite numerous rumors questioning their motives, the general sentiment was overwhelmingly positive.

 

***

 

Castle

While the scene in the market unfolded, Lansius was busy sorting the affairs of the nobles. In the morning, Lansius held his first official court and formally received guests who came to pay their respects. Many were ransomed knights or notable men-at-arms who pledged their loyalty to House Lansius.

With their pledge, Lansius received an additional 20 knights, 50 light cavalry, and around 100 men-at-arms, whom he subsequently integrated with Servius' Nicopolan regiment to ensure their loyalty.

Lansius welcomed the new cavalry, as his own had been campaigning with him since summer. His riders had marched and fought for far more than the normative forty days.

Unlike his commoner-based light cavalry, dragoons, and men-at-arms, whose contracts were year-round, the knights and their followers were only obligated to serve for a limited time. After their victory in South Hill, laden with honor and spoils, they expressed a desire to return home.

Sir Harold, as their senior commander, reported that some enjoyed South Hill and its different climate, while others wanted to build houses in Korimor, as Lansius had given them a parcel of land as promised. However, most wished to return to Korelia as many were native to the area between Korelia and White Lake.

Since the campaign in Umberland would mostly be fought in the mountains, Lansius didn't mind sending his heavy cavalry home. He had already calculated that it would be a mostly infantry affair with few opportunities for cavalry action.

After the formalities ended, his staff tallied the records and found that almost all the captured knights had agreed to join in order to receive a lighter ransom and retain their previous status. Those who did not join were either financially struggling to pay the ransom or were among Sir Gunther's top enablers, whose illegally acquired lands had been repossessed.

With the new policy gaining wider acceptance from the peasantry, commoners, and landlords, the lands of South Hill were transformed. The policy brought structural change that overruled every land grant and corruption that the previous House had done. In a sense, this was a mini agrarian reform without the bloodshed.

Instead of confiscating one by one and causing lengthy feuds, the policy provided South Hill with a clean slate.

Lansius understood that he could only do this because he had achieved military victory over the reigning House and captured most of the influential knights. He was under no illusion that everyone would willingly accept the policy. He knew that sooner or later, he would face resistance or even an armed rebellion.

...

 

Council Chamber

"The previous lord's top enablers had lived an easy life like mini barons for a long time. Likely, they wouldn't take a hard life willingly," Lansius commented as he and his staff convened in the council chamber.

"Do you expect an armed rebellion?" Audrey, who sat next to him, asked.

"Well, not now while we have thousands of troops, but later on when we go on a campaign."

Sir Harold sighed before suggesting, "We could capture them again and hold them indefinitely."

Lansius shook his head. "We could, but we have no proof, only hunches and suspicions. Also, it would give us a bad name since they just paid their ransom in full."

Sterling, who was back on the job, looked at the documents and commented, "Indeed, they paid in full."

Lansius nodded and gazed at Audrey, saying, "They're certainly rich and could raise a mini army if they want to."

"We could leave a sizable garrison to counter them," she proposed.

"That is one strategy to deter them. But I'm thinking of sapping their strength," Lansius proposed.

This tale has been pilfered from Royal Road. If found on Amazon, kindly file a report.

Everyone looked at him with anticipation. "What do you mean by that?" Audrey asked.

"Does it have to do with the struggling knights?" Sir Harold ventured.

"Indeed." Lansius smiled. "I'm thinking of curbing their power further. Let's extend our hand to the struggling knights."

Sir Harold rubbed his chin. "Does that mean, My Lord are willing to loan them money?"

"No, it'll set a bad example. At most, I'm willing to forfeit my share of the ransom." According to the law, the one who captured a person was entitled to half the ransom, while the other half went to the lords — in this case, directly to Lansius' coffers.

Audrey looked puzzled. "But what if they still can't pay even after you forfeit your share of the ransom?"

"Easy, I'll accept their property as collateral until they prove their valor in the next campaign."

Sterling quickly made notes as nobody voiced any objection.

The discussion carried on until Dietrich arrived with new reports about South Hill. Lansius then made several decisions, focusing on billet housing and the maintenance of carts, which had been used extensively during the march from Korimor. Additionally, he addressed a number of other issues requiring attention from his staff.

"Make sure to invite one of the duck breeder families and the orchard master to Korelia. Their expertise would be invaluable," Lansius instructed.

"Noted," Sir Harold remarked while Sterling made some notes.

"How about Sir Gunther?" the knight inquired.

"Yes, he accepted the move to Korelia. So, arrange for his household to be included in the convoy. Our knights and cavalry should be a good escort for him."

Everyone nodded, agreeing with Lansius' decision.

Audrey looked around and asked, "Anything else, or can we take a break?"

Dietrich shook his head. Apart from the reports he had collected, he was mostly dealing with security, and there was little to be concerned about with such a large army garrisoning the region.

"Perhaps one more thing?" Sir Harold asked.

"Please, feel free," Lansius replied.

"The staff and I were a bit perplexed as to why, My Lord only purchased so little winter gear. Wouldn't we need a lot of them for the upcoming campaign?"

"Ah," Lansius exclaimed. "Well, first of all, we already stockpiled a good amount in Three Hills. Secondly, I'm afraid that if I purchase more in South Hill, the price would rise so high that the commoners who need it for winter would suffer."

His explanation was well received and Lansius continued, "There's also another concern. I don't want to make the price rise so high that making winter gear becomes so profitable it takes workers from the farms."

Sir Harold nodded, pleased with the explanation.

Seeing that nobody else had anything to say, Lansius rose and the rest of the council members followed. "Then, let's take some rest until the sun is more forgiving, and then we'll do a round of inspection to the villages."

That concluded the council meeting.

 

***

 

Lansius

As the midday sun passed, the Lord and Lady, escorted by cavalry, went to inspect the farming communities again to ensure that nothing was amiss. Lansius was gladdened to see that some changes had already taken effect.

The farmlands were noticeably less grassy, and the work areas for processing and storing grains were also being cleaned and repaired. Some of the villagers were repairing fences to protect the ripe crops from animals, some started to hunt for pests, and a few were making scarecrows.

The Nicopolans were also adapting better than expected, starting their work on the communal plot by weeding, replacing broken fences, and fixing the dirt road so carts could move more easily. Their only complaints were about the bitter grain, and they asked for more ale and sausages.

Lansius jokingly told them to wait, pointing out that the harvest was near and it would be wasteful to drink now without a celebration. However, he promised to deliver them fresh batches of sausages from the hunt as soon as possible.

In other villages, some vegetables had been harvested, and Lansius witnessed that the Nicopolans and the locals could work hand in hand.

After spending time with the village chief, the Lord and Lady rode back to the castle. Lansius was scheduled to sign some trade contracts, one of which was a purchase order for winter wheat seeds.

As was the custom, the negotiation had been dealt with beforehand, and the merchant, a plump man in his fifties, was given an audience as a formality.

"My Lord, My Lady," the merchant greeted. "It's an honor to be in your esteemed presence once again."

"We are as well," Lansius replied warmly and then motioned for Sterling to proceed.

Sterling approached the merchant and gave the freshly stamped document. The merchant accepted the scroll politely.

"Is everything alright on your end?" Lansius asked from his seat.

"Everything seems fine, My Lord. Although, your subject has a question."

"I don't mind," said Lansius, gazing at Audrey, who looked tired. "But keep it short," he added.

"Certainly. Your subject only wanted to ask, why is My Lord buying winter wheat seeds?"

"Ah, that. I suppose I could tell you. As I have done with farming tools, I intend to give the seeds to the farmers."

The merchant couldn't help but ask, "For free?"

"Indeed. The whole strategy is to increase production by lending tools and seeds to the peasantry," the Lord explained.

The merchant nodded, saying, "My Lord is too generous. The peasants will be pleased."

"It's good business to keep them content," the Lord replied. "With the situation in Lowlandia and the Imperium in general, I fear that in the near future, money will be worth less compared to grains. We'll do well to prepare in advance lest we become victims of the turmoil."

"Wise words, My Lord. I shall take them to heart." With nothing more to say, Sterling escorted the merchant out.

With the audience session concluded, Lansius rose and stretched his arms.

Audrey smiled at him. "Tired?"

"Yeah." Lansius took her hand and helped her up. "We have some free time before supper. But perhaps we could have a private dinner if you wish."

Audrey looked at him with a smile. "Do I look that pale today?"

"Hardly, suntanned even," he jested.

She chuckled and replied, "A private dinner sounds nice."

"That's settled then," Lansius declared.

Behind them, Carla and Sterling made mental notes about what to arrange for the evening.

 

***

 

Grand Chamber

The Grand Chamber, situated on the second floor, was a smaller hall compared to the Great Hall. The place was a functional room for the Lord's family, used either to dine, listen to music, or receive guests in private.

That evening, Sigmund had come and reported the event at the market.

"Robart..." Lansius mulled the name as if trying to memorize it. However, he had no intention to meet or invite the gentle giant. He only wished for him to live in peace.

"Is the reward really necessary?" Audrey asked after finishing half her meal.

Lansius smiled. "A good house and a good land might seem excessive."

"Then why?" she asked.

Lansius chuckled. "You'll find out in a week or so."

"You're going to do more?" Audrey blurted out.

Lansius laughed, finding it hard to explain. Even he himself struggled to recall the exact historical case he had read only once or twice. Fortunately, he was able to grasp the underlying idea and concept well enough to attempt to apply it.

For reasons unknown to him, before he arrived in this world, aside from games, history was all he had or was interested in. Lansius gazed at Audrey to reassure her, "There's no point if I don't follow up. But I understand your concern. I don't intend to waste any more of our precious assets."

"Well, it's not like I don't trust you, but sometimes, I'm worried since Calub isn't around." There was a hint of guilt in her voice.

"We have Sterling," Lansius said, and the squire bowed his head, adding, "I'll do my best to live up to your expectations."

"Make sure the Lord isn't wasteful. He has three Baronies to run," she said with concern.

Lansius couldn't help but quip, "It's a mark of a good wife to be concerned about her husband's spending."

Audrey chuckled, took her goblet of pale ale, and drank it straight. Her eyes were already drowsy.

"These past few days have been exhausting," Lansius remarked.

"Indeed, it's best if we take care of ourselves. Else miasma might catch us."

Lansius nodded. The miasma concept was false but he felt that the weather was quite different compared to Arvena, and that might cause problems. Even Audrey was having trouble. "Let's head to the bedroom then. Might be a good idea to rest early. I don't feel like reading books or scrolls tonight."

"I agree," Audrey replied. She then turned to Carla. "Let's skip sword training tonight."

"Of course, My Lady," Carla replied, and then piqued by their unusual condition, she poured the ale from her wineskin into another cup and took another sip from it.

Observing her, Sterling approached the table and sniffed at the ale.

"Something in the ale?" Lansius asked, observing the mixture of water and ale in his goblet.

"Perhaps the ale is a bit too strong," Sterling ventured.

"Nah, we're probably just tired," Audrey dismissed their concern.

Afterward, the Lord and Lady opted to retire early.

Once inside the chamber, Lansius unbuttoned his doublet and hastily cleaned his face using clean water in a copper basin. He noted a scent of iron and couldn't help but look around.

"What's the matter?" Audrey inquired.

"I smell blood," he said with a sharp and alert gaze, his hand ready on his hilt.

"Well..." Unexpectedly, Audrey didn't look alert but rather awkward.

"You're injured! When?" Lansius stormed toward her, believing she was hiding an injury.

"Easy, it's not-" Lansius grabbed her arm and started to look for wounds.

Annoyed, she gazed at him strongly. Lansius recoiled and blinked in pain, almost taking a step back. "Why did you do that?" he complained.

Audrey moved around him and hugged him from behind. "Because you're too forceful. You should treat your wife gently," she said with a pout.

Hearing that, Lansius chuckled. "Can't I at least check your injury?"

Audrey nestled her face into his back and said, "It's not an injury."

Lansius furrowed his brow. "Not an injury?" And then he realized, "Oh..."

"It's that time of the year," she explained. "The time when I usually get a bit moody."

Lansius recalled their past experiences during the fall season: the bitter reunion at Toruna Manor and their awkward relationship at Korelia Castle.

"Does that mean...?" he ventured.

Audrey gave him a sweet smile and whispered, "Hannei told me about fertility. If it's true, then next month... Well, I believe Korelia and Korimor deserve an heir."

 

***

 

Chapter 115

The Wind of Harvest

 

Agatha

Like the previous year, this year's harvest season was also late, but it was slowly inching closer. The cool wind from the northwest, beyond the mountain separating Nicopola and the Great Plains of Lowlandia, began to make its presence felt. Even during midday, one could easily notice the subtle change in the air.

Instead of a relaxed atmosphere, the farmers of South Hill were laboring hard in the fields. Despite the late harvest, the lack of manpower due to the failed campaign against Korelia had left them ill-prepared. Worse, the Lord's men were forcing them to prioritize work on the communal land, which yielded crops belonging to the Lord and his cohorts.

The situation was dire until a short battle drastically altered the region's political landscape. Overnight, a new name emerged as the Lord of South Hill.

This change in power came as a surprise, but the new Lord immediately worked to pacify the region. As the victor and new Lord, he could have easily confiscated any land and wealth he wanted, using any pretext he liked. However, he ultimately refrained from doing so. Instead, he opted to engage in trade rather than demanding food for his large army.

For the villagers, Lord Lansius' arrival was a bittersweet moment. Along with him came two hundred men who had been freed from Korelia. Their return provided much-needed relief to the community. Through their stories, the villagers, including Agatha, learned about the fate of their relatives who had been captured.

These men shared that those from South Hill who had been captured were treated fairly in their captivity. While it would be years before they could return, their situation was deemed far better than being sold into slavery.

Unfortunately, those who returned also confirmed many deaths. A large number had perished during their hasty retreat to the Great Plains. Many became widowed, old parents were left childless, and brothers mourned their siblings.

Such was the harsh reality of war in Lowlandia. However, instead of being drowned in mourning, those who survived carried on with their lives.

Yet, as Agatha had witnessed, life also brought unexpected helping hands. The farming communities around South Hill were greatly surprised when Lord Lansius, for this year, exempted them from obligatory work on the communal land.

Confusion and disbelief initially surrounded the policy, but these were swiftly resolved as the Lord himself visited the villages and gave his words of assurance.

His benevolent policy and personal approach quickly made him popular. Although some held him responsible for the loss of their loved ones in the Battle of Korelia, the majority were inclined to support his nascent rule.

With the new policy in effect, the farmers could focus on their crops. However, this change also brought an unexpected development.

The Lord was bringing in his men, the Nicopolans, to work on the communal land. Each village received dozens of men, who would pitch tents, live in barns, and work alongside the villagers.

Despite giving them a warm welcome, the communities had mixed feelings. While they appreciated the Nicopolans, who would tend the communal fields in their stead, there was suspicion that this arrangement might be a ploy to claim a share of the villagers' crops as payment for their help.

Such suspicion was not exaggerated, as it had been common for Lowlandia Lords to station troops in villages and demand food in exchange for 'protection'.

However, these doubts dissipated when the villagers observed the Lord regularly supplying his men with provisions from the City, including a bounty of meat from hunting expeditions. Moreover, the Nicopolans gladly shared, bartered, or traded what they had with the community.

With no remaining suspicions and only some lingering fear, the villagers found no reason not to accept the Nicopolans fully. After all, it was easier for them to trust a third party than the Lord of Korelia. Even those who had lost loved ones and harbored resentment towards the Lord couldn't extend their bitterness to the Nicopolans, who had caused them no harm.

With the Nicopolans' assistance, the villages and farms buzzed with activity. Weeding the farms to remove grass was the top priority, followed by fixing wooden fences around the fields to deter animals from the forest. Scarecrows were also erected in many places, while another group actively hunted rodents and pests.

In the village center, the communal granary underwent repairs in preparation for the upcoming harvest. The area designated for drying grains was also cleaned and maintained as needed.

At first, the Nicopolans worked only on the communal farm, but they were ready to extend their help to anyone in need. The Lord only required the person in need, along with the village chief, to formally register their request for assistance. He would then, through his lieutenant, assign his men to help on the designated farm. If necessary, additional men could be requested.

In exchange for this assistance, the Lord asked for a percentage of the yield as payment, which was certainly fairer than a failed harvest.

The Nicopolans' presence also solved many problems unrelated to the harvest. Streams were cleaned, wells repaired, and trees obstructing roads were chopped down.

Some of the Nicopolans were sophisticated, educated city folk. Thus, some were able to help with carpentry, masonry, and even mending clothes. Some taught basic calculations and alphabets in their spare time.

A few respectable individuals shone as informal leaders, helping to organize work and other events as necessary. Because of their involvement, several troublemakers were conscripted into the army. This deterred more youths from following in their footsteps.

In another case, the wolf pack that had been troubling the villages was driven deeper into the woods after an elaborate ambush.

Everywhere Agatha looked when she returned home from her training was progress and improvement. She had never seen her village so ready for harvest. For the first time, the fences were in good shape, the fields cleared of grass, and there were new scarecrows that could move their limbs at the slightest touch of wind.

The roads were now wide and clear of potholes, allowing carts to travel fast and without fear. The forest too had become a haven for gathering wild berries and firewood. She never expected that Lord Lansius was able to bring about so much change in such a short time.

People she met on the road appeared happy. Even her parents were smiling, grateful for the two new scythes loaned by the new City Council. Agatha was relieved to see that things had turned out so well for her village. She came home to friends, relatives, and parents who, for the first time in a long while, dared to believe there was more to life than just toiling endlessly to enrich the nobles.

This tale has been unlawfully lifted from Royal Road. If you spot it on Amazon, please report it.

 

***

 

Lansius

One week had passed since Lansius' meeting with the grain merchant. As he had predicted, the market responded well to the news that he was purchasing winter wheat seed. The merchants, initially surprised, also reacted positively to his intention to provide the seeds to the peasantry without charge.

Because of these developments, the grain price dropped two notches. The market was confident that South Hill peasants would plant their winter wheat.

Despite Lansius' upcoming campaign to Umberland, the introduction of winter wheat led most merchants to expect a steady grain supply in the region throughout the next year, thus diminishing any incentive to hoard.

However, Lansius wasn't going to gamble with the merchants' speculative tendencies. Furthermore, the grain price issue was just one among a myriad of other challenges that he needed to address before the South Hill region could be deemed secure.

Thus, in the privacy of the Council Room, Lansius summoned his staff to discuss their situation.

"The question is: how to secure South Hill without leaving a large garrison," Lansius asked his staff.

Audrey remained sitting and listening, Sir Harold pondered with arms crossed, while Dietrich was observant but quiet.

It was Sigmund who pondered, "Without a large garrison. Is it even wise?"

"It is if we could," Lansius replied, leaning back in his seat.

"It's unfortunate that we can't rely on our cavalry as quick reinforcement," Audrey lamented.

"Indeed, South Hill is far from Korelia, also having no direct route but to pass through the Three Hills region. Even with a horse relay, a message will need at least 7 days to reach Korelia, and then another 9 or 11 days to reach South Hill with an all-cavalry force."

Sir Harold drew a sharp breath. "11 days of rapid march through the Great Plains. Unless they're nomads, the riders will be too tired to fight upon arrival."

"Indeed, that is a correct assessment," Lansius confirmed.

"Can't we use the nomads as a quick reaction force?" Audrey asked.

Lansius let out a stiff smile. "We can, but their numbers aren't that big either. Also, I don't want to use the nomads in South Hill as there are frictions between them."

"Frictions?" Audrey furrowed her brow.

"My lady, many from South Hill who were routed in the Battle of Korelia died in the Great Plains while on the run from the nomads," Sigmund replied.

"Ah, why didn't I think of that?" Audrey remarked.

As the discussion slowed down, Dietrich asked, "A question, My Lord. Just how many men do you think are needed to keep South Hill from rebelling?"

Lansius pondered for a bit before answering, "Aside from fifty in the castle, perhaps two to three hundred would be prudent."

His staff reacted by sighing or nodding deeply.

"Is such a large number really necessary, My Lord?" Dietrich asked again.

"Two or three times the size of an army that the rebels could raise is the norm," Lansius explained. "The City has close to four thousand people, while the surrounding villages have another thousand or two. Theoretically, someone with charisma and gold might convince a percentage to rebel."

Sir Harold looked at Dietrich. "What the Lord said is true. Remember that Omin started as a knight and only had clout with a dozen guards. But he managed to convince the commoners and organized a successful coup."

Dietrich nodded thoughtfully.

"Losing three hundred of our force seems large, and it'll hurt us in our next campaign, but since we have so many... Can't we afford that?" Audrey tried to suggest.

Lansius gazed at her with a small grin. "That is true, we have two thousand men. But remember, they are Nicopolans."

Audrey seemed to realize her error and massaged her head.

Lansius continued, "While the Nicopolans, especially Servius and his band, are loyal to our cause, the rest have only followed us due to their need for food. Thus, I have no confidence in their loyalty, especially in my absence."

The council chamber turned quiet, only the occasional wind from the tight vertical window was heard in the background.

"So, we can't rely on our cavalry or our allies at all. Then we are truly in a predicament," Audrey lamented.

Lansius smiled and leaned forward, "What if I tell you there's a way to raise a large number of armed men who are obedient to your cause and don't cost you money to feed, to arm, or to maintain?"

His words attracted everyone's attention.

"Is it even possible?"

"Such a grand plan will certainly require a lot of time, and at most, we only have two weeks before harvest."

"Oh, but the plan is already ongoing," Lansius revealed, much to his staff's astonishment and skepticism.

Sigmund finally spoke up, "My Lord, is such a grand plan possible without our knowledge? Surely, we would have noticed such an undertaking."

Lansius' smile widened. "But Sigmund, you are the one who completed the preliminary stages."

 

***

 

South Hill City

The next morning, Sigmund and his guardsmen, returned to the market once again. The people on the market welcomed the officials' arrival and quickly gathered into a crowd. Everyone, from the common folk to the rich, followed, all looking expectantly.

Sigmund climbed the steps of the wooden platform and gazed at the crowd looking at him intensely. The market had come to a standstill.

"Hear ye, hear ye," Sigmund addressed the crowd. "Today, under the command of the new City Council, I bring you a series of decrees."

The crowd gasped when they saw that Sigmund was holding a stack of parchment, each sealed with wax. Anticipation was running high.

"The City Council decrees: Whoever assisted the City in harvesting, collecting, and storing grains safely and timely for seven days without fail, will receive no toll, market levies and tax for the next year."

Upon hearing this, everyone cheered loudly, looking around in excitement. Many were seasonal laborers who were more than able to help. In fact, they had always wanted to help, but for years the villagers had so little to offer that such arrangements couldn't happen. Nobody wanted to work for minimal gains.

But now, the Lord was offering them tax exemption for the next year. This meant that traveling merchants could journey without paying tolls, peddlers could vend their goods free from levies, and shopkeepers were exempted from market taxes.

"There's more," Sigmund declared as his men nailed the first parchment to the wooden board post.

Hearing this, the crowd momentarily subdued their celebration, eager to hear more.

"The City Council also decrees: Price manipulation is a serious crime. Therefore, all involved, nobles or commoners alike will be imprisoned in the dungeon for a minimum of one year. Furthermore, half of their family wealth will be confiscated."

There were murmurs of disbelief but they knew that the new Council was committed to their word, no matter how absurd it sounded.

Sigmund continued, "Any crimes related to grains and food that harm the common good will be punished with one year of hard labor on the communal land."

His men took another parchment from Sigmund and nailed it to the wooden board post.

"The City Council decrees: Should a coup arise against House Lansius, the perpetrator henceforth loses their noble status. As such, any commoner or peasant can capture them, with a bounty of ten gold coins for a knight, two gold coins for a squire, and ten silver for each man. The bounty can be shared."

The crowd recoiled at the announcement, but instead of fear, they were thrilled by the prospect of a large reward, enough to propel them into landowners. They also welcomed the possibility of participating in preventing a coup.

Sigmund continued, "In light of the previous decree, the new City Council allows each household with an untarnished name to possess two spears or one crossbow."

The crowd turned ecstatic. The previous Lord had been so fearful of his own people that even daggers were confiscated upon entering the town. Now, the Council permitted them to arm themselves, providing them leverage against troublesome nobles.

"Furthermore, when harvest is done, the City Council, on behalf of the Lord and Lady, wishes to invite everyone to a festival. Everyone who wishes the Lady well will receive two mugs of ale and a copper coin."

The people cheered loudly, praising the Lord and Lady in unison. The last decree was as good as offering free ales and a large meal to everyone who came. Knowing the City Council's reputation for keeping their word, the people were overjoyed.

As Sigmund concluded his announcements and his men nailed up the final parchment, a spontaneous celebration erupted in the market. Despite the early hour, the scent of ale filled the air as the crowd celebrated.

Ten days later, in the second month of Autumn 4425, South Hill finally welcomed its late harvest. Despite considerable effort and rising anticipation, the harvest results had proved to be marginal, if not slightly better than modest. Each grain had yielded just over half its potential.

Once again, the climate and weather, untamable as ever, had asserted their supremacy in dictating the results of human labor. The winds of uncertainty quietly swept through the region.

 

***

 

Chapter 116

Spymaster

 

South Hill City - Ten days before the harvest.

As soon as they rode out from the city, Audrey, dressed in dark hooded garb, asked with a blushing face, "What's with that last decree?"

Lansius, riding a common horse and dressed similarly, chuckled. "Why? Don't you like well wishes?"

"It's embarrassing," she protested as they trotted along a quiet road. Carla, Sterling, and the rest of the guards in disguise rode in front and at the rear.

She continued in a low voice, "Besides, what's with the ten gold coins for a knight? That's way too expensive. I know we had plenty in the baggage train, but this will put a hole in our coffer."

Lansius laughed. "You're forgetting a small but important detail."

Audrey guided her horse closer. "Ten gold coins for a knight... What did I miss?"

"Yes, we'll pay them ten gold coins for a knight. But guess who will take the captured knight's manor, land, warhorse, and armor?"

"Ah!" She exclaimed, her mouth agape.

"Also, don't be stingy with rewards, especially against a coup. I could offer more and it would still be profitable, but it might make the local knights nervous."

"I see..." Her voice trailed off as she got lost in thought.

Lansius smiled as a gust of wind blew around them bringing a certain scent of autumn.

Riding slowly, Audrey turned to Lansius again. "I think it's time for you to explain what this plan is all about. Yesterday, you talked about raising numerous armed men who are loyal, don't cost money, don't need feeding, or arming. But all I've seen are some basic rules and allowing people to have spears or crossbows."

Lansius chuckled, while Audrey added, "We've already given away a basket of coins, and a house with land. Now you're planning to give away barrels of ale and coins."

Lansius responded by asking, "Drey, do you know how to make an army follow commands?"

"Good payment, punishment, and the law stating they must obey," she answered.

Lansius nodded, sensing she grasped the idea. "That's how you make an army follow commands. But how do you make commoners follow commands?"

Audrey's gaze sharpened. "Using commoners as an army?"

"Yesterday, I mentioned armed men," he reminded her. "For peacekeeping, you don't have to rely on the military."

Audrey appeared doubtful.

Lansius smiled and pointed out, "We're drawing from the same pool for men: the populace. Rebel or us, the source is the same. Now, if we draw the populace to our side, promising great rewards for catching rebels, what do you think will happen?"

"But how will they dare to go up against rebel knights? Just having weapons isn't enough," she argued.

Lansius had anticipated that question. "That's why I'm offering absurd rewards for simple tasks."

Audrey recalled the events in the market, her eyes flickering with realization. "You're training them."

"Conditioning them," he corrected her with a smile. "The basket of coins, the house with the land, all are a demonstration of authority."

"Authority..." she mulled, as their horses trod upon the familiar route.

"Just like in the army, merely being a Lord isn't enough to control the men. One must be able to show that he is in control and has the power to reward, enforce rules, and give punishment. That is called: having authority."

She seemed to follow, so Lansius continued, "When we show that our words are true, people will listen. And there's no better way than giving them ridiculously simple tasks and giving big rewards. That is known as: demonstrating authority."

Like a good student, Audrey listened intently.

"When you show authority and demonstrate it effectively, titles become unnecessary. From mercenaries to bandit kings, their leaders operate without formal titles."

"That is true," Audrey remarked.

Lansius finished off by correcting the misconception, "Controlling the commoners is not only possible, but it's always been done. Nobles levy the commoners for wars. So, the notion that we can't rely on them in peacetime is rather absurd."

The horse neighed as another wind blew sending dry leaves around them.

Audrey removed the dry leaves from her hair and clothes and asked, "But I've never heard of anyone using commoners to fight coups."

"Because they're not comfortable sharing power with commoners," Lansius revealed without hesitation. "And do you know why most nobles aren't comfortable?"

Audrey pondered seriously and ventured, "Fear?"

"Not quite. The correct answer is morals."

She furrowed her brows. "Morals?"

"If a Lord is cruel and dishonest, the populace is likely to oppose him, not providing help. As for me, I hope I'm good enough."

Audrey reached for Lansius' hand. "You're a good Lord," she reassured him warmly.

Lansius smiled. "This is why to rule without making anyone miserable is a good cause."

The Lord and Lady, accompanied by their entourage, continued their way toward the villages. To their left and right, the ripened farmland welcomed them.

 

***

 

After midday, when the sun was more merciful, the Lord of Korelia returned to the castle, having completed his weekly inspection.

Waiting in the courtyard were Dietrich and the page boys. The Lord and Lady dismounted, and after completing the necessary formalities, they were escorted to the inner part of the castle.

"Any tidings, Dietrich?" Lansius asked.

"My Lord, the knights and squires will return to Korelia tomorrow morning."

"And Sir Gunther?"

If you stumble upon this tale on Amazon, it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

"His House has confirmed they will join. Their carriages are being loaded as we speak."

Lansius nodded as they continued walking to the Grand Chamber where they could discuss more freely.

They reached the Grand Chamber and took their seats to wind down. The servants promptly brought drinks and refreshments. Yet, it was Carla and Sterling who poured drinks for the Lord and Lady.

"How's the local knights' reaction to this morning's Council announcement in the market?" Lansius asked.

"Still quiet, none reported movements."

He nodded and then leaned into his seat. "Unless the Lady wishes to ask anything, that would be all for me."

Audrey gazed at Dietrich. "Anything else you want to report?"

Dietrich knitted his brow. "None in particular, Cap—, I mean, My Lady."

"Don't sweat it," said Audrey. She then picked a fruit from the silver platter and offered it to Dietrich. "They tell me it's from the previous Lord's own orchard."

Dietrich politely accepted the aromatic fruit. "Gratitude."

"Something to keep yourself from boredom. Guard duty in the castle can be really dull."

Dietrich let out a grin before turning to Lansius, bowed his head a little, and took his leave.

Audrey sipped her cup of water, her gaze resting thoughtfully on Lansius, who seemed lost in contemplation. "What's on your mind?" she asked gently.

"Just a thing or two about South Hill," he said.

"You know, Lans, I'm still curious about giving no market tax or toll tax for next year. Won't it deplete South Hill's income next year?" Audrey asked.

"It was intentional. First of all, it would deter a coup as anyone who tries would face strong opposition from the commoners and esquires who benefited from the one year tax-free policy," Lansius explained.

Audrey found it interesting and listened with her back straight.

Lansius continued, "Secondly, it would take a chunk out of the region's income for a year. That'll reduce the region's ability to raise an army. Even if a coup is successful, they would only have a small army."

"That is a lot of use from just a single policy," Audrey mused.

"There's more. Offering less tax is also a good incentive to win the people's hearts without much effort. Furthermore, for a small city like South Hill, with limited scribes and clerks, suspending half the taxes for a year will allow them to focus on the big issue — ensuring that the region's bookkeeping is accurate. Mind you, the previous Lord left messy records."

"A plan within a plan," Audrey commented in astonishment.

Lansius smiled and drank from his goblet.

"Have you decided who'll govern the City after we leave?" She asked.

Lansius glanced at her before answering, "Ideally, Lady Daniella, but she's technically your knight and also she's in Three Hills."

"Three Hills as an ally is doing us disfavor," Audrey voiced her disappointment.

Lansius leaned to one side, resting his elbow on the armchair. "Three Hills is a big city with big politics. Perhaps, this is the best Lord Jorge could do."

"Well, whoever you pick, make sure it's not Sir Harold."

Her request piqued Lansius. "Any reason why?"

"We're going on a campaign and we need his expertise," she explained.

"Ah," Lansius mumbled. Then added, "You don't need to worry, Sir Harold has made his stance clear. He wants no part in governing a city."

Audrey breathed a sigh of relief. "So, there's only one name left," she ventured.

Lansius took his goblet again. "I guess, it's time to summon."

...

 

Grand Chamber

"My Lord," Sigmund greeted Lansius as he entered the Grand Chamber. They were alone; Audrey had retired to her room with Carla. Only Sterling remained, sitting in the far corner.

"Please take a seat. I have news for you," replied Lansius.

The skald took a seat and prepared to listen.

Lansius remained standing and spoke, "As you know, I'm going on a campaign to Umberland. However, I need someone to lead the garrison in South Hill."

Sigmund seemed prepared and replied, "I believe Sir Harold would be the best candidate."

"I agree with you, but the knight already made his stance clear. That's why I'm thinking to let you to govern the city."

Sigmund blinked and shifted in his seat uncomfortably.

Lansius didn't say a word, observing the captain's reaction.

"Is this why you sent me to the market as a herald?" Sigmund finally reacted.

"One of many reasons," Lansius explained casually. He forwent mentioning that from the start, he had refrained from addressing the people directly because he wanted Sigmund to be the face of the authority he had planned.

Sigmund looked uncertain, pondering. "But what about the orange skalds and the skirmishers?"

"Farkas will be the new leader."

"I see... So, my Lord, has confidence in him."

"Not as much as I trust you or Dietrich. And his gittern play is still lacking."

Lansius' words drew chuckles from Sigmund.

"But, at least, the men respect him and he's morally acceptable," Lansius continued.

Sigmund raised an eyebrow. "Morally? How can you tell, My Lord?"

"I already know how he behaves with the prey he hunts. So, I asked the hunters how Farkas behaved with other hunter's slain prey. They told me Farkas only takes a small cut if he didn't contribute to the kill, even when he's technically their lieutenant."

Sigmund nodded thoughtfully.

"Showing restraint and respecting others despite your status is a good trait for command. However, I'm not sure about his tactical ability, but you have twenty days to prepare him."

"My Lord, I can vouch for that. In twenty days, I shall drill Farkas in what I know, including the gittern play."

Lansius was pleased with the declaration. "One more thing," he said. "Even if you're in South Hill, the Orange Skalds should continue."

"But they'll be under Farkas."

"Farkas will lead but one group. I wish to have more, ideally one in each city in Lowlandia," Lansius revealed.

Sigmund nodded in understanding. "To serve as your eyes and ears."

Lansius approached Sigmund and placed a leather pouch on the table, revealing it to be filled with gold and silver coins. "The funds for the skalds. Try to make it work."

"My Lord, with this much, even if it fails, we'll have enough musicians to entertain several cities."

Lansius chuckled and tapped on the skald's shoulder. "Lowlandia and the Grand Alliance will face many enemies. I need someone who can walk in bright disguise and in the shadows."

"Then, I'll strive to be the perfect candidate," Sigmund replied with a determined nod.

 

***

 

As part of the capitulation, Sir Gunther, the previous Lord of this region, had forfeited his family manor for a price and followed the group of returning knights to Korelia. Sir Gunther and his House were to be accepted as a minor member of the Grand Alliance. Lord Lansius promised to provide them with a pension in exchange for their loyalty and support.

To guard the manor, the Lord had sent skirmishers to the area, which also served as a reward, given the surrounding ripened orchards and abundance of food.

For the skirmishers, life was good. Their injured could recuperate in peace while the healthy could rest their weary bodies. Emboldened by the situation, they even dared to anticipate great things in the coming harvest. Unfortunately, fate could be a cruel mistress.

In the second month of Autumn 4425, South Hill finally welcomed its late harvest. Despite considerable effort and rising anticipation, the harvest results had proved to be marginal, if not slightly better than modest. Each grain had yielded just over half its potential.

The mediocre harvest dampened the mood in South Hill City and Castle. Knowing the effort the Lord and the Nicopolans had made, they had expected good results, yet it turned out lacking.

Everyone was affected by the mood and even the upcoming celebration couldn't lift their spirits. The only one who was unfazed was the Lord and his closest retinue.

The castle staff whispered about the Lord's response. Some argued that the Lord had done what he could and chose not to be affected by the bad news. While most agreed, a few even dared to suspect that the Lord simply didn't care.

"In two weeks, the Lord will depart with his big army," one whispered, triggering nods from the other servants.

"They'll need a lot of grain," another replied, followed by, "Probably will leave us with barely enough to pass the winter."

A few sighs were heard. They had big expectations for Lord Lansius, but now all of it seemed to be undone. Nobody in South Hill had the illusion that the Lord would cater to their needs more than his own army. Thus, morale began to drop.

...

 

Lansius, Council Chamber

"My Lord, the people are getting restless. The price of grain has steadily increased despite the harvest," Dietrich reported.

Lansius remained quiet and motioned Dietrich to give another report, as if unbothered by the grain price. Audrey, seated next to him, betrayed slight concern.

Sir Harold, placing his arms on the table, added, "My Lord, this harvest result may jeopardize our campaign to Umberland."

"I doubt it's that bad," Lansius responded lightly. Then he glanced at Sterling, asking, "What's the story on the street?"

"There are all kinds of baseless rumors flying around the city," Sterling reported. "Things aren't looking good, My Lord. If we depart next week, Sigmund will probably face trouble. Should I summon him for you?"

"No," Lansius disagreed. "I want him to train Farkas, let's not bother him with this market panic. The people's expectations are simply unjustified. Harvest results are almost a gamble, so there's no need for excessive worry."

"As long as farmers and the people do their best, then any result that isn't famine is acceptable," Audrey commented.

"Wise words," Lansius praised and poured some light mead into her silver goblet.

She accepted the goblet but, despite the rich honey aroma, refrained from taking a sip. "Three days have passed since the harvest ended. People, even the castle servants, looked concerned with the result. Perhaps something needs to be done."

Lansius gazed warmly at her. "I know."

"A false rumor might ruin a Barony. Perhaps a statement to calm the people would be prudent?" Sir Harold suggested.

Lansius nodded at the wise counsel and said, "It's a correct response, but in our case, let's just wait."

"But the price is rising, My Lord," Dietrich voiced his concern.

Lansius let out a chuckle that drew everyone's attention. "I'm actually waiting for that."

Everyone in the chamber looked at him, puzzled.

Then, with a sly smile, Lansius quipped, "Want to see my magic trick?"

 

***

 

Chapter 117

The Lord's Grain Gambit

 

South Hill

It was still some time before the sun reached its zenith when the Lord and Lady, accompanied by their entourage, arrived at the City Granary, situated a fair distance from the market. The caretaker of the place was taken aback by their visit.

The sudden activities and sightings of horsemen and guards piqued the crowd's curiosity, and they soon gathered. Once they knew who had arrived, the anticipation was high. Rumors spread that the Lord was catching big thieves or rounding up those who stole the harvest. People were expecting to see men dragged out from the granary in ropes.

However, despite all the rumors, the Lord's visit was mostly ceremonial. He simply conversed briefly, looked at the storage personally, and confirmed what the people of South Hill already knew: this year's harvest yield was lacking.

With the granary still reeling from last year's failed campaign, this year's mediocre harvest results, and Lord Lansius' plan to campaign against Umberland, South Hill's food security was put in doubt.

While aware that the farmers would plant their winter crops, the community's outlook had changed. Previously, the winter crops were seen as a hopeful promise of abundance next spring. But now, they were seen as a necessity; without them, they would certainly face famine.

And they knew that the one who would decide their fate was Lord Lansius.

"Just how much will the Black Lord take from the granary?" many asked in hushed whispers.

Due to the market's situation, the merchants, ever driven by profit, had begun to keep a larger stockpile than usual. Despite the Lord's harsh stance against price manipulation, the merchants didn't believe they were breaking any laws. In their view, they were merely preparing for the worst. As a result, the price of grains continued to rise, and the poor were increasingly concerned about the coming winter. Their only hope was for a helping hand from the Lord.

A few dared to ask, "Unlike the rich and landowners, why are we still untouched by the Lord's benevolence?"

Others argued, "We helped with the labor, yet we see no benefit from the free market tax or toll tax."

The poor, surviving through begging or doing odd jobs whenever possible, found themselves in no position to benefit from the tax-free policies.

The Lord's inspection of the granary was brief and uneventful, ending as swiftly as it had begun. Contrary to the crowd's expectations, the visit resulted in no tangible action. No one was brought to justice, there was no address to the people, and no alms were distributed. The Lord and his entourage simply rode away.

Barely raising more than eyebrows, the visit left the crowd dissatisfied. They dispersed, continuing with their day as the fear of winter continued to weigh heavily on their minds.

 

***

 

The next day at dawn, as the first shop in the market barely opened to receive its daily goods of vegetables and milk, there was a commotion in the streets. Even though the roads in the city were still empty, traffic was already building up. Many city dwellers woke up surprised to see horse and donkey-drawn carts lining up the streets leading to the market.

At least thirty carts were already there, and then another ten arrived, further clogging the city's narrow and winding streets.

"Officer, what's going on?" a few daring individuals asked the guards, who appeared to be patrolling the streets.

"Nothing to worry about. We're just escorting the farmers to sell their grains."

"Farmers, selling grains?" They couldn't believe their ears.

"Yes, apparently, unlike last year, they have plenty of surplus this year," the officer explained.

"They have?" another neighbor who just joined asked in surprise.

The officer gave a stiff smile. "I don’t know the details myself. We're ordered to escort the farmers safely and I’m expecting further instructions later. Gentlemen, until then," he said, before walking away with his group in brigandines and sallets. They continued patrolling the area, aware that a large number of horses and donkeys can be troublesome.

While the people in the city were still processing what had happened, the market situation was approaching a near frenzy. The various shops worked as diligently as they could, purchasing the grain at yesterday's market price.

More carts of grain arrived from the surrounding villages, greeted by an ever-increasing number of shops opening, each vying not to be outdone by their competitors. Everyone was seizing the opportunity for profit. Gaining such a high quantity of grain felt like a boon; they were convinced they were securing a tremendous amount of profit, even before the morning had fully dawned.

Little did they know just how much grain they were actually dealing with.

...

 

The sun rose higher, bathing the city in its golden light, yet the market remained paralyzed by the convoy of carts that had gathered in the busy area. These narrow carts, loaned by the City Council, filled the streets, each one waiting its turn to offload grain. Buckets of hay and water were scattered here and there, as coachmen tried to keep the burdened beasts in good condition.

The sheer number of carts crowding the streets leading to the market affected everyone. This congestion showed no signs of resolving soon. As it turned out, the farmers were not only selling but also purchasing goods with their hard-earned money, loading them into their carts and thereby further slowing down the process.

This unforeseen development was followed intensely by everyone. While almost everyone didn’t fully understand how the market set its prices, they knew instinctively that scarcity drives prices up, and abundance drives them down. So they watched with great excitement, hoping that the price would come down.

After close to forty carts had been unloaded and processed, and with forty more still lining up in the streets, the merchants began to worry and decided to meet in secret. Many shop owners had just been awakened by their workers or helpers, having had no expectation of large market activity so soon after the harvest and so close to the Harvest Festival.

"Forty carts followed by another forty," one exclaimed as soon as they gathered.

"Where do they come from? Outside of South Hill?" another asked.

As he sat down, an old balding merchant shared, "My men report that they saw another group coming from the other villages. At least twenty carts, likely more to come."

"How could there be this many? Is the Lord somehow behind this?"

"My fellow merchants, please remain calm. I have conducted a small investigation," the host said calmly, relaxed in his seat.

"As expected of the richest man in South Hill," one of the guests quipped.

The man in the bright red doublet smiled and continued, "The situation is caused by our own negligence. We've miscalculated."

"Miscalculated? How?" one asked on behalf of the group.

"This year, the Lord allowed the peasants to exclusively work and harvest their own land," the host responded.

"Yes, we know that, but that doesn’t mean they could produce that much more."

"Indeed. The problem lies in our faulty measurement," he revealed. Before anyone could react, he asked, "Tell me, how did you find out that the harvest result was meager?"

The young merchant pondered, then shrugged and confessed, "I know from other fellows. They raised their prices, so I raised mine."

If you discover this tale on Amazon, be aware that it has been unlawfully taken from Royal Road. Please report it.

The host gazed at the rest, and one answered, "With just a few drinks everyone can ask the granary workers. They can see with their own eyes just how much is stored in the building. I even know some who bribed the clerk to learn the actual tally in the records given to the Lord."

Many nodded their heads.

"This is where we got it wrong," the host surmised. "We were too focused on the granary and failed to see the real situation."

"Failed? But we have men, neighbors, and relatives who took part in the harvest. They all tell us that the harvest yield was lower than last year. Surely, they wouldn’t lie," one retorted.

"I'm not suggesting they're lying," the host clarified.

"Then how could this happen? Combined, we've already processed probably more than fifty cartloads of grain."

"Gentlemen, bear in mind that we overlooked the issue of distribution." The host leaned forward. "Let me explain. By law, the Lord could only take crops from communal land, and that is what gets delivered to the city granary."

The guests followed intently, voicing no objection.

"The issue is, as I said before, for this year, the Lord allowed the peasants to work exclusively on their land. Under the previous lord, the peasants usually lost many crops due to pests or animal attacks that gathered as soon as the harvest season started. However, this year, they could harvest their crops to their hearts' content."

The merchants nodded their heads slowly, beginning to understand.

The old merchant commented, "That is true. Twenty years ago, when my father was still alive, we usually purchased grains directly from the peasants. But since the Three Hills conflicts, the farmers had so little we didn't bother to travel there anymore."

"For more than a decade, we've been so accustomed to relying on the communal land, on our private farms, and those of the nobles, that we forgot the peasants were also suppliers," the host lamented. "The harvest did indeed lessen, but the distribution made it seem worse than it actually was."

Many sighed or shook their heads in disbelief. They had been misled by the stockpile of grains in the granary and were unaware that this year, the farmers had their own stockpile. Only now did they remember that the Lord had made his men, the Nicopolans, available to assist the peasants with their crops. Thus, it became clear how the peasants could achieve optimal results, even in a low-yield situation.

Deep down, the merchants were aware that in their greed, they had cornered themselves into painful losses. Usually, whenever a surplus happened, they could sell it to Three Hills for profit. Even when the previous lord forbade it, they smuggled it for even more profit. But now they dared not gamble against the Black Lord.

One who remained standing headed to the door. "Please excuse me, I have stocked up plenty. I need to tell my store not to buy anymore."

Another rose from his seat. "Thank you for the explanation. I'll also stop trading."

"How about the price?" the young merchant asked his colleagues.

The old merchant, donning his hat as he prepared to leave, advised, "Better to sell at your purchase price from several days ago."

"But that's a loss."

The host rose and tapped the young man's shoulder. "At this rate, everyone will feel a loss. Better to drop the stock now before the winter wheat harvest next spring. At this rate, the beggars will be eating white bread."

Many chuckled nervously as they left. The idea that the price of white grain would drop so low that beggars could eat wheat and oats instead of rye, barley, legumes, or bran, was laughable. But the possibility now existed, and if it happened, the merchants knew they would face a tremendous loss.

With heavy hearts, the merchants raced to stop their shops from buying grains and began to offer lower selling prices. A few even quietly showed willingness to offer lower prices to anyone with money and willing to speculate on bulk purchases, out of fear of further loss from their vast grain storage.

Midday was still far off when the market rejected the remaining grain carts, leading to a serious disturbance and loud shouting between the farmers and market workers. The situation soon worsened as some frustrated farmers began to sell their grains on the street at lower prices than the merchants, causing a ruckus and further aggravating the disturbance.

Unable to intervene effectively, the merchants attempted to bribe, but not all were willing to accept such measures.

The merchants considered using thugs to enforce their will, but the presence of the Lord's men deterred any such actions. Seeing the Nicopolans armed and the Lord's men positioned with crossbows on windows and rooftops, nobody dared to escalate the conflict. They were acutely aware that the Black Lord had his eyes on this situation.

Nobody wanted to forfeit their lives and wealth, thus the farmers reigned in the market. The narrow streets of South Hill turned into a surprise grain market, flooding the city with cheap grains for everyone to buy. The farmers were also proved to be generous, each giving a free bowl of grain to beggars and children in need.

The situation ceased only when the Lord, via his Captain, directed the farmers to the granary, offering to buy their remaining grain out of benevolence. Thus, the story circulated that on the first harvest under Lord Lansius, despite the low yield, the farmers were flooding the city with grain.

The commoners, not privy to all the information, attributed the situation to the new Lord being blessed by the Ancients. Any earlier skepticism towards his House had now vanished, replaced by fervent trust and submission. The poor were particularly heartened; the sacks of white grain they had gained at such low prices seemed nothing short of magical in their eyes.

This harvest season, everybody, even the poorest, had plenty to eat, and they directed their gratitude to the new Lord.

 

***

 

South Hill Castle - Audrey

"My Lady," Sigmund and Sir Harold greeted as they entered the Council Chamber.

"Sir Harold," Audrey responded, then turned to Sigmund, "Apologies for bothering you during your training," she said, motioning them to their seats.

"This is my duty, My Lady. I cannot imagine not participating in this," said Sigmund, taking a seat.

Carla diligently poured drinks for the guests. Inside the council room were only four people: the Lady, Sir Harold, Sigmund, and Carla.

Audrey nodded and asked, "How's the situation out there?"

Sir Harold smiled and reported, "Servius did everything smoothly. The plan is flawless, so our part in the scheme was minimal."

"The early farmers got their money, and the food prices dropped significantly," Sigmund added.

Audrey let out a breath of relief. "Well done," she praised.

Outside, the problem seemed solved. The price of grain had dropped, and as a bonus, the farmers gained money to improve their lives. However, the staff knew not everything was as it seemed.

"A question," Sir Harold asked, drawing everyone's attention. "On behalf of the other council member, while we understand what was happening, we're not sure how this could happen."

Audrey nodded. "It would be wiser to wait for the Lord, but I can try to explain."

"Indeed, My Lady, an explanation from you would be much appreciated," Sigmund said.

Audrey took a deep breath and began, "What happened in the market today was a diversion. We take the merchants as the enemy and the grain as our troops. To achieve victory, we need to corner the merchants until they refuse to buy more grain."

She continued, "The first strategy was to appear as having a larger army than the opponents. While we had the farmers' grain, it was only worth around eighty cartloads. Thus, we used narrow military carts and didn't allow the farmers to load bushels of wheat directly into the carts and load them to the brim as usual. Instead, we used wooden barrels."

Sir Harold commented, "It's safer but less efficient. Each of our carts could carry slightly more than half of an ordinary wide merchant cart."

"The use of wooden barrels was also intended to slow the process," Audrey added. "The plan was to cause chaos in the market. The Lord mentioned that by creating the illusion of an abundance, we could reassure everyone about the grain supply."

Sigmund nodded quietly, looking impressed.

"By utilizing narrow carts and wooden barrels, we successfully distributed grain equivalent to eighty cartloads across over a hundred carts. However..."

Sir Harold interjected, "It still wasn’t enough."

"Indeed, with just around 110 carts, the Lord was still skeptical that he could convince the merchants. So, the cornerstone of the second strategy was to increase the cart number to more than 140. To reach this number, only 70 carts at the front were fully loaded with white grains. The rest had white grain on top, but brown grain at the bottom."

"It was a risky move. But it worked," Sir Harold chuckled. "The market seized up after processing forty carts and refused to buy more."

"The Lord explained to me: Just like on the battlefield, if one side sees the other receiving large reinforcements, one column after another, they would be more inclined to flee."

Sir Harold chuckled again. "It amazes me that we treated the grain price and the merchants like we were on a battlefield."

"Indeed, it's unthinkable," Sigmund added.

"If everything is clear, then, shall we proceed with the report?" Audrey asked.

Sigmund straightened up. "Currently, the carts with white and brown grains are returning to the camp. As planned, they didn't unload at the city granary. We have the Captain to relay another order that the grains should be transferred directly to the Nicopolan camp outside the city."

"Good. Let's keep the brown grains for emergencies," Audrey instructed.

"Actually, My Lady, some Nicopolans have grown fond of brown grain and blood sausages. So, we can treat the food like any other," Carla, standing next to Audrey, spoke up for the first time.

Audrey chuckled at this revelation. "Now, I'm curious. Perhaps I should give it a taste."

Carla furrowed her brow. "We dared not cook such food for you."

Audrey shifted in her seat and glanced at her. "Last year, I was still a squire. A meal is a meal. If it's good enough for them, it's probably good enough for me."

"Count me in for a bowl," Sir Harold commented with a smile.

The mood in the chamber lightened.

"My Lady, there's another development," Sigmund reported, as all crucial matters had been reported. "One of our agents heard that some merchants are willing to part with their grains at a low price if anyone agrees to purchase in bulk."

Audrey drew a deep breath. "Just as the Lord predicted."

"What did the Lord tell you, My Lady?" Sigmund asked.

Audrey chuckled and muttered, "He said: That'll teach them not to play with grain prices again."

The guests chuckled. Afterward, Sigmund repeated, "Should we entertain the offer?"

"Of course, more grains are better for the upcoming campaign," Audrey replied without hesitation. "Also, the Lord wanted to appease the nobles and landlords who will join us in the upcoming campaign."

"Ah, I see, a strategic gift of grains," Sir Harold mused.

"Exactly. It's also to keep them from messing with the prices," Audrey explained, then turned to Sigmund. "Can you handle the negotiation?"

"Certainly. I'll play them hard first, ensure we get a better price."

With that, the council marked the grain issue as resolved. Utilizing the Tarracan Man's strategy, Lord Lansius had brilliantly safeguarded South Hill's harvest, convincing all that the city had more than enough grain, thus averting the high price.

Now, only one matter remained – the preparations for their departure in just three days. This would be their fourth campaign of the year. Despite a string of victories, there lingered a fear among everyone that they might be overreaching. For them, battle and war were akin to a gamble, and Lord Lansius had cast his dice so often that many feared his streak of luck might be nearing its end.

 

***

 

Chapter 118

Fourth Marches

 

South Hill Castle

While Audrey led the Council Meeting, Lansius immersed himself in strategic planning within the confines of his study. He had learned enough from the village elders and the Nicopolans under Servius about how to proceed with South Hill.

Seated behind a large desk, Lansius scrutinized this year's harvest records. Even in a low-yield situation, a baron like him still secured a fair share of the harvest. The harvest collected by the Nicopolans from the communal field would be kept in the city granary and, as was the norm, sold whenever needed to maintain food prices.

Aside from the grains in the city granary, from which he would allocate a portion for his campaign, Lansius also received a share of grain from the peasants who sought the Nicopolans' assistance. Moreover, the villagers sent a few more carts of grain to the camp as a gesture of gratitude.

In his hand, he held a small letter from the village elders.

We, the elders of the Northern Villages, 

On behalf of our fellow villagers, we humbly wish to convey our deepest gratitude for My Lord's benevolent policies. They have brought an abundance of harvest and joy to the community. We, your humble servants, wish to offer what meager supplies we have, in hopes it could be used for My Lord's future campaign.

May the Ageless One and the Ancients protect My Lord and My Lady from all harm.

- Signed, the elders of the Northern Villages

Lansius felt overwhelmed by the farmers' generosity. As he looked at the donated amount, he mused, "They're really confident in their winter wheat."

Aside from the first source, the communal land, and the second source, the farmers' share, Lansius also had a third source: his purchases.

Due to the weak harvest and merchants' price gouging, the market had been shocked. However, it also provided Lansius an opportunity to counter the market dynamics. After today's gambit, he was confident that the next day prices would plummet, leaving him as the sole buyer in the region.

This situation would undoubtedly dent the merchants' pockets, but he viewed it as a necessary lesson to humble the rich, making them think twice before profiting from others' suffering. With everyone having enough to eat for the winter, Lansius hoped it would strengthen South Hill against possible rebellion or coup, as potential perpetrators would not be able to secure enough men to rally for their cause.

Returning to the grain issue, Lansius estimated that, with all three sources combined, he would have more than forty days of supplies, with some room to spare. Yet, the situation in Umberland remained a source of concern.

He kept it to himself, but he was deeply troubled. Early reports brought by Sterling from Three Hills were especially damning. From these, Lansius learned that Umberland's countryside had been ravaged and was now devoid of its peasantry.

Defending a region with scarce food production is a death trap.

Thus, as preparation, he needed as much grain as he could acquire without causing his allies to suffer. To achieve this, he planned to buy grain in Three Hills but needed to keep this part of the plan secret. He didn't want anyone to speculate that he was planning to purchase a large quantity of grain from Lord Jorge's domain.

Lansius glanced at the numbers, calculating how many carts of grain he had so the Three Hills merchants wouldn't try to speculate. Fortunately, he found the number to be sufficiently large.

"It should be grand enough," he muttered to himself, sure that the supply carts would be sufficient to deter anyone from speculating.

With the supplies for the campaign largely secured, Lansius stored the parchments in his drawer and took a moment to lean back in his chair. Gazing around the room, he couldn't dismiss the bright colors used in the study, yet had purposely kept the place mostly unchanged, knowing his stay in South Hill would be brief.

Lansius then picked up another parchment marked 'Plans for South Hill.' The first item on the list was the road project. Despite the challenging topography, he wanted to ascertain the feasibility of a direct route to Korelia. With South Hill potentially becoming a breadbasket, a faster direct route to Korelia would significantly benefit his domain.

Next on the list was the plan to send an envoy to Corinthia. But first, he needed to learn more about them.

"Sterling," he called.

The squire quickly rose and approached with hurried steps. "Yes, My Lord."

"Can you summon Sigmund for me? He should still be in the castle after the council meeting."

"At once." Sterling bowed and exited the study.

Even without Sterling at his side, there was no risk to Lansius' safety. Guards stationed outside the door were loyal men from Korelia and Midlandia who had followed him since his battles with Lord Robert. It was said that competition to be his guard was so fierce that they spent their own money on appearances, including trimmed beards, perfumes, brightly tailored brigandines, and even polished accessories.

Lansius dismissed the thought of investigating further, choosing to trust his staff and his men. While curious, he preferred to avoid micromanaging his men unnecessarily.

As long as they don't cause issues, I see no harm.

Unlike gambling, there were only benefits to having well-motivated guards with a good appearance. Lansius then returned to the current issue: Corinthia. Although the city was part of Lowlandia, its distance, and terrain rendered the Barony largely independent, often keeping it uninvolved in the Lowlandia conflict.

Despite many considering the barony to be little more than a poor fishing village, Lansius saw the potential for an ally or the opportunity to learn about the Middle Sea, locally known as the Narrow Sea.

However, expectations for Corinthia to transform into a bustling trading city were generally dismissed. The Narrow Sea was treacherous, characterized by cliffs on both sides or endless inhospitable marshlands, leading to frequent accidents even for experienced Navalnia seamen. Consequently, the southern trade route remained mostly inactive.

After taking a sip from a goblet of water, Lansius turned his attention to the last on the list. It was South Hill's most pressing issue: manpower. He recalled the elders' words and his discussions with Servius.

Good or bad, this year's result is due to the Nicopolans' assistance. 

And next year, there won't be Nicopolans in South Hill.

For this harvest, Lansius had implemented a modified version of the Military Agricultural Colony with some success, inspired by the Tuntian system from the Han Dynasty. Unlike the Roman practice of allocating land to veterans as both a reward for service and a means to create strong outposts and recruitment sources, the Tuntian system used soldiers to directly produce their own food during campaigns.

Implementing a full Tuntian model in the Imperium was impractical due to the forty-day campaign limit and the reluctance of levies to engage in such hard labor on a campaign. However, since Lansius maintained a year-long payroll for his army and they were in the midst of real threat of famine, he believed it might be feasible to adopt this model to some extent.

Yet, its use for South Hill had come to an end. Lansius needed to move his army to Umberland before winter.

Thus, there was a real concern for South Hill's food production in the absence of the Nicopolans. The question was whether the region could still thrive and produce a surplus with the current manpower shortage.

Medieval agriculture was not without risks. Without pesticides, over-cultivating but failing to harvest could lead to rodent infestations, or worse, locust swarms that could devastate the entire province.

Thus, drawing on his extensive knowledge of history—a subject he once vaguely considered unnecessary—Lansius dipped his quill pen into the ink and began drafting his plans. He aimed for a strategy that might enable Sigmund to govern the region with relative ease and lessen everyone's burden in the long run.

While he could simply accept the situation as it was and leave the farmers to their work, Lansius aspired to do more. He aimed to improve the odds, even slightly, that next year would be better, even without his troops around to assist.

...

 

This tale has been unlawfully lifted from Royal Road. If you spot it on Amazon, please report it.

Soft knocking was heard from the door, followed by, "My Lord, I'm here with Captain Sigmund."

"Ah, let him in," Lansius responded. He had been waiting.

The skald, dressed in a fine crimson doublet, entered the study chamber. "My Lord, you summoned me?"

"Please, have a seat," the Lord motioned, quickly adding, "Sigmund, what do we know about Corinthia?"

The skald's gaze sharpened as he sat down. "Not enough," he mused, pondering what Lansius' question really was.

Lansius chuckled, satisfied by the skald's sharp intuition.

Sigmund added, "I think I could fathom just a slight hint of My Lord's intention. I shall send two of my best agents to Corinthia."

"Other than a small cost, there's no harm in gathering information, and the benefits from it will be worth their weight in gold," Lansius voiced his support.

"But, My Lord, what has piqued your interest in Corinthia?"

"Hopefully, a potential ally and trading partner. If things go well, I might even invest in ship design or sea trade," he explained.

"I see," Sigmund nodded thoughtfully.

There was nothing else to say about Corinthia, so Lansius moved to the next issue. "While you're here, do you have any requests regarding your upcoming governorship?"

Sigmund breathed a sigh of relief. "I'm glad My Lord asked. I need advice on managing the nobility. How can I rein them in, especially when two factions are at odds?"

"Which factions concern you?"

"The knights that opposed you, they might be in bed with the merchants, and the landlords."

Lansius nodded, seemingly unperturbed. "Not everyone will openly support us while the situation remains undecided. Currently, we enjoy popular support, so it's natural for people to wait and remain neutral before pledging their support to any faction. Thus, the best strategy is to maintain our neutrality."

Sigmund listened intently, so Lansius continued, "If you remain steadfast and keep military power free from their influence, you should emerge unscathed. Moreover," Lansius pondered, "you can always rely on delay tactics to diffuse tensions. Tell them you're awaiting my discretion. I can always respond with a stern no."

Sigmund nodded, seemingly satisfied with the advice. "Then, My Lord, how about managing the land for next year? Without the Nicopolans, South Hill lacks a thousand men to work and tend the farm."

Lansius handed him a neatly folded letter from the table, which Sigmund accepted politely.

"Memorize this letter, take it to heart, and then burn it."

"My Lord, is that necessary?"

"No, but it sounds dramatic," Lansius quipped, prompting chuckles from both.

"In this letter, you'll find a framework for a Civilian Agricultural Colony," Lansius explained.

"Civilian Agricultural Colony?"

"It shouldn't be surprising," Lansius remarked. "We're currently using the military. However, there's another way to do it."

"By civilians, is My Lord thinking about the commoners?"

"Anyone unfortunate," Lansius clarified. "Seasonal laborers, landless farmers, orphans, the poor in the market. Any capable but unfortunate farmer should be invited to work on the communal farm."

"But wouldn't that compete with the private farms owned by landowners? They also rely on the same labor pool."

"Tell them we need to increase crop production no matter what to avoid famine. Stick to that point, and they'll quiet down eventually. After all, this will likely just force them to offer decent wages to their workers or to employ them year-round instead of seasonally."

"So, just a minor inconvenience for them," Sigmund commented.

"Indeed. They wouldn't stage a coup over mere pocket change," Lansius reassured him. "Also, I will allow two hundred camp followers to settle, so you're not starting completely from scratch."

"My gratitude, My Lord. But what about the payment system?"

"I have outlined the details in the letter. Divide the communal land into two parts: one half to be managed by the peasants as part of their tax, and the other half to be worked by the new labor force. You'll need to compensate the laborers, but consider it an investment."

"Will the region have enough cash, especially since My Lord has promised to waive tolls and market taxes for the next year?"

"It will. I'll abstain from claiming my share from South Hill for a year or two, until the situation stabilizes." Lansius paused, then added, "Frankly, don't worry too much about coins. We're facing a potential famine, and I fear grain will become more valuable than silver."

They heard the chirping of a bird passing by the narrow window, seemingly announcing the fair weather. "It will be a lovely week for marching," Sigmund commented.

"Hopefully, the weather will remain this good," Lansius replied with a smile. "Also Sigmund..."

"Yes, My Lord?"

"Could I ask you to create something for me?" Lansius' eyes brightened. "I've always wanted to try something to make the march less painful."

 

***

 

South Hill City

The Harvest Festival was planned for tomorrow, after everyone had completed the harvest, stored the grains, and cleaned the land sufficiently to avoid pest growth. As it would be a two-day event, extensive preparations were necessary.

From morning to noon, across the village and city, everyone was busy setting up tables and chairs, and slow cooking had already started to ensure the various meals would be ready by tomorrow. It was a community event where the Lord was expected to donate liquor, cooking ingredients, and musicians to ensure merriment.

Street performers had prepared a new act, dubbed "The Rise of the Black Baron and the Magical Grain." People were eager to watch the performance on the city's main street, or wherever patrons were willing to pay.

The cities buzzed with decorations of all sorts. Children gathered berries and wildflowers, while others brought fruits from the orchards and fresh vegetables from the gardens.

While the community prepared for the festivities, the Lord's military was gearing up to march. Footwear was repaired, fresh woolen socks distributed, and carts received their last major maintenance before heading to Three Hills.

The main army would march one day after the two-day Harvest Festival. Although he could have ordered them to march now, the Lord decided to boost their morale by allowing them to enjoy the festivities.

Meanwhile, Sigmund had quietly dispatched a small team of skirmishers, disguised as wandering minstrels, on a fast cart to Three Hills. This was the reason the Lord had allowed them to rest to their heart's content at the previous Lord's manor—so they wouldn't begrudge being sent out before the Harvest Festival.

Once again, the minstrels would serve as his forward eyes and ears. His scouts in bright clothing, falsetto voice, and thrilling music.

...

 

On the next morning, the city came alive with music, dances, and all kinds of festivities. There were small archery competitions, fishing contests, baking contests, running contests, and, of course, a drinking contest.

The baking contest was especially phenomenal, filling the city with the aroma of freshly baked bread for the entire day. Because it was a competition, butter and aromatic herbs were used generously, giving the air a sweet, milky, and rich scent.

The Lord and Lady were present, providing the crowd with barrels of liquor from his castle, along with flour, butter, and, special for this year, Korelian salted meat. In turn, the city offered the Lord and Lady the best cuts of roast duck, slow-cooked since the previous night.

Entertainment was everywhere, with folk dances, theatrical plays, and music. The highlight was a trained horse that took part in a drama play, behaving as if it understood its role and could act as well as any human.

The Lady was enchanted and spent an hour playing with the horse. Seeing an opportunity, the Lord extended an invitation for the horse owner and other actors to perform in Korelia, which was graciously accepted.

"Korelia next year should be a great place to be," Audrey remarked excitedly as they rode home.

Lansius chuckled. "I'm sure it will be. Let's just hope we can resolve the Umberland issue before the harvest season."

Audrey offered a small grin. "With you leading, I doubt we can fail."

"That's high praise. But really... We should prepare for the worst. After all, there are many unknown factors in Umberland."

Audrey nodded, understanding that to underestimate the danger in Umberland would be foolish.

"My Lord, My Lady, apologies for interrupting," Sir Harold said as he rode closer.

"Please, speak," Lansius said openly.

"Your presence is requested again," Sir Harold conveyed.

Lansius looked to the skies. "But it's still early for supper."

"It's not the city, this request came from the village elders. They've begged me to extend an invitation for My Lord and Lady to the northern villages," the knight explained.

Lansius chuckled and looked at Audrey, who nodded with a smile. "I don't mind," she said.

"Well, then, let's enjoy a drink or two and a light bite," Lansius declared, his entourage readily agreeing.

As the festivities carried on, the air of merriment rejuvenated everyone's spirits. The usual doom and gloom were momentarily forgotten, swept away by cheerful cries and laughter. Individuals from various factions set aside their differences, united in joy, sharing laughs, meals, and drinks. That day, South Hill was reborn anew.

 

***

 

South Hill

Two days after the harvest festival, at dawn, the castle buzzed with activity. All its chandeliers and lanterns were lit, signaling the Lord and Lady's preparations to march. The kitchen staff busied themselves preparing breakfast and lunch for the road.

"Are you ready?" Audrey asked Lansius, who was already dressed in his traveling clothes, belt, and sword.

"Ready," Lansius remarked, his gaze lingering on the master chamber that had been their abode for the last several weeks. He noticed Agatha, assisting with packing their clothes. Catching his gaze, she looked up.

"Yes, Master?"

"Agatha, please take care of this place for us," Lansius said gently.

The girl hesitated.

"What's the problem?" Lansius inquired, not expecting any other response than affirmation.

Audrey, standing by his side, giggled and approached the chambermaid in training. "She's torn. Half of her wants to come with us, and the other half wants to stay with her family."

Lansius offered a gentle smile. "Is that true, Agatha?"

The girl nodded. "It's true, My Lord."

"Then continue your training. Once Umberland is safe for travel, we can invite you to join us, either there or in Korelia," Lansius reassured her.

"Really?" The girl's excitement was palpable.

"It's a promise. But in exchange, do me a favor."

"Anything, My Lord," said Agatha with a wide grin.

"Look after Sigmund for me. Offer him counsel from time to time. While he undoubtedly knows more about everything, being asked for advice and confided in is valuable and will make him wiser," Lansius confided in her.

The girl nodded earnestly. "I'll offer as much counsel as he needs."

A knock on the door interrupted them.

"My Lord, My Lady, do you need more time to prepare?" Sterling inquired from outside.

Lansius looked at Audrey, who shook her head as she donned her traveling cloak. "If it's time to leave then, we should act quickly."

Thus, the Lord and Lady bid farewell to the castle staff and the people who had gathered on the street outside. Marching in formation with their select guards and cavalry, they headed northeast, taking the route through the northern villages and towards Three Hills.

They had been there for just slightly over a month, yet the parting was bittersweet for the populace who had come to recognize the Lord's leadership during these turbulent times. Many wished he could stay and rule the city for a bit longer, but they knew that the Lord was shouldering the responsibility for the entire province.

As the formation moved away from the city, Audrey glanced back and caught sight of the castle's colorful glass window, shining like a miniature sun amidst the orchards on either side. "I'm going to miss this place," she murmured.

"Indeed," Lansius echoed, retrieving a small earthen jug from his saddlebag and offering it to her.

"What's this for? Are we celebrating something?" she inquired before taking a sip.

"To our victory over South Hill and to saving so many troops from hunger," Lansius declared, proud of his achievement.

"To past victories and the future," Audrey toasted. Their smiles broadened as they shared the sweet mead.

Grateful villagers lining the road waved them off, catching one last glimpse before the couple embarked on an eight to nine day march to Three Hills. Beyond Three Hills lay the plateau leading to the mountain pass where Umberland was situated. There, the fate of Lowlandia would be decided.

 

***

 

Chapter 119

Muli Mariani (Marius' Mule)

 

Korelia

Undisturbed by the distant march of war, the Korelians celebrated the marriage of Calub and Cecile with joy and festivity, marking the culmination of the city's celebrations since the harvest's arrival.

The first celebration was the harvest festival itself. Despite the recent Battle of Korelia disrupting planting seasons, this year's festivities shone brighter than usual. This was due to the stable food prices that allowed everyone to partake in the celebration. This stability was achieved through a trade agreement with the merchants of eastern Lowlandia and grain surpluses from White Lake.

Next came the celebration in honor of Lord Lansius' official recognition as the Baron of Korelia. Upon hearing the news, the people threw a spontaneous city-wide celebration to honor the Imperium's decree. This celebration was prolonged after news arrived that the Lord had secured another great victory over South Hill, creating a euphoria never seen before.

The marriage between two well-loved figures brought the season's festivities to a close.

Calub, the alchemist, was an honorable treasurer whose diligence ensured that wages and payments were disbursed on time and without any mischief. His work ethic and integrity endeared him to many. Similarly, Cecile, the late Sir Callahan's daughter, was cherished by the Korelians. Her House's contributions and gallant sacrifice were still fondly remembered.

The townsfolk enthusiastically organized a banquet for the newlyweds, with Sir Justin, serving as the Marshal, officiating the marriage in Lord Lansius' absence.

The year 4425 would be long remembered in Korelia as a season full of celebration and joy.

As autumn deepened, life in Korelia resumed its tranquil pace. Shepherds led their flocks to graze on the harvested fields, preparing the land for the next season. The sound of shearing signaled the start of wool work, which would continue through the winter. The breeding season brought a promise of renewal and growth, particularly important for sheep, ducks, donkeys, and most notably, horses.

With Korelia's growing importance, an increasing number of breeders established trade posts in the city, leading to the emergence of a bustling market. The volume of horse trade, which included horses for farm work, burden beasts, leisure, and warhorses, increased dramatically. With every transaction, the city levied modest taxes to attract more businesses.

Sir Justin was at the forefront, ensuring horse breeders felt comfortable and encouraging collaboration with the nomads. He believed that sharing knowledge between the two parties would work wonders.

As efforts to further improve Korelia City continued, the community was busy in the barns, gathering and storing hay. This task was crucial to ensuring there would be ample feed for the horses and livestock throughout the harsh steppe winter.

Amidst the work and preparation for the cold months, a wave of excitement washed over Korelia, sparked by the newly operational bathhouse. Word of this oasis of relaxation quickly spread beyond the city's boundaries, drawing curious visitors from the surrounding villages. They came in droves, eager to immerse themselves in the soothing waters that promised respite from their daily labors.

Behind the scenes, four individuals elevated the bathhouse to new heights. Initially, it was Lady Felicity's presence that drew the women's populace to the bathhouse. They were eager for their daughters to bathe in the same waters as her, believing it would bring good luck, or at least, offer something to boast about to friends and relatives.

Now, with Lady Felicity having returned to Midlandia, the bathhouse continued to be graced by more beauties. The newly married Cecile often visited with Claire, her sister. Frequently joining them were Lady Astrid, the daughter of the Lion of Lowlandia, and Eleanor, the Marshal's daughter, who was now her lady-in-waiting.

The four were busy preparing a branch of the school for commoners and landless gentry, finding a weekly respite in the bathhouse's newly built warm water section.

Their influence helped turn the bathhouse into the city's top attraction. This influx of visitors injected new life into Korelia's economy. Around the bathhouse, a vibrant community of inns, taverns, and food stalls sprang up, catering to the needs and desires of the guests. Each new establishment added to the city's allure, transforming the area into a bustling hub of commerce and social gathering, further driving its economic impact.

The operational and profitable bathhouse also elevated the city's prestige in the eyes of the Midlandian guilds, eager to expand their influence and business. More guilds sent their laborers to offer projects to the city council or to sell their services directly to the masses.

The first newcomers were a cobbler family from Midlandia, who set up their shop near the bathhouse. They were soon followed by a textile workshop and a tailor. Then, a bakery opened, enticed by the prospect of securing firewood at favorable prices due to the bathhouse's demands.

Following this trend, a wealthy merchant from last year's salt trade constructed a temporary kiln. Using rejected firewood from other sources, he began to supply basic pottery, bricks, and even clay roofing to the locals—items that had been previously imported and were prohibitively expensive for most Korelians.

The leftover materials from the kiln, including the ashes, aided in the construction of mud houses for the thousands of captured laborers. Previously, the Marshal had allowed them to enjoy some form of harvest festivities in their camps. Now, refreshed and well-rested, he directed their efforts toward completing the mud housing and winter-proofing other facilities.

He aimed for them to withstand the harsh winter of Korelia without falling ill and risking delays in the various projects, especially the construction of the city wall and the new eastern keep.

The fair and humane treatment left the laborers mostly at peace. Being Lowlandians, they had expected worse treatment. Moreover, since they were either from Korimor or South Hill natives, they were reassured knowing that their families were aware of their situation and waiting for them at home.

They were also content, knowing their families were in good hands. Despite initial skepticism, the news from travelers from Korimor and South Hill was uniformly promising. They began to view the Lord of Korelia not just as capable but as fit to rule, and perhaps even as the leader the Lowlandians needed to end the region's long history of bloodshed.

Despite Lord Lansius' obscure background, there emerged a general willingness to submit, not born out of fear or helplessness but out of admiration and acceptance. This sentiment persisted even in his absence, as Korelia, and everyone within it, whether free or not, continued to forge new paths independently.

Such progress was only possible because Lord Lansius had laid a solid foundation. He did more than construct buildings; he assembled a team of capable and trustworthy personnel to oversee and manage the various aspects of the city, ensuring its continued growth and well-being.

More importantly, the staff members, armed with his vision, did not shy away from investing in and engaging in mutually beneficial business relations. They also extended fair treatment to captured laborers, understanding they were not enemies but another part of Lowlandia to be embraced. With these elements in place, the city and its people thrived.

 

***

 

House Arte

If you encounter this tale on Amazon, note that it's taken without the author's consent. Report it.

Far from Lowlandia, in Brunna village near Midlandia, a concentration of troops was building up. Three hundred Arvenians were in training, supported by two hundred Midlandians.

After returning from their visit to the Capital, Sir Archie, or Lord Arte in disguise, had been steadily growing his power base in Brunna. The small but wealthy estate had previously been owned by a baronet involved in slave ownership in Sabina Rustica.

The punishment for this crime was death. Furthermore, the late baronet's seditious act against Lord Arte constituted another high crime, warranting a more serious capital punishment.

In desperation to avoid execution, the late baronet struck a deal to adopt Sir Archie into his House in exchange for his silence. The baronet thought he had outwitted death, but Sir Archie made certain the man lived only until the document and patent were signed and the necessary ceremonies concluded.

Officially, the baronet passed away due to old age. Unofficially, it was a lethal combination of a high dose of aphrodisiac and a surprise visit from a courtesan that led to severe heart problems for the old, yet lustful, man.

As the baronet had no direct heir, only several bastards with little claim to the estate, Sir Archie inherited the entire Brunna estate and village. This inheritance provided him with a manor, a source of income, and land to build his forces—a stroke of luck, especially since no Midlandian nobles would have willingly granted him land that offered such independence.

Many had hoped to turn him into their henchman. Arte knew he was fortunate to have Lansius, whose remarkable performance significantly boosted Arte's standing among his Midlandian peers. Furthermore, Lansius' success opened the door for Arte to gain support from Sir Stan and Seneschal Bengrieve, two of the most influential figures in Midlandia.

Their influence shielded Arte from other nobles across the vast Midlandian territories who might have sought to entangle him in their ongoing succession crisis.

In military matters, learning from Thomas’s insights about Lansius' strategy against Lord Robert, Lord Arte invested heavily in crossbows. Instead of building expensive cavalry units, he doubled down on creating a force of competent men-at-arms, augmented by crossbowmen.

In Brunna, they trained hard until Thomas, felt confident they could replicate Lansius' success against the Lion of Lowlandia. Due to his competence, the bearded axe man was subsequently appointed Captain.

His superior, Sir Peter, an able diplomat, became Lord Arte's trusted right-hand man, while Sir Anci was named Cavalry Captain.

Leda, the freed Rhomelian slave from Sabina Rustica, quickly proved her worth by meticulously maintaining the records and ensuring the finances were balanced. This allowed the burgeoning force to remain independent and not indebted to other Midlandian nobles who might use them as their private army.

Thilde, a female Arvenian squire who had been captured and tortured in Sabina Rustica, became another rising star in House Arte. Despite her injuries, she learned to walk again and trained harder than anyone, earning immense respect from her comrades and becoming the embodiment of Arvenian courage and stubbornness.

While Brunna was focused on military preparations, it was also gearing up for another significant event: a noble wedding. The anticipated day arrived with Lady Felicity returning from Lowlandia in a procession befitting a high noble, flanked by armed guards and cavalry.

With Imperium officers in attendance, the couple tied the knot. It was a merry affair with a sense of grandeur, despite their nature in disguise. Although subdued, the week long party and celebration quickly became the subject of widespread discussion among the neighboring villages and towns.

The revelation that a mere knight, now an adopted baronet, had accumulated such vast wealth, manpower, and influence left everyone in awe.

Contrary to expectations of a tranquil fall and winter, the newlyweds, just a week after their honeymoon, donned their armor and fur clothes. Without hesitation, they led their army out of Brunna. A fierce determination shone in the eyes of the Arvenians as they marched, united in their resolve. They were intent on exacting vengeance upon Lord Karius and Lord Gottfried.

 

***

 

Lansius

The army and their camp followers marched under fair weather and covered a good distance each day. Their preplanned route and knowledge of where to camp greatly aided their travel.

By midday on their fourth day from South Hill, they took a rest, using tents atop the carts as makeshift shades. It was then that the scouts reported the arrival of dozens of allied horse-drawn carts from Three Hills.

Just as Lansius had been informed by his budding network of spies and long range scouts, the goods he had been awaiting had arrived.

Everyone was eager to see what the dozens of carts contained. It turned out that almost all were filled with bags of various models and materials, though they were roughly the same size.

At the Lord's command, his staff quickly distributed the bags, with the Lord himself taking one.

Sir Harold, Servius, and Farkas, who had just returned from forward scouting, were amused by the double-strapped backpacks. Although they had seen them before, they had never considered them to be more useful than the simple bags carried on the shoulder or pouches on their belts.

They quickly noticed that with these backpacks, instead of relying on various smaller bags or pouches, each man could carry more goods. They were akin to saddlebags but for humans.

"With these, we can reach Three Hills in under three days," the Lord declared confidently as he inspected the bags.

His words were met with chuckles from his staff and others within earshot. The fact was, they were still four to five days away from Three Hills. Even if they could march that fast, the burdened beasts in the supply and baggage train would collapse from exhaustion.

"My Lord, it isn't wise to risk our supply line," Servius advised.

"This is to help with the supply line. With these bags, we can pack as many goods as possible to lessen the beasts' burden," the Lord explained. Before anyone could complain, he had loaded his bag with various goods and carried it comfortably on his back.

"This is manageable," he remarked after some tries. "Let's march this way."

"You wish to march on foot?" Sterling asked, puzzled.

"Yes, why not? After all the festivities, we need some training. Otherwise, we might face a nasty surprise in Umberland," the Lord replied without hesitation.

The staff exchanged looks before Lady Audrey stepped forward, addressing the command staff. "Tell the men to pack all personal belongings in their bags, along with goods they can carry. Let the carts carry less. Let's aim to cover as much ground as we can today."

The Lord looked at his wife and started, "You don't have to walk—"

Ignoring the interruption, Audrey continued, "My Lord, I believe it's best to explain the reasoning behind this. I doubt these bags are merely for training."

"Of course," Lansius reassured her and then addressed the rest of his men. "These bags are greater than you might think. Two of the most crucial factors in the military are speed and freedom of movement across terrain. And with the help of these bags, we can achieve it."

Everyone listened, not expecting a humble backpack to carry such significance.

"In Umberland, we'll be fighting in dense forests and mountainous terrain. Relying on horses, donkeys, or oxen for our supplies will limit our speed, choice of routes, and more importantly, our ability to conceal movements. It also exposes our vital grain supplies to the enemy," Lansius explained.

The idea that someone might try to take their hard-earned grain away incensed the Nicopolans. The trauma from their hunger under Sergio's rule would take years to heal.

"Now, imagine if everyone carried their own supplies," he ventured. "It would free us to move wherever we want, climb steep hills, or traverse forests without concern for our supply line. Yes, it's tiresome, but it's doable. It's nothing compared to the backbreaking work of tending to crops."

Nods of agreement came from the circular formation around him.

With everyone's attention, Lansius continued, "Each person should carry spare clothes, a blanket, warm attire, foot wraps, and flour. Depending on their group, they're also to share tent gear, along with a cauldron, cooking utensils, medicine, and other mending tools."

The men were surprised at the volume of items they were expected to carry, items usually loaded onto the group's dedicated donkey or mule.

Noticing the men's reluctance, the Lord added, "This practice is well-known in my birthplace. A trained man will carry a bag twice this size, filled to the brim with food, water, and equipment, allowing him to march independently of any supply line for weeks."

Now, it was the command staff's turn to nod their heads. They were the ones who truly understood how such mobility and freedom of movement could impact warfare.

By not being tethered to a slow-moving supply line, a group could more easily set up ambushes, move faster to secure advantageous positions, impede the enemy's movement, or flank them unexpectedly. Along with the mobile dragoon forces, this agility and freedom would prove invaluable when utilized correctly and with synergy.

"This setup also enables you to cook and survive on your own if you get lost, or if need be, when we are defeated and you find yourselves in a rout," the Lord added, ever so casually.

The notion of facing defeat spurred protests from the men. After the initial shock, expressions of warm support poured in.

"We're with you, My Lord. There won't be a rout with you in the lead," one shouted.

"We might not be Korelians, but the Nicopolans will prove their worth in battle," another man beside Servius voiced his determination.

Lord Lansius offered a stiff smile. As he chose not to intervene, Sir Harold stepped forward and, with a single loud clearing of his throat, managed to silence the men. He then gazed upon the Lord politely.

"Gratitude, Sir," Lord Lansius expressed his thanks to his knight. Then, addressing his men, he continued, "Gentlemen, there's no harm in discussing defeat. Just like fear, we must embrace and understand it. Do you know that defeat and retreat are the greatest strategies of them all?"

The Lord's unexpected question caused everyone to ponder. To them, talking about defeat and retreat was such a taboo that nobody dared utter it. The noblemen were especially sensitive to these words, fearing they would destroy morale or lessen the men's bravery.

Yet, ever unorthodox, Lord Lansius broached the subject of defeat and retreat with a straight face and calm demeanor. Expectation and anticipation ran high; many believed the Lord aimed to impart something valuable for the upcoming campaign.

 

***

 

Chapter 120

Great General

 

En-route to Three Hills

Lansius climbed atop a horse-drawn cart to make himself more visible. Despite wearing only a simple white doublet and a wicker hat on his head, the lord had a commanding presence. "Gentlemen, let me tell you a little secret: defeat or losing a battle is not the end."

His words of simple truth echoed, meeting with various reactions.

He pressed on, explaining, "I have studied how great nations in the past have prevailed despite losing major battles again and again. You might not know this name, but to me, it's as close as home. In Trebia, 20,000 lost their lives; in Trasimene, another 20,000; and in Cannae, 70,000. They were disasters, yet the nation not only survived but prevailed!"

The claim put everyone in either shock or disbelief; they had never imagined a kingdom could survive such disasters without collapsing.

"The Imperium is no different," Lansius pointed out. "The Western part and the Centuria province have faced defeat after defeat for more than twenty years against the Western Nomads, yet the Imperium is still standing."

The men nodded in unison, finding similarities between the two and feeling rather proud of it.

Raising his voice, Lansius called, "Fellow Lowlandians and Nicopolans. Let their resilience be our lesson. Do not fear defeat, for true defeat lies only when you cower in fear and give up."

Even with doubt painted on their faces, the men voiced no rejection.

Lansius followed with an analysis, "Defeat in battle is but a condition when multiple unexpected things happen all at once. Failure to learn about the enemy's superior force is one of the usual factors, followed by failure to acknowledge our own troops' situation and morale. Bear in mind, courage is a fickle thing. One moment you feel brave, the next, you feel tired and would prefer running over fighting."

Like a good mentor, Lansius calmly surveyed his students. "Other factors might relate to the physical situation. While terrain can be scouted, rain or snow remains beyond our ability to predict. Then there's the role of equipment—whether we've carried the right tools for the job, thick woolen blankets and socks for winter, waxed leather for rainy days, or long pikes to counter cavalry."

Everyone nodded in agreement with the Lord's assessment.

"And lastly, provisions: flour for bread, grains for gruel, cheese, fat, blood sausages—everything. Without food, defeat is almost guaranteed. However, one defeat does not equate to losing everything. Remember the Imperium and its resilience."

Audrey intrigued, raised her hand. "My Lord, then how should we react when defeated?"

"Good troops should act like fighters. Even when beaten down, you should never give up and must stand up again."

Audrey nodded; the analogy to a fighter was easy to understand.

Lansius looked at the rest of his men and decided to gamble on a lesson. "I do not fear defeat. And as such, I do not fear Umberland."

The unexpected bold words made the men's faces brighten with smiles and grins.

However, Lansius raised his hand to recapture their attention. "Yet, it's what comes after Umberland that I fear."

Seeing puzzled looks from the men and staff, Lansius elaborated, "If you do as I've instructed, and if the fair weather holds, conquering Umberland will not be too difficult. However, taking Umberland means facing refugees, armed or not. How should we answer them? With open arms or with unsheathed swords?"

Grim expressions appeared on everyone's faces. It wasn't new or groundbreaking; the Nicopolans had suspected such a situation would arise, pitting them against another group of Nicopolans, but they had never given it real thought until now.

"For certain, Lowlandia has no more grains to spare. And you know I'm not lying about it. You farmed it yourself in South Hill."

A heavy silence fell until Servius raised his hand to interrupt.

"Speak." Lansius motioned.

"My Lord, may we learn what your plan for Umberland is?" Servius asked.

Lansius gazed warmly at the older gentleman who prided himself as a condottiere leader. "Unfortunately, that answer I do not possess," Lansius admitted without hesitation. "I can only promise that I'll do my utmost to make a decision that we won't regret."

The words of reassurance helped to pacify the Nicopolans' worries.

Just then, Sterling stepped forward, offering a cup of water to the Lord. After a brief pause to drink, Lansius turned back to his men. "All this talk about war, defeat, and strategy might sound confusing."

He garnered smirks and chuckles from the men around him.

"A long time ago, a wise man wrote that war isn't hard. He also said that victory is easy, but defeat is never easy. And I wholeheartedly agree with him."

Everyone watched with raw anticipation. For the poorest of Nicopolans who had made it this far, just to be in the presence and witness this exchange was already the highlight of their lives. They would cherish this memory like a heirloom.

"Reflecting on it, in strategy, we understand that a good lord or general knows how to win, but a great one knows how to retreat."

The words puzzled his men and murmurs erupted. Some quickly agreed and nodded, while others looked skeptical and shook their heads.

Fully expecting such a reaction, Lansius waited patiently until they calmed down. "Tell me, who is the better general, one who retreated twice and lost half his troops, or one who retreated ten times and lost only a quarter of his troops?"

The question sparked realization among his staff members and their men.

"Everyone can lead an attack. Any one of you can take a group of brave youngsters and attack a bandit hideout. Ensuring you have more men than the bandits isn't complex planning. However, what about organizing a retreat in order? What about retreating without causing a rout? Is any one of you capable of doing that?"

Understanding dawned on the men's faces. Even Audrey, Sir Harold, and Servius nodded openly.

"A proper retreat is the hardest maneuver to learn. The best general is not one who could win wars, but one who could retreat without damaging his troops. He then could regroup and attack at a better time and place."

Witnessing the nodding heads, Lansius continued, "If one can achieve this, then even after facing a dozen defeats, he would eventually emerge victorious. This is what I wanted to achieve."

Despite its audacity, the statement held an undeniable truth and the men were swayed further.

"Gentlemen, I don't mind losing battles, and I want you to maintain the same mindset," Lansius declared, trying to instill seeds of fearlessness in his men. "Everyone under my banner should not fear losing, defeat, or retreat. Our only goal is to win the war! So, cast aside your fears. Trust that even in defeat, we will prevail."

The narrative has been taken without permission. Report any sightings.

Servius turned around to face his comrades, feeling their resolve in the air, and shouted, "You heard what the Lord said. No matter what, we will prevail!"

A thunderous chorus of responses erupted from the men. Spears and shields banged in a cacophony of agreement.

"Ever victorious!" one roared, followed by another's cry of "Unstoppable!" Others chimed in with their own battle cries, a wave of fervor washing over the ranks.

Lansius watched the reactions with a wide smile, adjusting his wicker hat due to the heat while waiting for the commotion to subside. "Fellow comrades-in-arms, now you've heard of my troubles and learned more secrets of warfare."

His men happily nodded in agreement.

"The burden of planning and governing is mine to shoulder; let my staff and I take care of it. Meanwhile, all I ask of you is to shoulder a different kind of burden."

Most knew what the Lord was hinting at, and smirks and chuckles formed on their lips.

Lansius took another bag from the cart and held it up. "This will help us achieve victories. Learn to use it, train with it, depend on it, and soon we will show the world what rapid marches are."

 

***

 

Just as parents reveal their burdens and business to their children to foster understanding, Lansius employed a similar psychological method to influence his troops. He openly shared the grim challenges and responsibilities he faced, compelling them to recognize the gravity of their situation. This, in turn, made them more cooperative and less inclined to resist demands and changes than usual.

Achieving their compliance was precisely Lansius' goal. He aimed for his troops to quickly adapt to marching with backpacks.

There was no doubt that it could be done. The real challenge lay in convincing them.

Historically, although Roman legionaries marched with their bags, the Medieval army, due to its tradition and training, was generally unwilling to carry the burdens on their backs. Instead, they depended on donkeys, mules, or solely on the Lord's baggage train for sustenance.

Lansius considered this approach too far from ideal, as it placed significant burden on his limited logistical capabilities. Furthermore, it compromised his troops' mobility, since medieval horse-drawn carts and unpaved roads were inadequate. While they could navigate the Lowlandia steppes, Umberland would be a different game.

He understood that he must either transform his troops or face continuous difficulties in the future. Thus, while marching in peace to Three Hills, Lansius had decided to take action.

Although it seemed like a straightforward task, he was aware of the historical resistance from the military. Even the Romans, who initiated this practice, faced strong resistance. The reforms enacted by Gaius Marius led people to openly mock the new army as Marius' mules, because the legionaries were now carrying their supplies instead of relying on mules.

However, this change allowed the new army to move rapidly without depending on roads or favorable terrain. It enabled them to march further, venture beyond the Roman road network, and set up ambushes in unforeseen locations. After securing a great victory, no Roman ever questioned the benefits of soldiers carrying their own rations.

Fortunately, Lansius' situation was much better. He had demonstrated just how effective a leader he was: capable and also compassionate, thus making his troops more agreeable.

"If the Lord wishes us to become his mules, so be it," many complied with minimal complaint.

Others felt content carrying their own supplies, thinking that, even if they were defeated or in retreat, they could still survive with the food on their backs.

As they prepared to resume their march, further instructions came from the chain of command. The first focused on how to properly load and manage the straps across their shoulders and torsos. Secondly, the Lord required each person to carry at least a week's worth of food. Additionally, depending on their group, each member was also responsible for sharing the burden of the group's essentials, including the canvas tent, bedrolls, ropes, cauldron, and even a wooden pole.

Carrying this load, especially in gambeson or ringmail, was a heavy burden, but they trusted their lord's judgment that it was achievable. Moreover, they were eager to meet the Lord's expectations, especially since he was leading by example, marching also on foot.

True to his word, Lord Lansius, flanked by his most trusted men and following a signal from a buccina, led the march. With his bags loaded, a shield in his left hand, a spear in the other, and his helmet strapped to his chest, the Lord marched steadfastly.

Watching him, all remaining doubts dissipated, and soon, three thousand men and camp followers, arranged in multiple columns, followed. They were trying hard not to disappoint the Lord, who in their minds was a better leader than any nobles they ever knew.

 

***

 

Lansius

This is more tiresome than I expected, but no matter, better a little pain here than paying the blood price.

It had been a good one-hour march, and his feet, hips, and shoulders were feeling it. However, he found solace in the distance they covered. Compared to before, they were progressing faster.

As he marched one step at a time, Lansius kept a watchful eye on his surroundings. He was aware that his cavalry were on either side of his flanks and front.

Under Sir Harold, the Dragoons were to keep a perimeter in case something went undetected by the layers of forward scouts.

The sound of a horse trotting from the side alerted him. The horse and rider approached until exactly at his right side, providing Lansius with good shade from the sun. He gazed at the rider and, unsurprisingly, found his wife on the saddle.

"It's been an hour," Audrey commented.

"I can still go for another three," Lansius quipped, much to the chuckle of his men around him.

"My Lord, you can leave this training and bag demonstration to us," Sterling chimed in.

"I'm sure everyone wouldn't mind. You've shown us more than enough that it's doable," Servius added.

"Shall I fetch the horse, My Lord?" Farkas, the hunter turned minstrel, offered.

"No, it's good exercise. Otherwise, I'll be getting weak," Lansius responded lightly.

His men chuckled. Meanwhile, Audrey gazed at Sterling. "Squire," she called.

"Yes, My Lady," Sterling approached her.

Audrey didn't say anything but gave him two waterskins, obviously for Lansius' needs. Then back at Lansius, "Since you won't let me march on foot for some reason, at least allow me to provide you with some shade."

He let out a wide grin, followed by the chuckles of his men.

"The Lord marches under the auspices of his great wife," Farkas quipped, garnering laughter from them.

"No shame in it for my wife is indeed great," Lansius praised. "And it's always good to march under shade, be it from the clouds or from a benevolent wife."

His men chuckled again. The joy gave them respite from the monotonous marching.

Audrey let out a sigh, but a smile formed on her lips. "You're not born Arvenians or Lowlandians, yet the stubbornness is the same."

Lansius had no response but to chuckle.

Watching the Lord said nothing, Farkas quipped, "But My Lady, you're also not born Midlandians, yet you're prettier than most of the ladies in Lubina castle."

Audrey raised her brow and retorted, "I heard you're of Korelia born and never left the city. Then how can you tell that I'm prettier than the ladies in the Midlandia court? Who taught you all these, Sigmund?"

"Indeed, My Lady, Captain Sigmund has convinced me as he had confirmed it with his own eyes. Your face, your waist, your form-"

Lansius deliberately cleared his throat, stopping Farkas from continuing a popular ballad.

Servius tapped the minstrel's shoulder. "Perhaps, it isn't a bright idea to woo your Baron's wife."

"Does the new minstrel wish to lose an eye or have a shorter tongue?" Sterling teased to add more pressure.

"I assure you that I didn't mean-" Farkas tried to explain nervously, thinking he had overstepped, but Lansius raised his hand to stop him.

"Farkas, I think now it's the time," the Lord said rather ominously.

"The time? What time, My Lord?" Farkas asked nervously.

Next to him, Sigmund made a not-so-subtle throat-slitting gesture.

Lansius chuckled at his staff's antics. Their way of welcoming a new staff member was unprofessional, yet it fostered camaraderie. "Farkas, I'm sure Sigmund has taught you about my request."

"Ah, the marching song?" the minstrel turned bright.

"Indeed, I think the time is right. Let's see if we can march further with the help of a song."

Farkas raised his hand to gather his subordinates, the black bandits they called themselves unofficially, and the rhymes they made were also rebellious in nature.

Farkas sang the cadence, quickly garnering attention.

"Citizens, watch your wives, we say,

Black-haired rogue's coming your way!

Lion's gold from White Lake's day,

Stashed away, oh stashed away!"

Then, his men in bright clothes joined in the chorus.

"He's the Black Lord, strong and bold,

Vanquished foes on steppes so cold.

From Korimor to South Hill's hold,

Triumphs now in tales retold!"

Rejoiced by the joy on the men's faces, Farkas continued.

"Western Lords, they felt his might,

All three armies lost the fight.

Omin, Sergio, Gunther's plight,

Faced our Lord and lost their right."

His fellow minstrels then sang the last part.

"Into Umberland, we march with pride,

Lowlandians by the Black Lord's side.

Shepherd's tunics we've set aside,

For bright doublets, worn with pride!"

Hearing this for the first time, Lansius chuckled to mask his embarrassment. Everyone around them chuckled too, finding it vulgar but unapologetically refreshing.

"That's a lively song," Audrey commented with a grin.

"Sigmund is really one crazy bastard," Lansius muttered. Yet, he noticed the men naturally catching onto the catchy lyrics and beginning to ask for more.

Before long, his column marched to the lively song. Then the column next to it started to learn the song, followed by another column.

By daybreak, three songs had circulated and were well-loved by the men.

While Lansius felt slightly embarrassed by the lyrics, which aggrandized him, he couldn't deny the results.

"We've camped further than planned?" he inquired of his scout as his command tent was being erected.

"Yes, My Lord. We've not stopped at the planned site. This is the spot we intended to reach by midday tomorrow."

Lansius grinned and chugged from his waterskin. "Then in two days, we'll probably be dining in Three Hills City."

 

***

 

Chapter 121

Nightfall's Guest

 

For tyrants, no sensation surpassed the thrill of wielding power over others and seeing their commands carried out. Yet, this intoxicating sense of control was exclusive to the tyrant. For everyone else, this concentration of power and its rampant abuse proved to be detrimental, even to those closest to the despot. This dynamic made the situation perilous for all involved.

The inherent human desire for freedom meant that inevitably, all those under the tyrant's rule sought to break free, striving to overthrow the despot. Ironically, this often led to them becoming the new tyrants, perpetuating a never-ending cycle of power and resistance.

Despite a similar concentration of power, the situation in House Lansius was strikingly different.

After a grueling two-day march, burdened with heavy bags, the troops caught sight of the outer walls of Three Hills City, arriving almost three days ahead of schedule. Despite their exhaustion and discomfort, the group was buoyed by smiles and laughter, astonished at their own marching speed.

For them, there was no greater validation for the Lord's plan than the outcome itself. Moreover, there was no greater feeling for the troops than knowing the ones in power were thoroughly competent in their planning and decision-making.

While power was concentrated in one individual in both scenarios, the situation in House Lansius' volunteer-based army presented a stark contrast to that of a tyrant's household.

The men were not fearful but were instead grateful and appreciative of the opportunity to serve under such a competent commander. Furthermore, Lansius' approach to leadership was distinct from that of a tyrant. Before implementing any major changes, he spent time explaining his plans to his men, convincing them with sound reasoning and arguments, and even leading by example.

The troops felt they were in good hands, governed not with a leash and whip but by a wise counsel and guiding hand.

Now, with the sun low on the horizon, the vanguard had reached the city, where formalities ensued between the officers. More surprisingly, when the main army arrived, they were greeted by a sea of tents just outside the city wall.

"No need to pitch tents today," many exclaimed excitedly, pleased with the arrangement.

Soon, there were arrangements for a feast from the Lord of Three Hills, welcoming the victorious army from their conquest of South Hill.

Externally, everything seemed to progress flawlessly. However, the machinations behind the scenes were more complicated.

While Lansius had allowed the Nicopolans to sleep in tents outside the city wall, he instructed his dragoons to camp further away in a much safer location. Even in the failing light, Servius and Farkas were building a security network of scouts as their eyes and ears.

The Lord had commanded that he wanted no surprises, and while Lord Jorge was friendly, there was no guarantee that the rest of the Three Hills nobility was in line with their Lord.

...

 

A woman in traveling attire entered the command tent. "My Lord, My Lady," she greeted quickly.

"Lady Daniella, it's good to see you again," Audrey replied, seated beside Lansius, who slouched, looking too weary to engage.

"My apologies, the preparations I made were not adequate. I had anticipated two more days before the army's arrival."

"No, that's not on you," the Lord muttered. "You could even claim that it's because of your efforts that we arrived early."

"I never expected that equipping an army with bags would yield such results," Daniella mused.

Lansius looked as though he was about to explain something but changed his mind at the last moment. Instead, he drew a deep breath and rested his head on a folded chair with supple, cushioned head support—one of the luxuries he had acquired from the last war.

Seeing Lansius so fatigued, Audrey decided to play his part, "Dame, you mentioned the preparations were inadequate. Yet, we've seen tents erected for the army, a feat I believe was orchestrated by you?"

"Indeed, My Lady, but the accommodation must be insufficient. Isn't that why, My Lord and Lady, didn't sleep in the provided tents?"

Lansius mumbled something, and Audrey smiled understandingly. "Yes, I'm aware. Let me handle this."

Turning to Daniella, Audrey explained, "We decided to camp here for security reasons. Lord Jorge's failure to provide aid or support for our campaign to South Hill has led us to question his motives."

"But My Lady, the Lord of Three Hills sent words of congratulations, which I believe I forwarded to you through Sterling."

"Indeed, we received such a message from Sterling, but it arrived only after our victory, not before."

Daniella nodded, understanding the situation. "I regret my inability to fulfill my role. I couldn't rally the council of Three Hills to our cause."

Audrey offered a stiff smile. "Don't blame yourself. Even the Lord believes Three Hills' politics might be too intricate for anyone, even for Lord Jorge. This is why we let the main army camp closer to town while the cavalry and command structure stayed further away."

Daniella nodded deeply. In contrast to Lansius' previous approach, which kept his troops away from Three Hills to avoid disrupting the city, he now camped his main army directly outside the city gates, a visible show of force likely aimed at the nobles who might be deluded into thinking they could still do as they pleased.

"It's a wise move," Daniella said, then added, "I apologize for not thinking that far ahead and being cautious enough."

"Don't be. Perhaps we're simply overreacting, but the Lord felt it was better to be prepared. Even with a large army, we shouldn't become overconfident."

Daniella could only nod her head again.

"Well, how about your other reports?" Audrey inquired.

"Yes, My Lady, the dealings for grain are—"

Lansius' snore suddenly caught everyone's attention. With smiles and grins, they motioned to end the meeting, allowing their Lord to rest without interruption. For his retinue, the politics in Three Hills held little significance, as their loyalty was squarely with Lansius himself.

The narrative has been taken without permission. Report any sightings.

Outside the command tent, Audrey gestured for Daniella to walk with her.

"Please excuse the Lord. The march has left him utterly exhausted."

"Understandably, fast riding indeed wears on the body."

"The Lord wasn't riding," Audrey corrected gently.

Daniella furrowed her brows for a moment before her expression turned to one of surprise. She had connected the dots on how the Lord could convince the troops to march faster while carrying heavy bags. "My Lady, it's unthinkable that the Lord would march on foot."

Audrey chuckled. "He insisted on inspiring his men. And he didn't just march. Like everyone else, he also carried one of the bags you procured."

Daniella shook her head in disbelief, yet her grin was undeniable. "It seems the Lord continues to do the unexpected."

"For a good reason. After today, no one can deny the results."

"Indeed." The Dame then shared what was on her mind, "Perhaps this is what the wise mean when they talk about the mark of a good leader."

"Undoubtedly," Audrey affirmed. "The Lord confided in me that it's ideal to lead by example. He always advised never to demand of your men what you wouldn't do yourself."

"One should never ask another to bear a weight one is not prepared to lift oneself," Daniella echoed, citing her mentor's words.

Audrey nodded, then stopped to face Daniella directly. "One question."

It was a brief statement, but Daniella understood from Audrey's gaze that it carried significant weight. "Please, My Lady. As a knight of Korimor, command me," Daniella said, kneeling before her in the middle of the camp, conscious of the onlookers.

Audrey grabbed her arm and helped her to her feet. Unlike Lansius, who was unaccustomed to such formalities, Audrey was more prepared for her role. Without missing a beat, she asked, "Do you trust Lord Jorge?"

Daniella answered without hesitation, "I trust the person, but not his judgment or his cohorts. However, I might be biased, having worked with him before serving Lord Lansius."

Audrey valued her candor. Then acting on her own judgement, she suggested, "Perhaps, it might be wise for Lord Jorge to act to regain Lord Lansius' favor."

"Leave it to me, My Lady. I'll do my utmost," Daniella pledged, inspired by the Lord's willingness to march with the men.

 

***

 

Dragoon's Camp

After ensuring that everything was in order and Sir Harold along with the last of the supply train had joined the camp, Audrey returned to the main tent. Her hair basked in the golden sunset, momentarily casting her in the visage of a noble northern queen. The look was so captivating that Carla paused her chores just to stare at her master.

Audrey quickly noticed and returned her gaze.

"My Lady," Carla greeted her hurriedly, realizing her lapse.

"Has the Lord awoken?" Audrey inquired, walking towards the inner part of the large command tent.

"Yes, My Lady. I have also brought the meals for you both," replied Carla, following behind her.

"Gratitude. You should take a break and go eat," Audrey suggested.

Carla silently bowed her head and retreated to a corner near the entrance, where she could dine in peace while still keeping watch over the tent.

Meanwhile, Audrey entered the inner section and was greeted by Lansius with a casual "Yo."

His carefree attitude brought a smile to her face. "Feeling better?" Audrey asked, hanging up her traveling cloak.

"Yeah, a bit. Oh, sorry for falling asleep earlier. I hope Dame Daniella wasn't mad or anything."

"There's no need to worry. Everyone is grateful. Because of you, we arrived in Three Hills faster than expected. The men are highly motivated and proud of this achievement," Audrey said, changing into fresh attire.

Feeling his gaze on her, she looked back at him, catching his look of admiration. "But you're exhausted," she reminded him.

"Duty never ends," Lansius quipped, sending Audrey into giggles.

"You should carry fewer goods in the bags. You're not a mule."

"Well, Sterling also carried a lot, and he just had his leg fixed. I can't do less than him."

"And you claimed I'm the stubborn one," she remarked with a grin.

Lansius smiled and gestured for her to sit. "Come, let's eat before the stew gets cold."

Audrey quickly finished changing into a loose black tunic and took a seat on a small folded chair. She broke her bread and dipped it into the stew.

The aroma of the stew and bread mixed with the sweet scent of honey wax—a distinction of the noble's quarters from lesser establishments that used tallow-based candles.

They ate in peace. The rigors of marching and leading had been so taxing that the quietness became something to cherish. Without needing to say anything, he offered her a forkful of tenderly boiled vegetables, glistening with a hint of butter. She, in turn, passed him a slice of crusty bread, richly slathered with young cheese.

Only after they were half-full did Audrey speak up, "You seem to enjoy marching. But I hope you'll reconsider. Umberland is still another eight to nine days away."

"It shouldn't be that far," Lansius replied thoughtfully. "Servius mentioned it's closer than what the map conveyed, though the roads are poor and the terrain steep."

Audrey gave no response, choosing instead to continue with her meal.

Lansius drank from his goblet of water and suddenly admitted, "Don't tell anyone, but I regret my decision to walk."

The admission and shift in tone made Audrey giggle, and Lansius couldn't resist joining her.

"Oh, Lans, I told you—"

"You know me; I'm used to walking everywhere, but damn, those bags can carry a lot."

Audrey put her plate on the table, unable to resist laughing. Lansius, too, laughed at himself.

Afterward, she rose and proceeded to hug him. "My dear poor husband. Next time, you should be riding next to me. I'll figure out some excuse."

Lansius chuckled. "No need for an excuse. It was a demonstration, not a new routine, at least not for the command staff."

She returned to her spot and said, "You should get more rest. I'll take care of the camp."

"Has Sir Harold—"

"Done. We have all the supply train accounted for."

"Excellent. And the night watch?"

"No need to worry. Since we camped with the Dragoons, everyone is relatively fresh."

Lansius nodded, pleased. "That's great to hear. I don't feel like doing anything but sleep."

"I bet. You must be aching all over," Audrey ventured.

Lansius squinted his eyes and asked, "You don't look surprised?"

Audrey smiled. "You reminded me of my first hunting expedition. Wearing ringmail everywhere inside a forest, trying to keep up with Isolte. I still remember vomiting my breakfast and lunch."

Lansius chuckled at hearing that.

"It's good that you didn't vomit."

"I'm not that weak anymore. Just a bit surprised by the weight."

Audrey finished her meal and said, "Anyway, you should be proud. The troops were celebrating this fast march. They liked it and came to understand their newfound ability."

Lansius chuckled. "Well, we cheated somewhat. I told Sir Harold to guard the slower supply carts so we could advance faster."

"Yet, you have proven that rapid march is achievable."

Lansius nodded while slurping more of his vegetable stew.

"I think you'd do better with duck egg broth," she suggested.

Lansius swallowed and looked her dead in the eyes. "No duck egg," he stated briefly but firmly.

Audrey grinned at his reaction. "How about if I spoon-feed you?"

"Interesting idea, but no." He shook his head.

They finished their meal and kept the leftover bread for next day, in case they encountered a late breakfast or someone got hungry at night.

...

 

As they prepared to rest, the conversation turned to their situation with their ally.

"The problem is Three Hills," Lansius stated. "I want to know where they stand... I wish I had someone as capable as the late Sir Callahan."

Audrey poured him some watered-down spice wine to dull the aching. "The Dame is trying hard. I'm sure she'll improve with experience."

Lansius mulled. "Maybe it's my fault. She's adept with army management, but diplomacy might not be her forte."

"I'm afraid we have no one else, especially not one with experience. Unless you're considering recruiting Lord Robert."

"Ah, the Lion of Lowlandia," Lansius said with respect.

Noticing his tone, Audrey suggested, "Perhaps it's time to summon Sir Michael."

"Oh, I've heard he's newlywed. I wouldn't want to bother him."

Audrey sighed deeply and quipped, "Yet our honeymoon has been ruined. You owe me another."

"Tonight is as good a day as any to start. Let's call Carla for some mead," Lansius quipped back.

Audrey chuckled at his audacity and retorted, "I doubt you're up for much with those sore legs."

Before they could continue, a voice announced, "My Lord, My Lady, an important guest has arrived."

Audrey cleared her throat, while Lansius rose and stepped outside to greet Carla, asking, "Who is the guest?"

"It's Lady Daniella, My Lord."

Lansius furrowed his brow. "Why is she here again? Did something happen?"

"Ah, she has returned," Audrey commented.

"My Lord, she's brought someone else with her."

From Carla's tone, Lansius sensed the importance, quickly donned his doublet, and headed to the entrance. Audrey followed.

"Is our staff with them?" Audrey asked as they walked.

"Sterling and Sir Harold are with them," the squire informed.

At the entrance, they saw Lady Daniella, Sir Harold, Sterling, and a figure in a brown hooded robe.

"My Lord, My Lady," Lansius' retinue greeted, while the robed figure revealed a handsome face with lighter brown hair.

Lansius gasped, "Lord Jorge."

The Lord of Three Hills offered a stiff smile and greeted, "Lord Lansius, it's good to see you in person again." The air crackled with anticipation. His unexpected presence undoubtedly heralded a shift in the status quo. Lowlandia was on the brink of change, and nothing would be the same anymore.

 

***

 

Chapter 122

Masters of Three Hills

 

Dragoon's Camp

At Dame Daniella's urging, the Lord of Three Hills had traveled incognito to meet with the leader of the Grand Alliance. His arrival signaled the winds of change to the status quo. Doubts within Lansius' camp about Lord Jorge were quickly dispelled, placing the initiative firmly in his hands.

"My Lord, why are you here?" Lansius approached Jorge, with Audrey following behind him.

The honored guest offered a broad smile and declared, "I'm here to show my sincerity."

Lansius glanced at the entrance. "I don't see your escort."

Hearing that, Jorge chuckled. "Lord Lansius, you're not the only one with bold ideas," he retorted, eliciting a polite chuckle from Lansius.

Knowing his counterpart still had questions, Jorge clarified, "I came here of my own volition. I don't need an escort; I have your protection after all. I doubt anyone would dare harm someone under the Lord of Korelia's protection."

Lansius smiled and responded, "Your words are too kind." Then, noticing his staff had arranged seats and a table, he quickly motioned for Jorge to be seated. "Please, My Lord."

"After you, My Lord, My Lady," Jorge replied.

The three sat simultaneously, and Carla promptly served everyone pale ale. Lansius took the initiative and drank first to assure his guest of the ale's safety.

Jorge nodded and took a sip from his silver goblet.

Meanwhile, the rest of the staff were watching from a distance. Sir Harold and Sterling were whispering with Dame Daniella, likely inquiring about the current situation. They understood that when the time came, their Lord would seek their advice and opinions.

After they had taken their drinks, Audrey spoke up. "Have you eaten, My Lord?"

"Indeed I have, My Lady. Thank you for the offer," Jorge replied with a dazzling smile. While most ladies would be charmed, Audrey's attention was focused on ensuring the guest didn't carry any concealed weapons.

"It's time I explain my visit," Jorge began. "I'm here to apologize for my court's indecisiveness. We have factions, some of which, I must admit, probably still wish me dead."

"I'm not sure it's that dire," Lansius replied with concern.

Jorge appreciated the concern. "This is why I came without an escort. I want you to know I wholeheartedly support the Grand Alliance, despite my court being filled with people who resist change."

Lansius nodded deeply.

"However, that should no longer be an issue," Jorge hinted.

Audrey and Lansius exchanged glances, prompting Audrey to ask, "Is there a breakthrough?"

"I want to say yes, but it's going to take more time. The way My Lord has stationed your troops outside the wall hasn't gone unnoticed. However, my court tends to be overly slow to decide, which could make matters worse. Thus, I decided to act on my own," Jorge said.

"What kind of act?" Lansius asked cautiously.

The noble guest hesitated at first before explaining, "After the battle of Korelia, my House's grip on power has weakened. As I've said before, my council fears a coup. Worse, Sir Arius is currently defending against a Nicopolan incursion, and the few Black Knights stationed in the city are stretched thin."

Lansius took a deep breath, acknowledging the situation.

"If I send troops to join your campaign, they'll be my loyalists. We believe the opposing factions will wait for this opportunity, especially if you purchase a significant amount of grain. Even after the harvest, the food situation hasn't returned to normal, and I fear a large purchase might spell trouble for the populace. That would be the right moment for them to instigate a coup."

"A coup while you're at your weakest and lacking popular support," Lansius summarized.

"Exactly," Jorge exclaimed, seemingly unworried.

While Lansius pondered, Jorge declared, "Thus, I feel it would be better to declare my support and join this war in person."

Jorge's declaration surprised everyone. Audrey and the rest of the staff looked to Lansius, who stared at Jorge momentarily before gazing back at them. It was unexpected but a significant boon.

Lansius couldn’t conceal his gratitude but remained wary. "My Lord, why offer your support despite your predicament? Wouldn't this risk your House and family?"

The charming Lord paused before asking softly, "This might trouble you, Lord Lansius, but I'm planning to take my family. We'll follow closely behind your main army. Consider us as a reserve or whatever you need."

"But, my lord, we're headed for battle. It will be dangerous," Audrey warned.

Jorge met her gaze, his gesture showing appreciation for her concern. "Here or there, my family and I are at risk." Then he turned his gaze back to Lansius, "Frankly, I'd rather be surrounded by my loyalists and allies, even on a battlefield. At least in there, I'll know who the enemy is."

Lansius closed his eyes briefly, masking his reaction. Then, putting his hand on the table, he rose, and extended a hand towards Jorge. "My lord, it would be an honor to have you and your family join our campaign."

Jorge, ecstatic, rose quickly and clasped Lansius' hand. "Shogun," he addressed Lansius, "then I am in your care."

"It is my duty," Lansius responded seriously, before adding with a lighter tone, "Although I have some concerns that people might interpret this as me keeping you hostage."

"Nonsense, they will see it as two Lords of Lowlandia uniting to address a serious threat," Jorge countered.

Lansius chuckled, nodding in agreement. He looked to Audrey, who also showed her support, while Sir Harold and Sterling voiced no objections.

As if on cue, Carla refilled everyone's goblets. Seizing the moment, Lord Jorge raised his silver goblet. "To Umberland. May we rescue the nobles still holding out there."

...

 

After the agreement was put on paper, Lord Lansius ordered Dame Daniella to summon Sir Morton to his camp. While waiting for the escort, Sir Harold entertained Lord Jorge with their detailed account of the South Hill campaign. Carla and Sterling were also there, assisting in taking care of their honored guest.

Meanwhile, Audrey was conversing with Lansius on the inner side of the camp.

"Don't you fear that the opposing faction would deliver a coup when Jorge and all his loyalists are marching with us?"

Lansius drank a goblet of water and massaged his temple. "Everything seems possible. I can't be sure." He leaned back in his chair and explained, "If the opposing faction is ambitious and stupid, then they'll do just that. However, if they're ambitious and smart, they'll wait for news whether we're successful in Umberland before starting their plan."

"That's true," Audrey nodded in understanding. "Indeed, if we're successful, then I doubt they'll want to oppose us directly."

Lansius' gaze turned sharp, and he looked annoyed.

If you spot this narrative on Amazon, know that it has been stolen. Report the violation.

"Is that hatred I see on your face, darling?" Audrey quipped.

"I just don't like the way they play this game. All this risk of a coup while we're facing a big crisis. This is horseshit!"

"I can understand that. We're going to rely on Three Hills' support for our supplies." Audrey let out a sigh. "Then what are you planning to do?"

"That's the frustrating part," Lansius slumped in his seat. "Just like in South Hill, we have no evidence, only suspicion."

Audrey glanced at him before deciding to say, "I held back before, but I might need to remind you that this is Lowlandia." The firmness in her voice caught Lansius' attention. Audrey quickly added, "If you wait for evidence, by then, everything will be too late."

Lansius leaned forward in his seat, gaze locked with Audrey. "Do you want to strike first without evidence?"

Audrey knelt in front of him and said softly, "Sometimes, you're too inflexible for your own good."

"But punishing the wrong people could cause long-term resentment and spread the seeds of instability and rebellion," he explained.

Audrey let out a smirk. "I'm not saying to punish them."

"Then?"

"You know, you can just summon them and ask."

Lansius' brow furrowed momentarily before musing, "That is true. I can investigate them."

"That's not what I meant, but you're also correct. That's a role you can play. After all, every noble is also the local judge. Moreover, you're the leader of the Grand Alliance," she pointed out.

"That is true, it's within my jurisdiction." Then he gazed at Audrey, asking, "But what did you mean earlier?"

"Well, I'm trying to say that we don't have to make it too complex. We're dealing with subjects, not an army maneuvering into battle. Summon them, bring them out from the safety of their walls. Show them who's in charge. And then, we can see what kind of people they are."

Lansius nodded thoughtfully. "Iron fist in a velvet glove. This is a workable approach."

"Glad to be of help." Audrey then rose with a smile. "Then, if you come up with a plan, I'll be glad to hear it first."

 

***

 

As evening turned to morning in Three Hills City, the market sprang to life, buzzing with energy more than ever before. The Lord of the city had granted Lansius' army free entry, attracting camp followers and off-duty troops into the city's welcoming arms. Despite the initial surprise and caution regarding the presence of a large army, the locals could not turn away the influx of customers, and so far, there had been no problems.

They flocked through the gates, their footsteps echoing on the cobblestones, drawn by the promise of leisure and commerce. Instead of fear, the atmosphere was charged with excitement and a sense of camaraderie. The aromas of fresh bread, spices, and smoked meats from the food stalls tantalized the nose.

Laughter and chatter filled the air, mixing with the calls of merchants hawking their wares—from shimmering fabrics to intricate trinkets that caught the morning light.

While most Nicopolans hadn't been paid as per their agreement in the fields of Korimor, they were given their share of plunder from their victories in South Hill. Although it wasn't a significant amount, it was more than enough for them to indulge themselves.

Many, having already secured what they needed in South Hill, chose to eat heartily. Others, in search of sturdier or correctly sized footwear, were drawn to Three Hills' renowned cobblers' alley. This bustling lane was lined with shops displaying boots of all sizes and styles, from repaired second-hand to new finely crafted riding boots. The air was rich with the smell of leather and wax, as cobblers and apprentices busied themselves with their craft, offering not just new footwear but also repairs and custom fittings to all who had cash in their pockets.

Meanwhile, behind closed doors, Lord Lansius' staff arrived early to purchase winter seeds for South Hill. The group, consisting of the city's biggest merchants, had entertained Dame Daniella and Sterling, who acted on their Lord's behalf.

As soon as pleasantries were over, they got down to business. As they went through the list approved by the Lord of Korelia himself, the merchants were surprised to learn that Lord Lansius wasn't going to buy a lot of grain for the upcoming campaign.

"Just winter seeds? Not even flour for the upcoming campaign?" one of the merchants, clad in a silver fur coat, was surprised.

Dame Daniella furrowed her brow, looked him in the eyes, and deftly replied, "We have enough grain and flour in South Hill. What made you think we need to purchase more?"

Another merchant, more plump but with better articulation, quipped, "Surely, it's a good approach to stock more food in case the campaign goes, say, unexpectedly?"

The Dame smiled. "We have assurances from the Lord of Three Hills that the city's granary has enough if we need assistance. Furthermore..." She looked around to ensure they were the only ones in the chamber and no servant was in sight.

Her reaction prompted Sterling to head to the door, exit, and close it behind him. Noticing this, the merchants grew anticipatory.

"My Lord has confided in me that the campaign will likely be a brief one," Daniella hinted.

The merchants shook their heads in disbelief. Many of them had thought to make a profit after learning that the Lord of Korelia was heading to Umberland. Due to the unexpected good harvest in Three Hills, they had quite a surplus this year. And because Lord Jorge's administration lacked effective oversight, many landowners retained a significant portion of the harvest for themselves, resulting in these surpluses ending up in the merchants' holdings.

Until now, they had kept this grain surplus to themselves to prevent prices from plummeting. Ironically, they had pinned their hopes on Lord Lansius to purchase their grain and get rid of the surplus. However, it turned out Lord Lansius had more than enough and that the campaign was only expected to be short.

"Unbelievable," one of the merchants commented on the situation.

"But it's the Lord of Korelia we're talking about," the plump merchant joyously chortled.

Other merchants, both old and young, could only exhale nervously. Lady Daniella's presence prevented them from freely expressing their frustration.

Noticing their troubled looks, Dame Daniella offered a diplomatic suggestion, "Look, Lord Lansius is not only a good warlord; he's also a businessman at heart."

Her words attracted everyone's attention. They had heard rumors about the Lord making sound business decisions and started to feel a bit of hope.

The Dame continued, "I'm sure you've heard that Lord Lansius never treats merchants with contempt. He never confiscates merchants' wealth or gets jealous of their profit. He often said: profit makes the world go round."

"Not to offend you, Dame, but this sounds too good to be true," the plump merchant commented lightly.

"You can ask him yourself if you want. I think I can arrange for two people to meet the Lord personally," she suddenly offered.

Everyone glanced at each other. The chance of meeting with the most powerful man in Lowlandia was a great opportunity.

The plump merchant stepped forward, locking gazes with his comrades, and declared, "As your representative, I will go—"

"Fat chance. You have no business that the Lord will need," a wise-looking old man retorted. Turning to Daniella, he added, "Others here will, at best, be intermediaries. You would be better off inviting me, as I have—"

"Your product quality will embarrass us all, old man," the plump man's friend supported him.

"I am sure—" the plump man attempted to reclaim the discussion but was quickly silenced by his now rivals.

"The old man is right. Your selection of goods is even inferior to mine," another merchant interjected.

Then, another merchant stood, boldly declaring, "It is I who am fit to accompany the old man."

"Nonsense! You are not even a guild member!"

Dame Daniella let out a deep sigh as if troubled. However, in reality, this was exactly what she had wanted.

 

***

 

Dragoon's Camp

Since morning, Lansius' army of clerks and scribes, recruited from Korelia, Korimor, and now South Hill, had been working diligently. This was the first time they did not need to march, so they returned to their work, calculating, keeping records, making payments, and managing inventory.

They were the ones who worked tirelessly to ensure that everything was accounted for. Lansius' demand for year-round payments was making good record-keeping a necessity.

And they were the ones who made this possible. The corps, originally formed by Servius and Dame Daniella, was now under Lansius' supervision.

Their work and their lord's full support kept their troops in good shape. Desertion was minimal, even among the Nicopolans who had taken an oath at the plains of Korimor not to seek payment in exchange for food, safety, and shelter.

After the victory in South Hill, Lansius instructed that payments be made to units that had proven themselves in combat. This was as much a reward as it was Lansius' strategy to maintain his influence over his men and ensure their loyalty. After all, as Lord Arte once told him: People fight for their own interests. A man who asks for nothing cannot be trusted.

While Lansius oversaw their work from afar, Sterling entered the tent. "My Lord, My Lady," he greeted.

"Ah, you've returned," Lansius said from his seat inside the command tent.

"The merchants' representative is here to see you."

"Well done. Was it difficult?" Lansius asked.

"Not at all. They're very pleased with this opportunity."

Lansius nodded, delighted. "Then, tell them to wait. I'll send word when I'm ready to receive them."

Sterling bowed his head and left the command tent.

Audrey took a sip from her goblet and said, "Let me handle this."

Lansius gazed at her. "Pardon...?"

"You heard me," she replied lightly. "You don't need to do everything by yourself. Lady Daniella will be there, and since this is merely gossiping about the nobles and landlords, I'll be more than capable."

Lansius was surprised but pleased by her initiative. "You're a better reader of character than I am. I think you'll do just fine."

"Gratitude for the praise," Audrey smiled. "Then, when will I need to meet them?"

"Let them wait a little... We don't want to seem as if we're desperate to see them," Lansius explained. With that matter settled, he returned to his scrolls at the table, reviewing them. Audrey, too, returned to her reading—a compilation of wise words she had been trying to memorize to avoid looking like a country bumpkin in front of her subjects.

Just as they were about to take a break, Sir Harold entered the tent with an ominous tone. "My Lord, My Lady."

Lansius could sense trouble in his voice. "What's the matter?"

"It's the Black Knight's Captain, Sir Morton. He's asked for a private audience," the tall knight explained.

"Sir Morton?" Lansius asked, turning to Audrey.

"I wasn't aware of this," she explained, then gazed at Carla.

"No one was, My Lady. Yesterday, when he came with the guards to escort Lord Jorge to the city, he said nothing beyond pleasantries."

Lansius looked at his knight. "What do you think he wants from us?"

"I tried to pry, but he said it's a private matter," Sir Harold stated, without concealing his disdain.

Lansius glanced at Audrey, who nodded in understanding.

Rising from his seat, Lansius decided, "Well, we need to kill some time; might as well entertain Sir Morton." He then muttered to himself, "O feared Mage Knight, what tidings will you bring to us?"

 

***

 

Chapter 123

Mentor

 

The Lord of Korelia's Camp

Sir Morton, the Black Knight Captain, clad in a stylish black brigandine, was escorted to the Lord's command tent. His request for an audience had been granted.

Walking at a leisurely pace and flanked by several guards, the mage knight entered the Lord of Korelia's command tent. "My Lord, My Lady, gratitude for granting me this opportunity," he said formally.

"Sir Morton, it's good to see you again," Lansius responded warmly.

Audrey added, "May we ask, for what reason do we have the pleasure of your presence today?"

"My Lady, as I promised before in Korelia, I'll be introducing a good mentor."

Lansius and Audrey exchanged glances. Audrey nodded once, and Lansius motioned for his squires and guards to take a break.

When they hesitated, Audrey reassured them, "Go on, I'll be more than enough."

The guards and squires bowed their heads and exited the tent, joining the corps of scribes and clerks who had already taken a break from their duties.

Now alone, Lansius asked, "This mentor, is she a mage?"

Sir Morton answered, "The mentor will be under disguise; she always is. You can regard her as an educator, and none will suspect anything."

Lansius exhaled deeply, aware of Audrey's gaze on him. "Pardon me for being blunt, Sir Morton. But do we have any guarantee she will cause us no harm?"

"Unfortunately, only indirectly, My Lord." The guest paused, gauging Lansius' reaction before explaining, "The Mage Guild seeks to foster good relations with a rising star of Lowlandia. They even wondered if My Lord would become a patron in exchange for a mage in your service."

"So I am a potential client," he mused.

"I believe the Guild wanted to be at your side, My Lord."

Lansius nodded and turned to catch Audrey's glance. Despite her neutral expression, he understood her thoughts. "Very well, Sir Morton. Arrange for her to meet us, hopefully soon, as we are departing in two days."

"She's already in the city. It would be best if My Lord wrote an invitation letter for her, so she could make her way here and introduce herself."

Lansius nodded, and Audrey stood, walking halfway to the entrance and calling for a scribe while keeping an eye on Sir Morton.

Instead of a scribe, Sir Harold dashed inside, hand on his hilt. "Yes? Oh, a scribe, just a moment," he said, managing a smile.

The mage knight smiled at this, commenting, "You have plenty of loyal men at your side."

"Gratitude and I apologize for my men's reaction."

"Think nothing of it, My Lord."

As Audrey was dictating the invitation letter, Lansius suddenly asked his guest, "Tell me, what is she like?"

"I only know her briefly, but she is among the most experienced in the guild."

Lansius leaned forward. "Sir Morton, I do not wish to sound rude, but are there any quirks, a short temper, or anything else I should be aware of?"

Sir Morton smiled. "She bears the demeanor of a mentor, not a fighter. Also, I've heard she wishes to retire to a vineyard and still needs quite a sum to achieve that."

Hearing such a hint, Lansius felt somewhat relieved. At least now I know where her goal lies.

 

***

 

Before midday, Sir Morton had returned to Three Hills City. His audience was brief, yet it sparked considerable gossip. While most speculated it was likely an official errand on behalf of the Lord of Three Hills, others speculated that the mage knight was on a mission of atonement for his actions in the battle of Korelia, where he had slain the famed Sir Callahan.

While the dragoons and cavalry were busy gossiping during their downtime, Lady Audrey presided over a meeting with the merchant representative. No deal was to be made, just a simple meet and greet.

In the Baroness' presence, Dame Daniella skillfully inquired about the nobles and landlords of Three Hills. With just a hint of encouragement from the Lady and the aid of hard liquor, the merchants were more than willing to share their extensive knowledge of connections.

As she had little knowledge of Three Hills, Audrey relied on Daniella to crosscheck the information she obtained from the merchants. The Dame's stay and past dealings in Three Hills had been invaluable, as she already had a good understanding of the hierarchy of Three Hills' landlords and their factions.

Before midday, they had completed their meetings. With Lady Daniella by her side, they returned to Lansius to deliver their reports.

"So, what did you learn from the merchants?" Lansius eagerly asked.

"There are lots of knights and esquires families, but according to the merchants, only three stand out," Audrey began, then turned to Daniella. "I am sure the Dame could explain more about them."

"Of course, My Lady." Then to Lansius, Daniella reported, "They are, respectively, the moneylender, the winery, and the jeweler."

Lansius nodded. "I assume their profitable business enabled them to amass private lands for crops."

"Indeed, My Lord. These three always show up when I talk about powerful nobles in the city besides the ruling House. The person who controls the winery is-"

Lansius raised his hand to stop Daniella. "It might sound odd, but in this process, the less I know, the better."

Daniella looked puzzled but nodded. Audrey chose to trust her instinct and listened attentively.

"From those three, which one is showing grand ambition?" Lansius asked.

Daniella pondered for a moment before admitting, "It is rather hard to tell."

"Which of them is currently building, or has recently completed, an opulent residence that rivals the Lord's palace?" Lansius guided her. "Which one was mentioned by the merchant as wearing dresses to rival those of the nobles, or whom the merchants spoke of in high regard or with a hint of fear? Who among them exhibits jealousy towards the ruling class?"

Daniella paused, reflecting on her thoughts, before responding, "The House engaged in moneylending fits your criteria. The merchant shared tales of their family manor, lavish with fine marbles, bronze sculptures, and gold ornaments. I've also heard that their banquets are always decadent."

Lansius took a moment before asking, "Did the merchant describe the current House leader as smart and industrious?"

Stolen from its original source, this story is not meant to be on Amazon; report any sightings.

Daniella's eyes flickered, trying to recall the conversation. "Despite their fear of him, the merchants seem to regard him as a rich fool, one who fancies only leisurely pursuits like collecting horses and exotic foods."

"Ambitious, not bright, and lazy," Lansius profiled the moneylender House.

The two noted the three criteria Lansius mentioned.

"Then, what about the winery House?" he inquired.

Audrey decided to answer, "The winery House also shows some ambition. He is successful and keeps expanding the family business. The merchants talk about his new manor and vineyard."

Lansius squinted his eyes. "I was not aware that Three Hills has suitable land to grow grapes."

"They do not. Their vineyard is located further from town, near the plateau that leads to the Umberland mountain pass," Audrey clarified.

"Ah," Lansius muttered. "So, the winery House leader is ambitious, smart, and industrious."

"He is probably the most competent of them all," Daniella agreed. "Well spoken, well connected, and people like him."

"You're implying he's the most dangerous one?" he asked.

"It might be just my intuition, but I believe he is the most influential and possibly the most likely candidate to lead a coup."

"Not so fast." Lansius broke a smile. "How about the last House?"

Daniella exchanged glances with Audrey before reporting, "We keep hearing that the jeweler House is the worst. The current head abandoned his training after his father's death and now only bothers with poetry, drinking, and gambling."

Lansius rubbed his chin in contemplation. "What do his peers say about him? Do we know anything about him being ambitious?"

Audrey pondered but shook her head. Daniella reacted the same and said, "We do not have any clue about his ambition."

Lansius crossed his arms, and Audrey ventured, "I dare say, he's not ambitious. The merchants seem to have nothing good to say about the man."

Hearing that, Lansius leaned back in his chair.

This prompted Audrey to ask, "Does that mean everyone with ambition poses a threat?"

"Not necessarily. It's just that people without ambition generally do not cause trouble," Lansius paused, then added, "Ambition is good when paired with intelligence." He looked at Dame Daniella. "Being ambitious, smart, and industrious are ideal traits for a command staff."

The dame blushed slightly at the praise but remained composed.

Turning back to Audrey, Lansius asked, "Based on the three criteria, who, in your opinion, poses the greatest danger among the three?"

"The moneylender House is ambitious, not intelligent, and lazy. It is a dangerous combination," Audrey assessed.

Lansius then turned his gaze to Daniella.

"The winery House is ambitious, intelligent, and industrious. I say he is the most dangerous," Daniella gave her view.

Lansius smiled, "Both views are valid. The Jeweler poses the least concern, so indeed it's between the Moneylender and the Winery."

"Shall we summon them here?" Audrey proposed.

Exhaling deeply, he shook his head. "I think not. Ironically, inviting them here will give them more credence." He then turned to Daniella and instructed, "Work with Farkas and try to get more information from these two Houses."

"Understood," she affirmed.

"Focus on the Moneylender House," he added.

The two women raised their eyebrows. Noticing this, Lansius clarified, "I think our fear of the Winery is mostly baseless. He might be ambitious, but he is also smart, and industrious. I see nothing wrong with that."

"Why focus on the moneylender then?" Daniella inquired.

"As the Lady has said, the moneylender possesses a dangerous combination: ambitious, dumb, and lazy."

Daniella was puzzled. "Smart and industrious isn't dangerous, but dumb and lazy is?"

"A lazy fool without ambition will pose no danger. In fact, a happy fool like me is the fabric of society. We are naturally good subjects, perfect for farmers, servants, footmen, or any other roles."

Audrey chuckled upon hearing his quip.

"My Lord, please don't belittle yourself like that," Daniella responded.

Lansius chuckled before turning serious, "However, laziness coupled with ambition is never a good mix. Such a person dreams of grandeur but is too lazy to put forth the real effort required to achieve it. They will look for shortcuts to success. Jealousy, lies, sabotage, and even coups become their tools of choice. We'll do well to protect our House from this kind of person."

Daniella nodded in agreement, and Audrey took it to heart.

"Find out if the moneylender House has in the past tried to arrange a marriage with House Jorge or any of its allies. Also, ascertain the extent of his forces. Does he wield any influence over the city's guards, or have clout with thugs and troublemakers? He'll need muscle if he wants to start a coup."

"My Lord, collecting such information will take a lot of time," Daniella warned.

"Indeed," Lansius sighed, almost resigning. He knew he needed patience and time to solve this but had to march in two days. "I dislike this, but it seems this matter will remain unresolved by the time we depart."

 

***

 

Following Lord Lansius' instructions, Dame Daniella gathered information on the two Houses. Early reports revealed that the moneylender House was in its fifth generation of Esquires. The current head is known for his ambition, often speaking about how well he could rule if he had been born a high noble.

More concerning was the news that his sister had once been offered to Sir Arius, but the arrangement fell through. Coupled with reports of a large number of armed men and influence in various sectors of the city guard, this information alarmed Lansius enough to assign additional men and equipment to Daniella.

Unexpectedly, Lord Jorge readily gave his permission, and it was decided that Daniella would not join the campaign to Umberland but would instead remain stationed in Three Hills with two hundred Nicopolans.

Lansius had hoped for a larger garrison but was cautious of risking the ire of the populace, who had yet to trust him fully. This situation could potentially be exploited by the perpetrator to rally the crowd against him.

On the last night before departure, Lansius wrote a letter to the moneylender, suggesting cooperation and proposing ideas for lending or banking services among Grand Alliance members.

"Do you think this will work?" Audrey asked after the scribe had left, leaving them with the important letter on the table.

"It's probably futile," Lansius admitted as he inspected the letter, finding it to be of high quality. "Such a man is unlikely to be intelligent and industrious enough to realize the potential. However, I hope it might distract the House enough to prevent them from launching a coup in Lord Jorge's absence."

Audrey patted Lansius' shoulder, saying, "Don't doubt yourself. This letter might be more effective than a large garrison."

Lansius smiled at her comment. "Let's hope so."

"Ah, I forgot to ask." Her gaze fixed on him. "I heard from Carla that you declined the merchant's offer. Are they still quoting a bad price?"

"Not at all. They offered a fair price," Lansius replied.

"Then why refuse?"

"I'm merely acting as expected. If they offered me a price and I readily agreed, then it would seem as though there's a plot at play. I'm simply showing that we might or might not need it. By giving them some doubt, I hope to save us from a price hike later on."

Audrey pouted, reflecting, "True. We still need a lot of grain to defend Umberland."

"Correct. We're not just taking Umberland but defending it through winter and spring. We'll need a lot of grain to survive. That's why securing a solid, long-term contract is crucial, not a half-baked one."

Audrey sighed. "Thinking about the grain situation makes me want to eat even more."

"Permission granted," Lansius quipped.

Audrey chuckled at his jest.

They were having their supper and not expecting anyone when Carla entered the inner part of the tent. "My Lord, My Lady."

"Yes, what is it?" Audrey inquired.

"Sterling mentioned the guards have someone with your invitation," Carla reported.

...

 

Escorted by Sterling, a woman in her late forties, decked in lustrous grey attire, entered the tent. She carried no staff or wand, only a traveling bag. A similarly fashionable headscarf covered her brown hair. Her clothing and makeup helped maintain some of her youthful appearance.

She stood and glanced at Lansius only briefly, appearing stunned. The sight of his black hair might have been unexpected or noteworthy to her.

"Introduce yourself," Sterling urged.

"My Lord, My Lady, I am Ingrid, an educator from East Centuria."

"East Centurian, huh," Audrey muttered before asking, "What subjects do you teach?"

"I am well versed in etiquette, poetry, and also medicine."

"That's a vast range of knowledge," Audrey said approvingly.

Watching them, Lansius said to Sterling and Carla, "Please prepare a tent for her, and then you can take a break."

After the squires had left, Audrey said to Ingrid, "Sir Morton spoke highly of you."

"Gratitude, My Lady. Sir Morton is a prodigy. The guild hoped, he has showcased how beneficial a member of our guild can be to your force."

Lansius exhaled sharply. "Indeed, he has, although, unfortunately, it was against my own forces."

"My condolences," Ingrid bowed her head apologetically.

"There's no enmity between us and Sir Morton anymore, so please," Lansius gestured for her to proceed.

"Gratitude, My Lord. The guild instructed me to serve as a mentor for the Lady, and I'll also be working in a limited capacity as a mage until you decide to become a patron."

"What will happen if I become a patron?"

"Available candidates will be trained for your service."

Lansius and Audrey exchanged glances. Before they could react, Ingrid took something from her purse and offered it with both hands to the hosts. The small object, possibly a ring or a necklace, was inside a small purple velvet envelope. "A gift of a jewel from the guild. A gemstone of might as a token of the guild's confidence in your rule in Lowlandia."

Audrey, out of caution, grabbed Lansius' hand, asking the mentor, "I've never heard of this."

"It is a rare item, only found on the old continent. It will grant the wearer momentary power akin to that of a mage, though only physically."

Audrey took the velvet envelope and opened it, revealing a small, inconspicuous gem-encrusted silver necklace. "Why would the guild readily part with such a valued object?" she asked as she inspected it.

"Because they learned from Sir Morton about your grand plan to pacify Lowlandia. The guild wishes to lend their support to your endeavor."

Lansius was intrigued. "But why? Why would a powerful guild have interest in a no-man's-land like Lowlandia?"

Ingrid seemed troubled by the question. She had the answer but had yet to decide whether she could trust the Lord and Lady. Unexpectedly, the Lord of Lowlandia wasn't distracted by the promise of a mage in service or even by rare magical items that should appease even the most powerful men.

 

***

 

